,docs,label,doc_vec
0,"     But Thomas, who has risen in Republican ranks as an advocate of bootstrap
conservatism, would present a striking change from Marshall, a civil-rights
pioneer and an anchor of the court's declining liberal faction.;    Thomas,
barely half the age of the man whose seat he was named to fill, came of age in
the world that Marshall helped create.;    Now the question is to what extent
Thomas would add weight to the court's new majority that appears willing to
dismantle important parts of the legacy that Marshall helped to build.;   
While not much is known about Thomas' views on most issues likely to come
before the court, he has made clear his opposition to affirmative action and
to policies that can be viewed as incorporating quotas or racial preferences.;
   Opposes affirmative action;  In his year as a federal appeals court judge,
he has not ruled on affirmative action, but he has long been outspoken in
taking the position that government affirmative-action programs are not only
unwise but unconstitutional.;    However, in other respects, this nomination
is very much a wild card both for conservatives who jumped instantly to
embrace it and for liberals whose responses ranged from cautious to hostile.; 
  His views on other major issues before the court, including abortion,
church-state relations and the definition of constitutional due process, are
unknown. Those views may well remain unknown through a confirmation process
that may be contentious but that in the end is not likely to derail the
nomination.;    Studied for priesthood;  Thomas attended Roman Catholic
schools through college and studied for the priesthood. Although the Catholic
Church vigorously opposes abortion, Thomas has apparently never taken a public
position on abortion or on the dimensions of the constitutional right to
privacy, on which the right to abortion was based.;    His position on
affirmative action is probably sufficient to shift the court's direction since
the court remains closely divided.;    ""My opposition to preferences and
quotas not only is a constitutional, legal opposition, it has been a moral,
ethical opposition,"" he said five years ago at a conference sponsored by the
Anti-Defamation League of B'nai B'rith.;    In its most recent
affirmative-action decision, a year ago, the court split 5-4 in upholding a
Federal Communications Commission policy that gives preference to blacks and
members of other minorities in acquiring some radio and television licenses.; 
  Justice William Brennan wrote that decision a few weeks before he retired
from the court. Marshall joined it. The views of Justice David Souter,
Brennan's successor, remain largely unknown.;    Views on big issues unknown; 
Thomas' views on the other major issues remain unknown, although the 1990
confirmation hearing for his seat on the Court of Appeals was widely viewed on
Capitol Hill and in ideological interest groups as a rehearsal for a Supreme
Court nomination.;    Some Democratic senators said at the time and again
Monday that their votes to confirm him for the appeals court should not be
taken as endorsements for the Supreme Court.;    Three years ago, the Senate
denied confirmation to Judge Robert Bork despite having voted to confirm him
only a few years earlier to the same court on which Thomas now sits.;   
Leaders of abortion rights groups said Monday that they would press the Senate
to deny confirmation to Thomas unless he expresses his support for the Supreme
Court's abortion precedents, including continued adherence to Roe vs. Wade,
the 1973 ruling that established the constitutional right to abortion.;   
Abortion faction speaks out;  ""The Souter model of silence and evasion that we
saw last year is absolutely unacceptable,"" said Kate Michelman, executive
director of the National Abortion Rights Action League.;    Her reference was
to Souter's confirmation hearing last September, during which the nominee
gracefully but firmly deflected questions on abortion.;    Sen. Howard
Metzenbaum, an Ohio Democrat who serves on the Judiciary Committee, endorsed
Michelman's position.;    ""I'm through reading tea leaves and voting in the
dark,"" he said.;    But the Judiciary Committee includes some of the most
conservative Democrats in the Senate as well several combative Republican
conservatives. If Thomas maintains his silence, his nomination is unlikely to
founder on the abortion issue alone.;    Rights groups cautious;  Civil rights
groups took a cautious tone Monday, essentially noting ""concerns"" and saying
they would study the record.;    ""We urge the Senate not to rush to judgment,""
said a statement from a Leadership Conference on Civil Rights, an umbrella
group of 185 organizations that took an early and leading role in the defeat
of the Bork nomination.;    Introducing his nominee to the country at a
televised news conference Monday, Bush drew on the powerful appeal of Thomas'
life story as a self-motivated and self-made success.;    ""Judge Thomas' life
is a model for all Americans,"" Bush said.;    At his side stood a black man
who was 5 years old when Marshall won his Supreme Court argument in Brown vs.
the Board of Education and who was a college freshman when Marshall joined the
Supreme Court.;    That was a generation ago, when the court was still
rewriting the ground rules by which Americans were to live their lives. Well
before Bush presented Thomas to the country Monday, it was clear that that
chapter in the court's history is largely closed and that a new page was about
to be turned. After Monday's nomination, some -- but by no means all -- of the
blanks on that page have been filled in.; CLARENCE THOMAS; Born: June 23,
1948, in Pinpoint, Ga.; Education: B.A. from Holy Cross College, 1971; J.D.
from Yale Law School, 1974.; Career:; (box) 1974-'77: assistant attorney
general, state of Missouri; (box) 1977-'79: attorney, Monsanto Co.; (box)
1979-'81: legislative assistant to Sen. John Danforth, R-Mo.; (box) 1981-'82:
assistant secretary for civil rights, Education Department; (box) 1982-'90:
chairman of the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission; (box) 1990-: U.S.
Circuit Court of Appeals for District of Columbia; Source: Who's Who Among
Black Americans; WHAT'S NEXT?; Now that President Bush has nominated Clarence
Thomas to the Supreme Court, the next step is up to the Senate.; (box)The
Senate Judiciary Committee is expected to begin confirmation hearings in
September, after the August recess.; (box)After the committee makes a
recommendation, the nomination will be voted on by the full Senate.; (box)If
confirmed promptly, Thomas could be on the Supreme Court by the time it begins
hearing cases in October.;    Source: Mercury News Wire Services  ",1,"[ 0.52714758  0.01446055  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
1,"     But Sen. Howard Metzenbaum, D-Ohio, said the Senate Judiciary Committee, in
confirming four justices without learning how they felt about abortion, has
""given them a free ride"" and should be tougher in ferreting out Thomas'
views.;    ""The failure to give an answer may cause me and others to be
unwilling to vote for his confirmation,"" Metzenbaum said on ""CBS This
Morning."";    Sen. Arlen Specter, R-Pa., noted that Metzenbaum did not press
Justice David Souter during confirmation hearings about his position on
abortion. ""I do not think it is appropriate to ask a nominee the ultimate
question as to how he is going to decide a specific case,"" Specter said.;   
""I will not support yet another Reagan-Bush Supreme Court nominee who remains
silent on a woman's right to choose, and then ascends to the court to weaken
that right,"" said Metzenbaum, the only member of the Judiciary Committee who
voted against Thomas' nomination to the Circuit Court of Appeals to the
District of Columbia.;    Sen. Orrin Hatch, R-Utah, said on NBC's ""Today"" show
that ""literally nobody nominated for the Supreme Court should give his or her
views with regard to cases that might come up in the future."";    But Sen.
Patrick Leahy, D-Vt., said ""in the past few months alone the Supreme Court is
throwing out past decisions, and I think it is legitimate to ask Judge Thomas,
what do you think of settled law, like Roe vs. Wade (legitimatizing abortion),
what do you think of a woman's right to privacy, free speech issues, issues of
freedom of religion."";    Civil rights groups have opposed Thomas on grounds
he was insensitive to the concerns of minorities and the elderly as chairman
of the federal Equal Employment Opportunities Commission in the 1980s.;   
""The fact that he is an African-American should not be a basis for avoiding
very careful scrutiny of his civil rights record,"" said Julius L. Chambers,
director of the NAACP Legal Defense and Education Fund.;    While some
Democrats immediately blasted the nomination, the party's biggest guns held
their fire.;    Judiciary Committee Chairman Joseph Biden, D-Del.; Senate
Majority Leader George Mitchell, D-Maine; and Sen. Edward M. Kennedy, D-Mass.,
all promised a thorough review of the nomination.;    Confirmation hearings
are expected to begin after Congress' August recess.;    Thomas, 43, would
strengthen the 6-3 conservative majority on the nine member court. An
unabashed conservative, he would succeed the court's leading liberal -- and
first and only black justice.;    Bush rejected suggestions that he chose
Thomas because he wanted to keep a black in that seat.;    ""I kept my word to
the American people and to the Senate by picking the best man for the job on
the merits. And the fact he's minority, so much the better,"" Bush said at a
news conference outside his vacation home in Kennebunkport, Maine.;   
Potential opponents of the nominee promised in their statements to ignore
Thomas' race when they examine his record.;    ""The background of Judge
Clarence Thomas is less important than his views and what they mean to
protecting our constitutional rights,"" said Sen. Paul Simon, D-Ill.;    When
head of the EEOC during the Reagan administration, Thomas ""seemed to go out of
his way to find ways to weaken some of the basic civil rights protections,""
said Simon, a member of the Senate Judiciary Committee.;    On a number of
occasions Thomas has expressed objections to racial quotas. In a 1985
statement, Thomas said, ""Federal enforcement agencies . . . turned the
statutes on their heads by requiring discrimination in the form of hiring and
promotion quotas, so-called goals and timetables."";    In a 1987 article for
the Yale Law &amp; Policy Review he referred to affirmative action as ""social
engineering."";    ""I don't want my vote to contribute to an increasingly large
and conservative anti-choice majority on the Supreme Court,"" said Sen. Alan
Cranston, D-Calif.;    Thomas said he looked forward to the confirmation
process ""and to be an example to those who are where I was, and to show them
that, indeed, there is hope."";    Thomas declined to answer questions about
his legal views until his hearings.; WHAT'S NEXT?; Now that President Bush has
nominated Clarence Thomas to the Supreme Court, the next step is up to the
Senate.; (box)The Senate Judiciary Committee is expected to begin confirmation
hearings in September, after the August recess.; (box)After the committee
makes a recommendation, the nomination will be voted on by the full Senate.;
(box)If confirmed promptly, Thomas could be on the Supreme Court by the time
it begins hearing cases in October.;    Source: Mercury News Wire Services;
CLARENCE THOMAS; Born: June 23, 1948, in Pinpoint, Ga.; Education: B.A. from
Holy Cross College, 1971; J.D. from Yale Law School, 1974.; Career:; (box)
1974-'77: assistant attorney general, state of Missouri; (box) 1977-'79:
attorney, Monsanto Co.; (box) 1979-'81: legislative assistant to Sen. John
Danforth, R-Mo.; (box) 1981-'82: assistant secretary for civil rights,
Education Department; (box) 1982-'90: chairman of the Equal Employment
Opportunity Commission; (box) 1990-: U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals for
District of Columbia; Source: Who's Who Among Black Americans  ",1,"[ 0.51995743  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
2,"     There, in the segregated black Georgia of four decades past, began the
toughening of Clarence Thomas, nominee to the United States Supreme Court.;   
Abandoned by his father, driven by his hard-eyed grandfather and a band of
nuns sent south to teach black children, young Clarence learned sharecropping
and scholarship, hard labor and the Latin mass, and how to survive the walk
home through black Savannah in his Catholic school uniform.;    From these
roots, he might have become one of any number of bright, activist black men to
rise out of Southern poverty and press a politically aggressive liberal agenda
of civil rights and affirmative action -- as did men like Thurgood Marshall,
the retiring justice whose Supreme Court seat Thomas might take.;    Instead,
Thomas, now 43, became something else -- a hybrid product of harsh Southern
history and baby-boom ambition, a proponent of personal strength over
dependence, of individualism over government activism.;    By the time he
arrived in Washington with the Reagan administration, he had developed into a
rare breed -- a black conservative so impressive to Republican presidents that
he was set on the road to the highest court in the land. But he was so
disturbing to traditional liberals that they are eager to deprive him of
Senate confirmation in September.;    Historically, trying to predict Supreme
Court nominees has been extremely risky. Still, many liberals are convinced
that Thomas' past clearly shows his future. He would, they say, oppose
abortion rights, school busing plans and affirmative action programs. He would
also weaken the wall separating government and religion and further restrict
the rights of criminal suspects and defendants.;    Not surprisingly, Thomas'
many friends and supporters draw different conclusions. They see him as an
independent spirit, a probable centrist on a court that has been steering
rightward for several years.;    The Georgia beginning;  But any attempt to
understand the potential successor to the revered Thurgood Marshall must begin
in Georgia.;    There, just the other day, Leola Williams, Thomas' mother,
talked about how the force of family worked on her son:;    ""Clarence was
surrounded by all our older parents. He saw how our family and other people
struggled to make a living.;    ""I guess Clarence wanted to prove to himself
he could be what he wanted to be -- and prove to his grandfather he could be
the kind of person (his grandfather) wanted him to be."";    The grandfather,
the late Myers Anderson, began training Thomas in earnest when the boy was 9
and Leola Williams' life suddenly began coming apart. Her house off Pin Point
Avenue had gone up in smoke, and some months later, her husband went north to
Philadelphia, leaving her with two young children and a third on the way.;   
Williams took her daughter, Emma Mae, and moved in with an aunt while she
awaited the birth of her second son, Myers. Clarence went to live with his
grandparents in Savannah, to help with Anderson's year-round oil and ice
delivery business.;    His grandfather proved to be a profound force in
Thomas' life -- a mentor, a role model, an unrelenting taskmaster and the
embodiment of a personal philosophy that Thomas once recalled this way:;   
""He used to tell me that there was no problem that elbow grease couldn't
solve. Then he'd say, 'Old Man Can't is dead. I helped bury him.' "";    When
Anderson wasn't coaching Thomas, in his farm fields or on his delivery truck,
he made sure the lessons continued, in the hands of the Franciscan nuns of
all-black St. Benedict the Moor School.;    Thomas, who had experienced racial
mistreatment by white seminarians in Georgia, ultimately rejected seminary
life. He has identified an episode at Immaculate Conception Seminary in
Conception, Mo., in 1968 as the final humiliation. He said he heard a
seminarian there react to the shooting of Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. by
saying, ""Good, I hope the son of a bitch dies."";    Thomas left the seminary
and went north to enroll at Holy Cross College in the gritty New England
factory city of Worcester, Mass.;    A Southerner in New England;  The
Southern farm boy was forced to endure not only the harsh winters of New
England, but also the chilly atmosphere of a white college just beginning to
widen opportunities for blacks.;    Within days of King's assassination, the
school created a scholarship fund named after the civil-rights leader and
stepped up the recruiting of blacks. And so Thomas, who was driven from the
Missouri seminary by racism, became one of the beneficiaries of an effort to
combat it.;    Thomas, who paid for his college education with loans, jobs and
the newly raised scholarship funds, soon was drawn into the turbulence of
Vietnam War and ""black power"" politics.;    He helped found a Black Student
Union, writing and typing its constitution. In December 1969, he and other
black students resigned to protest the suspensions of black students who had
blocked a General Electric recruiter on campus. Stung, school officials
granted a blanket amnesty and the students returned.;    Thomas went on to run
track and write for the campus newspaper. He graduated from Holy Cross with
honors and left for Yale University Law School in New Haven, Conn.;   
Freewheeling liberalism;  ""He came into law school espousing liberal views
from his freewheeling, unattached undergraduate days,"" said Harry Singleton, a
black classmate, close friend and a former civil rights official in the Reagan
Education Department.;    ""But he became more conservative as he went through
the process of legal education."";    Yale law students, Singleton explained,
were exposed to conservative law professors with powerful minds.;    ""I used
to discuss conservative ideas with Clarence and he was interested in them,""
Singleton said. ""They were about the dangers of big government trying to solve
all the ills of society and how every time you do that you take away from the
liberties of the people."";    But it was Thomas Sowell, the conservative black
economist now at Stanford University's Hoover Institution, whose work came to
grip Thomas' mind.;    Shortly after his arrival at Yale, Thomas remembered
when someone gave him one of Sowell's books and ""I threw it in the trash""
because ""it really went against all the things we'd been indoctrinated to
believe about the radical movement and the peace movement."";    But after law
school, Thomas rediscovered one of Sowell's books. Sowell's provocative 1983
work, ""The Economics and Politics of Race,"" was ""manna from heaven,"" Thomas
said.;    In that book, Sowell, arguing from a laissez-faire perspective,
endorsed the notion that blacks would benefit more from pursuing economic
achievement than political agitation.;    From Yale to Washington;  Thomas,
always a top student, was recruited out of Yale in 1974 by John Danforth,
R-Mo., then Missouri attorney general, a Yale trustee and a frequent campus
visitor. Danforth brought Thomas to Jefferson City, Mo., to work in the
attorney general's office.;    When Danforth became a U.S. senator in 1977,
Thomas stayed in St. Louis to work as an assistant counsel for the Monsanto
Corp., then in 1979 joined Danforth in Washington as a legislative aide.;   
Reagan administration officials were so impressed by Thomas and his new
conservative leanings that they appointed him assistant secretary for civil
rights in the Department of Education. In 1982, they promoted him to the more
visible post of chairman of the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission. There
controversy dogged him for the next eight years.;    Congress learned in 1989
that the EEOC under Thomas' direction had permitted more than 13,000 age
discrimination claims to lapse.;    Civil-rights groups accused Thomas of
failing to enforce other anti-discrimination laws as well, and of retaliating
against employees who disagreed with his policies.;    Thomas concentrated on
winning relief for victims of actual discrimination. He steered away from
lawsuits based on statistical evidence and remedies that included timetables
for future hiring.;    But he was unwilling to go along with more strident
voices in the Reagan administration who opposed most legal remedies for
discrimination, so he often felt isolated from both the administration and the
civil rights establishment.;    Several years ago, a top Reagan domestic
adviser who wanted his coffee cup refilled at a black-tie dinner looked up and
spotted a black man in a tuxedo hovering near the table. Holding the cup
aloft, the official asked for more coffee. The black man reached past the cup
to shake hands and said evenly: ""Perhaps we haven't met. I'm Clarence
Thomas."";     SUNDAY IN PERSPECTIVE: A reporter who saw Clarence Thomas at his
most candid writes about the nominee's opinions, fears and frustrations.; 
Nomination Of Clarence Thomas; President Bush has chosen Judge Clarence Thomas
of the U.S. Court of Appeals to replace Justice Thurgood Marshall, who is
retiring from the Supreme Court.; Nominee's background; Age: 43; Birthplace:
Savannah, Ga.; Family: Married to Virginia Lamp Thomas; he has one son, Jamal;
Education: Bachelor's degree, 1971, Holy Cross College; law degree, Yale Law
School, 1974; Professional experience: Missouri assistant attorney general,
1974-'77; chairman of Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, 1982-'89; judge
on U.S. Court of Appeals for District of Columbia since. 1990; . . .; On
quotas:;    ""Federal enforcement agencies . . . turned the statutes on their
heads by requiring discrimination in the form of hiring and promotion quotas,
so-called goals and timetables.""; . . .; On affirmative action:;    He
referred to it as ""social engineering . . . . We're standing the principle of
non-discrimination on its head."";    . . .; How justice is chosen; President:
The president nominates Supreme Court justices.; Senate: Senate holds hearings
into qualifications of a nominee prior to confirming, rejecting or failing to
act upon the nomination.; Qualifications: The Constitution sets no
qualifications for justices. Traditionally, justices have had some legal
training and most have been judges, lawyers or law teachers.; . . .; Past
Nominees; David Souter: Confirmed by Senate, 1990, despite concerns of some
Democrats about his views on the right to privacy; Anthony M. Kennedy:
Confirmed unanimously, 1988; Robert H. Bork: Rejected, 1987, because of his
strict interpretation of the Constitution, which critics said would have set
back progress on individual rights; Douglas H. Ginsburg: Ginsburg asked that
his nomination be withdrawn, 1987, after he admitted having smoked marijuana
as recently as 1979; . . .; Sources: Chicago Tribune, World Book Encyclopedia,
Compton's Encyclopedia, Who's Who Among Black Americans, news reports;
Knight-Ridder News Service  ",1,"[ 0.57468497  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
3,"     Sen. Strom Thurmond, the panel's senior Republican, said Thomas' rulings as
an appeals court judge were ""within the mainstream"" and warned his Democratic
colleagues about inappropriate questions.;   ""Requiring a nominee to pass an
ideological 'litmus test' would seriously jeopardize the efficacy and
independence of the federal judiciary,"" Thurmond said.;   But Sen. Herb Kohl,
D-Wis., told Thomas, ""We'll want to know what you really think . . . Don't
hide behind the argument that you can't discuss the issues."";   Thus was the
stage set for what is expected to be a lively set of hearings for Thomas, a
black conservative nominated to replace retiring Justice Thurgood Marshall,
the nation's first black justice.;   After each of the committee members gave
an opening statement, the proceedings were stopped for a 90-minute lunch
break. Thomas was to begin his testifying later in the afternoon.;   Even
before Biden rapped the opening gavel, Thomas' nomination triggered a
confirmation battle more akin to a political campaign -- television
commercials, endorsements by dozens of groups for and against, and a daily
drumbeat of support from President Bush.;   Abortion aside, Thomas also is
expected to be questioned about his views on civil rights -- especially
affirmative action -- and the right of privacy.;   Thomas smiled broadly as he
shook hands with Biden and other members of the committee in advance of the
opening gavel.;   Moment of humor; For the most part, he sat quietly at the
witness table while members of the committee outlined their views on his
nomination.;   There was a moment of humor when Biden asked Thomas how old he
was. Thomas, 43, replied, ""well, I've aged over the last 10 weeks"" since his
nomination.;   Sen. Edward M. Kennedy, D-Mass., said that while Thomas has
never commented publicly on abortion directly, the nominee once praised a
speech that called abortion ""the constitutional equivalent of murder."";   But
Sen. Orrin Hatch, R-Utah, a strong Thomas supporter, said Thomas should not be
forced to spell out his views on abortion because Justice David H. Souter, who
won Senate confirmation last year, was not required to do so.;   Questioned on
'natural law';   Biden said Thomas would be asked about his belief in ""natural
law."" Some critics contend Thomas holds natural-law views that could lead to
the conclusion that fetuses have a ""right to life"" requiring states to outlaw
all abortions.;   Biden himself is an advocate of natural law in some form,
but he said Thomas apparently holds ""a vision of natural law that we have
moved beyond."";   Biden said he would be looking closely to see whether
Thomas' philosophy would lead to imposition of a moral code on the
Constitution and ""radical change"" in legal opinion.;   Thurmond, of South
Carolina, said Thomas has all it takes to become ""an outstanding member of the
Supreme Court."";   ""It is not appropriate that philosophy alone should bar a
nominee from the Supreme Court unless that nominee holds a belief that is
contrary to the fundamental, longstanding principles of our nation,"" Thurmond
said in prepared comments.;   In prepared opening remarks that reflected
Democrats' ambiguity about Thomas, Sen. Patrick V. Leahy, D-Vt., said, ""I am
impressed -- and the country is -- by the less-traveled road you have taken
from Pinpoint, Ga., to the threshold of the Supreme Court. Your
self-discipline, diligence and hard work are exemplary.;   ""But at the same
time, your record and your writings trouble me,"" Leahy said. ""I have no clear
idea of your approach to the Constitution."";   ""I am also troubled by your
open admiration for those who are willing to deceive and defy Congress and by
the hostility you have demonstrated toward Congress both in action and in
word,"" Leahy said.;   As the hearings opened, the White House expressed
confidence today that the Senate would confirm Thomas.;   ""It's just beginning
up there; it's just beginning,"" Bush said when asked if Thomas' confirmation
was assured.;   ""People know of my total support for him and I think he'll do
very well. But now it's in the hands of the Senate. Let them make this
determination,"" Bush said.;   'Independence of the court'; Making a fresh
appeal for Thomas on the eve of today's opening hearing, Bush exhorted
lawmakers Monday to ""preserve the independence of the court"" by avoiding
asking the nominee how he would vote.;   But one member of the committee, Sen.
Howard Metzenbaum, D-Ohio, said on NBC-TV today: ""I think we have a right to
find out from him exactly what's going through his head on a number of issues.
And I think to do less than that would be irresponsible on our part."";   White
House spokesman Judy Smith said today that, although the White House would not
divulge numbers in an informal head count, ""We're confident Judge Thomas will
be confirmed."";   If confirmed, Thomas would be the 106th Supreme Court
justice but only the second black.;   The committee is expected to closely
examine Thomas' record as chairman of the federal Equal Employment Opportunity
Commission and as head of the Education Department's civil rights office.
Liberals contend he pursued policies that slowed, or even blocked, increased
opportunities for minorities and women.;   Feminist groups have been in the
forefront of the liberal coalition opposing Thomas, warning that his vote
added to an already conservative Supreme Court could overturn federal
protection for abortion rights and send the issue back to state legislatures.
The National Abortion Rights Action League aims to flood Senate offices with
half a million anti-Thomas post cards.  ",1,"[ 0.46333105  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
4,"     Thomas is expected to join the high court as its 106th justice next week,
becoming the seventh conservative on a nine-member court already embarked on a
counterrevolution against many liberal rulings of the past.;   Eleven
Democrats joined 41 Republicans to produce the slim majority in favor of the
43-year-old federal appeals judge.;   It was the closest Senate confirmation
of a Supreme Court nominee since Lucius Q.C. Lamar, an appointee of President
Grover Cleveland, also squeezed through by four votes in 1888. Lamar was
confirmed on a 32-28 vote.;   President Bush, elated by the approval of his
nominee, called Thomas to congratulate him. ""You did a fine job,"" Bush said.
""You were a wonderful inspiration and you had the overwhelming support of the
American people. You have a lifetime of service to your country ahead. Well
done."";   In a statement issued by the White House, Bush referred to Thomas as
""a man of principle who is sensitive to the problems and opportunities facing
all Americans."";   But feminists were outraged. ""Today the Senate sacrificed
the integrity of the Supreme Court, its own reputation and the rights of
American women to the Bush-Reagan agenda,"" the Women's Legal Defense Fund said
in a statement released after the vote.;   Thomas said he wanted to put his
confirmation ordeal, which lasted more than three months, behind him.;   ""This
is more a time for healing, not a time for anger or for animus or animosity,""
he told reporters in a brief interview outside his Virginia home.;   ""I guess
in so many ways, as I say to my wife so many times, I'd like to thank
America,"" he said.;   In Norman, Okla., the woman whose complaints prompted
the extraordinary weekend hearings on sexual harassment allegations against
Thomas said she hoped his confirmation wouldn't stop others from complaining
about harassment in the workplace.;   Law Professor Anita Hill, once an aide
to Thomas, declined to comment specifically about the Senate vote. But, she
said, if she had it to do again, she still would have testified against
Thomas.;   ""My gut reaction is that it was the right thing to do . . . and
even looking at how hard it was, I would do it again because it was the right
thing,"" she said.;   If Thomas is sworn in, as expected, on Monday, he will
have missed oral arguments in 20 cases, including high-visibility disputes
over school desegregation and abortion. He will not participate in these cases
unless the other justices anticipate a tie vote and order new arguments.;  
The Senate vote followed a 7-7 Senate Judiciary Committee deadlock over the
nomination and committee hearings of unprecedented range, from discussions of
lofty constitutional principles to accounts of lurid sexual misconduct.;  
Under oath, Hill accused Thomas of misusing his position as her boss at the
Department of Education and the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission by
sexually harassing her a decade ago. Thomas vehemently denied that the events
Hill described ever took place.;   Left unresolved was the central question of
whether Hill was telling the truth last weekend on the sexual harassment
issue. With that issue undecided, Thomas backers argued that he was entitled
to a presumption of innocence and a number of Democrats agreed.;   ""Professor
Hill's allegations cannot be used to justify a vote against Judge Thomas,""
Sen. Alan Dixon, D-Ill., concluded in casting his ballot for Thomas.;   The
hearings on the harassment charges led only four previously pro-Thomas
Democrats to change their minds and vote against him: Richard Bryan and Harry
Reid of Nevada, Joseph Lieberman of Connecticut and Bob Graham of Florida.;  
Sen. Orrin Hatch, R-Utah, said Thomas was ""a decent human being"" who was
wronged ""because of a process that broke down . . . and his life, though not
ruined by any stretch of the imagination, has been severely harmed."";  
Disagreeing, Sen. Edward Kennedy, D-Mass., said: ""To give the benefit of the
doubt to Judge Thomas is to say that Judge Thomas is more important than the
Supreme Court."";   Thomas' defiant and powerful response to the charges was,
to many observers, a critical turning point in the hearings.;   He refused to
tolerate any further inquiries into his private life and portrayed himself as
an innocent victim of ""a high-tech lynching for uppity blacks"" and ""the most
bigoted, racist stereotypes"" of the sexual prowess of black men.;   But
several senators deplored the injection of race into the Thomas nomination.;  
Sen. Patrick Leahy, D-Vt., who opposed the nomination, blamed the
administration.;   ""I'm saddened that once again race was used as a tool for
short-term political gain,"" Leahy said.;   Thomas will succeed retired Justice
Thurgood Marshall, the first black justice and the Supreme Court's last link
to the liberal Warren Court of the 1950s and 1960s.;   As the youngest Supreme
Court justice, Thomas is expected to remain on the high court for decades,
long enough to grapple with anticipated 21st-century legal issues stemming
from new reproductive technologies, gay and lesbian claims to family rights,
experimental drugs, multinational business arrangements and other
developments.; How they voted; Here is the 52-48 roll call by which the Senate
voted to confirm Clarence Thomas to the U.S. Supreme Court.; (box) REPUBLICANS
voting for (41):; Murkowski, Alaska Stevens, Alaska McCain, Ariz. Seymour,
Calif.; Brown, Colo. Roth, Dela. Mack, Fla. Craig, Idaho; Symms, Idaho Coats,
Ind. Lugar, Ind. Grassley, Iowa; Dole, Kan.  Kassebaum, Kan. McConnell, Ky.
Cohen, Maine; Durenberger, Minn. Cochran, Miss. Lott, Miss.    Bond, Mo.;
Danforth, Mo. Burns, Mont. Rudman, N.H. Smith, N.H.; Domenici, N.M. D'Amato,
N.Y.   Helms, N.C. Nickles, Okla.; Hatfield, Ore. Specter, Penn. Chafee, R.I.
Thurmond, S.C.; Pressler, S.D. Gramm, Texas Garn, Utah Hatch, Utah; Warner,
Va. Gorton, Wash. Kasten, Wisc. Simpson, Wyo.; Wallop, Wisc.; (box) DEMOCRATS
voting for (11):; Shelby, Ala. DeConcini, Ariz. Fowler, Ga. Nunn, Ga.; Dixon,
Ill. Breaux, La. Johnston, La. Exon, Neb.; Boren, Okla. Hollings, S.C. Robb,
Va.; (hbox) REPUBLICANS voting against (2):; Packwood, Ore. Jeffords, Vt.;
(hbox) DEMOCRATS voting against (46):; Heflin, Ala. Bumpers, Ark. Pryor, Ark.
Cranston, Calif.; Wirth, Colo. Dodd, Conn. Lieberman, Conn.(*) Biden, Del.;
Graham, Fla.(*) Akaka, Hawaii Inouye, Hawaii Simon, Ill.; Harkin, Iowa Ford,
Ky. Mitchell, Maine Mikulski, Md.; Sarbanes, Md. Kennedy, Mass. Kerry, Mass.
Levin, Mich.; Riegle, Mich. Wellstone, Minn. Baucus, Mont. Kerrey, Neb.;
Bryan, Nev.(*) Reid, Nev.(*) Bradley, N.J. Lautenberg, N.J.; Bingaman, N.M.
Moynihan, N.Y. Sanford, N.C. Burdick, N.D.; Conrad, N.D. Glenn, Ohio
Metzenbaum, Ohio Wofford, Penn.; Pell, R.I. Daschle, S.D. Gore, Tenn. Sasser,
Tenn.; Bentsen, Texas Leahy, Vt. Adams, Wash. Byrd, W.Va.; Rockefeller, W.Va.
Kohl, Wisc.; (*)The four Democrats who switched their votes from favoring to
opposing Thomas were Lieberman of Connecticut, Graham of Florida and Bryan and
Reid of Nevada.  ",1,"[ 0.39120815  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
5,"
   -- ""I believe that society is now in a position to
vigorously enforce equal rights for all Americans. . . . But
I believe in compensation for actual victims, not for people
whose only claim to victimization is that they are members of
a historically oppressed group.""
   -- ""America should not fall into the trap of blaming all
the problems faced by blacks or other minorities on others.
We are not beggars or objects of charity. We don't get
smarter just because we sit next to white people in class,
and we don't progress just because society is ready with
handouts. As a people, we need to find solutions to problems
through independence, perseverance and integrity. As a
society, we should develop better policies to deal with the
underclass than the failed solutions of the past.""
   While the views of President Bush's first Supreme Court
nominee, David Souter, were virtually unknown before his
confirmation, the 43-year-old Mr. Thomas has boldly
articulated his vision of constitutional law, both as a judge
-- he now sits on the Court of Appeals for the District of
Columbia Circuit, the nation's second-highest bench -- and,
before that, as chairman of the Equal Employment Opportunity
Commission for eight years.
   ""Basically the job of a judge is to figure out what the
law says, not what he wants it to say,"" Mr. Thomas told me.
""There is a difference between the role of a judge and that
of a policy maker. {Judge Robert} Bork was right about that,
no question. Judging requires a certain impartiality.""
   At the same time, ""impartiality is not the same thing as
indifference. This isn't law school speculation. When I hear
a case, I know damn well that something is going to happen as
a result of what I decide. People's lives are affected.
Sometimes a man's life depends on the outcome. And these are
people looking to me, to the judge, to figure out what's
just, to correctly apply the law. That's not a responsibility
I take lightly. No way.""
   Many of Mr. Thomas's critics have taken his unconcealed
admiration for Ronald Reagan, his former boss, and Robert
Bork, his predecessor on the D.C. Circuit, as evidence that
Mr. Thomas shares their philosophy of jurisprudence. But in
fact, a careful reading of his articles and speeches reveals
a different sort of judicial conservatism.
   Writing in the Howard Law Journal in 1987, Mr. Thomas
argued for what he called a ""natural law"" or ""higher law""
mode of judging, in which the judge examines not only the
text of the Constitution or statute but also the moral
principles underlying the American form of government. Mr.
Thomas maintains, with support from Abraham Lincoln and
abolitionist Frederick Douglass, that the Constitution must
be read in the context of the principle of equality inherent
in the Declaration of Independence.
   In a powerful speech Mr. Thomas gave on Martin Luther King
Day three years ago, he defended certain forms of civil
disobedience. King often quoted Thomas Aquinas's statement,
""An unjust law is a human law that is not rooted in eternal
law and natural law."" Part of King's legacy, for Mr. Thomas,
is his reflection on the close connection between law and
morality.
   President Bush's nominee understands the hostility he is
likely to face in Congress. ""When you're up before those
confirmation hearings, it's like going through Dante's
Inferno. . . . I've seen a glimpse of that process. When you
get up there, you just hope that you don't get destroyed so
that even if you don't make it, you can go on with your
life.""
   Mr. Thomas is likely to be a very different kind of judge
from the man he is replacing. When reminded of Thurgood
Marshall's comment that he could not wholeheartedly celebrate
the bicentennial of the American founding because the
Constitution permitted slavery, Mr. Thomas shook his head. ""I
have felt the pain of racism as much as anyone else,"" Mr.
Thomas says passionately. ""Yet I am wild about the
Constitution and about the Declaration. Abraham Lincoln once
said that the American founders declared the right of
equality whose enforcement would follow as soon as
circumstances permitted. The more I learn about the ideals of
those men, the more enthusiastic I get. . . . I believe in
the American proposition, the American dream, because I've
seen it in my own life.""
   Mr. Thomas's life is a remarkable story. Born in a small
frame house on the outskirts of Savannah, Ga., in 1948, Mr.
Thomas endured all the hardships of the segregated South. His
father left before he could walk, and his mother worked as a
housemaid and picked crabs from the marsh to eat and sell.
The family shared a single outhouse with several neighbors.
   In the summer of 1955, Clarence Thomas and his brother
went to live with their maternal grandparents, who owned an
ice delivery and fuel oil business. It is here, under the
stern tutelage of his grandfather, Myers Anderson, that Mr.
Thomas locates the beginning of his true education. ""My
grandfather has been the greatest single influence on my
life,"" he claims. In 1987 he told the Atlantic, ""When the
civil rights people indict me, the man they are indicting is
that man. Let them call him from the grave and indict him.""
   As Mr. Thomas remembers, his grandfather believed that
""Man ain't got no business on relief as long as he can work.
Damn welfare, that relief]"" At home the Thomas boys worked
six hours a day in addition to school: raising the chickens,
pigs and cows; cleaning the house and the yard; painting,
roofing, plumbing and fixing; maintaining the oil trucks and
making deliveries.
   These lessons of hard work, personal dignity and
self-sufficiency were reinforced through years of Catholic
school and college. He finished his undergraduate studies at
Holy Cross College in Worcester, Mass. ""That's where I
started to get political and radical,"" Mr. Thomas recalls. ""I
read Malcolm X. I became interested in the Black Panthers.""
In 1971 he founded the Black Student Union at Holy Cross. He
went on to Yale Law School, where he worked summers at New
Haven Legal Assistance, continuing what he calls ""my
political consciousness raising.""
   Nevertheless, ""I never gave up my grandfather's ideals,
and when my left-wing opinions began to clash with those
ideals, I began to move away from the left."" Eventually he
took a job with Missouri Attorney General (now Senator) John
Danforth because ""he promised to treat me like anyone else.
He promised to ignore the hell out of me.""
   At a conference of black conservatives in San Francisco,
Calif., Mr. Thomas's eloquent departures from the civil
rights orthodoxy on quotas and government handouts greatly
impressed the newly installed Reagan administration, and in
1981 he was nominated to be assistant secretary for civil
rights in the Department of Education.
   The next year he was promoted to the top job of the EEOC.
Under the Carter administration, the agency had zealously
promoted numerical goals and timetables. ""Thomas came in, and
he rejected all that,"" remarks William Robinson, dean of the
District of Columbia School of Law.
   Mr. Thomas had his skirmishes with the Leadership
Conference on Civil Rights, an umbrella group instrumental in
defeating the Bork nomination, and he made a dangerous enemy
in the American Association of Retired Persons, which accused
him of letting legal protections for the elderly lapse. When
he was nominated to the D.C. Circuit in late 1989, a number
of these special interest groups prepared for a bloodbath.
But the storm clouds melted away and Mr. Thomas was approved
by the Senate Judiciary with a 12-1 majority. The full Senate
seated him with only two senators opposed. The reason for the
smooth passage, EEOC vice chairman Ricky Silber man (whose
husband Laurence Silberman sits on the D.C. Circuit with Mr.
Thomas and is his closest friend on the bench) thinks, is
that ""Clarence has an amazing ability to neutralize
opposition. Just as in his life, he turns negative values
into positive values, an amazing feat.""
   Can Clarence Thomas be confirmed to the Supreme Court?
Even liberal judges will go on record praising Mr. Thomas.
""If I or a member of my family were in trouble, he is the
kind of person I'd like to appear before,"" Judge Damon Keith,
a Carter appointee on the Sixth Circuit Court of Appeals in
Detroit said in an interview. ""Our judicial philosophy may
not be the same, but he is a bright and reflective man who
believes passionately in fairness. I say this without
reservation, and in full knowledge of all the people who
complain about him.""
   Dean Robinson added, ""People often confuse what Clarence
thinks with what some of his friends on the right think, but
Clarence is his own man."" While at the EEOC, Mr. Thomas gave
speeches accusing the Republican Party of ""blatant
indifference"" toward black voters, and chastised Ronald
Reagan in particular for letting Bob Jones University get
away with racial discrimination, and for ""foot dragging"" on
the Voting Rights Act extension.
   Mr. Thomas and his wife Virginia live in Northern Virginia
with Jamal, Mr. Thomas's son from a previous marriage. Some
weeks before word of the nomination came, Mr. Thomas
confessed to being slightly bemused by all the attention
being paid to him by scholars and courtwatchers. ""The problem
for my opponents, and for my friends, is that I don't think I
fit any of these molds very well. Once people figure this
out, maybe they'll leave me alone.""
   ---
   Mr. D'Souza, a research fellow at the American Enterprise
Institute, is the author of ""Illiberal Education: The
Politics of Race and Sex on Campus"" (Free Press/Macmillan,
1991).
",1,"[ 0.24252195  0.00607428  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
6,"
   But barring damaging unforeseen revelations about Judge
Thomas, Democrats will have a hard time mounting a
broad-based campaign against the affable 43-year-old, who is
smart, tough and speaks powerfully about overcoming racism
and poverty in the deep South.
   ""Anybody who takes him on in the area of civil rights is
taking on the grandson of a sharecropper,"" observes
conservative Republican Sen. Orrin Hatch of Utah.
   Judge Thomas's nomination yesterday got a restrained
reaction from many Senate Democrats. Civil rights groups,
too, said they will have to study his record, both in his
brief tenure on the appeals court and as chairman of the
Equal Employment Opportunity Commission during the Reagan
administration.
   Mr. Bush's choice is a bold political move, coming in the
midst of the current debate over civil rights legislation and
quotas. The president has nominated a man who would be not
merely the second black to serve on the Supreme Court, but a
man who embodies the ideal of personal achievement rather
than reliance on government programs for a leg up.
   The choice also will put Democrats on the defensive: Judge
Thomas draws praise even from some liberals. ""He has been a
very good colleague,"" says Chief Judge Abner Mikva of the
appeals court here, a former Democratic congressman.
Moreover, Democrats specifically urged the president to
consider appointing a minority-group member to fill the
vacancy that was created when Thurgood Marshall announced his
retirement last Thursday.
   Judge Thomas's association with moderate Republican Sen.
John Danforth of Missouri, for whom he worked after his
graduation from Yale Law School in 1974, will also weigh in
his favor. Mr. Danforth's support will help reassure many
moderate Senate Democrats and Republicans, much as New
Hampshire GOP Sen. Warren Rudman's sponsorship of David
Souter did after President Bush nominated him last July.
   While liberals will focus on Judge Thomas's legal
inexperience, his record on the bench doesn't present them
with the sort of target they had with the articulated,
sharply conservative legal views of Robert Bork, whose
Supreme Court nomination was defeated in 1987.
   A number of Senate Democrats, including Judiciary Chairman
Joseph Biden of Delaware, stressed when Judge Thomas was
confirmed for the appeals court that he would face tougher
scrutiny if he were nominated for the Supreme Court. But that
will be a difficult position to defend in light of Mr.
Thomas's success last year in deflecting liberal criticism.
   Judge Thomas's strong opposition to affirmative action and
the abortion debate will be grist for his confirmation
hearings. ""I don't know where Judge Thomas stands on a
woman's right to choose, but I intend to find out,"" said
Democratic Sen. Howard Metzenbaum of Ohio, who was the lone
opponent last year in the Senate Judiciary Committee's
12-to-1 approval of his appeals court nomination. ""Women have
a right to know whether Judge Thomas is committed to
protecting their fundamental rights.""
   Abortion-rights groups are also likely to be concerned
about the fact that Judge Thomas is a Catholic who spent a
year in a Missouri seminary in the 1960s pondering the
priesthood. As other Supreme Court nominees have done,
however, Judge Thomas is likely to go to great lengths to
avoid committing himself on abortion, an issue that is
expected to come before the court again and again.
   The reaction from civil rights groups was muted. Ralph
Neas, executive director of the Leadership Conference on
Civil Rights, said, ""With so many constitutional rights and
personal liberties at stake, the Senate must make sure
Clarence Thomas has demonstrated a commitment to equal
opportunity and equal justice under the law. . . . We urge
the Senate not to rush to judgment.""
   To friends and colleagues of Judge Thomas, his own life
story is the most compelling thing about him. With Justice
Marshall's retirement, civil rights advocates worried that
there would no longer be anyone on the court who had
experienced racial segregation. Though Judge Thomas may not
find favor with those groups, the fact is that he knew
nothing but segregation as he grew up outside Savannah, Ga.,
in the 1950s.
   Born into rural poverty, he lived in a house with no
bathroom until he was seven years old. His father left when
he was young, and his mother sent him to live with his
grandparents.
   The grandparents raised him with strict discipline,
instilling in him a strong work ethic, and sent him to an
all-black Catholic school run by white nuns. Yesterday,
speaking at a news conference at President Bush's home in
Kennebunkport, Maine, Mr. Thomas choked up when he talked
about his grandparents' influence. For a moment, it appeared
that he might not be able to finish his statement. He praised
them as well as ""my mother and the nuns, all of whom were
adamant that I grow up to make something of myself.""
   As a child, Judge Thomas said, ""I could not dare dream
that I would ever see the Supreme Court, not to mention be
nominated to it. Indeed, my most vivid childhood memory of
the Supreme Court was the `Impeach Earl Warren' signs which
lined Highway 17 near Savannah. I didn't quite understand who
this Earl Warren fellow was, but I knew he was in some kind
of trouble.""
   The first person in his family to attend college, Judge
Thomas spent a year at Immaculate Conception Seminary in
Conception Junction, Mo., before transferring to Holy Cross
College in Worcester, Mass. After law school, he went to work
for Mr. Danforth, who was then Missouri's attorney general.
   After two years in the Monsanto Co. legal department,
Judge Thomas rejoined Mr. Danforth, by then a U.S. senator.
He then served for a year as chief of the U.S. Education
Department's civil rights office before President Reagan
appointed him chairman of the EEOC in 1982.
   His eight-year tenure at the EEOC was marked by
controversy. He changed the agency's approach to de-emphasize
settling large numbers of cases quickly, concentrating
instead on instances in which specific victims of
discrimination could be identified. In age discrimination,
particularly, that created case backlogs that distressed
advocates for senior citizens.
   Liberals charged that, across-the-board, the EEOC under
Mr. Thomas's leadership didn't aggressively attack civil
rights violations. ""As chairman of the EEOC, Clarence Thomas
failed to demonstrate a commitment to civil rights and
liberties,"" says Nan Aron of the liberal Alliance for
Justice.
   But Mr. Thomas had strong views and didn't shrink from
expressing them. Rather, he seized every opportunity --
including writing letters to editors, op-ed page articles and
book reviews -- to attack affirmative action as patronizing
and as an ineffective remedy for discrimination. In a 1987
letter to The Wall Street Journal, he said, ""I firmly insist
that the Constitution be interpreted in a colorblind fashion.
. . . I emphasize black self-help, as opposed to racial
quotas and other race-conscious legal devices that only
further and deepen the original problem.""
   Since he has been on the federal bench, liberal and
conservative legal analysts agree, the relatively few
opinions he has written don't suggest a strong ideological
slant, although he has tended to rule for the government in
criminal cases and in business regulatory matters.
   One highly controversial case on which Judge Thomas sat
earlier this year has yet to be decided. A three-judge panel
of the appeals court is considering the constitutionality of
a Federal Communications Commission policy giving preference
to women for broadcast licenses. The others on the panel were
Judges Mikva and James Buckley, a conservative. The questions
are: Will Judge Thomas use the case to once again attack
affirmative action, and will that pour fuel on his
confirmation fight?
   Judge Thomas is well-liked by colleagues, both at the
EEOC, where the new headquarters building is named for him,
and at the appeals court.
   Ricky Silberman, a close friend who is vice chairman of
the EEOC and whose husband, Laurence, sits on the appeals
court, says: ""He is a very simple person who loves to say he
was a farm boy and remains a farm boy."" A sometime jogger and
weightlifter, he enjoys reading and listening to music
ranging from classical to his favorite, country singer George
Jones.
   For much of his tenure at the EEOC, Mr. Thomas was a
single parent, raising a son, Jamal. Some friends have
expressed concern that the bitterness of the divorce from his
first wife could spill over into his confirmation hearings.
His second wife, Virginia, a deputy assistant secretary at
the Labor Department, is white.
   In light of the administration's strong attack on racial
quotas in hiring, President Bush's selection of a black man
to fill Justice Marshall's seat brought questions about
whether he was in fact observing a quota on the court. In his
press conference, Mr. Bush strongly denied the very thought
of that, insisting that race wasn't a factor in the selection
of Judge Thomas.
   ""The fact that he is black -- a minority -- has nothing to
do with this,"" the president said. ""He is the best
qualified.""
   Judge Thomas, who just turned 43 last week, would be the
youngest Supreme Court justice of the past 100 years with the
exception of William O. Douglas, who joined the court when he
was 40. Senate Judiciary Committee hearings on the Thomas
nomination are expected to be held in September. If they go
smoothly, Justice Thomas could be sworn in before the new
Supreme Court term begins on Oct. 7.
",1,"[ 0.29877099  0.00614684  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
7,"
   Sen. Howard Metzenbaum (D., Ohio) has said that the Senate
is ""entitled to a direct, categorical answer"" on Judge
Thomas's stance on abortion, and on Roe v. Wade. Thurgood
Marshall's example makes it plain, though, that Mr. Thomas
may refuse to give that categorical answer. During the
Marshall hearings in 1967, the issue of the day was not
abortion but crime, and the most controversial case was
Miranda v. Arizona.
   Sen. John L. McClellan (D., Ark.) pressed Mr. Marshall to
reveal his opinion of the case. Mr. Marshall refused,
explaining that there were other cases pending on variations
and interpretations of Miranda and that, if confirmed to the
Supreme Court, he would have to rule on those cases: ""On
decisions that are certain to be re-examined in the court, it
would be improper for me to comment on them in advance. . . .
From all the hearings I have read about, it has been
considered and recognized as improper for a nominee to a
judgeship to comment on a case he will have to pass on.""
   Sen. McClellan emphasized that he did not want comments on
a future case, but on a past case, Miranda. But Mr. Marshall
held firm, stating that future cases would be related to
interpretations of Miranda, and that the issue of crime was
still very controversial.
   Sen. Sam Ervin (D., N.C.) attempted to get Mr. Marshall to
discuss the case law that preceded Miranda, in much the same
way that Sen. Joe Biden (D., Del.) attempted to persuade
Judge Souter to comment on the right of privacy at issue in
the abortion cases, by way of Griswold v. Connecticut. But
Mr. Marshall would not even remark on the 14 words in the
Fifth Amendment concerning self-incrimination.
   Sen. Ervin, exasperated, pointed out that since the
jurisdiction of the Supreme Court is so broad that a case on
practically any issue might come before it, Mr. Marshall's
theory meant that the committee would have a difficult time
asking any questions about Mr. Marshall's judicial
philosophy. ""It is a problem,"" Mr. Marshall said, though a
problem for the committee, not the nominee. In the end, Mr.
Marshall would comment only on such long-decided cases as the
Gibbons v. Ogden case of 1824, which concerned issues of such
vintage that they were no longer controversial.
   Some of Mr. Thomas's detractors have openly worried that
he seems too distant from his origins in the segregated
South. Eleanor Holmes Norton, delegate to Congress from the
District of Columbia, said that she hoped he would ""bring to
the bench his personal experience as a poor black man.""
Harvard Law School's Derrick Bell fears that Mr. Thomas would
""look black but think white.""
   But such personal experiences are irrelevant to the work
of a justice of the Supreme Court, according to Thurgood
Marshall. ""A judge is not permitted to use his own personal
views under any circumstances,"" he said, ""but if the
particular decision-maker, whether he be judge or justice or
magistrate, applies the Constitution to the facts and it
comes out that way, that is inevitable."" Sometimes the
outcome of a case is incidentally related to a justice's
private views, but personal preferences can play no part in
the decision-making process. Such crusading zeal is
inappropriate, despite the 1990 call of Sen. Paul Simon (D.,
Ill.) for a nominee with ""fire in the belly."" ""There is
nothing personal allowed, nothing personal,"" Mr. Marshall
emphasized. Justices ""shall not use their personal views, and
indeed, they take an oath not to do so.""
   The intellectual leaders of the coalition that defeated
the Bork nomination, notably Laurence Tribe in his 1987 book,
""God Bless This Honorable Court,"" insisted that the Senate
had the right -- and the responsibility -- to scrutinize a
nominee's general political or judicial philosophy. This
issue was raised in the Marshall hearings too. Clearly a
senator may vote any way he wishes on a nomination, and for
any reason; but not all votes nor all reasons are consistent
with the duties of senators, and with the manner in which
they ought to behave. This thought was expressed most
eloquently by Sen. Edward Kennedy (D., Mass.), whose primary
contribution to the Marshall hearings was elucidating the
normative guidelines for senators.
   Sen. Kennedy stressed a central point both in the
committee room and before the full Senate: The Senate is to
assess qualifications; it is not to examine political or
judicial philosophy. ""We are not charged with the
responsibility of approving a man to be associate justice of
the Supreme Court only if his views always coincide with our
own,"" Sen. Kennedy stated. ""We are not seeking a nominee for
the Supreme Court who will express the majority view of the
Senate on every given issue, or on a given issue of
fundamental importance."" It was Sen. Kennedy's view that only
the professional background of a nominee was relevant for
senatorial consideration, not his substantive views.
   The question of ""ideological balance"" on the court was
also raised in this context, and addressed by Sen. Roman
Hruska (D., Neb.). Sen. Hruska had received letters stating
that Mr. Marshall was too liberal for the Supreme Court, that
he would upset the ""balance"" between liberals and
conservatives. Sen. Hruska dismissed these fears as
irrelevant. ""The nominating power lies with the president of
the United States; and if it is his desire to appoint someone
he considers a liberal, that is his prerogative. If he wants
to nominate someone he considers a conservative, that is also
his prerogative."" The role of the Senate is to ""inquire into
the integrity, the competence and the record of a man,"" not
his ideology.
   Several other issues were brought up during the Marshall
hearings that have a bearing on Judge Thomas's case. Sen.
Kennedy believed that because Mr. Marshall had been moved
through the Judiciary Committee before, the Senate could
""move expeditiously ahead with his confirmation."" Mr. Thomas,
too, has been previously approved by the committee. Mr.
Marshall had been accused of having communist ties, in part
because in one case he cited a work by Herbert Aptheker, a
leading U.S. communist theoretician. Committee Chairman James
Eastland (D., Miss.) raised this issue, but only to allow Mr.
Marshall to clarify the facts, and to state that he was not a
communist. Mr. Thomas's supposed ties to Louis Farrakhan seem
entitled to equal treatment.
   Finally, the fact that Mr. Marshall was black was treated
as noteworthy, but not determinative. In the case of Judge
Thomas, blackness ought to be regarded the same way. The fact
that Mr. Thomas's judicial views are not the same as those of
Thurgood Marshall is a reflection of the increasingly
pluralistic nature of black society, but hardly an issue
worthy of senatorial consideration. As the second black
American to serve on the Supreme Court, Judge Thomas will
shoulder many responsibilities; not because he is black, but
because he will hold a lofty office.
   ---
   Mr. Robbins is a historian in Ayer, Mass.
",1,"[ 0.17671252  0.00727128  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
8,"
   The proceedings will be carried live on ABC, NBC, CBS,
CNN, public television and cable outlets. Heightening the
tension were allegations from a second accuser, a former
Thomas aide named Angela Wright, that he engaged in what she
termed ""annoying and obnoxious"" behavior, including
pressuring her for dates and making inappropriate comments.
   Given the focused, explosive nature of the hearing, this
is destined to be one of the most dramatic days in Washington
in recent memory.
   In the narrowest sense, Judge Thomas and Ms. Hill are
staking their own reputations, personal credibility and
careers on this session. But they are also surrogates in a
far larger struggle. The outcome of this hearing will affect
the personal and political reputations of lawmakers, interest
groups, President Bush and the White House political
apparatus -- as well as informal and heated conversations
throughout a riveted nation.
   ""Right now the emotions are running higher than I can
remember, with the best-laid plans being upset everywhere,""
says Thomas Mann, director of governmental studies at the
Brookings Institution. ""Washington and Congress are under
siege, and the whole world is watching. Clarence Thomas and
Anita Hill are not the only public figures on trial.""
   The players in today's drama could pursue a number of
strategies, each with enormous risks:
                                                                                                       

   Clarence Thomas
                                                                                                       

   Judge Thomas has to answer whether he dated, or tried to
date, Ms. Hill. He also must answer whether he continued to
press her despite repeated refusals. The nominee told Senate
supporters as late as Wednesday night that he never even
asked her out. But his affidavit denying her general charges
doesn't answer that conclusively.
   Judge Thomas also has to convince the lawmakers -- and the
public, watching at home or offices -- that he did nothing to
give the appearance that he was harassing her on sexual
matters or was using his position as her boss to create an
atmosphere of discomfort.
   He and his supporters must decide if he'll be more
credible if he gives an inch or stands firm. He could argue
that he may have said something improper and he's sorry; that
he did approach Ms. Hill socially but did not persist; or
that he simply never did anything that could even be
misunderstood. He'll probably take the last course, arguing
that he made neither social nor sexual advances to Ms. Hill,
and certainly did not press upon her either his sexual
interests or accounts of pornographic materials.
   He and the witnesses called to support him will portray
him as a man with a formal business style and an almost
prudish approach to work-place relationships. He will face
the hearings with the brand of confidence that left those he
spoke to this week, in the words of William Kristol, Vice
President Quayle's chief of staff, ""absolutely convinced he
is telling the truth.""
   The key to Judge Thomas's success or failure largely rests
with him alone, says Sen. Nancy Kassebaum of Kansas, the only
Republican woman in the Senate and a probable Thomas
supporter. ""Clarence Thomas has to personally address these
issues with a conviction and purposefulness that will resolve
these questions,"" she says.
                                                                                                       

   Anita Hill
                                                                                                       

   The University of Oklahoma law professor began this with
confidential allegations that Judge Thomas had subjected her
to sexual harassment when she served as his personal
assistant at the Education Department. How will she explain
why she continued to work for Judge Thomas after the
purported incidents -- and especially why she followed him to
the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission from their
previous jobs?
   ""If you listen to her carefully, no one can believe that
woman is attempting to smear this man,"" says Roger Wilkins, a
Thomas opponent and former Johnson administration official
who now teaches at Virginia's George Mason University. ""She
is a very credible human being.""
   She has also been instantly transformed into a symbol by
women's groups and liberal activists who wanted to defeat
Judge Thomas's nomination long before these charges were
aired.
   The witnesses Judge Thomas has summoned on his behalf will
seek to pick her story apart, citing telephone log comments
indicating that Ms. Hill ""just called to say hello"" or ""needs
your advice on getting research grants"" or ""wanted to
congratulate on marriage."" Ms. Hill will need to convincingly
explain or refute those messages, as well as reports that
have Judge Thomas, for example, helping her land a job on the
law faculty at Oral Roberts University.
   And Ms. Hill will also be asked why she didn't broach her
sexual-harassment charges in confirmation hearings for
earlier posts that Judge Thomas won.
   Ms. Hill will have to defend her own credibility
forcefully. But if she appears strident, she may play into
the hands of those who claim she's simply trying to derail
the nomination.
                                                                                                       

   President Bush
                                                                                                       

   The president who nominated Judge Thomas has to battle for
his nominee, of course, but how does he do that without
wading into the underlying issue of sexual harassment?
   Although the president has selected a record number of
women for appointive federal posts, none of his most
important political or policy advisers are women. Only two of
his 14 most senior White House officials are women.
   Some argue that Mr. Bush would do better to lose the
battle -- the nomination of Thomas -- than win the battle and
lose a much bigger war. In his zeal to defend his nominee, he
already has opened himself to criticism that he lacks
sufficient sensitivity to the difficulties women face in the
work force.
   Presidential advisers are counseling Mr. Bush to stay away
from the dispute over whether Judge Thomas is guilty of the
charges of sexual harassment. But Mr. Bush, who is preparing
for his re-election campaign, doesn't want to lose perhaps
the most emotional confirmation battle in decades. He is
walking a thin line.
   ""One fairly obvious consequence is that he is going to
have to, in some way and at some point, acknowledge this
issue,"" says Ruth Mandel, professor at the Eagleton Institute
of Politics at Rutgers University. ""If he doesn't acknowledge
it and address it, it's going to come up in the 1992
campaign.""
                                                                                                       

   Sen. Joseph Biden
                                                                                                       

   The chairman of the Judiciary Committee, Mr. Biden is
being accused of not treating these charges seriously enough.
The Delaware Democrat has to perform a tremendous high-wire
act: On the one hand, he has to be sensitive enough to Ms.
Hill to show that he cares about the issue of sexual
harassment. On the other hand -- as the chairman of a
committee that began the downfall of Reagan Supreme Court
nominee Robert Bork -- he must be tough enough on Ms. Hill to
show that he's being fair to the nominee.
   Mr. Biden knows that members of the committee have had, as
political scientist Robert Starks puts it, ""egg on their
faces"" for days, answering charges about why they didn't
investigate further when they had at least some information
about Ms. Hill's charges as early as July. The criticism
comes in the wake of continuing dissatisfaction with the
confirmation process from both sides of the ideological
divide, with each side accusing the other of politicizing the
process.
   Mr. Biden has told associates that he regards this episode
as a ""terribly ugly chapter on Capitol Hill,"" and will seek
in the televised hearings that begin this morning to reclaim
the high ground for Congress. But how can he do that in this
atmosphere of recrimination? He also faces the likelihood of
a Republican-generated investigation of how Ms. Hill's
charges leaked to the public. (The committee, which had
deadlocked 7-7 on the nomination, won't take a new vote; the
Senate vote is scheduled for Tuesday.)
                                                                                                       

   The Democratic questioners
                                                                                                       

   The Democrats will have to look as if they're trying to
get the truth -- not as if they're trying to get Judge
Thomas. It won't be easy.
   Sen. Patrick Leahy of Vermont is a former prosecutor who
seemed to have disbelieved much of what Judge Thomas said in
his hearings. He is already on record as criticizing the
nominee for fleeing from his record, arguing that Judge
Thomas ""jettisoned one public statement after another like a
captain trying to keep his ship afloat."" Mr. Leahy has
complained that Judge Thomas's advisers counseled him to
""play it safe,"" and that the tactic ""did not fulfill Judge
Thomas's responsibility to the nation.""
   Sen. Howell Heflin, a former chief justice of the Alabama
Supreme Court, is a conservative Democrat who waffled on the
Thomas nomination and then opposed it, criticizing the
nominee's evasiveness and suggesting he might be a right-wing
ideologue. His role in today's hearing is likely to be that
of the elder jurist; he might be regarded as something of a
barometer for other southern Democrats.
                                                                                                       

   The Republican questioners
                                                                                                       

   They want to support Judge Thomas without appearing to be
winking at sexual harassment.
   Sen. Orrin Hatch of Utah, who in the earlier hearings
assumed the role of Thomas defender, will be an energetic
champion. And though questions of sexual propriety weigh
heavily on Mr. Hatch, who has a reputation for being
strait-laced, he can be expected to question Ms. Hill
aggressively and to be an assertive advocate of Judge Thomas.
   Sen. Arlen Specter of Pennsylvania, like Mr. Leahy a
former prosecutor, has already spoken to Judge Thomas about
Ms. Hill's charges. The nominee denied all the charges to
him; Sen. Specter will want to be sure that Judge Thomas
didn't lie to him. Aggressive and combative, Mr. Specter will
follow the story wherever it leads him, and Republicans know
that he is not necessarily a GOP team player. He voted
against Judge Bork but for David Souter, and supported Judge
Thomas in the committee vote.
   Sen. Strom Thurmond of South Carolina, the senior
committee member, is an administration hard-liner. He is
likely to deplore sexual harassment but ask why Ms. Hill
waited to come forward.
                                                                                                       

   The Thomas handlers
                                                                                                       

   Although the White House is arguing that Judge Thomas is
preparing his defense himself, the team that prepped the
nominee for his hearings is under enormous pressure to redeem
itself and salvage the situation.
   The handlers, led by corporate lobbyist and former White
House chief of staff Kenneth Duberstein, calculated that the
harassment report could be kept confidential, and didn't
press Judiciary Chairman Biden either to dismiss the
allegations or to deal with them. The group's strategy was to
portray Judge Thomas as a person of extraordinary character,
playing down questions of his experience and scholarship, and
they didn't anticipate an attack on what they regarded his
strongest flank.
   Moreover, the group's strategy of having Judge Thomas be
as general and evasive as possible during the hearings --
insisting at one point that he had no opinion on the Supreme
Court's landmark abortion ruling -- created a credibility
problem that has haunted the nomination. Concerns about Judge
Thomas's forthrightness cost him some votes he might
otherwise have won -- and left him more vulnerable when the
sexual-harassment issue erupted. Now, the handlers are paying
the price.
   ""The horrible problem here is that there is no way to
handle this,"" says a Republican familiar with the nomination
process.
                                                                                                       

   The anti-Thomas groups
                                                                                                       

   For now at least, the activists who opposed Judge Thomas's
confirmation are riding high, having already scored a victory
by delaying the nomination.
   A number of liberal activist groups, especially the
Alliance for Justice, People for the American Way and the
Leadership Conference on Civil Rights, have emerged as the
stealth bombers of confirmation hearings, working more
feverishly than even members of the Judiciary Committee
staff. These groups' influence first was felt during the
nomination of William Rehnquist to be chief justice and
intensified during the Bork confirmation fight, as they
developed into a tightly knit network.
   ""The public wants to have the full record placed before it
and the U.S. Senate,"" says Nan Aron, director of the Alliance
for Justice.
   The groups and their supporters argue that they provide
invaluable research assistance and are a magnet for
information about nominees. But opponents of the
organizations believe, in the words of Alan Slobodin,
president and general counsel of the Washington Legal
Foundation's legal studies division, that they ""will stop at
nothing to defeat a nominee.""
   If the effort against Judge Thomas fizzles and the
organizations are seen to have grossly overreached, their
credibility will be badly damaged in any future battles.
   Civil-rights groups that have opposed Judge Thomas are in
an especially awkward position. On the one hand, says Ronald
Walters, chairman of the political science department at
Howard University, their objectives ""are going to be served
by this hearing because regardless of the outcome it's going
to damage the credibility of the nominee."" But the groups
could also lose by winning: They know that if Judge Thomas
performs poorly today and is defeated, it is unlikely the
president will nominate another black jurist.
   ---
   Jeffrey H. Birnbaum contributed to this article.
",1,"[  9.91005566e-01   6.58459197e-04   1.76203019e-02 ...,   0.00000000e+00
   0.00000000e+00   0.00000000e+00]"
9,"
   Even if he hadn't gone through the agony of the past two
weeks, Judge Thomas would have been a crucial addition to the
court, which is closely divided on such extraordinarily
important issues as abortion, religious expression, and free
speech.
   But Judge Thomas's friends and foes agree that his
nationally televised trial by fire cannot fail to change him
as a jurist. In his own testimony, he said an assassin's
bullet would have been preferable to the public hearings over
allegations of sexual harassment. Moreover, at 43, he is a
relatively young man, and his confirmation hearings suggested
that his views on many central legal questions are in flux.
This recent traumatic experience is sure to affect his
thinking.
   Clint Bolick, vice president of the Institute for Justice
in Washington and a close friend of Judge Thomas, says that
the weekend hearings will deepen his sympathy for victims and
""will reconfirm his very strong belief in individual rights.""
   But those who had qualms about Judge Thomas before Anita
Hill's accusations against him exploded in public worry that
the hearings will push him in a different direction. ""He now
sees himself as the victim of some kind of left-wing
conspiracy,"" says Estelle Rogers, a Washington attorney. As a
result, she argues, Judge Thomas will be more likely to rule
against the interests of civil rights organizations and
women's groups that opposed him.
   Others are concerned that the Supreme Court as an
institution will be diminished for having Judge Thomas on the
bench, even though Prof. Hill's allegations of misconduct
were not proven. Conservative legal commentator Bruce Fein,
who had been a Thomas supporter, says the Senate should have
rejected the nominee because ""the Supreme Court has got to be
an institution that's above suspicion. That's why Doug
Ginsburg was out. That's why Abe Fortas was out."" (Judge
Ginsburg withdrew as a nominee to the court in 1987 after it
was revealed he had smoked marijuana as a law professor;
Justice Fortas resigned in 1969 in a financial scandal.)
   Legal experts all along the political spectrum believe the
rocky confirmation hearings will influence the judge's views
on a host of issues soon to be before the court. The charges
by Prof. Hill could hardly fail to influence his thinking on
a sexual harassment case that will be argued this fall. His
lingering anger toward women's groups could also affect his
thoughts on abortion -- the most controversial issue before
the court, and an issue on which Judge Thomas has said he has
no current view.
   His confrontation with Congress, as Sen. Kennedy fears,
could easily enough affect his view of cases involving the
separation of powers between the three branches of
government. The ""high-tech lynching,"" as he called it, could
also make him less sympathetic to a free press in First
Amendment cases.
   On the other hand, liberals hope that his experience at
the hands of the Senate will have sensitized Judge Thomas to
the rights of people charged with wrongdoing. His contention
that he was wrongly accused could make him empathize with
those who protest their innocence.
   He should be able to survive his ordeal. Judge Thomas is
by no means the first Supreme Court appointee to have
weathered scandal. Others have, and then gone on to
distinguished careers on the high court. Shortly after
Justice Hugo Black's confirmation in 1937, for example, it
came to light that he had been a dues-paying member of the Ku
Klux Klan. Justice Black withstood a storm of criticism and
demands that he resign. He disowned his racist affiliations
and went on to become an influential liberal justice.
   The Thomas case, however, is unique in some respects. ""We
have never had such sustained public scrutiny of such
sensitive private matters"" involving a Supreme Court nominee,
observes Robert Katzmann, a political scientist at the
Brookings Institution. The cloud over Judge Thomas isn't
likely to dissipate quickly, especially because the Senate
was ultimately unable to determine whether he or his accuser
was telling the truth. As Judge Thomas helps decide
controversial cases over the years, the specter of Anita
Hill's lurid allegations will almost certainly be evident.
Nothing, he angrily told the Judiciary Committee, ""can . . .
give me my good name back.""
   Here's a look at issues on which legal experts think Judge
Thomas's thinking may be affected:
                                                                                                       

   SEXUAL HARASSMENT. The bitter battle over Judge Thomas's
treatment of Anita Hill has pushed a relatively obscure case
called Franklin vs. Gwinnett County (Ga.) into the limelight
because it involves sexual harassment. The case, expected to
be argued before the court later this year, centers on a
female high-school student who was forced by a male coach to
have sex with him. The question is, can the student sue the
county school system for damages under federal anti-bias law.
   The slightest utterance from Judge Thomas during this
argument is bound to be dissected and will be imbued with
special meaning. He might even be asked to recuse himself
from the case, though it's unlikely he would do so. ""People
will certainly be looking at how he decides the case,"" says
Nancy Duff Campbell, co-president of the National Women's Law
Center, which has filed a friend-of-the-court brief in the
case.
   Some believe that lingering bitterness over Anita Hill's
charges may prejudice him. ""What we've seen is that Thomas
would be biased against claims made by those trying to
protect women's rights,"" says Dawn Johnsen, legal director of
the National Abortion Rights Action League.
   But Ms. Campbell is hopeful that Judge Thomas will be
sympathetic to victims of such discrimination, in part to
rehabilitate his reputation. ""We hope this was an educational
experience and that he'll be molded in a way to be more
sensitive,"" she says.
   Judge Thomas may get a boost in this effort from the
politically attuned Chief Justice William Rehnquist. ""I
wouldn't be surprised to see the chief justice give him
opinions to write on certain topics, like sex discrimination,
specifically to try to dispel any bad image,"" says Yale
Kamisar, a constitutional law professor at the University of
Michigan.
   During the hearing, Judge Thomas made plain his abhorrence
of sexual harassment. ""I have adamantly condemned sex
harassment,"" he told the Judiciary panel. ""There is no member
of this committee or the Senate who feels stronger about sex
harassment than I do."" As chairman of the Equal Employment
Opportunity Commission, Mr. Thomas said, he took swift action
against EEOC officials who were found to have engaged in
sexual harassment.
                                                                                                       

   ABORTION. The issue that dominated the first round of
Judge Thomas's hearings last month, was abortion-the most
contentious issue before the court. Democrats questioned
Judge Thomas's credibility when he insisted not only that he
didn't have an opinion on Roe vs. Wade, the abortion-rights
landmark Supreme Court decision, but also that he had never
discussed the 1973 case.
   Women's rights organizations fear that Judge Thomas's
animosity toward liberal interest groups will influence his
decisions on reproductive rights. Judge Thomas angrily told
the committee that interest groups ""came up with this story
{Hill's charges} and used this process to destroy me.""
Claudia Withers of the Women's Legal Defense Fund says that
such expressions of hostility by Judge Thomas ""give us the
concern that he wouldn't look favorably on claims"" by
interest groups that advocate abortion rights before the
Supreme Court and that also opposed his nomination.
   The Supreme Court is scheduled to hear arguments today in
a case involving women's ability to get court orders to break
up the sort of anti-abortion blockades that roiled Wichita,
Kan., in the summer. Judge Thomas wouldn't be able to vote on
the case unless the Supreme Court asks the parties to reargue
it once he is on the bench.
   But a number of cases presenting an opportunity to
overrule the Roe vs. Wade decision are working their way
through the lower courts, and the justices are expected to
hear at least one of them next term. In the intervening
months, abortion-rights advocates worry that Judge Thomas's
bitterness toward them will harden and push him into an
anti-Roe majority on the court.
                                                                                                       

   SEPARATION OF POWERS. One legal expert who knows Judge
Thomas well is convinced that the new justice will be very
negative about any issue enhancing congressional powers. Even
before the experience of the past week, he probably would
have fallen under the influence of Justice Antonin Scalia, a
staunch foe of expanding congressional powers. That alliance
will be fortified now.
   ""Congress,"" Judge Thomas told the conservative Federalist
Society in 1988, ""is out of control."" The Senate Judiciary
Committee's performance can only have reinforced this low
opinion of the legislative branch. He called the hearings
""sick"" and ""Kafkaesque.""
   Judge Thomas has for a number of years allied himself with
conservative legal thinkers, led by Justice Scalia, who trace
many of the government's ills to congressional overreaching.
He called the 1988 Supreme Court decision on the
constitutionality of the independent counsel law ""the most
important case"" since Brown vs. Board of Education. Judge
Thomas endorsed the lone dissenter in the case, Justice
Scalia, who argued that Congress lacked the authority to set
up a special prosecutor's office to investigate alleged
wrongdoing by powerful federal officials. Judge Thomas
asserted that Justice Rehnquist, who wrote the majority
opinion upholding Congress's action, ""failed not only
conservatives but all Americans.""
                                                                                                       

   PRESS. In his opening salvo against the Judiciary
Committee and other foes, Judge Thomas recounted with disgust
the worst parts of his ordeal, describing ""reporters sneaking
into my garage to examine books that I read, reporters and
interest groups swarming over divorce papers, looking for
dirt.""
   Armstrong Williams, a Thomas friend and former aide,
reports that the judge in part blames the media for his
troubles. ""The media took the whole thing and sensationalized
it, promoted false charges, just like the Tawana Brawley
case,"" Mr. Williams says.
   There are no cases involving press freedoms on the court's
docket and Judge Thomas has had very limited First Amendment
experience, a gap that gave the American Bar Association
reservations about the nominee. Surely, though, the past 10
days haven't made him any fan of the media.
   And, in all probability, reporters will continue their
digging into Judge Thomas's past in an effort to get to the
bottom of Anita Hill's charges. ""There's a Pulitzer Prize out
there waiting for any reporter who solves this mystery,""
observes Susan Estrich, a law professor at the University of
Southern California, who helped run Gov. Michael Dukakis's
campaign for the presidency in 1988.
   Once confirmed, a Supreme Court justice ""probably can't""
be impeached for past infractions, such as lying to Congress
or committing sexual harassment, says Laurence Tribe of
Harvard Law School. The Constitution says justices may serve
as long as they maintain ""good behavior,"" and that is
generally understood to mean good behavior after they take
the oath, according to Prof. Tribe. That question remains a
murky one, however, because it hasn't been squarely
addressed.
                                                                                                       

   RIGHTS OF ACCUSED. In one of the more bizarre colloquies
of the Judiciary Committee spectacle, Democratic Sen. Dennis
DeConcini of Arizona, a member of the ethically tarnished
""Keating Five,"" commiserated with Judge Thomas about being
pilloried. Although he didn't return the sympathy, Judge
Thomas did say that ""on matters such as privacy, matters such
as procedures for charges against individuals in the criminal
context . . . this has heightened my awareness of the
importance of those protections.""
   Judge Thomas gave earlier hints that on protection of
criminals' rights he might surprise his conservative backers.
In the first phase of the hearings in September, Judge Thomas
spoke of watching from his appeals court office the bus loads
of black prisoners and thinking, ""There but for the grace of
God go I.""
   Being under the glare of the interrogators' spotlight
""could open his eyes, sure,"" says Michigan Prof. Kamisar.
   Judge Thomas will have an opportunity to apply his
criminal-law views in the case of Jacobson vs. U.S., which is
scheduled to be argued next month. Government agents used
three undercover operations over 29 months to send mailings
from phony pornography publishers to Nebraska farmer Keith
Jacobson. He eventually agreed to receive a magazine
depicting sexual acts between teen-age boys, and he was
prosecuted. Mr. Jacobson contends he wouldn't have bought the
magazine were it not for the government trap.
   In the end, some critics of Judge Thomas worry that his
recent experiences will send him onto the court as an
embittered man bent on revenge against his perceived
tormentors. ""This is a dangerous way to send someone to the
Supreme Court, feeling as victimized as he does,"" says Ms.
Rogers, the Washington attorney.
   But John Danforth, Judge Thomas's most passionate defender
in the Senate, says going through the ""agonies of hell"" has
made Clarence Thomas ""more sensitive to civil rights, to the
necessity of legal protection of the people of this country,
than most people who could conceivably be nominated for the
Supreme Court.""
",1,"[ 0.92051341  0.00182854  0.01529109 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
10,"
   Excepting the differences one would expect among
independent thinkers, Clarence Thomas and Robert Bork are cut
from the same judicial cloth. And so he too was a symbol that
had to be destroyed.
   The attack on Clarence Thomas, which boggled tens of
millions of viewing Americans, makes sense only if one
understands that the roots of the struggle extend back to
1980 and Ronald Reagan's election to the presidency. One of
the most persistent arguments of those who opposed the Reagan
era was that it was a fluke, that he was simply not elected
President because people agreed with his conservative
political philosophy. Believing this to be true, opponents of
the Reagan presidency then argued that his nomination of the
like-minded Judge Bork was also illegitimate. As they put it,
""out of the mainstream.""
   We have argued continuously during these years that this
argument was false, that the voters had indeed entrusted
Ronald Reagan with a mandate (his campaign positions were
clear) and that the losing side was trying to overturn the
results of these elections.
   With the televised Thomas hearings we have in effect just
held another national election. And the public, by every
measure available, gave Judge Thomas what in a normal
election would be called their landslide support.
   This doesn't mean that the American people support Judge
Thomas -- or Robert Bork or Ronald Reagan -- in every detail
of their political beliefs. It is likely even that on the
abortion issue, most voters are essentially pro-choice. We
don't doubt, however, that in terms of the presidency or the
Supreme Court, voters are willing to risk disappointment on
discrete issues if they approve the fundamental direction.
They have now given their consent in three successive
presidential elections to a direction that can fairly be
called conservative. The Supreme Court nominations of George
Bush comport with those results.
   The difference, however, between the American people and
the permanent political establishment in Washington is that
Washington no longer feels constrained by the American
political system. It won't wait for the next election, nor --
more importantly -- will it make the effort to persuade the
electorate to support its views of Supreme Court nominations.
   They'd rather fight their battles inside the Beltway,
which lets them operate free of input from this nation's huge
electorate. They can't possibly have wanted the sexual
harassment charge against Clarence Thomas to go before the
entire American population. It did, and they were undone by a
system that they made.
   That system has depended crucially on the support of an
ideologically compliant Washington press corps, which would
normally render a target politically controversial and, in a
risk-averse town, untouchable. Cut off from their support
base, Judge Bork, Ed Meese, Oliver North and others have been
left bleeding on the Washington fields. With Judge Thomas,
however, the system ran out of control.
   Washington's reporters, who had already largely broken
away from the editorial controls of traditional journalism,
even broke away from the congressional staffs and
special-interest groups, building the sexual harassment story
into a bonfire of personal and political grievances. They
seemed to be demanding a national referendum on sexual
harassment, meaning a Senate vote for the accuser, and
instead the whole nation showed up and a big majority voted
the other way -- to support Clarence Thomas. Perhaps the
voters felt they couldn't trust Washington or Congress with
something important.
   Now, with Clarence Thomas heading for the Court and the
voters going back to their daily lives, what has been
learned?
   The Democratic Party has to decide whether its future lies
with the world view of the special-interest groups and
anonymous congressional staff, or with people such as Bill
Clinton, Doug Wilder, Paul Tsongas and others, mostly
beyond-the-Beltway governors, trying to conform the party's
historic ideals to the temper of the modern electorate.
   The congressional and White House Republicans should have
learned that in a period of divided government, they can only
win, as here, by abandoning their traditional passivity in
favor of going on the offensive, and without apology.
   Black Americans have perhaps the greatest sorting out to
do. The bonfire illuminated the existence of an impressive,
moderate black middleclass. If there is a group of true
political independents in this country, they are it. It looks
as if they have a lot to say to Democrats, Republicans and
white feminists. They should stick around and keep talking.
   As for Clarence Thomas, we don't agree that he joins the
Court in a damaged state. This country is in the middle of a
historic political turning. There was no reason to expect
that the overturning of the old order would be quiet or easy.
But history will note that at the moment Clarence Thomas was
about to be destroyed by the old order, the American people
came forward and by the millions confirmed his appointment to
the Supreme Court. It looks to us as if Clarence Thomas is
the first Justice to sit on the U.S. Supreme Court with a
popular mandate.
",1,"[ 0.24487645  0.01007606  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
11,"
   Michael Milken, who faces insider
trading charges, is seen as the Wall Street whiz kid who made
``junk-bond'' financing into the tool of choice for corporate
raiders.
   In so doing, Milken, 42, transformed Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.
from a minor player on Wall Street into a powerhouse and in the
process made himself feared, respected and enormously wealthy.
   The 184-page civil complaint filed in U.S. District Court in New
York against Milken, Drexel and others on Wednesday followed months
of speculation about Drexel's involvement in the Ivan Boesky
insider trading scandal.
   Although the move by the Securities and Exchange Commission had
been anticipated, Milken and others who have made fortunes in junk
bonds continued to hold their annual Beverly Hills spring gathering
known as the Predators' Ball. The message was clear: Never mind the
burgeoning government investigation of insider trading. It was
business as usual at Drexel, and Milken was still king of the junk
bonds _ high-risk, high-yield notes used to finance corporate
takeovers.
   Milken had refused to comment publicly on the scandal up until
Wednesday, when he issued a written statement asserting that ``for
the past 22 months I have been the subject of a shadow trial of
systematic leaks and innuendo based on false accusations.''
   In anticipation of a crisis, Drexel undertook a public-relations
campaign starting last year to polish its image, stressing the role
of junk bonds in helping small companies and downplaying their role
in large takeover battles.
   The normally secretive and unreachable Milken himself played a
major role in that blitz, accepting speaking engagements. He
granted selective media interviews _ on condition there would be no
questions about the Securities and Exchange Commission and the
investigation.
   The speeches and interviews focused almost solely on Milken's
latest pet plan _ to alleviate the Latin American debt crisis by
swapping debt for equity or selling securities backed by those
countries' oil and silver resources.
   In the years before the insider trading scandal, the financial
media wrote glowingly of Milken.
   ``A one-man revolution,'' Forbes magazine headlined one typical
article.
   ``A world-class financial wizard, on a plane with the likes of
Bernard Baruch and Jay Gould ... Mozart of the money markets,''
wrote California Business magazine.
   It had been a relatively short road for Milken, from head
cheerleader at Birmingham High School in the San Fernando Valley in
1964 _ actress Sally Field and superagent Michael Ovitz were among
his classmates _ to the top of the nation's financial industry.
   Milken reportedly pulls down $40 million a year as the head of
Drexel's junk-bond operation and his personal fortune has been
estimated at more than $500 million.
   He lives with his children and wife, Lori _ his high school
sweetheart whom he married at age 22 _ in a house on the former
estate of the late actor Clark Gable in suburban Encino, an
upper-middle-class section of the San Fernando Valley two miles
from his childhood home.
   Milken's fascination with finance stetches back to his boyhood.
   At age 10, while other boys were giggling over comic books,
Michael Robert Milken was enamored of money. A favorite pastime was
hovering over tax returns being prepared by his father, an
accountant.
   After studying business at the University of California,
Berkeley, and the University of Pennsylvania's Wharton School,
Milken went to work for Drexel Firestone &amp; Co. in Philadelphia as a
junior bond trader.
   Drexel merged with Burnham &amp; Co. in 1973 and Lambert Brussels
Witter in 1976 to become today's Drexel Burnham Lambert, and
Milken's job was moved to New York.
   Milken worked hard to make a name for himself but never got used
to the East. As the story goes, he wearied of the cold Eastern
winters that froze his water pipes and kept his two children from
playing outside. He also tired of the long commutes from his home
in suburban Philadelphia to Wall Street.
   In 1977, he pulled off a coup by convincing Drexel to let him
move the company's junk-bond operations from Wall Street to Beverly
Hills, just off swank Rodeo Drive.
   His reasoning was simple: He didn't have to be sitting in a tiny
office in Manhattan to make deals. He just had to know the players
and have their confidence.
   Milken was enormously successful in that regard, almost
single-handedly building a close-knit network of junk-bond
investors. Milken no longer has to go on the road to make deals.
The corporate players come to him.
   Milken still works hard _ 12 to 13 hours a day, seven days a
week. He once said he had no hobbies ``because what I do is fun.''
   Milken's appearance generally is described as ordinary. He buys
his suits off the rack, and it was only a couple years ago that he
traded in his unstylish American car for a Mercedes.
",2,"[ 0.38538942  0.0092504   0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
12,"
   Michael Milken, the fallen Drexel Burnham Lambert
financier, is striking out on his own.
   But what isn't clear is whether loyal ex-colleagues will follow
the Pied Piper of junk bonds to his new firm _ and how long the
venture will last with Milken facing a lengthy jail term.
   Milken, 42, resigned Thursday after 19 years at Drexel, where he
began a wildly successful career that helped reshape corporate
America in the 1980s through the pioneering use of low-grade
securities called junk bonds.
   Milken, who made a reported $550 million in 1987, said he is
forming a consulting firm to assist companies that want to raise
money to start up, grow or stay in business.
   But he faces $1.85 billion in forfeitures of alleged illegal
profits and a lengthy jail term if convicted on a 98-count fraud and
racketeering indictment, the government's largest securities crime
prosecution to date.
   People involved in Milken's plans for the new firm, International
Capital Assets Group, said Milken does not intend to raid Drexel's
Beverly Hills, Calif., junk bond division, which he founded and ran
until his March indictment.
   The principals in the new firm, which now has a handful of
employees and a temporary Los Angeles office, are not going to be
``Drexel people,'' Milken associates said.
   But Milken still commands tremendous loyalty among some key junk
bond employees and Drexel clients, and no one is ruling out
defections. Milken associates did not release details on his plans,
including whether an affiliated brokerage would be formed.
   A Drexel official, speaking on condition of anonymity, said the
Wall Street giant does not anticipate conflicts with Milken's new
firm because it will not be in the brokerage business.
   Under Drexel's still-to-be-approved settlement of civil insider
trading and other fraud charges with the Securities and Exchange
Commission, Drexel and its employees are barred from doing business
with Milken, directly or indirectly.
   The Drexel official said the provision likely will be reviewed on
a case-by-case basis, so some contact between the New York
investment firm's clients and Milken may occur. For instance, Milken
may be able to refer clients to Drexel and vice versa but not
receive any fees.
   Milken's resignation ends the relationship between one of the
most important financial players of the decade and the firm he
helped boost from a second-tier brokerage to the nation's fifth
largest.
   ``Michael Milken made many important contributions to Drexel
Burnham, and his resignation, although not unexpected, is a sad
event,'' Drexel stated. ``We wish him well in his new endeavor.''
   Milken widely was credited with creating a $175 billion-a-year
junk bond market. His pitchman sale of the bonds _ previously used
mainly by companies with low credit ratings _ helped fuel the
decade's corporate takeover mania by giving smaller companies and
corporate raiders a tool for financing growth, mergers and takeovers.
   But the federal government alleges Milken used his powers through
Drexel to engage in a range of securities crimes, including schemes
with now-jailed stock speculator Ivan Boesky.
   He also is accused of insider trading in a separate SEC lawsuit.
No settlement has been reached and no trial scheduled in that case.
   Milken had been on leave from Drexel since his criminal
indictment. His brother, Lowell, who also was charged in the case,
announced Thursday he was quitting the firm to return to practicing
law.
   ``I am naturally disappointed to be forced to leave Drexel as
part of the firm's settlement with the government, but I look
forward to the opportunity of helping people build companies,''
Michael Milken said in a statement.
   Milken joined Drexel full-time in 1970 after graduating from the
University of Pennsylvania's Wharton School. In 1978, he moved
Drexel's junk bond division to Beverly Hills.
   Milken's trial in federal court in Manhattan is set for next
March. He is free under a $700 million bond package.
   Lawyers close to the case indicated Milken's decision to resign
was calculated. By quitting, Milken pre-empts the firm's agreement
with the SEC to dismiss him once the settlement is approved by a
federal judge.
   With Milken's resignation, lawyers may argue that parts of the
Drexel pact are moot and mount further challenges. They also are
expected to challenge the provision barring Drexel and Milken from
doing business with the same clients.
",2,"[ 0.35592355  0.00931979  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
13,"
   Columbia Savings &amp; Loan Association has filed a
$6 billion civil lawsuit accusing Michael Milken and other former
Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. officials of fraudulently peddling junk
bonds in the 1980s.
   The lawsuit, filed Wednesday by the failing savings and loan,
claims that Milken and others manipulated and coerced Columbia and
other thrifts into buying billions of dollars worth of the risky
high-yield bonds.
   ``Absent such deceit and manipulations it would have been clear
that the market for junk bonds was highly illiquid and that junk
bonds were unsuitable investments for savings and loan
institutions,'' the suit says.
   Columbia once was a major Drexel customer. It holds a junk bond
portfolio with a face value of over $4 billion, the largest of any
thrift. Milken had a close business relationship with former
Columbia chairman Thomas Spiegel, who resigned last year.
   Milken, the former head of Drexel's Beverly Hills, Calif.-based
junk bond department, was sentenced last month to 10 years in
prison for six felonies related to illegal trading practices. None
of the charges involved junk bonds.
   The lawsuit by Columbia, filed in U.S. District Court in Los
Angeles, names Milken, nine other Drexel officials and more than
100 investment partnerships sponsored by the collapsed Wall Street
firm.
   It alleges that the thrift lost more than $2 billion on
investments in junk bonds and seeks three times that amount under
federal racketeering and antitrust laws.
   Columbia, based in Beverly Hills, said in the lawsuit that
Milken and other Drexel officials manipulated, coerced and deceived
the thrift by promising that the market for the bonds would remain
active and the thrift would make money.
   In a statement, a spokesman for Milken said the lawsuit was
without merit. The statement said Columbia was an independent
institution that made its own investment decisions, often in
disagreement with Milken.
   ``It is outrageous now to blame Michael Milken for losses as a
result of strategies and decisions that were implemented long after
he was no longer active at Drexel Burnham Lambert, and which he did
not endorse or agree with,'' the statement said.
   Milken resigned from Drexel last year but the statement said he
had gradually reduced his day-to-day activity after he was linked
to the government's Wall Street investigation in late 1986.
   It said the lawsuit amounts to ``shifting the blame to the most
convenient scapegoat on the financial scene - Michael Milken - who
has been blamed for every problem facing the U.S. economy except
the Iraqi invasion of Kuwait.''
   The lawsuit joins scores of other civil complaints against
Milken for alleged wrongdoing related to his guilty plea as well as
other trading activity during his tenure at Drexel, which is now in
federal bankruptcy court proceedings.
   The 176-page lawsuit by Columbia also claims that Milken and
other Drexel employees appropriated stock in buyouts for themselves
via the investment partnerships that should have gone to junk bond
buyers in the deals.
   The suit accuses Milken and others of manipulating the junk bond
market, giving bribes and stock investment opportunities to some
thrift executives, misappropriating valuable stock interests in
junk bond deals, skimming profits from junk bond trading, and
controlling through illegal means a web of thrifts and other
investors in junk bonds.
   Columbia was one of many savings and loans, big investors and
other institutions that invested heavily in deals financed or
supported by Drexel in the 1980s.
   Columbia says in the suit that its junk bonds have a total face
value of $4.3 billion, but that it has written down their value to
$2.5 billion to account for the decline in their market price. It
also says it has suffered actual losses of $200 million through the
sale of some bonds.
   The suit says Columbia was ``ill-equipped'' to make use of
relaxed federal laws in the early 1980s that allowed thrifts to
invest in corporate securities such as junk bonds. It alleges that
Milken and the others exploited this weakness.
   The savings and loan is expected to be take over soon by the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. as part of the nation's costly
thrift bailout.
   The FDIC and Resolution Trust Corp., which administers the
failed thrifts, already have filed a claim for $4.5 billion against
Drexel in federal bankruptcy court alleging that fraudulent junk
bond dealings caused Columbia heavy losses.
   Also named in the Milken lawsuit are former Drexel chief
executive Frederick Joseph; Milken's brother, Lowell, also a former
Drexel executive; Peter Ackerman, Drexel's former chief of capital
markets; and other officials.
   As part of his settlement of criminal and civil charges by the
government, Milken has agreed to place $400 million in a fund to
compensate investors harmed by his actions. But he would remain
liable for awards exceeding the amount in the fund.
",2,"[ 0.32325525  0.00846437  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
14,"

By the time he was a high school student in the San Fernando Valley, it was 
clear that Michael Milken had a bright future. He was voted most likely to 
succeed, head cheerleader, king of the senior prom and president of the men's 
honor organization. Classmates probably wouldn't have been surprised if he 
became a millionaire by the age of 30. 


By many estimates, Milken probably achieved that milestone, because by the age 
of 30 he was a fast-rising star at the fast-rising securities firm of Drexel 
Burnham Lambert Inc., managing its high-yield ""junk bond"" operations and 
reaping huge profits for the firm and himself. Last July, when he hit the age 
of 42, Milken had become one of the nation's richest men, with an estimated net 
worth of close to $1 billion. 


The news Wednesday that Milken will be fired by Drexel and will not paid his 
1988 bonus of $200 million as part of the company's settlement of securities 
fraud charges signals the end to the Milken era at Drexel. But it doesn't close 
the book on his impact on corporate America. 


Michael Robert Milken, the center of the nation's biggest securities fraud 
investigation ever, arguably is the most significant and visionary figure in 
American business in the 1980s, the J. P. Morgan of his generation who 
unleashed a revolution in how businesses raise capital to finance growth. 


Milken virtually single-handedly pioneered the modern junk bond market, now 
worth $180 billion in total bonds outstanding, and the fuel that has financed 
hundreds of small- and middle-size businesses and wave after wave of corporate 
takeovers. Milken's actions directly or indirectly touched the lives of 
millions of Americans, from ordinary workers to high-powered corporate 
executives. 


He also steered Wall Street into a new and far more aggressive role in 
takeovers -- and not just by advising in them or financing them. He actually 
created and built up entire entities and corporate raiders who launched bids, 
partly with the aim of reviving the era of the owner-manager and making giant 
corporations lean and mean again. 


""He has indelibly changed the course and face of the investment banking 
business and the economy as a whole,"" said Fredric Roberts, head of a Los 
Angeles investment banking firm bearing his name and Southern California 
district director for the National Assn. of Securities Dealers. 


Yet, for all his contributions, Milken's name is hardly a household word. He 
shunned publicity and did his deal-making in relative secrecy. 


He also has been a man of sharp contrasts. He has an unusual recollection of 
detail and could recite the terms on every high-yield bond in America. Yet he 
reportedly forgot who was the best man at his wedding. He is an intense 
workaholic who got to the office by 4:30 every morning and typically worked 
15-hour days. Yet he is described by friends as a devoted family man who, until 
his latest legal troubles mounted, spent long hours with his three children, 
all of whom have suffered from various health problems. 


History has yet to render a final verdict on Milken as a saint or a sinner, or 
something in between. His crowning achievement -- the creation and growth of 
the modern junk bond market -- has yet to weather a serious recession. And 
while his junk bond machine transformed Drexel from a second-rate securities 
firm into one of the most powerful on Wall Street, his alleged transgressions 
as its junk bond chief ultimately could be the firm's undoing. 


While Milken's junk bonds helped companies create thousands of new jobs, they 
also led to layoffs of workers at firms taken over by raiders financed by junk 
bonds. And while Milken's family foundations donated millions of dollars of his 
profits to various charitable causes, he also is accused of questionable 
practices that netted exorbitant profits for himself and colleagues. 


But whatever the future of Drexel and its once-star junk bond chief, it is 
clear that Milken is an exceptional individual who was driven from the very 
beginning with unusual determination. 


Born in the San Fernando Valley as the son of an accountant, Milken gained 
business experience as a teen-ager helping his father prepare tax returns. 
Attending Birmingham High School in Van Nuys, he served as head cheerleader on 
a squad that included future actress Sally Field. He was voted the ""most 
spirited"" and ""friendliest"" member of his graduating class of 1964. 




Managed Investments 


""He was very successful in everything he did, whether it was sports or school 
service or debate,"" recalled Harry Horowitz, a Milken friend since childhood 
who followed him to Drexel and now serves as a senior vice president there. 
""He's always been in a leadership role in anything he's been involved with."" 


Milken then earned an undergraduate degree in business administration at UC 
Berkeley, avoiding the anti-war campus unrest of the time, serving instead as 
president of his fraternity. As a sidelight, Milken managed investments for a 
small group of clients, eating losses himself in exchange for half the profits. 


After marrying his high-school sweetheart, Lori Hackel, Milken moved to the 
Philadelphia area, where he attended the University of Pennsylvania's Wharton 
Graduate School of Business, becoming one of its brightest students and working 
part time in the Philadelphia office of a precursor to Drexel Burnham Lambert. 


While at Wharton, Milken began to take an interest in the securities that would 
make him legendary. 


Junk bonds at the time were primarily debt issues that were once highly rated 
but had fallen in value and increased in risk when the issuing companies fell 
on hard times. Milken believed that investors were overly pessimistic about 
these bonds -- which often could be bought for as little as 20 cents or 30 
cents on the dollar -- and that their higher yields more than compensated for 
their added risk of default. Investors holding diversified portfolios of many 
junk bonds would earn higher profits, even if some of the bonds defaulted, he 
reasoned. 


Milken's shrewd trading of junk bonds soon began making millions of dollars for 
Drexel -- and for himself and his band of hard-working traders and salesmen. 
Finally, in 1978, Milken asked to move the junk bond trading operation from New 
York to the Century City section of Los Angeles. (It moved in 1983 to its 
present home on Rodeo Drive in Beverly Hills.) Out West, Milken felt he could 
work long hours yet still be home in time for dinner with his family. Milken, 
friends say, also wanted to be close to his father, who was then dying of 
cancer. 




Began Underwriting 


Drexel executives were reportedly uncomfortable with the move because it also 
would give Milken more independence. But they granted it because they had no 
choice, given Milken's megabuck success. 


Soon, Milken found that trading junk bonds wasn't enough. He and Drexel began 
underwriting new junk bonds, issued by companies that were too small, young or 
risky to get conventional bank loans or issue conventional high-rated corporate 
bonds. 


Milken viewed the issuance of junk bonds by small- and medium-size companies as 
part of a crusade to change the face of corporate America. Milken correctly 
felt that those companies were the economy's true job creators, and allowing 
them access to capital markets would unleash a wave of entrepreneurial 
innovation that would make America more competitive. 


To spur this crusade, Milken also created and unleashed a stable of corporate 
raiders whose hostile takeover bids were made possible by junk financing. 
Milken-backed entrepreneurs -- such as T. Boone Pickens Jr., who launched 
unsuccessful bids for Phillips Petroleum, Gulf Oil and Unocal; Ronald O. 
Perelman, who took over Revlon, and Carl C. Icahn, who took over TWA -- would 
displace managements that had grown tired and stale, Milken reasoned. 


""Capital is no longer a scarce resource,"" Milken told a group of high school 
students in a 1986 speech. ""(The) scarce resource today is management, 
knowledge, vision, dealing with change, recognizing what people want and need 
in the future and the ability to work together."" 




Showed Genuine Interest 


Businessmen were mesmerized by Milken's broad insight, knowledge and charm. 


""The guy was extremely supportive,"" said Robert Berglass, chairman and 
president of Dep Corp., a Rancho Dominguez-based manufacturer of cosmetics and 
other personal-care products. ""I got a feeling that he had a genuine interest 
in our ideas as to how to grow."" Since Drexel became its investment banker in 
1986, Dep's sales and employment have more than doubled, Berglass said. 


""I'd talk to Mike from time to time just to get ideas,"" said Eli Broad, 
chairman and chief executive of Kaufman &amp; Broad, a Los Angeles home builder 
and occasional Drexel client. ""He had a pretty broad window on the world. He 
must have talked to 200 people a day, so he was a good source of information 
and ideas."" 


Companies ranging from MCI to Metromedia, from Holiday Inns to Levitz 
Furniture, used Drexel-underwritten bonds to finance growth or takeovers. 


""Mike's a builder; everything he's touched has been the better for it,"" 
colleague Horowitz said. ""These companies didn't have opportunities to raise 
money in the capital markets. Some were in industries that didn't even exist 
before."" Entire industry segments, such as health maintenance organizations, 
home building, entertainment and hotels, derived much of their financing 
through Drexel's junk juggernaut, Horowitz notes. 


Milken also is described by colleagues as a supportive, although somewhat 
harried, manager. He typically slept only three or four hours a night at his 
Encino home and was at his desk every morning at 4:30, hours that his staff 
often kept as well. He had no office, instead occupying the middle of an 
X-shaped desk where he was constantly on the phone or monitoring his staff of 
more than 100 traders, whom he saw ""as his extended family,"" as one colleague 
put it. Clients or others seeking appointments with Milken sometimes had to 
meet him at unusual times -- like 5 a.m. on Sundays. 




Manipulation Claimed 


Yet Milken took great pains to be with his family, particularly his daughter, 
who suffers from a form of epilepsy, and his two sons, Horowitz said. This past 
week, pulled away from his family to New York to plan his legal strategies, he 
brought an extra set of his childrens' school books so he could help them with 
their homework, Horowitz said. 


But despite the image of Milken as a devoted father and charitable giver, 
federal investigators and critics believe that he built his junk bond empire 
partly on deceit and manipulation. 


Investigators believe that institutions and individuals may have been pressured 
into buying and selling junk bonds through an incestuous system of favors and 
obligations. Junk bond issuers often were asked to buy junk bonds issued by 
other corporations. Those that did not often found themselves frozen out of 
future Milken deals. 


Drexel and Milken defenders say such practices were necessary to maintain 
orderly markets in junk bonds where there were few buyers and sellers anyway. 


Regulators might have overlooked such practices were it not also for alleged 
illegal activities related to Milken's involvement in corporate takeovers. 
Although takeovers account for only about a fourth of junk bonds issued, the 
Securities and Exchange Commission and federal prosecutors charge, among other 
things, that Drexel's junk bond operations engaged in an array of securities 
violations, including market manipulation, inadequate disclosure, ""parking"" of 
securities to hide their true ownership and other infractions. 


Milken is expected to be indicted separately on these charges soon, possibly 
this week. And Drexel's expected guilty pleas will not help his defense, a 
situation that Milken supporters at Drexel say amounts to a cold betrayal of 
the man who put the firm on the map. 




Repairing His Image 


People close to Milken say he is convinced of his innocence and is willing to 
undergo a lengthy trial to prove it. He also feels misunderstood and maligned 
by the public and the news media -- but his reluctance to talk to reporters 
reinforced such an image. 


Accordingly, Milken has moved in the past year to try to repair his public 
persona. Once totally inaccessible to the media, Milken recently has granted 
interviews, often discussing one of his newer interests: how to solve the Third 
World debt problems by refinancing underdeveloped nations' bank loans. 


He also has taken pains to publicize his charitable activities, which ranged 
from taking underprivileged children to baseball games to donating millions of 
dollars to charities. Among his favorite causes: cancer research, youth 
organizations and Jewish community organizations. 


""Mike always had a vision of being successful and wanting to help others from 
behind the scenes,"" Horowitz said. 


Yet although Milken's spirits are high, the legal pressures have taken their 
toll, colleagues and friends say. ""Mike's worked for Drexel for 17 years, he 
never worked anywhere else,"" one friend said. ""Now all that is being taken away 
from him."" 


Main story, Part I, Page 1 

",2,"[ 0.          0.          0.00734075 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
15,"

Michael Milken, the Drexel Burnham Lambert ""junk bond"" wizard in Beverly Hills 
who revolutionized U.S. corporate finance and raised funds for dozens of 
corporate raids, was indicted Wednesday on federal racketeering, insider 
trading and other securities fraud counts. 


The long-expected indictment also named Milken's brother, Lowell Milken, and a 
former Drexel trader, Bruce L. Newberg. 


If convicted on the racketeering charges, the three could face an astronomical 
amount in financial penalties: The indictment asks that they forfeit a total of 
$1.85 billion, representing their salaries, other compensation and their share 
of Drexel profits, all earned in what the government charges was a continuing 
criminal enterprise operated at the New York-based investment banking firm. 




Fines Could Be Doubled 


In addition, the federal racketeering law, known as the Racketeer Influenced 
and Corrupt Organizations Act, or RICO, at least theoretically could subject 
them to twice that amount in fines. This means each defendant could face up to 
$3.7 billion in fines on the two RICO charges. They also face additional fines 
on the other counts totaling in the millions of dollars. 


Michael Milken faces a maximum jail sentence of about 300 years, with lesser 
amounts for the other two defendants. 


The indictment apparently marks the end of Milken's 20-year career at the firm 
that his junk bond operation transformed from a second-rank investment bank to 
one of the powerhouses on Wall Street. Junk bonds are high-risk, high-yield 
debt securities. 


Immediately after the 98-count indictment was returned by a federal grand jury, 
Drexel said that Milken, 42, and his brother, 40, had requested and been 
granted leaves of absence. John Kissick, formerly head of the firm's corporate 
finance department in Beverly Hills, has been expected to take Michael Milken's 
place. 


The criminal charges result from the biggest criminal securities fraud 
investigation ever undertaken by the government. The inquiry has been under way 
for over two years. Benito Romano, the U.S. attorney in Manhattan, said ""this 
specific investigation is continuing"" and didn't rule out the possibility that 
additional individuals may be charged soon. 


The charges filed Wednesday mean that Newberg is now facing two separate 
racketeering indictments. He is also named as a defendant in an indictment 
returned last July relating to Princeton/Newport Partners, a small investment 
firm that did business with Drexel. The charges against him in the two 
indictments appear to cover the same general chain of events. 


Lowell Milken, a lawyer, gave up a promising legal career in the 1970s to help 
his brother run Drexel's Beverly Hills office. The indictment charges that 
Lowell ""was his brother's principal adviser in the conduct of the conspiracy."" 


Sources at the firm said the indictment of Michael Milken probably would clear 
the way for Drexel to swiftly settle civil charges filed by the Securities and 
Exchange Commission. Milken's continued presence at the firm was a major 
sticking point in the talks. 


Settlement with the SEC, in turn, would remove the last obstacle to Drexel's 
carrying out its pledge to plead guilty to six criminal counts and pay $650 
million in financial penalties. The firm had entered into that agreement in 
December, in part to avoid more serious racketeering charges and a possible 
huge forfeiture of assets. 


The 110-page indictment returned Wednesday appears to closely follow the civil 
charges contained in an SEC lawsuit filed in September against Drexel and the 
Milkens. It contains only a few charges that weren't in the SEC's complaint and 
leaves out a number that were. 


The indictment accuses Michael Milken of a prolonged pattern of insider 
trading, stock market manipulation and defrauding clients. It claims that he 
sought to enrich himself through self-dealing at the same time that he was 
acting on behalf of Drexel's customers. 




Areas of Wrongdoing 


The indictment charges three broad areas of wrongdoing. One involves 
transactions with former stock speculator Ivan F. Boesky, who pleaded guilty to 
a single criminal charge and gave prosecutors the information that touched off 
the Drexel investigation. The indictment charges that Milken used Boesky's firm 
to hide illegal stock trading. 


The second broad area involves transactions with Princeton/Newport Partners, in 
which Drexel and Milken allegedly helped Princeton/Newport carry out tax fraud 
through sham securities trades with Drexel. Among other charges, the indictment 
alleges that Drexel used Princeton/Newport to illegally manipulate the price of 
COMB Co. securities in 1985. 


The third general area involves alleged straight insider trading in the 
securities of Lorimar Inc. and Viacom Inc. by Michael Milken. 


Although the government could immediately ask a federal judge to freeze the 
three defendants' personal assets, Romano, the U.S. attorney in Manhattan, said 
he probably will not do that. He said his office has been negotiating with the 
defendants' lawyers and added that he expects a bond to be posted by the three 
men, covering at least a part of the amount they may be required to forfeit to 
the government. 




Expects Assurances 


Romano said he expects to receive written assurances that assets covering the 
rest will not be dissipated before a trial is held. 


When asked about the huge amounts, among the largest that individuals have been 
asked to forfeit in a RICO case, Romano said the numbers represented ""the 
extraordinary levels of compensation and stock ownership in the (illegal) 
Drexel enterprise"" paid to Michael Milken and the others. The indictment notes 
that Milken received $1.1 billion in direct compensation from Drexel from 1984 
through 1987, as well as millions in other forms of compensation, and that he 
is Drexel's largest individual stockholder, owning about 6% of the firm. 


According to the indictment, Milken's pay was $123.8 million in 1984 and $135 
million in 1985, then more than doubled in 1986 to $294.8 million. In 1987, he 
was paid $550 million. The indictment says that, during those years, Milken's 
personal compensation amounted to between 28% and 44% of the junk bond 
department's gross revenues. 


Lowell Milken allegedly received $102 million in direct compensation during the 
same period. 


Drexel's tentative settlement of the six criminal charges pending against the 
firm calls for it to withhold nearly all of Michael Milken's compensation from 
1988, as well as about $13 million owed to Lowell Milken. But the brothers are 
challenging that in court as a violation of their constitutional rights, and it 
will be up to a federal judge to decide. 


The $1.85-billion total that the three are being asked to forfeit was based in 
part on calculations of how much each of them had received from Drexel. But 
Romano said that, under the law, each of them could be held ""jointly and 
separately"" liable for the full amount. Michael Milken has been reported to 
have a personal net worth of nearly $1 billion. 


Arthur L. Liman, one of Milken's main defense lawyers, said in a written 
statement that Milken ""will plead not guilty with confidence that in a fair 
trial he will be acquitted."" Liman said: ""The charges against Mr. Milken are 
essentially a repetition of the accusations made by Ivan Boesky and others as 
they bargained for leniency or immunity from prosecution."" 


Both Milkens strongly denied the charges against them. Michael Milken said in a 
written press release: ""I am confident that in the end I will be vindicated."" 
Lowell Milken said that ""the proof will show that I had virtually no contacts 
with Ivan Boesky, and that I had little, if anything, to do with the events the 
prosecutors misrepresent in order to construct their charges."" 


He added that ""I have been thrown into this indictment because of a fact in 
which I take great pride -- I am Michael Milken's brother."" 


Michael Armstrong, Lowell's lawyer, said in a brief interview that he found 
little that was unexpected in the indictment. ""It seems like little more than a 
rehash of what the SEC came out with six months ago,"" he said. 


In another statement, two lawyers representing Newberg accused the government 
of seeking to punish Newberg for refusing to become a prosecution witness by 
indicting him twice on racketeering charges. 


""The second RICO indictment of Mr. Newberg, containing essentially the same 
charges as those in the first indictment, is a total perversion of the RICO 
statute,"" the lawyers said. Newberg could not be reached for comment. He left 
Drexel when it became apparent that he was going to be charged in the 
Princeton/Newport case. 


Romano said that none of the three would be arrested. Instead, they will be 
allowed to present themselves for arraignment, probably one week from today. 
The government requested that U.S. District Judge Kimba M. Wood be assigned to 
the case, because she is already presiding over the case in which Drexel is 
expected to plead guilty to six charges. 


The indictment conspicuously leaves out a number of names of Drexel employees 
who reportedly have been under investigation. Several of them had received 
""target"" letters from prosecutors warning them that they faced indictment. 
Defense lawyers said they believe that the government may file additional 
indictments, or file a new indictment, superseding the one handed up Wednesday, 
that would include more individuals as defendants. 

",2,"[ 0.          0.          0.00925312 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
16,"

""Junk bond"" wizard Michael Milken officially ended his 20-year career at Drexel 
Burnham Lambert Inc. on Thursday and said he will launch his own financial 
consulting firm while he awaits trial on racketeering and securities fraud 
charges. 


Milken, 42, who has been on a leave of absence from Drexel since March 29, on 
Thursday submitted his resignation. In a telephone interview, he said his new 
firm, International Capital Access Group, would offer a wide range of 
consulting services consistent with his personal interests and his previous 
work at Drexel. He claimed that one purpose of the firm will be to ""address the 
major issues in society."" 


He said he would offer advice on subjects as diverse as the Third World debt 
crisis, helping unions, employees and minorities obtain ownership stakes in 
companies and advising financially troubled companies on how to raise new 
capital. 




'Very Emotional Experience' 


The timing of Milken's resignation appears to have been influenced by a Supreme 
Court decision last week that cleared the way for Drexel to complete its 
announced plan to settle civil insider-trading and securities fraud charges 
brought by the Securities and Exchange Commission. The settlement now is 
expected to go into effect within the next few weeks. It requires Drexel to 
terminate Milken's employment and also avoid any direct or indirect business 
dealings with him. 


Milken's brother, Lowell Milken, 39, also resigned Thursday from Drexel. He 
said through his attorney that he plans to resume practicing law. Lowell Milken 
had been a lawyer with the Los Angeles firm of Irell &amp; Manella before he 
left in 1978 to help his brother run Drexel's junk bond department. Michael 
Armstrong, Lowell Milken's lawyer, said his client hasn't decided yet where he 
will practice. Lowell Milken was also indicted in March on racketeering 
charges. 


During the rare, on-the-record interview, Michael Milken said of the 
resignation: ""After spending your whole life working for one company, it's a 
very emotional experience."" But in a reference to the investigation and legal 
problems that have beset him, he added, ""the last few years have been an 
emotional experience."" 


Milken said he decided to set up his own firm now because ""to continue to help 
(people he has done business with or offered advice to), I need some vehicle to 
be able to help."" 




'Naturally Disappointed' 


Milken started out in 1969 as a part-time employee at Drexel Harriman, a 
Philadelphia investment firm that was a precursor to Drexel Burnham Lambert, 
while attending the University of Pennsylvania's Wharton School of Business. 
Within a decade, his pioneering use of high-yield, high-risk junk bonds had 
transformed Drexel from a second-tier brokerage firm into one of Wall Street's 
most powerful investment banking houses. 


In a written statement issued Thursday, Milken said: 


""Drexel is the only company I've worked for since graduating from college. And 
it's the only one I ever expected to work for. I am naturally disappointed to 
be forced to leave Drexel as part of the firm's settlement with the government, 
but I look forward to the opportunity of helping people build companies."" 


Milken currently faces a 98-count federal criminal indictment. The government 
is also demanding that he forfeit $1.85 billion under the racketeering charges. 


Steven Anreder, Drexel's spokesman, said: ""Michael Milken made many important 
contributions to Drexel Burnham, and his resignation, although not unexpected, 
is a sad event."" He added: ""We wish him well in his new endeavor."" 


Milken was somewhat vague about exactly what the new firm will do or how many 
people it will employ. His personal spokesman, Ken Lerer, said it would start 
out with fewer than 10 employees. Tentative plans call for it to be based in 
West Los Angeles, and Lerer said it definitely won't be in the Beverly Hills 
building that houses Drexel's junk bond department. Milken, his brother and 
several other partners own that building. 




Declined to Speculate 


Milken said he isn't currently talking with any of his former colleagues at 
Drexel about coming to work for his new firm, but he didn't rule out that 
possibility. ""I just can't tell you at this time,"" he said. 


He also declined to speculate on whether he might try to expand the firm to 
offer full-scale investment banking services if he should succeed in overcoming 
the criminal and civil charges facing him. ""The financial world changes all the 
time,"" he said. ""Exactly what one would be interested in doing in the future I 
don't know."" 


For the time being, Milken's legal problems probably will prevent him from 
competing directly with Drexel, individuals involved in the legal cases said. 
Were he to branch out beyond consulting to underwriting or trading securities, 
he might run afoul of federal and state regulators who supervise the 
registration of securities broker-dealers. But sources said the potential 
exists nevertheless for conflicts with Drexel. 


The SEC settlement's ban on Drexel doing business either directly or indirectly 
with Milken could be interpreted to mean that Drexel can't do business with 
clients advised by Milken. Milken's lawyers haven't said yet whether they will 
challenge that provision of the settlement in court. If it goes into effect, 
however, it conceivably could force clients to choose between dealing with 
Milken or Drexel. A source close to Milken said: ""I think you'd have to take it 
on a case-by-case basis."" 


Anreder said: ""We don't anticipate any conflicts."" 


Milken also declined to say if he might refer clients to firms other than 
Drexel for investment banking services. ""I can't predict what's going to happen 
in the future,"" he said. ""We'll see what happens and it will depend on each 
individual situation."" 


Milken, who earned amounts ranging up to $550 million per year at Drexel, over 
the last year has attempted to help arrange financing for unions and workers 
seeking to take over troubled companies. He also has proposed innovative 
solutions to the Latin American debt problem. Some observers have viewed this 
as part of an overall public relations campaign at a time when he is in 
trouble. But Lerer insists that these are all genuine interests of Milken's and 
that he has been involved in these activities for years. 




'More Demands Than Ever' 


Friends of Milken's have speculated that one reason he decided to start a new 
firm now is that, since taking a leave of absence from Drexel, he has had an 
unaccustomed amount of time on his hands. They note that Milken typically would 
work from 4:30 a.m. until about 6 p.m. He was used to orchestrating a multitude 
of deals at once. In recent weeks, Milken has given speeches to a variety of 
organizations and worked on his legal defense. 


""I think Michael is desperate to find something to do,"" a former Drexel 
colleague said. 


Milken himself, however, strongly denied that he has time on his hands. ""I have 
more demands on my time than ever before,"" he said, although he added, 
referring to the legal cases: ""Sometimes they're things you'd rather not have 
to spend time on."" 


Gary Lynch, the SEC's director of enforcement, declined to comment Thursday on 
Milken's decision to open a new business. The Milken brothers still face SEC 
civil charges as well as the separate criminal charges. 


Milken, his brother and former Drexel trader Bruce L. Newberg are likely to go 
to trial on the pending criminal charges sometime early next year. Federal 
prosecutors are expected to bring a new indictment within the next several 
months containing additional charges. 


A number of Milken's former colleagues at Drexel already have been granted 
immunity from prosecution and are cooperating with the government 
investigation. Sources confirmed Thursday that another former Drexel employee, 
Reed Harmon, who had worked closely with Milken, was recently granted immunity 
in exchange for testimony before a grand jury. 




Charges Denied 


Harmon is said to have detailed knowledge of some of Milken's business dealings 
with former stock speculator Ivan F. Boesky. Boesky, suspected of widespread 
insider trading, pleaded guilty to one criminal count and agreed to cooperate 
with prosecutors. Much of the government's case against Milken involves his 
alleged dealings with Boesky. 


Milken, Lowell Milken and Newberg all vigorously deny the charges against them. 


Drexel has agreed to plead guilty to six criminal charges and pay $650 million 
in penalties under an agreement with the U.S. Attorney's Office in Manhattan. 
The guilty plea would be made after the firm's separate settlement with the SEC 
goes into effect. Lawyers for Michael and Lowell Milken are challenging 
provisions of the settlement agreement, including a requirement that Drexel 
withhold much of the brothers' compensation owed them for 1988. Michael Milken 
is said to be owed at least $200 million. 

",2,"[ 0.          0.          0.01044454 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
17,"

Michael Milken may be gone from Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., but his 
deal-making days aren't done. 


On the eighth floor of the United Artists building on North Roxbury Drive in 
Beverly Hills, just a couple of blocks from his old perch on Drexel's junk bond 
trading desk, carpets have been laid, wallpaper is up and furniture delivered. 
Milken's new company, International Capital Access Group, is open for business. 
Despite the racketeering and securities fraud indictment hanging over him and 
his forced resignation from Drexel in June, Milken hasn't retreated to the 
sidelines. 


When Drexel's former junk bond chief announced plans for the firm, he said it 
would help members of minority groups and unions raise the capital to own 
companies. And, four months after it was founded, ICAG appears to be doing just 
that. 


But the new firm is also gearing up for a considerable amount of potentially 
more profitable business. Since leaving Drexel, Milken has had talks with many 
of his old firm's clients, according to a senior Drexel executive. And in a 
long interview in ICAG's offices, Milken confirmed that a significant part of 
ICAG's business will be with ordinary companies. 


It may make direct investments in companies. And it is working on finding new 
capital for successful companies and refinancing firms that are in trouble. In 
exchange for Milken's brainpower and contacts in arranging refinancing, ICAG 
expects to receive an ownership stake in most of the companies that it helps. 


""What we're doing here is pretty much what we were doing before (at Drexel),"" 
in the sense that his focus is on finding ways for companies to raise capital, 
Milken says, although he no longer trades or underwrites securities. 


Milken, however, protests any suggestion that the firm's main purpose is to 
make money. All of its activities, he says, fall under the category of ""helping 
people."" He refuses to discuss ICAG's fees or even confirm that he expects the 
company to be profitable. ""Financial reporters have this preoccupation with 
money,"" he says. ""We're focused on creating value. Wealth is a byproduct."" 
Several times during the interview, the man who earned $550 million in one year 
at Drexel, and is estimated to be worth well over $1 billion, complained that 
""people are so hung up on money."" 


At Drexel, Milken essentially created the market for high-yield, high-risk junk 
bonds, and he revolutionized the way that capital was raised for medium-sized 
U.S. companies. He also turned junk bonds into a potent tool in corporate 
takeovers and leveraged buyouts. 


Now, Milken seems determined to prove that the government's case against him 
will not stop him from carrying out his ideas. An ordinary person might be 
overwhelmed by the chore of preparing a legal defense against a 98-count felony 
indictment. But Stephen Weinroth, a longtime Drexel official now on leave, 
says: ""Mike has an energy level that makes a nuclear plant look pathetic."" 


In the short time since ICAG was formed, it already has purchased $2.5 million 
worth of barges and other equipment to lease to Unimar International Inc., a 
Seattle-based shipbuilder and tugboat company that was bought out by its 
unionized employees with Drexel's help in 1987. Milken says ICAG plans to do 
this for other employee-owned companies as well, since many of them have 
trouble raising the money to buy equipment outright. 


Among activities involving minorities, Milken has put groups of minority 
businessmen in contact with potential backers. And Bill Tatum, publisher of New 
York's black newspaper, the Amsterdam News, says he met with Milken about 
backing for a bid on a major general-circulation newspaper, perhaps the 
troubled Daily News. Milken says that helping unions and members of minority 
groups, and devising ways to help indebted countries, such as Mexico, will make 
up more than half of ICAG's business. 


In addition to these areas, Milken already is doing a considerable amount of 
mainstream business. He says he has agreed to help recapitalize an 
entertainment and publishing concern, which he won't identify. He is working on 
bailing out Weintraub Entertainment Group, a Los Angeles company that was 
straining under its junk bond debt after a string of unsuccessful movies. He is 
helping to arrange financing for a Los Angeles chain of car dealerships. And he 
says that enough progress has been made on some deals that they may soon be 
announced publicly. 


Milken says that, in all, he has been approached by several hundred companies. 
Of these, ICAG is doing work on behalf of about 30. He says that 12 of these 
already are at the point where a transaction has occurred or is about to. 


Milken won't comment on the terms on which ICAG is helping these companies, but 
one deal that fell through suggests that, while his aim may be to help others, 
he isn't neglecting his own interests. Wolfgang Puck, the well-known chef and 
proprietor of the Los Angeles restaurant Spago, said he approached Milken in 
July about raising new financing for Puck's frozen pizza venture, Wolfgang Puck 
Food Co. In an interview, Puck said he wasn't able to come to terms with ICAG. 
Puck said he balked when Milken demanded a majority stake in the company. 


Milken says he wasn't directly involved in the Puck negotiations, and denies 
that they fell through because of the ownership issue. He says Puck's company 
at the time was in financial difficulties and needed a lot of financing. (It 
has since obtained some financing elsewhere.) He says that the talks broke down 
because they involved too many lenders and stockholders who simply couldn't 
come to terms on a variety of issues. 


Milken's challenge in establishing a new firm will be to overcome serious 
handicaps imposed by his pending criminal prosecution. ICAG cannot trade or 
underwrite securities. Such activities were a main part of Milken's activities 
at Drexel. But they require licensing by the Securities and Exchange 
Commission. From a legal standpoint, Milken could apply for such licenses, 
since he has yet to be convicted of anything. For practical reasons, however, 
he has chosen not to, and so must rely on other firms to perform these services 
for his clients. 


Asked if it bothers him that he can no longer issue new securities, Milken 
says, ""it's not something I'm thinking about at this time."" 


Investment banking sources say that Milken, in effect, also is closed out of 
doing work for the gambling industry, which made up a big share of his clients 
at Drexel. Because he is under indictment, New Jersey and Nevada gaming 
authorities have indicated that they might take legal steps against casino 
operators who do business with him. 


And though Milken's press spokesman and personal lawyer strongly deny it, a 
number of potential clients are frightened of having their names publicly 
associated with him. In an off-the-record interview, the chief executive of a 
publicly traded company who was a client of Milken's at Drexel and praises 
Milken effusively said that he couldn't afford to have any formal business 
relationship with ICAG. He said the commercial banks with which his company 
does business have indicated that they might stop lending to him if he does. 
Some banks, he said, ""have decided that Milken is not a credible person right 
now."" 


This hasn't stopped a flood of companies that have approached him in 
confidence, however. And there are still plenty of well-known executives who 
praise Milken publicly and wish his company success. Steven J. Ross, 
co-chairman of the recently merged Time Warner Inc., said: ""Mike has to be one 
of the most brilliant financial minds of our time."" But Ross would not say if 
he expects to use ICAG's services. ""We have factors that we never make public 
about any of our business dealings,"" he said, adding: ""That's not to be 
construed that we are or aren't."" 


In true Milken style, ICAG's new offices are comfortable but not ostentatious. 
Only the firm's name, not Milken's, is on the door. And he refers to everyone 
who works there as co-workers, not employees. 


The heart of the firm is a long rectangular table made up of 18 wooden desks 
pushed together. Complete with financial data computer screens, it looks 
remarkably like a trading desk. It is an environment that evidently makes 
Milken feel at home; his years in Drexel's Beverly Hills office were spent at 
the center of the junk bond trading desk. But at this one, for the foreseeable 
future, no securities will be traded. 


The firm currently has about 20 employees, with more expected to join soon. 
(Milken says he doesn't know how many.) Among the top staff members, whom 
Milken calls ""principals,"" are Steven Fink, a former official at Pacific Asset 
Holdings (a partnership in which Milken holds an interest), Lorraine Spurge, 
formerly one of his top assistants at Drexel, and Randolph Read, former 
president of a merchant banking concern. Officials at the new firm say they are 
aren't making overtures to lure Drexel employees to ICAG. But Milken doesn't 
rule out talking to former Drexel colleagues who may, on their own, contact him 
about a job. 


He refuses to discuss how much capital the firm has, a key measure of the 
potential scope of its activities. ""It's a private firm,"" he says. Milken did 
say that all of the firm's capital comes from himself and the principal staff 
members, not outsiders. ""There are a number of people who have called, but we 
felt it would be better that we did not take in outside backers,"" he said. 


But one clue to the amount of money that Milken personally is committing to the 
firm is how much he says ICAG is willing to invest in an individual 
transaction. For most types of transactions, he says, the firm stands ready to 
invest between $500,000 and $20 million. 


Milken draws a sharp distinction between his goals and those of Bruce 
Wasserstein and Joseph R. Perella, formerly of First Boston Corp., who, like 
Milken, left a big Wall Street firm to set up shop on their own. Their new 
firm, Wasserstein Perella &amp; Co., was established as a corporate takeover 
boutique. In contrast, Milken says, ""you will not find us involved in any 
unfriendly transactions."" 


Although Milken is credited with inventing the use of junk bonds to back 
hostile corporate raids, he maintains that hostile transactions have ""never 
been a major focus of mine."" Milken adds: ""There's so much we can do to help 
people, I just don't think it's something we're interested in."" 


By ""helping companies,"" Milken means suggesting ways that they could improve 
their basic business, working out creative means of raising capital or 
recapitalizing to reduce interest costs, and using his vast network of contacts 
to put companies in touch with potential investors. 


After a speech he made in September, Milken was widely quoted as suggesting 
that companies should now attempt to reduce their level of high-yield debt. 
Some analysts interpreted this as a major reversal, since Milken's later years 
at Drexel were largely spent promoting leveraged buyouts financed with huge 
chunks of junk-bond debt. But Milken maintains that he is simply doing what he 
has always done, advising companies to profit from market conditions. 


One service that ICAG expects to perform is finding creative ways for its 
customers to convert their costly high-interest debt into a combination of 
lower-interest debt and equity -- that is, stock. Milken says his firm expects 
to help salvage some of the large companies that have been in the news in the 
last couple of months because of severe difficulties in meeting the payments on 
their junk debt. ""There are some companies today that aren't knocking the cover 
off the ball, and yes, we are willing to help,"" he says. Milken declines to 
discuss individual companies but denies that the debt per se caused their 
problems. 


As ICAG takes on customers, one thorny issue is its relations with current 
Drexel customers. When Drexel settled a massive SEC lawsuit, the firm agreed 
not to do business ""directly or indirectly"" with Milken. What this means 
precisely hasn't been defined and could be a source of further SEC action. It's 
not clear, for example, whether legal problems would arise if a company hired 
Drexel to underwrite securities according to a recapitalization plan drawn up 
by Milken. 


Milken's lawyers are interpreting the provision to be Drexel's problem, not 
his. (A Milken adviser notes that Milken isn't a party to the settlement with 
the SEC.) Still, the adviser acknowledges that ""it's something that exists, and 
we're conscious of it."" 


Some current Drexel clients say they wouldn't be troubled by feelings of 
disloyalty if they also decided to seek help from ICAG. Oscar U. Mutz, 
president and chief executive of Forum Group, an Indianapolis developer of 
retirement communities that is a Drexel customer, says: ""I don't ask Drexel's 
permission to go see Morgan Stanley (another Wall Street investment bank), and 
I don't ask Drexel's permission to go see Michael Milken or anybody else."" 
Mutz, however, says he hasn't yet had occasion to do business with ICAG. 


Steven Anreder, Drexel's spokesman, says the firm hasn't lost any clients to 
ICAG. And he said he doesn't expect conflicts to develop. 


Milken, who was one of the most feared competitors on Wall Street when he was 
at Drexel, now frequently is funneling to other firms the trading and 
underwriting business that he can no longer do himself. One ICAG staff member 
says Milken's old competitors today are more than happy to do business with 
him, now that he's no longer directly competing. ""The reality is that we can 
generate a lot of business for people,"" the staff member says. 


Milken himself takes pains to downplay his former role as competitor, saying 
that as a former buyer and seller of securities, he always had to maintain good 
relationships with other firms. 


One big, unanswered question is what will become of the firm if Milken is 
convicted and sent to prison. His trial is scheduled for March, and he faces 
the possibility of a lengthy sentence. He denies any wrongdoing and is 
vigorously fighting the charges. 


Milken and staff members say they are hoping for the best and, no matter what 
happens, they expect ICAG to remain in business and grow. Meanwhile, Time 
Warner's Ross says: ""He's got such a brilliant mind that I think he could do 10 
things at one time and still prepare for what he's about to undergo."" 

",2,"[ 0.          0.          0.00681626 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
18,"

A federal judge sentenced an apparently stunned Michael Milken to 10 years in 
prison Wednesday after ruling that the crimes he pleaded guilty to were neither 
minor nor isolated. 


The sentence was by far the harshest imposed in the recent chain of Wall Street 
scandals. 


U.S. District Judge Kimba M. Wood said the unexpectedly long prison term is 
meant to make an example of the former Drexel Burnham Lambert junk bond king, 
whose innovative use of high-yield, high-risk bonds had fueled the corporate 
takeover frenzy of the 1980s. Milken had pleaded guilty to six felony 
securities law violations last April. 


But in a jammed courtroom in Manhattan's federal courthouse, Wood said that 
Milken, 44, who has been accused, among other things, of helping to bring on 
the national savings and loan disaster, could not be blamed for all of the 
financial excesses of the 1980s. Wood said she had not made him a scapegoat for 
""the decade of greed."" The judge said she based the sentence only on evidence 
of specific crimes presented in court. 


Milken family members, supporters and lawyers were plainly shocked by the 
sentence. One close Milken adviser said: ""No one could have imagined this in 
their wildest nightmare."" Defense lawyer Arthur L. Liman left the courthouse 
without commenting and did not return phone calls later. 


Milken's sentence also included three years' probation during which he must 
perform full-time community service. The judge left open the possibility of 
reducing the sentence if Milken cooperates with the government. 


Milken could have been sentenced to as many as 28 years. But a number of 
lawyers who had followed the case closely predicted that he would get no more 
than five. A Milken spokesman said that no decision had been made on whether to 
appeal the sentence. 


During his own lawyer's presentation before sentence was imposed, Milken at 
times was in tears in the courtroom. He then stood and, choking back sobs, 
said: ""What I did violated not just the law but all of my own principles and 
values. I deeply regret it and will for the rest of my life, and I am very 
deeply sorry."" 


But when the judge read the sentence, he stood rigid and motionless, with what 
appeared to be a look of disbelief when she announced the 10-year term. Wood 
also sentenced him to three years of community service while on probation after 
his prison sentence. Milken and his wife, Lori, did not comment to reporters 
and were permitted to leave the courthouse through a back exit. 


Under his plea agreement, Milken was already committed to pay $600 million in 
fines and penalties. Lawyers said he must turn over that amount before the end 
of the year. Because of his huge earnings at Drexel, however, his wealth is 
expected to be at least hundreds of millions of dollars. 


Wood said evidence presented during a pre-sentencing hearing in October 
convinced her that Milken had committed additional serious crimes beyond the 
six felony counts he pleaded guilty to in April. Among them, she said, were 
several acts of obstruction of justice relating to orders or suggestions to 
employees to destroy documents. 


The judge also rejected longstanding defense claims that Milken's crimes were 
aberrations by a generally law-abiding man and that they were the result of 
overzealousness to help clients rather than greed. 


Wood called Milken ""a man of talent and industry."" But she said: ""This kind of 
misuse of your leadership position and enlisting employees who you supervised 
to assist you in violating the law are serious crimes warranting serious 
punishment and the discomfort and opprobrium of being removed from society."" 


At Liman's request, the judge agreed to sentence Milken under a provision of 
federal law that allows him to be paroled at any time at the discretion of the 
federal parole commission. Although Milken technically could be paroled almost 
immediately, government lawyers said the commission normally requires prisoners 
to serve close to two-thirds of their sentence. In Milken's case, that would be 
about six years. 


The sentence exceeds all others imposed in the series of securities fraud cases 
that grew out of the insider trading case against investment banker Dennis B. 
Levine in 1986. Levine himself got two years. Stock speculator Ivan F. Boesky, 
implicated in insider trading on an even grander scale, got only three years. 
Investment banker Martin A. Siegel, who directly stole information from his own 
corporate clients and also received suitcases stuffed with cash from Boesky, 
was let off with only two months. 


But in those cases, the defendants had fully cooperated with the government 
before their sentencing, turning in prominent former business associates. 
Milken had not. Under the highly unusual terms of his plea agreement, he is 
obliged to begin cooperating only now that the sentence has been imposed. 


The judge said she would consider reducing the sentence if prosecutors 
eventually certify to her that Milken has cooperated fully. 


Several lawyers said they interpreted the long sentence as an attempt by the 
judge to ensure that Milken cooperates fully, revealing whatever incriminating 
information he knows about corporate raiders, junk bond buyers and former 
co-workers. Charles Carberry, a lawyer who once headed the U.S. attorney's 
securities fraud unit in New York, said: ""I think it was a clear message that 
he should cooperate."" 


John C. Coffee, a Columbia University law professor, said the judge may also 
have imposed the severe sentence because Milken occupied a position of trust at 
the center of the financial world. ""There's a long tradition here of viewing 
very seriously abuses by people with high responsibilities, and this man was at 
the crossroads of capitalism,"" Coffee said. 


The six counts that Milken pleaded guilty to included conspiracy, securities 
fraud, causing the filing of false information with the Securities and Exchange 
Commission, mail fraud and aiding in the filing of a false tax return. 


The sentencing capped the most massive securities fraud investigation ever 
carried out by the government. Milken, who joined Drexel while still in 
business school in 1969, plucked junk bonds from obscurity and almost 
single-handedly built what at its peak became a $200-billion market. From 
Drexel's junk bond headquarters in Beverly Hills, Milken orchestrated 
transactions that made possible huge leveraged buyouts of such companies as 
Storer Communications and Beatrice Cos. 


But as investigators closed in, Milken was forced to resign from Drexel in 
1989, after he was named in a 99-count racketeering indictment and the firm 
itself pleaded guilty to six felony counts. Months later, the junk bond market 
started to collapse. And in February, Drexel was forced into bankruptcy 
proceedings. 


Milken's pay at Drexel peaked in 1987 at $550 million. In addition to total 
compensation of more than $1 billion from 1984 to 1988, Milken is believed to 
have received hundreds of millions of dollars from private partnerships he set 
up to benefit himself, family members and employees. 


Milken's lawyers, however, said that Milken's lifestyle was relatively modest 
and unmaterialistic. They noted that he had given much of his earnings to 
charities and that he long had personally worked for them, such as by teaching 
math to abused and abandoned inner-city children. 


Liman called Milken ""a sensitive human being with a social conscience whose 
offenses stand in sharp contrast to his whole life and to his value system."" 
Liman also argued that Milken is ""just not cut from the same cloth as Ivan 
Boesky."" 


The judge did not dispute that Milken had donated much to worthy causes, nor 
that his charitable activities began well before the investigation of him 
started in 1986. But she said that was not enough to make up for his crimes. 


During the sentencing, Wood disclosed for the first time her findings on the 
unusual pre-sentencing hearings she presided over in October. The so-called 
Fatico hearings were held to determine if there were evidence of additional 
crimes beyond the six to which he pleaded guilty. Under federal court rulings, 
Wood is allowed to consider evidence of other crimes in deciding on a sentence. 


In a lengthy written opinion released Wednesday, Wood found that Assistant U.S. 
Attorneys John Carroll and Jess Fardella had failed to prove some of their main 
claims. She said there was insufficient evidence to prove that Milken was 
behind a manipulation of WickesCos. stock in 1986. She said the government also 
did not prove its claim that Milken was guilty of insider trading in Caesars 
World securities in 1983, and also failed to show that he had illegally made 
lucrative investment opportunities available to employees of investment funds 
as inducements to get them to buy riskier securities for their funds. 


But she found that Milken had obstructed justice, in part, by arranging the 
destruction of a blue ledger book that showed illegal transactions between 
Drexel and David Solomon, head of Solomon Asset Management. The judge said 
Milken also had made remarks to employees in the Beverly Hills office in 
November, 1986, which could only be interpreted as instructions to destroy 
documents. 


Wood also found that Milken had acted improperly by not disclosing to the 
leveraged buyout firm Kohlberg Kravis Roberts &amp; Co. that he had kept 
extremely valuable warrants in a KKR deal for himself and his family instead of 
selling them to customers. 


During the sentencing, Wood derided defense claims that Milken was basically 
law-abiding and that if he were not, he would have committed more blatant 
crimes, such as insider trading. She said that an equally likely explanation 
was that Milken was simply afraid to do anything too blatant. 


""Your crimes show a pattern of skirting the law, stepping just over to the 
wrong side of the law in an apparent effort to get some of the benefits from 
violating the law without running a substantial risk of being caught,"" she 
said. 


Wood's sentence was viewed as a rebuff to many prominent Southern Californians 
who had written to her urging that Milken's sentence be limited to community 
service. Among those who had proposed that Milken was suitable for such service 
was Los Angeles Police Chief Daryl F. Gates, who suggested that Milken work for 
the Police Department's DARE program, created to help inner-city children. In 
court, Liman had proposed that the judge accept Gates' suggestion. The chief, 
through a spokesman, declined to comment on the sentence. 


James Slade, a spokesman for the federal Bureau of Prisons, said that under 
Justice Department rules, the 10-year term makes it unlikely that Milken will 
be allowed to serve his sentence in a minimum-security federal prison camp. 
Such camps, where Boesky and others caught up in the Wall Street scandals 
served their sentences, have open rooms instead of cells and offer extensive 
recreation facilities. 


Instead, Slade said, Milken probably will be sent to a medium-security prison, 
where there will be a higher concentration of street criminals and fewer 
white-collar offenders. He said that in some medium-security prisons, inmates 
are locked in old-fashioned barred cells at night. 


Staff writer Paul Richter in New York contributed to this story. 




FALL OF THE JUNK BOND KING 


Here is a chronology of key developments in the prosecution of former Drexel 
Burnham Lambert Inc. high-yield bond chief Michael Milken: 


Nov. 14, 1986: Stock speculator Ivan F. Boesky agrees topays $100 million to 
settle charges of insider trading, cooperate with investigators and plead 
guilty to a single criminal count. Later is sentenced to three years in prison. 


Nov.-Dec. 1986: Published reports link Milken to an illegal insider trading 
network led by Boesky. 


Sept. 7, 1988: The Securities and Exchange Commission accuses Drexel, Milken 
and three others of violating a range of securities laws, most in connection 
with Boesky. 


Dec. 21, 1988: Drexel agrees to plead guilty to six felony counts and pay $650 
million in fines and restitution to settle the biggest securities fraud probe 
in history. 


March 29, 1989: A federal grand jury indicts Milken, his brother, Lowell, and 
former Drexel trader Bruce Newberg on 98 counts of racketeering and fraud, 
based on information fromBoesky. 


April 7, 1989: The Milkens plead not guilty Newberg does the same later. 


April 13, 1989: Drexel and the SEC announce a settlement of the government 's 
civil fraud case against the firm that subjects Drexel to federal monitoring 
for three years and forces it to sever ties with Milken. 


June 15, 1989: Milken resigns after 19 years at Drexel to form his own 
consulting firm. Lowell Milken quits to return to practice law. 


Sept. 11, 1989: Drexel formally pleads guilty and begins paying its fine. 


Feb. 13, 1990: Drexel's parent company, Drexel Burnham Lambert Group, files for 
bankruptcy court protection after defaulting on debts and begins laying off 
employees. 


March 19, 1990: Prosecutors promise to bring a new indictment with broader 
charges against Milken by the week of April 16. 


April 20, 1990: Milken agrees to settle his case and reaches a plea bargain 
with the government. 


April 24, 1990: Milken tearfully pleads guilty to six felonies, agrees to pay 
$600 million in restitution and fines, and agrees to cooperate with the 
government after sentencing. He faces up to 28 years in jail. 


October 1990: Special two-week hearing to consider the government's array of 
charges against Milken, ordered by U.S. District Judge Kimba Wood to gain 
greater insight into Milken's character in order to fashion a fair sentence for 
the six counts he admitted. 


Nov. 21, 1990: Milken is sentenced to 10 years in jail, plus three years' 
probation, plus 1,800 hours of community service. The sentence could be reduced 
if Milken cooperates with the government in ongoing and future investigations. 

",2,"[ 0.          0.          0.00646579 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
19,"

Despite what you may be reading, Michael Milken is not a bloodless monster who 
set out to pillage the world and drown it in a sea of debt. He's a very smart, 
very driven and very flawed human being whose life -- and whose life's work -- 
has been completely destroyed. Anyone who doesn't feel at least a tinge of 
compassion for the man doesn't have an ounce of compassion in his body. 


Milken isn't a symbol of the 1980s, whatever that means. He's just a guy who 
was in the right place at the right time -- he started dealing in junk bonds 
when bargains were lying around like truffles on the forest floor -- who took a 
good idea much too far. 


The idea was that the rewards of owning junk bonds more than outweighed the 
risks of the borrowers going belly up. Milken took it too far by insisting that 
junk bonds -- securities that carry high risks and high interest rates -- were 
suitable for everyone. Which, in fact, they aren't, as the current crash in the 
junk market -- or in what remains of the junk market -- shows. 


Milken was obsessed with getting more and more people to accept the Gospel of 
Junk, and he almost single-handedly turned junk from a backwater of finance 
into a mainstream investment. Making junk mainstream is what did Milken in -- 
and ultimately what did in the junk bond market. 


When the junk market was small and had few players, people had no one to deal 
with but Milken, and he could keep weak borrowers out of the market. Once other 
brokerage houses decided to go after the junk business, Milken's competitive 
juices -- and his obsession with controlling every aspect of everything in his 
life -- compelled him to do whatever sleazy things it took to nail down 
business. 


If junk had stayed a backwater -- and if either the enforcers at the Securities 
and Exchange Commission or Milken's alleged superiors at Drexel Burnham Lambert 
reined Milken in -- he wouldn't be going to jail. 


But the SEC didn't go after Milken until a trail of stool pigeons fingered Ivan 
F. Boesky, who fingered Milken. And instead of supervising Milken, top Drexel 
officials averted their eyes to avoid seeing his sin. In fact, Drexel let 
Milken move the entire junk department from New York City to his native 
California. 


Milken's department was making so much money that Drexel Chairman Frederick H. 
Joseph let Milken do whatever he wanted because Joseph needed the 
Milken-generated profits to turn Drexel into a mainline brokerage house. 


To understand Milken, you have to understand that when he wandered into the 
world of junk bonds at a third-rate Philadelphia brokerage house in the 1970s, 
the junk market consisted of a handful of canny investors who spent their days 
searching through the rubble of financially distressed companies searching for 
securities that were better than they looked. 


Because Milken is very smart, has a good head for numbers and could work 
incredible hours, he found more of these little jewels than anyone else did. 


Soon, he persuaded his bosses to give him enough money to keep an inventory of 
junk around. This meant that when early ""junkmeisters"" -- Saul P. Steinberg of 
Reliance Insurance, Laurence A. Tisch of Loews, Carl Lindner of Penn Central 
and American Financial, to name a few -- wanted to buy or sell junk, they had 
to deal with Milken. 


But as the market for junk grew larger -- mainly because of what Michael was 
doing -- Milken wanted to keep all the business. To do that, he financed deals 
that he knew he should never have touched, and he went so far as to offer 
secret goodies to people who had money to invest in junk. That way, he bound 
these people to him. 


When the market was small, no one knew or cared what Milken was doing. When it 
got big -- and when he began raising money for a band of corporate brigands to 
take over mainline U.S. companies like Gulf Oil and Union Carbide -- that was a 
different game. He was used to operating without anyone knowing what he was 
doing, and he didn't understand that the rules had changed, and he had to clean 
up his act. 


Milken, being a complicated guy, has conflicting tendencies. On the one hand, 
he lives very modestly and always talks about how important it is not to take 
on airs. 


On the other hand, he felt himself smarter than anybody, and thought he could 
indefinitely get away with sleazy things. Such as telling bond issuers that 
bond buyers wanted cheap stock as a ""sweetener,"" then keeping the stock for 
himself and a handful of associates. 


During 1987, 1988 and 1989, I spent many hours with Milken, whom I came to 
consider a friend. He was brilliant, but he had no sense of humor and no sense 
of how other people perceived him. He didn't blame himself for his problems, he 
blamed the news media. And probably still does. 


Milken has lost almost everything that he holds dear. He used to pride himself 
on being a quiet donor of huge amounts to charity and of working, unheralded, 
with disadvantaged children. But he decided to let his public relations people 
turn charity into a PR show. 


He used to pride himself on having established the junk bond market. But that 
market is gone, and many of his most important junk clients -- Columbia Savings 
&amp; Loan of Beverly Hills, First Executive Corp. of Los Angeles -- are busto, 
and many others, such as Lindner and Steinberg -- seem to be in big trouble. 


He prided himself on his staff's loyalty to him -- but many of them turned 
state's evidence. 


By the time Milken broke down and cried several times Wednesday, it was far too 
late for him to be considered a human being. He was sentenced as the Beast of 
the '80s, but he will suffer as a man. 


Yes, Milken still has a vast fortune. But his life and work are in ruins, and 
he will spend who knows how many years in the slammer while his kids grow up 
and leave home. Even though he brought it on himself, watching how this man has 
destroyed himself is enough to make me want to cry. 

",2,"[ 0.          0.          0.01272883 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
20,"
   Attorneys for Mr. Milken dismiss the suggestion as absurd
and say Mr. Milken's potential liability won't be nearly so
extensive. While some shareholder attorneys routinely file
multimillion-dollar suits whenever a takeover is announced or
the market drops, the suits against Mr. Milken seem to be
much more likely to succeed than most.
   Consider:
   -- Mr. Milken's guilty plea to six felony counts Tuesday
makes it impossible for him to claim in civil cases that he
was guilty of no market fraud. In each case, the former junk
bond impresario will be viewed as a convicted felon.
   -- So much evidence against him has already been gathered
by federal prosecutors and the Securities and Exchange
Commission, much of which will eventually become available to
shareholder lawyers, that plaintiffs' attorneys will have to
do relatively little sleuthing of their own.
   -- While Mr. Milken didn't plead guilty to any
racketeering counts, recent court cases have made it
increasingly easy to show a so-called pattern of racketeering
in civil cases. Shareholders have sued Mr. Milken under the
Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law, and RICO
damages are automatically tripled.
   -- The SEC's funds to compensate victims of market
wrongdoing by Mr. Milken, Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. and
convicted abritrager Ivan F. Boesky, while stocked with more
than $600 million, cannot be used to pay tripled damages or
punitive damages. Thus, any judgment against Mr. Milken above
mere compensatory damages would have to come out of his own
pocket. Drexel was Mr. Milken's former employer. The
securities firm has filed for bankruptcy-court protection.
   All of this sounds like good news to Richard Greenfield,
one of the nation's top shareholder lawyers. As he eagerly
scanned the early wire reports of the plea Tuesday, Mr.
Greenfield said Mr. Milken should seriously contemplate
filing for bankruptcy-court protection. ""It's a very real
possibility,"" said Mr. Greenfield, who has filed several
cases against Mr. Milken. ""If I were in his shoes, I'd want
to start over on Day One. By the time he's out of jail, it's
all over.""
   Steven Rosenfeld, an attorney for Mr. Milken, says there
are ""no plans whatsoever"" for his client to seek
bankruptcy-court protection. The partner in the New York law
firm of Paul, Weiss, Rifkind Wharton &amp; Garrison says there is
""nothing particularly remarkable"" about the allegations in
the lawsuits. ""There is a word processor somewhere that spews
out the same . . . allegations,"" Mr. Rosenfeld says. ""I view
that as a plaintiff tactic.""
   As his partner Arthur Liman said the day before, Mr.
Rosenfeld said the Milken camp believes the $400 million Mr.
Milken is required to provide the SEC for civil restitution
will more than cover any legitimate claims.
   Still, the Milken team faces a morass of suits. One of the
most sweeping, filed last month in Los Angeles by
shareholders of Unocal Corp., accuses Mr. Milken, Drexel and
many major takeover artists of the 1980s of a massive
conspiracy that defrauded shareholders in takeover targets.
   Mr. Greenfield's firm filed the suit along with plaintiff
lawyer William S. Lerach of the shareholder law firm of
Milberg Weiss Bershad Specthrie and Lerach. It alleges a
back-scratching arrangement by which Mr. Milken teamed up
with high-profile corporate raiders to manipulate stock
prices in huge acquisitions. The suit, which seeks $2.3
billion in trebled damages, claims that more than 70
defendants violated the RICO law.
   Under the alleged arrangement, Mr. Milken shared ""secret
information with market operatives"" and backed the takeover
attempts of such raiders as Carl Icahn, Ronald Perelman, T.
Boone Pickens and others. According to the allegations, a
raider would typically tell Mr. Milken he wanted to take over
a particular company, and Mr. Milken would then issue junk
bonds for the raider's companies and arrange for other
raiders to buy the bonds. The raiders felt obligated to buy
the bonds because they wanted Mr. Milken to fund their future
takeover attempts, the suit says. Meanwhile, at Mr. Milken's
direction, arbitragers would purchase big blocks of stock in
the target company with guarantees against loss provided by
Mr. Milken, the suit claims.
   While the Unocal suit claims enormous damages to
shareholders, a suit filed by Mr. Greenfield's firm in
February may be even broader. The firm sued on behalf of at
least 10,000 class members who purchased high-yield,
high-risk bonds underwritten by and sold through Drexel. They
charged that the junk bond market was rigged, that prices
were artificially determined and that without Mr. Milken to
act as ""puppeteer,"" the market fell apart. Action in this
case is stalled for procedural reasons.
   Also pending are a multitude of civil cases lodged in the
past three years against Mr. Boesky, Drexel, Mr. Milken and
others that accuse the defendants of insider trading, stock
manipulation and other securities law violations. Many of
these cases are pending in federal court in New York, where
pretrial fact-finding has been slowed because of the
unavailability of Mr. Boesky, Mr. Milken and others to
testify at depositions. Thus far, federal prosecutors have
gotten the judge to deny the plaintiffs' lawyers access to
these witnesses while criminal investigations are being
pursued. But at some point, such a partial stay will
presumably be lifted.
   Finally, a sprinkling of cases across the country target
Mr. Milken among many other defendants in cases alleging that
savings and loans associations and other companies suffered
losses because they purchased large portfolios of Drexel's
junk bonds as part of back-scratching arrangements with Mr.
Milken.
   The strength of the plaintiffs' various charges are
difficult to gauge. Mr. Greenfield likens them to the
asbestos cases that led to the Chapter 11 bankruptcy-court
filing of Manville Corp., the giant asbestos manufacturer. He
says he believes that once one case ""breaks through"" to
trial, Mr. Milken will have no choice but to start settling
the rest of the cases.
   But a spokesman for Mr. Pickens's Mesa Petroleum Co., a
defendant in the Unocal case, calls the allegations ""silly
stuff. They've taken any name that's appeared next to
Boesky's or {Boyd} Jefferies's. . . . They're throwing names
in the soup and alleging a scheme that is pure nonsense."" Mr.
Jefferies, a former brokerage firm chief in Los Angles
pleaded guilty to two felony counts of breaking securities
laws in April 1987.
   Says attorney James Conroy, commenting on behalf of Revlon
Group Inc. Chairman Mr. Perelman and his MacAndrews &amp; Forbes
Holdings Inc., ""The suit casts a net very broadly and names a
lot of people in the process. We don't belong there because
there is no basis in fact for the allegations.""
   A civil case is always easier to prove than a criminal
case because the civil plaintiff doesn't have to prove his
charges beyond a reasonable doubt. Instead he must show only
that the accusations are more likely than not to be correct.
Nonetheless, the plaintiff's lawyers agree that winning a
trial against Mr. Milken wouldn't be easy.
   ""It can't be proven by a handful of witnesses and a
handful of documents,"" says Mr. Greenfield. Instead, the
lawyers must attempt to show juries patterns of trades in
which prices appear to be rigged and raise the issue of how
the securities were priced. The defendants, says R. Bruce
McNew, a partner in Mr. Greenfield's firm, ""have to have an
innocent explanation for what they've done. In the process of
proving your case, you then take apart their explanation.""
   Alan Bromberg, a law professor at Southern Methodist
University, says showing a chain of bond purchases doesn't
necessarily prove that Mr. Milken was in control of the
sellers and buyers, ""but it does permit that inference."" The
outcome of the case will depend on whether the jury believes
there was a conspiracy or the sellers and purchasers of bonds
made independent judgments.
   Mr. Bromberg and others assert that Mr. Liman, Mr.
Milken's principal lawyer, negotiated to make the plea
agreement narrow enough so that little of what Mr. Milken
admitted to can be used against him in the civil suits. ""I
suspect they fought hard on that, and my guess is they were
pretty successful at it,"" Mr. Bromberg says.
   However, a little-noticed provision in the plea agreement
could prove to be invaluable to civil plaintiffs. Prosecutors
extracted a promise from Mr. Milken that he wouldn't attempt
to block them from including in their sentencing memo many
additional charges of wrongdoing to which he didn't plead
guilty.
   Recently Robert Freeman, former Goldman, Sachs &amp; Co. head
of arbitrage, successfully blocked inclusion of such broader
allegations in the government's sentencing memo. Thus, the
government's full case against Mr. Freeman, who had pleaded
guilty to just one insider trading charge, was kept from
public view.
   In the Milken case, however, prosecutors are expected to
outline a broad scheme of alleged wrongdoing, involving a
wide range of companies and securities. Those charges could
be exceedingly helpful to plainitffs lawyers building civil
cases against him.
   Realistically, it's highly unlikely that the civil cases
against Mr. Milken will ever go to trial. Most shareholder
cases are settled, and Mr. Greenfield says he has had only
two jury trials in the past six years, while handling scores
of suits.
   One reason for this is that plaintiffs' lawyers typically
don't charge hourly rates. Instead they charge their clients
for a percentage of the settlement or jury award, generally
20% to 30%. Therefore, it is often to their benefit to
dispose of cases as quickly as possible.
   But settlements work only if both sides believe they are
making a fair compromise, considering what the damages might
be if the case went to trial. And, in the Milken litigation,
settling so many high-stakes cases could be a long and tricky
process in itself.
   ---
           Major Actions Against Milken, Others
                                                                                                       

   CASE:
   Unocal Corp. Shareholder Derivative Suit
                                                                                                       

   BACKGROUND:
   Filed by shareholders on behalf of Unocal, this civil RICO
suit seeks to recoup losses allegedly incurred by the
petroleum giant and its shareholders during T. Boone
Pickens's unsuccessful attempt to gain control of the company
in 1985. The suit alleges that Mr. Milken systematically
conspired with takeover professionals to manipulate stock
prices in takeovers.
                                                                                                       

   DEFENDANTS:
   Defendants include Michael and Lori Milken, T. Boone
Pickens, Paul Bilzerian, Carl Icahn, Irwin Jacobs, Ronald
Perelman and many others.
                                                                                                       

   AMOUNT: $2.3 billion
                                                                                                       

   STATUS: Pending in U.S. District Court, Los Angeles
   ---
   CASE:
   Sheffield v. Milken: ""The Junk Bond Case""
                                                                                                       

   BACKGROUND:
   Filed on behalf of individuals who purchased junk bonds
underwritten and sold through Drexel, the suit alleges that
Mr. Milken created a ""daisy chain"" of investors who would buy
and sell Drexel-underwritten bonds at Mr. Milkens direction.
The case also claims that without Mr. Milken to act as
""puppeteer,"" the junk market has since become ""disorderly.""
The potential class of plaintiffs is believed to include at
least 10,000 members.
                                                                                                       

   DEFENDANTS:
   Defendants include Mr. Milken, Frederick Joseph, Robert
Linton and Drexel entities.
                                                                                                       

   AMOUNT: Unstated
                                                                                                       

   STATUS: Pending in Delaware chancery court.
   ---
   CASE:
   Consolidated Boesky-Drexel-Milken Cases
                                                                                                       

   BACKGROUND:
   Including at least 30 cases alleging insider trading,
stock manipulation and other securities violations, these
suits relate to transactions involving at least 14 other
companies, including Pacific Lumber Co., RJR Nabisco Inc.,
Union Carbide Corp. and Wickes Cos.
                                                                                                       

   DEFENDANTS:
   Defendants include Drexel, Boesky, Milken and many others.
                                                                                                       

   AMOUNT: Unstated
                                                                                                       

   STATUS: Pending in U.S. District Court, Southern District
of New York
",2,"[  9.85727826e-01   7.85399447e-04   1.70764833e-02 ...,   0.00000000e+00
   0.00000000e+00   0.00000000e+00]"
21,"
   Ivan Boesky may have been the most feared man on Wall
Street in January 1985, but he jumped during a Friday morning
staff meeting when his secretary interrupted to say, ""Mike's
on the phone."" Everyone in the room knew that ""Mike"" was
Michael Milken, the junk-bond impresario at Drexel Burnham
Lambert Inc.'s Beverly Hills office. He was the only person
who always got through to Boesky. Mr. Boesky put his fingers
to his lips and looked around the table, ordering silence.
Then he picked up the phone. There were no pleasantries. Mr.
Boesky himself said little, mostly indicating agreement with
whatever Mr. Milken was saying. When he hung up, his eyes
were gleaming with excitement. ""We're putting all engines on
max,"" Mr. Boesky exclaimed to his assembled traders.
   He ordered his staff to buy as much stock of Diamond
Shamrock as possible, while selling short Occidental
Petroleum, betting that Diamond Shamrock would rise in price
and Occidental would fall. The Boesky staff was baffled.
Neither stock had been on their research or trading lists
that morning. What had Mr. Milken told Mr. Boesky?
   In fact, the night before, Drexel Burnham Lambert's West
Coast office had been told confidentially that Occidental
Petroleum Corp. and Diamond Shamrock planned to merge in a
stock swap that would probably cause Diamond Shamrock's stock
price to rise and Occidental's to fall. Since Drexel was
being retained by Occidental, Drexel's traders were barred by
law and firm rules from trading in the stock. But that didn't
stop Mr. Milken, a man so powerful that he seemed omniscient.
   Mr. Boesky's staff members weren't the only witnesses to
the phone call. Mr. Milken's top salesman, James Dahl, was
sitting next to Mr. Milken at the trading desk when Mr.
Milken called Mr. Boesky, and listened as Mr. Milken issued
the trading orders and he and Mr. Boesky refined their
strategy to capitalize on the still-secret information.
Unknown to Mr. Milken, this was the conversation overheard on
Mr. Boesky's end by his traders. And, in fact, under a secret
arrangement, Mr. Milken and Mr. Boesky owned the positions
50-50.
   Even now, after pleading guilty to six felonies, Mr.
Milken insists that he never engaged in insider trading. His
spokesmen deny the account reported here, which is based on
numerous interviews, including eyewitnesses, and review of
sworn testimony. As these previously unreported details show,
Diamond Shamrock looks like a brazen example of Mr. Milken's
and Mr. Boesky's joint insider trading.
   But the scheme proved star-crossed. The following Monday,
Diamond Shamrock's board unexpectedly rejected the deal. Told
of the development, Mr. Milken grabbed the phone, called Mr.
Boesky and, as Mr. Dahl again listened, practically screamed:
""The deal didn't go through. We've got to get out of the
position.""
   In New York, Mr. Boesky was apoplectic, frantically
ordering his head trader to unload the positions before the
news became public. But it was too late; the ticker soon
carried the news of the scotched deal, and every arbitrager
was trying to dump Diamond Shamrock. Over the next day Mr.
Boesky's traders struggled to contain the loss. Mr. Milken
screamed at Mr. Boesky for taking too long to get out of the
positions. Mr. Boesky screamed at Mr. Milken for getting them
into the mess. When it was all over, Mr. Milken brooded at
his desk. When Mr. Dahl asked what the matter was, Mr. Milken
incautiously explained that he had a position ""off-line"" with
Mr. Boesky and that the deal's collapse had just cost them
$10 million.
   Even though the conspirators lost money (insider trading
is a crime whether money is made or lost), the trading set
the stage for Wall Street's most sweeping criminal conspiracy
since the passage of the securities laws -- in which crimes
of far greater reach than insider trading would become
routine.
   What follows are major, newly revealed episodes from
history's biggest insider trading scandal. Because most of
the major players, including Mr. Milken and Mr. Boesky, ended
up striking deals with the government that allowed them to
plead guilty to relatively technical and minor-sounding
crimes, the true scope of their misdeeds has never been
publicly documented.
   Mr. Milken's crimes alone were massive: systematically
robbing clients by trading on their confidential information
for his own gain, manipulating securities prices to force
deals on which he could make huge fees, gouging unsuspecting
clients on junk-bond trades, and in at least two cases,
taking for himself, his relatives and a few Drexel colleagues
securities meant for his customers.
   This story also shows, for the first time, how the
government brought the criminals to justice. One government
agent posed as a blackmailer in order to trick a key member
of the insider-trading ring to confess his crimes. It shows
how Mr. Milken's lawyers and public relations advisers tried
to manipulate potential witnesses and the press, and it
reveals that Mr. Milken actually tried to plead guilty a year
before he finally did so. But his plea was rejected by
prosecutors because it came less than an hour after the
deadline they had set.
                                                                                                       


                                                                                                       

   As their power grew and the volume of their deals
skyrocketed, Mr. Milken's band of traders and salesmen
headquartered in Beverly Hills took on a superhuman aura -- a
tight-knit group working 16-hour days under extreme pressure
and loving every minute of it.
   In fact, the ruthless quest for profits set by Mr. Milken
in Beverly Hills was debilitating. Head trader Warren Trepp
began smoking four packs of cigarettes a day. Bruce Newberg
started taking blood pressure medicine. One day Mr. Newberg
raved hysterically when his phone line went dead during an
important client call. It turned out Mr. Newberg had chewed
through the cord. Another employee, Gary Winnick, complained
he was developing a brain tumor and other serious ailments,
though he remained healthy. Cary Maultasch developed
psychological problems, began seeing a psychiatrist, and
asked to be transferred to Drexel's New York office.
   Mr. Milken set the tone, badgering traders for not
squeezing the most out of a trade, hectoring employees who
tried to leave after only 12 hours of work. When Mr. Dahl
told Mr. Milken he was leaving early one day after learning
his mother had cancer, Mr. Milken's only response was, ""When
are you going to be back?"" Even when Mr. Milken himself
briefly keeled over at his desk on the trading floor in 1981,
his brother and co-worker Lowell came over, viewed the
unconscious body, and simply returned to his office. The
message was clear: Keep working.
   As early as 1982, Mr. Milken was making $45 million a
year, but his aides were struck by how obsessed he was with
enhancing his wealth and power. Chatting with Mr. Winnick one
day, Mr. Milken looked at the view across Century City and
West Los Angeles to the coast and asked, ""What do you think
it'd cost to buy every building from here to the ocean?""
   Once Mr. Milken discovered how his vast network of
junk-bond buyers could be harnessed to hostile takeovers, he
told his colleague Mr. Trepp in a tone of grim determination
that ""We're going to tee up GM, Ford and IBM, and make them
cringe.""
                                                                                                       

                    THE JUNIOR PARTNER
                                                                                                       

   Mr. Boesky was the ideal partner in crime. For despite his
fearsome reputation, he had neither Mr. Milken's market
acumen nor his access to funds. Like so many of the clients
that accepted Mr. Milken's millions, Mr. Boesky became
dependent. Drexel was supplying most of his financing -- and
charging him a whopping 17% interest.
   Mr. Boesky exhibited his own eccentricities, especially
when the subject was food. When he met stock trader John
Mulheren for the first time at a dinner party at Manhattan's
elegant Cafe des Artistes, Mr. Boesky was asked for his
order. ""I'll have every entree,"" Mr. Boesky said. The
waiter's pen stopped in midair. Mr. Boesky repeated, ""I'll
have every entree."" When the food arrived, the waiter had to
wheel a table next to them. On it were that day's eight
featured entrees. Mr. Boesky circled the table, looked them
over closely, and took one bite of each. He selected one, and
sent the rest back.
   Mr. Boesky ran his office with an intensity similar to Mr.
Milken's. When Mr. Boesky took a rare day off, he harassed
his employees with calls to ensure that everyone else was
still there working. He had remote control television
installed in the office so he could watch each employee from
his own control panel. Mr. Boesky's head of research, Lance
Lessman, once complained to Mr. Boesky's son, Billy, that
""Your dad's really been beating up on me."" ""Seriously
understand my father,"" Billy said in a somber tone. ""He is
stark raving mad.""
   When Mr. Milken enlisted Mr. Boesky in his schemes, Mr.
Boesky was predisposed toward crime. He was already trading
illegally on secret information from one of Wall Street's
brightest young stars, Martin Siegel. The Kidder Peabody
investment banker seemed to have it all: a beautiful wife, a
spectacular Connecticut oceanfront estate, glowing press. But
Mr. Siegel came to feel he couldn't live on his earnings of
more than half a million dollars a year. The Connecticut
house had cost $750,000. His wife needed full-time help with
their baby. Their Manhattan apartment was too small, and what
they considered an appropriate one would cost another $1
million. He was haunted, irrationally, by the bankruptcy of
his father.
   So Mr. Siegel convinced himself that he needed to provide
Mr. Boesky with inside information. The payoff would be cash
delivered by an Iranian courier who, Mr. Siegel came to
learn, always seemed to skim something off the top.
Otherwise, the payoffs went smoothly. On two occasions Mr.
Siegel met the courier in the lobby of the Plaza Hotel. After
the courier gave the Boesky-dictated password -- ""red light""
-- and Mr. Siegel responded, ""green light,"" the briefcase
containing the cash, neatly tied in Caesars Palace casino
ribbons, was handed over.
   But in 1985, Mr. Boesky decided he didn't want to risk
another handoff in the Plaza lobby. He told Mr. Siegel to be
at a phone booth on 55th and First Ave. precisely at 9 a.m.
Mr. Siegel would pick up the receiver and pretend to be
making a call. While he was on the phone, the courier would
stand behind him as though he were waiting to make a call. He
would place a briefcase by Mr. Siegel's left leg, then
disappear.
   Mr. Siegel arrived at the pay phone early on the appointed
date. To kill time, he sat down at a table in the window of a
coffee shop across the street. As he sipped his coffee, he
spotted someone who had to be the courier: a swarthy man
wearing a black peacoat.
   Then Mr. Siegel saw someone else. About a half-block up
the street, he spotted another dark-skinned man keeping an
eye on the man Mr. Siegel suspected was the courier. Mr.
Siegel started to panic. What was going on? Suddenly all of
Mr. Siegel's fears about Mr. Boesky's reputed ties to the
C.I.A. came to the fore. ""They're going to kill me,"" Mr.
Siegel thought. He fled.
   Mr. Boesky called him later that day. ""How did it go?"" he
asked.
   ""Nothing went,"" Mr. Siegel answered. ""There was more than
one person there.""
   ""Of course,"" said Mr. Boesky. ""There always is. I want to
make sure they deliver."" Mr. Siegel was amazed that Mr.
Boesky didn't trust his own courier. Mr. Boesky insisted that
Mr. Siegel repeat the exercise at the phone booth. This time
the plan went without a hitch, and Mr. Siegel collected that
year's ""bonus"" of $350,000.
   But the frightening experience caused Mr. Siegel to pull
away from Mr. Boesky, and eventually to stop giving him
inside information. His attention was increasingly absorbed
by his efforts to use insider trading profits to prop up a
faltering Kidder Peabody. To this end, he launched an even
broader insider trading scheme with Goldman, Sachs &amp; Co.
partner and chief arbitrager Robert Freeman.
   While Mr. Freeman would later plead guilty to a single
count of insider trading and his defenders would go on to
vigorously assert his innocence and mistreatment by
overzealous prosecutors, Messrs. Freeman and Siegel stole
information from their firms and their clients to trade
illegally on numerous deals. These included; Champion
International's bid for St. Regis paper; Kohlberg, Kravis
Roberts &amp; Co.'s purchase of Beatrice Cos.; and T. Boone
Pickens's raid on Unocal. As Mr. Freeman once cynically joked
to Mr. Siegel: ""I've got to hand it to you. You really know
how to trade information.""
                                                                                                       

                    MAJOR LEAGUE CRIME
                                                                                                       

   For the Milken/Boesky team, insider trading was a mere way
station toward bigger goals and bigger crimes. They were
willing, for example, to lose money on their insider trading
when a broader goal was sought. In 1984, when Milken client
Stephen Wynn of Golden Nugget Inc. found himself stuck with a
big position in MCA, Mr. Milken simply directed Mr. Boesky to
buy MCA shares until he had driven up the price sufficiently
that Mr. Wynn could sell his stake at a profit. There is no
evidence that Mr. Wynn knew of this illegal arrangement.
   Mr. Boesky lost money selling his own shares, of course.
Mr. Milken now owed Mr. Boesky $10 million. Paying him with
something so simple as a check was out of the question: It
would create a paper trail, and, more important, it would
cost Mr. Milken money. Instead, Mr. Milken would get his own
junk-bond customers to pay.
   He directed Mr. Boesky to buy junk bonds from Milken
clients, sell them back to Drexel at inflated prices,
generating profits for Mr. Boesky. Then Drexel would convince
other clients to buy the bonds at even higher prices. Some of
the clients weren't smart enough to realize what was
happening; others simply owed Mr. Milken for the many favors
he did for them. In less than six months, Mr. Milken repaid
Mr. Boesky more than $10 million. And in doing so, he
generated further trading profits for his own operation.
   The double threat of Milken information and Boesky buying
power may have reached its apogee with the 1985 takeover by
Drexel client Maxxam Group of Pacific Lumber. Pacific Lumber
was gearing up to resist, but then Mr. Boesky started buying
the company's shares on Mr. Milken's orders. Mr. Milken, of
course, was privy to Maxxam's confidential plans, including
the price it would ultimately be willing to pay. As usual,
Mr. Milken shared ownership of Mr. Boesky's positions and
promised to cover any possible losses. Mr. Boesky's SEC
filings, of course, made no mention of Mr. Milken's secret
interest.
   Maxxam raised its offer, and, feeling under pressure from
two raiders, Pacific Lumber capitulated. Mr. Milken's scheme
netted Drexel more than $20 million in fees and generated
over $1 million in insider trading profits on the stock owned
jointly by Messrs. Milken and Boesky. Pacific Lumber under
Maxxam control soon aroused the ire of conservationists by
felling tracts of redwood forest to meet its junk-bond
payments.
   But Mr. Milken's most lucrative ploy may have been his
taking Beatrice Cos. warrants in connection with the
leveraged buy-out of the company by KKR. Mr. Milken had
extracted the warrants (the right to buy Beatrice stock at a
low price) from KKR by arguing that he needed to offer them
to clients as an inducement to buy the Beatrice junk bonds.
Instead, Mr. Milken kept almost all the warrants for Drexel,
lodging the bulk of them in his and his family's
partnerships. The warrants eventually proved to be worth an
estimated $650 million.
   Mr. Milken's Beverly Hills colleagues believed they were
all sharing in the profits generated by the high-yield
department, both in their bonuses and through interests in
investment partnerships set up by Mr. Milken. Mr. Milken
refused, however, to give details of the partnerships. One
day, Gary Winnick called Jim Dahl into his office and said,
""I'm going to show you something that will make you sick.""
Mr. Winnick had gotten a master list of the partnerships. It
showed that while most Milken deputies had an account, there
were more than 40 accounts for Mr. Milken, his wife, his
children and other relatives. In total, Mr. Milken had
created more than 500 investment partnerships. One of them,
named Otter Creek, paid out an astounding total of $473.4
million, most of it to Mr. Milken and his family members. And
that was just one of the partnerships.
   But no amount of money, legal or illegal, seemed to be
enough for Mr. Milken. At the end of 1986, Drexel allocated
$700 million in bonus payments to Mr. Milken's high-yield
department. Under his arrangement with Drexel, Mr. Milken was
free to allocate those payments to himself and his
colleagues. Most of his employees thought Mr. Milken was
generous with them. They had no way of knowing that that
year, Mr. Milken kept $550 million -- nearly 80% of the total
-- for himself.
   Even that wasn't enough. The year before, Mr. Milken felt
that Drexel Chief Executive Fred Joseph had cheated him on a
finder's fee. Mr. Milken agreed that another department also
deserved credit, but argued that his personal contact with
the client had locked up the deal. Mr. Joseph disagreed and
refused to give Mr. Milken the money. He thought the matter
was over. But now, a year later, Mr. Milken again complained
about the fee. He called Mr. Joseph repeatedly, arguing
strenuously for hours about this one fee. In a year when he
had just made $550 million (not counting the Beatrice
warrants and other earnings), and when a conservative
estimate of his net worth and that of his family would be $3
billion, Mr. Milken never stopped griping that he had been
cheated. The amount in dispute: $15,000.
                                                                                                       

                      BEFORE THE FALL
                                                                                                       

   As he careened from triumph to triumph, Mr. Milken seemed
to change. He had always eaten lunch on paper plates out
among his colleagues, but by 1986 he was telling caterers to
serve him on china and he often ate alone. He obtained an
expensive new toupee, began wearing French-cuffed shirts,
bought a half-interest in a Gulfstream jet, hired a bodyguard
and began arriving for work in a chauffeured limousine.
   Still, by the standards of clients like Mr. Boesky, Mr.
Milken was an ascetic. In the summer of 1986 Mr. Boesky was
hardly ever in his office. He was often in Europe at his
place on France's Cote d'Azur. Other times he was at his $1.2
million Paris apartment, his London apartment, his condo in
Hawaii, or in his own suite at the Beverly Hills Hotel.
   But even Mr. Boesky outdid himself one Saturday in
September 1986. The Queen Elizabeth II had just left
Manhattan on a celebratory ""cruise to nowhere"" for the bar
mitzvah of real estate developer Gerald Guterman's son. The
QE II's entire staff of more than 1,000 had been hired. Peter
Duchin and his orchestra were playing. Clowns entertained on
board. Suddenly, guests began craning their necks skyward as
a twin-engine helicopter hovered over the ship and landed on
its helipad. With the blades still turning overhead, an
elegantly clad Mr. Boesky, dressed in black tie, flashed a
smile as he disembarked to laughter and applause.
   The helicopter was owned by Mr. Boesky's friend Mr.
Mulheren, and when the pilot reported to him, Mr. Mulheren
was furious. The next day he got on the phone to Mr. Boesky.
   ""Don't ever use my helicopter again for a stunt like
this,"" Mr. Mulheren said. ""Are you out of your mind?
Revolutions are made of this. People get put in gas ovens.""
   Mr. Boesky just chuckled. ""You've got to admit one thing,
John. When I go, I go first class.""
   The next day, Sept. 17, 1986, Mr. Boesky surrendered to
federal authorities and became an undercover agent for the
Department of Justice.
                                                                                                       

                  WHEN A STRANGER CALLED
                                                                                                       

   The call came early one October evening in 1986. Martin
Siegel had left Kidder Peabody for Drexel, and had just
returned from his new office to his Upper East Side
apartment. ""Is this Marty Siegel?"" a voice on the phone
asked. After identifying himself only as Bill, the caller
asked, ""Did you get my letter?""
   ""No,"" Mr. Siegel replied. ""I don't know anything about a
letter."" He thought he should just hang up, but something
held him. ""Why don't you tell me?"" Mr. Siegel asked.
   Then the voice dropped its bombshell. ""I mean, your
relationship with the Russian.""
   Mr. Siegel closed his eyes, only to see an image of Mr.
Boesky -- the Russian. He struggled to sound unconcerned, but
he had to cut this off. ""Don't bother me anymore. If you do,
I'll go to the police.""
   ""I doubt that,"" Bill replied sarcastically, and Mr. Siegel
hung up.
   He reeled away from his desk. ""So this is how it all
ends,"" he screamed. When his wife rushed in moments later,
she found her husband slumped over the toilet in the
adjoining bathroom, vomiting.
   The next day, on the advice of his lawyer, Lawrence
Pedowitz, Mr. Siegel drove to his Connecticut home where he
found the letter. It said simply, ""I know,"" and asked for
money to keep the writer from turning Mr. Siegel over to the
Internal Revenue Service. The next week, Mr. Siegel got a
curious call from Mr. Boesky anxiously seeking a meeting, and
then an IRS agent stopped by Mr. Siegel's office while he was
out. Mr. Siegel was growing increasingly unnerved.
   So at Mr. Siegel's request, Mr. Pedowitz contacted the
U.S. Attorney's office. Mr. Pedowitz summoned Mr. Siegel to
his office the next morning. ""The U.S. Attorney knows all
about the letter,"" he told Mr. Siegel. ""They know all about
you and Boesky."" Mr. Siegel put his head in his hands and
began to cry. ""I did this,"" he said.
   He quickly agreed to cooperate with the government, which
wanted him to try to ensnare his former Kidder Peabody
arbitrage colleagues, Richard Wigton and Timothy Tabor.
Investigator Thomas Doonan was assigned to work with Mr.
Siegel in an undercover capacity. The two always met in
person, but one day Mr. Doonan called him on the phone for
the first time. Mr. Doonan's voice, isolated on the phone,
sounded eerily familiar. Suddenly Mr. Siegel felt a chill. He
was transported back to an October night, to his bedroom,
where he had answered the phone.
   ""Is this Marty Siegel?"" the voice had asked, ruining Mr.
Siegel's life. ""Did you get my letter?""
   Mr. Doonan was ""Bill.""
                                                                                                       

                       THE COVER-UP
                                                                                                       

   Mr. Milken and his traders were winding down a busy week
in Beverly Hills one Friday afternoon in November 1986 when
salesman Terren Peizer shouted, ""Oh, my God."" The
electrifying news of Ivan Boesky's guilty-plea arrangement
had just crossed the ticker.
   All eyes turned to Mr. Milken. He showed no reaction.
After three or four phone calls, he jumped up and headed for
brother Lowell's office, where he remained for more than an
hour.
   That weekend, Jim Dahl was summoned by Mr. Milken into the
office. Mr. Milken walked silently into the men's room,
turned on the tap water full blast and said, ""There haven't
been any subpoenas issued. Whatever you need to do, do it.""
   Cary Maultasch, Mr. Milken's representative in Drexel's
New York office, was summoned as well, and booked a flight
immediately for Los Angeles. When he arrived, he was taken to
Mr. Milken. ""You don't know anything about the $5.3 million
payment,"" Mr. Milken said flatly. But Mr. Maultasch did know.
The payment was the money Mr. Boesky had owed Mr. Milken when
they finally decided to settle the books on their illegal
trading arrangement. Mr. Maultasch was dismissed, but Mr.
Milken scheduled another meeting with him for 4 a.m. the next
day.
   When Mr. Maultasch arrived he was escorted into a
conference room where Mr. Milken sat alone, a guard standing
at the door. Mr. Milken spoke in hushed tones and frequently
wrote his questions on a yellow legal pad rather than
speaking. He erased the questions once they were answered.
The questions all concerned the illegal arrangement with Mr.
Boesky, which Mr. Maultasch had helped Mr. Milken track.
   When Mr. Milken wanted to discuss a specific stock, he
used his pen to point at the stock's name on a list, never
mentioning the name aloud. When Mr. Maultasch left the
office, he returned his entry pass to a Drexel security guard
who tore it up. ""Don't worry,"" the guard said. ""You weren't
here.""
   Later, even after Mr. Milken had received his subpoenas,
Mr. Milken sat down next to Mr. Peizer, the salesman, as Mr.
Peizer was going through his files. ""What are you doing?"" Mr.
Milken asked. ""Complying with a subpoena,"" Mr. Peizer
responded. Mr. Milken opened his own file drawers. They were
empty. ""If you don't have any documents,"" Mr. Milken said,
""you can't comply.""
   Mr. Milken's defense strategy was set at the outset by
lead counsel Edward Bennett Williams, the famed Washington
criminal lawyer: ""We have to remain on the inside {of the
tent} pissing out."" Potential witnesses had to stay loyal to
Mr. Milken. To bring this about, Mr. Milken's lawyers found
other lawyers to represent potential witnesses whose
cooperation they thought they could count on. Thus, a key
potential witness like Mr. Dahl ended up retaining Mr.
Milken's own firm, Williams &amp; Connolly.
   Even though Drexel was paying Mr. Milken's legal fees, the
Milken defense team, which also included noted New York
lawyer Arthur Liman, decided not to cooperate with Drexel and
its lawyers even while saying publicly that they were working
together. Mr. Williams believed from the start that Drexel
would fold under the pressure of a massive government
investigation. So Drexel's lawyers weren't allowed to
interrogate Mr. Milken, even though Drexel's chief executive,
Mr. Joseph, sent them out to California to get to the bottom
of the Boesky allegations. Most companies would fire so
uncooperative an employee, but Drexel did nothing. Thus, when
Drexel kept insisting publicly that it could find no evidence
of wrongdoing, it was hopelessly ill-informed.
   Mr. Liman suggested that the Milken camp also retain
public relations expert Linda Robinson, wife of American
Express Co. Chairman James D. Robinson III, who had achieved
prominence herself with numerous high-profile clients like
RJR Nabisco Chairman Ross Johnson. Her colleague, Ken Lerer,
and some associates soon sat down with Mr. Milken to ask the
financier what he considered his principal achievements. The
PR-staffers would then build their campaign around them. Mr.
Milken took a legal pad and red flair pen and began to write,
citing his achievements: that he won a dance contest in
elementary school and was prom king in high school. He
stopped without mentioning Drexel. Some of the participants
rolled their eyes at the realization that portraying Mr.
Milken as a national treasure would indeed be a tough
assignment.
   Mr. Lerer soon began placing pro-Milken tips with favored
journalists, ""breast feeding"" them, as he once called it. The
Robinson firm began writing pro-Milken op-ed pieces that were
then signed by Milken clients. The whole effort was
enormously lucrative for the Robinson firm, which demanded a
$150,000-a-month retainer and often exceeded it in actual
billings. The possibility that Mr. Milken might be guilty
wasn't even allowed to be discussed inside the Robinson firm.
One afternoon, employee David Gilman, who worked on the
Milken account, was conferring with Mr. Lerer when Mrs.
Robinson marched into Lerer's office and sprang what staffers
came to call the ""loyalty test.""
   ""Is Milken innocent or guilty?"" she demanded.
   ""Innocent, of course,"" Mr. Gilman replied. Mrs. Robinson
didn't look satisfied, so he repeated, ""He is innocent,"" with
more conviction.
   ""Right,"" Mrs. Robinson answered, then stalked out of the
room.
                                                                                                       

                    THE TENT BLOWS OPEN
                                                                                                       

   Two big breaks for the prosecutors helped topple the
strenuous defense efforts of Mr. Milken's handlers.
Prosecutors working on the Robert Freeman case had gathered
records of a New Jersey firm called Princeton-Newport that
had done business with Mr. Freeman and Goldman Sachs. They
found some suspicious trading by one employee, whom they then
learned had been fired. The former employee, Will Hale, was
subpoenaed and questioned. The interrogation was getting
nowhere. Mr. Hale was evasive and reluctant. Then prosecutors
asked what seemed an innocuous question: Why did he leave
Princeton-Newport? Mr. Hale hesitated only slightly before
answering, ""I didn't leave. I was fired."" Why? he was asked.
""I couldn't stand all the crimes they were committing.""
   Mr. Hale detailed a series of securities crimes and said
Princeton-Newport's principal conspirator was none other than
the Beverly Hills office of Drexel Burnham Lambert.
Prosecutors went on to seize audio phone tapes that
implicated several Drexel employees, including Milken aide
Cary Maultasch, who, learning he was under suspicion, soon
dismissed his attorney out of fear that he was ""in Milken's
pocket."" Mr. Maultasch began negotiations with the U.S.
Attorney's office and became a cooperating witness.
   Another major break came soon after Milken aide Jim Dahl
was notified he was about to be indicted. All along, Mr. Dahl
had known he had something to hide. At Mr. Milken's
direction, he had helped client Columbia Savings &amp; Loan evade
taxes through phony trades. Now Mr. Dahl began to question
the loyalty of his lawyer, Robert Litt, whose firm also
represented Mr. Milken. Mr. Dahl requested a new lawyer, but
when he came to believe that Mr. Litt was stalling, he hired
two new lawyers of his own.
   When Mr. Dahl's new defense team examined the evidence
against him, Mr. Dahl was relieved: The suspicious trades
being examined by the government had his initials on the
order tickets, but he hadn't done them. One of the trading
tickets actually had the initials M.M. at the bottom. He
recognized the orders as trades in stocks for Ivan Boesky.
Mr. Dahl only handled bonds, and knew that Mr. Milken himself
handled Mr. Boesky's trades.
   Mr. Dahl immediately went to his old lawyer, Mr. Litt,
still working for Mr. Milken, and told him ""I didn't do the
trades, Mike did."" Would Mr. Milken sign an affidavit that
Mr. Dahl didn't do the trades? A week later the answer came:
Mr. Milken wouldn't sign or acknowledge anything. Mr. Dahl's
own trading assistant, still on Mr. Milken's payroll, said
she suffered a memory lapse; she didn't remember anything
about the trades, so she couldn't back up Mr. Dahl. Soon, Mr.
Dahl was convinced that he was becoming a fall guy for Mr.
Milken. His lawyers approached the U.S. Attorney's office and
asked for immunity. The ""tent"" so carefully erected had blown
open.
   Several other Drexel aides would soon follow Mr. Dahl into
the government camp. Even as his lawyers claimed the
defections didn't matter, the news hit Mr. Milken hard. After
testifying before a grand jury, Mr. Dahl was in New York when
he received a call from Mr. Milken. He was in Washington, and
if Mr. Dahl met him there, the two could fly back to Los
Angeles together in Mr. Milken's plane. Mr. Dahl, eager for a
reconciliation with his mentor, accepted. But as the flight
started, Mr. Milken said virtually nothing to Mr. Dahl. He
then selected a movie, ""Raiders of the Lost Ark,"" and turned
up the sound so loud that Mr. Dahl's ears hurt.
   ""Mike, if we're not going to talk, will you at least turn
that thing down?"" Mr. Dahl asked. But Mr. Milken didn't
respond. He didn't even look at Mr. Dahl, nor did he speak to
him for the duration of the flight. The message sank in. To
Mr. Milken, Mr. Dahl had ceased to exist.
                                                                                                       

                    ADMISSION OF GUILT
                                                                                                       

   By late 1988, having heard the Princeton-Newport tapes and
other evidence, Chief Executive Fred Joseph had ceased to
believe in Mr. Milken's innocence. That meant Drexel was
guilty, too. Mr. Joseph traveled to the office of Mr.
Milken's lead attorney, Arthur Liman (Mr. Williams having
died that summer), to explain his painful decision to have
the firm plead guilty and dismiss Mr. Milken. He was shocked
at the reception he received.
   Mr. Liman compared Mr. Joseph's decision to the Nazi
persecution of Jews. He argued that Mr. Joseph was depriving
Mr. Milken of his rights prior to trial. ""That's the first
step towards concentration camps,"" Mr. Liman said. ""No man
can deprive another of his freedoms."" Mr. Joseph was too
shocked to counter Mr. Liman's charges, but he insisted his
mind was made up. ""Mike did what he did,"" Mr. Joseph said.
""I'm not here to try Michael Milken."" Almost as an
afterthought, he added, ""Mike is going to plead guilty
anyway.""
   This really aroused Mr. Liman's indignation. ""Never,"" he
said firmly, showing Mr. Joseph to the door. ""Absolutely
not.""
   Mr. Joseph's next stop was Milken partisan Donald Engel,
the man behind Drexel's infamous Predator's Balls.
Immediately after Mr. Joseph left his office, Mr. Liman
placed a call to Mr. Engel. ""Donny, he's selling him out,""
Mr. Liman reported. So Mr. Engel was ready for a fight when
Mr. Joseph arrived at his apartment.
   Mr. Milken is ""our brother,"" Mr. Engel insisted. ""You've
got to fight. A mafia lawyer wouldn't act like this.""
   ""We're not a mafia company,"" a weary Mr. Joseph replied.
                                                                                                       

                         THE FALL
                                                                                                       

   Despite the Milken team's repeated denials, plea
bargaining was soon under way. By March of 1989, prosecutors
had put an offer on the table for Mr. Milken: plead guilty to
just two felonies in return for immunity for his brother
Lowell. Their deadline for a response was 3 p.m., March 29.
That afternoon, prosecutors gathered in their office to await
the call from Mr. Milken's forces. The grand jury was waiting
nearby in the courthouse. Expecting their client to plead
guilty, Williams &amp; Connolly's Mr. Litt had planned a trip to
Disney World and Mr. Liman was planning to go to France that
very day. But as the day wore on, Mr. Milken hadn't decided.
He wasn't even taking calls from his own lawyers. Finally,
Mr. Litt got through to Mr. Milken. ""I can't decide,"" Mr.
Milken said. ""I've got these concerns. . . .""
   The deadline passed without a response from Mr. Milken.
Still, the government waited. A press conference to announce
the indictment was scheduled for 4 p.m., then canceled.
Finally, a breathless Mr. Liman reached acting U.S. Attorney
Benito Romano from a pay phone at New York's Kennedy
International Airport and said, ""He's ready to reach an
agreement.""
   ""I'm sorry,"" Mr. Romano responded after a brief pause.
""It's too late.""
   Mr. Milken had made his worst trade ever. He was indicted
that day on 98 counts. He later pleaded innocent and asserted
publicly for a year that he would be acquitted. But
prosecutors had the advantage all along of knowing what the
public didn't -- that Mr. Milken had already admitted guilt.
   Mr. Milken's guilty plea, this time to six felonies, came
a full year later. On Nov. 21, 1990, federal district court
Judge Kimba Wood sentenced Mr. Milken to 10 years in prison
-- two years each on five of the six counts, with the
sentences to run consecutively.
   Many in the courtroom gasped as the sentence was read, but
Mr. Milken showed no reaction. When the Milken entourage had
gathered in the corridor outside, the heavy door to the
courtroom was closed. Mr. Milken had still said nothing. Then
he turned to Mr. Liman. ""How much did I get?"" he asked, as if
he hadn't heard Judge Wood. ""Two years?""
   There was a moment of stunned silence. Apparently Mr.
Milken thought he was being sentenced to concurrent rather
than consecutive sentences. Mr. Liman broke the news. ""Ten
years, Michael,"" he said gently. ""The sentence is 10 years.""
   The blood drained from Mr. Milken's face. He took his wife
Lori's arm and the two disappeared into a small witness's
waiting room off the corridor, closing the door behind them.
   Moments later, first Lori, then Mr. Milken, emitted
bloodcurdling screams. Milken lawyer Richard Sandler burst
into the room as Mr. Milken collapsed into a chair,
hyperventilating. ""Oxygen]"" someone yelled, as a federal
marshal raced for help.
   ---
                    Chronology of Events
                                                                                                       

   May 1986         The Securities and Exchange Commission
                    and federal prosecutors accuse Dennis
                    Levine of making $12.6 million in
                    insider-trading profits.
                                                                                                       

   Nov. 1986        Ivan F. Boesky agrees to pay a $100
                    million penalty to settle SEC charges
                    of insider trading. Prosecutors reveal
                    he has been cooperating in an undercover
                    investigation. Drexel Burnham Lambert
                    and Michael Milken receive subpoenas.
                                                                                                       

   Feb. 1987        Robert Freeman, Richard Wigton and
                    Timothy Tabor are arrested on insider
                    trading charges. Martin Siegel admits
                    insider trading and is identified as
                    cooperating in the government's
                    investigation.
                                                                                                       

   May 1987         The indictments of Freeman, Wigton, and
                    Tabor are dismissed. Prosecutors vow
                    to seek a new indictment.
                                                                                                       

   Oct. 1987        The stock market crashes.
                                                                                                       

   Dec. 1987        Boesky is sentenced to three years in
                    prison.
                                                                                                       

   Sept. 1988       The SEC accuses Drexel, Milken and
                    others of insider trading, stock
                    manipulation, fraud and other violations
                    of federal securities laws.
                                                                                                       

   Dec. 1988        Drexel agrees to plead guilty to six
                    felonies, settle SEC charges, and pay
                    a record $650 million.
                                                                                                       

   March 1989       Milken and his brother Lowell are
                    indicted on 98 counts of racketeering
                    and securities fraud.
                                                                                                       

   Aug. 1989        Freeman pleads guilty to one count of
                    insider trading. The investigation of

                                                                                                       

   Oct. 1989        The junk-bond market collapses.
                                                                                                       

   Feb. 1990        Drexel files for bankruptcy-court
                    protection.
                                                                                                       

   April 1990       Milken agrees to plead guilty to six
                    felonies and to pay $600 million.
                                                                                                       

   June 1990        Siegel is sentenced to two months in
                    prison.
                                                                                                       

   July 1990        John Mulheren is convicted after trial;
                    the conviction is later reversed.
                                                                                                       

   Nov. 1990        Milken is sentenced to 10 years in
                    prison.
   ---
                     Cast of Characters
                                                                                                       

   Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., Beverly Hills
                                                                                                       

   -- Michael Milken, head of high-yield securities
   -- Lowell Milken, Michael's brother, a lawyer
   -- Richard Sandler, lawyer
   -- James Dahl, salesman
   -- Gary Winnick, salesman
   -- Warren Trepp, head trader
   -- Cary Maultasch, trader
   -- Bruce Newberg, trader
                                                                                                       

   Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., New York
                                                                                                       

   -- Fred Joseph, chief executive
   -- Donald Engel, consultant
   -- Dennis Levine, investment banker
                                                                                                       

   Ivan F. Boesky Corp., New York
                                                                                                       

   -- Ivan Boesky, arbitrager
   -- Lance Lessman, head of research
                                                                                                       

   Kidder Peabody &amp; Co., New York
                                                                                                       

   -- Martin Siegel, investment banker (later at Drexel)
   -- Richard Wigton, head of arbitrage
   -- Timothy Tabor, arbitrager
                                                                                                       

   Goldman, Sachs &amp; Co., New York
                                                                                                       

   -- Robert Freeman, head of arbitrage
                                                                                                       

   Jamie Securities, New York
                                                                                                       

   -- John Mulheren, principal
                                                                                                       

   Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen &amp; Katz, New York (counsel for
Siegel)
                                                                                                       

   -- Lawrence Pedowitz, partner
                                                                                                       

   Paul, Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton &amp; Garrison, New York
(counsel for Michael Milken)
                                                                                                       

   -- Arthur Liman, partner
                                                                                                       

   Williams &amp; Connolly, Washington, D.C. (counsel for Michael
Milken)
                                                                                                       

   -- Edward Bennett Williams, partner
   -- Robert Litt, partner
                                                                                                       

   Robinson, Lake, Lerer &amp; Montgomery, New York (public
relations counsel for Michael Milken)
                                                                                                       

   -- Linda Robinson
   -- Kenneth Lerer
   ---
                 Irreconcilable Differences
                                                                                                       

   Everyone named in this article was interviewed or was
asked for an interview and given an opportunity to comment.
To a surprising degree, differences that emerged in various
accounts were reconciled during further interviews.
   The one major exception occurs between Mr. Milken's
assertions of fact, and Mr. Boesky's. The reporting found
that Mr. Boesky's version was consistently more accurate.
After making his plea agreement, Mr. Boesky's only obligation
was to tell the truth; indeed, his plea bargain would be
revoked if he lied.
   In contrast -- and in striking departure from usual
Justice Department practice -- Mr. Milken's plea bargain
isn't revocable even if he now lies. He didn't testify under
oath, even at his presentencing hearing when given the
opportunity to do so, and during the investigation he
repeatedly invoked the Fifth Amendment.
   Nonetheless, the following is an effort to convey Mr.
Milken's position, largely set forth in court filings
responding to government charges, as well as the positions of
others who dispute aspects of this story.
   Diamond Shamrock: Mr. Milken has repeatedly denied
engaging in insider trading. He has insisted that he
committed no crimes other than the six to which he pleaded
guilty. When given the opportunity to respond to allegations
of insider trading in Diamond Shamrock and other stocks, his
lawyers said only that if Mr. Milken had been routinely
insider trading with Mr. Boesky, Mr. Boesky wouldn't have
needed to trade illegally with Dennis Levine.
   Mr. Milken's Fainting Spell: Lowell Milken's attorney says
his client attended to his brother and called an ambulance
for him.
   The Siegel/Freeman scheme: Mr. Freeman has denied engaging
in any criminal activity other than the one instance of
insider trading with Mr. Siegel to which he pleaded guilty.
Mr. Freeman has apparently denied other specific alleged
instances in a presentencing memorandum, but at his request,
this document has been sealed. The Wall Street Journal has
filed suit to obtain the report; the litigation is pending.
   MCA/Golden Nugget: This was the subject of Count Three of
Mr. Milken's plea agreement. But while admitting crime, Mr.
Milken has insisted that the subsequent purchasers of MCA
stock were victims only of Mr. Boesky's rush to sell, not of
their mutual scheme.
   Pacific Lumber: In response to these allegations, Mr.
Milken's lawers said, ""It is obviously impossible for us to
refute . . . each and every transaction which Boesky now
claims was tainted with illegality.""
   Liman/Joseph discussions: While acknowledging having a
wide-ranging philosophical discussion, Mr. Liman has denied
comparing Mr. Joseph to the Nazis.
   -- James B. Stewart
",2,"[  9.91212534e-01   1.67966863e-04   1.51698702e-02 ...,   0.00000000e+00
   0.00000000e+00   0.00000000e+00]"
22,"     Sununu created an ""appearance problem"" by using a government car to travel
to a New York stamp show, Bush said, but ""given the circumstances, I think it
was appropriate."";    He added, however: ""It doesn't set a precedent. It
doesn't say anyone that has access to a car can go anyplace that anyone wants
at any time."";    ""I recognize, and I think the governor does, there's an
appearance problem,"" Bush said.;    But, he added, ""The facts surrounding this
particular trip, this beating that he's taken, is unwarranted in my view.""; In
Des Moines, Sununu vowed he would not take advice from ""self-styled experts""
on how or when he travels.;    ""You can't get here without traveling,"" Sununu
told a Republican fund-raiser. ""I know that's a very complicated concept for
some."";    Sources said Tuesday that an angry Bush contacted a senior
political adviser Sunday to discuss how to handle the controversy after
learning of Sununu's decision to have a government car and driver take him to
New York last Wednesday. Sununu attended a rare-stamp auction and conducted
other personal business but no official duties there, officials said.;    Bush
apparently made his call after Sununu defended himself on television Sunday.
It was Sununu's first appearance on a network program since revelations in
April about his extensive use of government planes for activities ranging from
visiting his dentist to skiing to trips to his home state of New Hampshire.;  
 On Sunday, Sununu gave the same explanation for using the government car that
he had offered for using government planes -- that he must be able to
communicate instantly with the White House in the interest of national
security.;    Sununu has been unable to fly on government planes for personal
business since Bush instituted new travel rules after the April controversy.; 
  Sununu since has asked sponsors of political events at which he is to speak
to obtain corporate jets to take him to and from Washington. White House press
secretary Marlin Fitzwater said Tuesday that direct solicitation of firms to
provide such planes would not be improper, although Sununu aides deny that he
asked directly for the planes.;    The car controversy has created new ripples
among Republicans who question whether Sununu recognizes that repeated
questions about his ethics reflect poorly on Bush, who vowed during his
campaign to bring a higher ethical standard to his administration and fight
even the appearance of impropriety among aides.;    One administration source,
echoing comments by many Republicans outside the administration, said Tuesday
that Sununu ""has a total blind spot on the issue of ethics and public
service."";    While Fitzwater has defended the legality of using the car and
corporate jets, he would not offer an opinion on perceptions of impropriety.; 
  ""I can't make a judgment,"" he said, adding, ""I don't know what happened"" in
connection with the jets. Party officials in three states where Sununu has
made recent appearances said they, not the White House, asked corporations to
provide him planes.;    Sununu and Edward Rogers, his top personal aide, flew
to Des Moines Tuesday night on a corporate jet arranged by the Iowa Republican
Party so Sununu could address a fund-raising event, according to Randy
Enwright, the party's executive director.;    ""Because of all the flak, we
wanted to make sure we did it right,"" he said. ""We ran this by the White House
to make sure the company didn't have any business pending there."";    The
Kirke-Van Orsdel insurance company in Des Moines furnished the plane, Enwright
said, and the state party was to pay the firm about $2,000, the cost of two
round-trip, first-class commercial tickets.;    The New Jersey Republican
Party arranged last week for Beneficial Corp. of Peapack, N.J., to charter a
plane to fly Sununu here after a fund-raising appearance there, according to
party spokesman Bill Ulrey.;    After his personal business in New York last
Wednesday, Sununu had gone on to New Jersey for the fund-raiser, while his
driver returned alone to Washington. Beneficial had been prepared to fly
Sununu to and from the event, but Sununu changed his mind and took the car at
the last minute, officials said.;    White House officials said the local
press has raised the transportation issue on every Sununu trip since April,
reflecting how the controversy has played nationally. ""Who's paying to get him
there is the first question they ask,"" an administration official said of
Sununu's travels.  ",3,"[ 0.44430659  0.02647756  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
23,"     ""No, no, John,"" Brady called out. ""YOU'RE going the wrong way."" Reproached,
Sununu reversed tracks and followed the Cabinet secretary.;    These days,
Sununu seems to be making a habit of going the wrong way: The latest flap is
over his taking a chauffeur-driven White House car to New York to attend a
stamp auction.;    And the abrasive chief of staff is discovering that the
dozens of people he has insulted or slighted -- from administration officials
to members of Congress -- are watching his travails with thinly disguised
relish.;    Before, Sununu could take comfort in unswerving support from the
person who mattered: President Bush. But now, that too is in doubt.;    Bush
gave Sununu a less-than-ringing endorsement Wednesday, telling reporters that
the former New Hampshire governor has created an ""appearance problem."";    And
suddenly, the political community is abuzz with questions about how long
Sununu will last in his job and how someone so bright could get himself in so
much trouble.;    Sununu's latest problems stem from his use of his official
car to go to New York for a stamp auction. There was nothing illegal about the
trip, or Sununu's ride home on a corporate jet after attending a GOP
fund-raiser in New Jersey later that night.;    But the incident raises
questions about Sununu's judgment because it came only a few weeks after
reports of his use of government jets for personal and political purposes.;   
Besides triggering a spate of unflattering attention, those reports prompted a
new, more-restrictive White House travel policy that required Sununu to get
advance approval for his flights.;    The latest flap has dominated White
House briefings the past two days and prompted Bush to suggest Wednesday that
Sununu shouldn't use his government car for such purposes again.;    ""I
recognize, and I think the governor (Sununu) does, there's an appearance
problem,"" said Bush, who nonetheless defended Sununu's use of the car as
permissible in this case and said Sununu's job was safe.;    White House
spokesman Marlin Fitzwater, amplifying Bush's comments, made it clear that
Bush had told Sununu that he was concerned by the appearance of impropriety
and that he wanted his chief of staff to take no more embarrassing trips.;   
Fitzwater said Bush expects such use of a White House car to be ""a
one-time-only thing. . . . We only expect it to happen once."";    The
controversy is unquestionably an embarrassment for Bush, who has prided
himself on setting a high ethical standard for his administration. And some
former White House officials say Sununu should recognize that he is not
serving Bush well.;    ""In light of his problems with his jet travel and all
that, he ought to be a little careful,"" said Lyn Nofziger, a White House
political director under Ronald Reagan. ""If not for his sake, then for the
sake of the president. It's the president who has to run for re-election next
year, not John Sununu."";    As Sununu himself has noted, some of the criticism
goes with the job of saying ""no"" to administration officials and lawmakers who
want the president's ear.;    ""Somebody has to be the tougher hand, the firmer
hand. It goes with the territory,"" Sununu said last month.;    But critics
complain that Sununu's brusque style has alienated Republicans and Democrats
needlessly, causing unnecessary ill will.;    He publicly dismissed Sen. Trent
Lott, R-Miss., as an ""insignificant figure"" last year during the budget debate
on Capitol Hill. He has enraged House Republicans by dressing them down
privately and questioning their political skills.  ",3,"[ 0.55045229  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
24,"     According to one writer, ""He said no to cabinet secretaries and to
congressmen, to journalists and to job-hunters; he said no short and sharp
without troubling to be polite about it; and so he would come to be warmly
detested on the Hill, in the National Press Club, at Republican National
Headquarters and across the country."" And his improprieties, when they were
revealed, shocked the nation and rocked the administration to its very
foundations. And he wasn't even named John Sununu.;    But the rise and fall
of Sherman Adams, President Eisenhower's powerful chief-of-staff, is more than
an interesting political doppleganger to the travails of his lineal heir, John
Sununu. The case of Sherman Adams sheds an eerie light on Sununu's rise in the
ancient, stony soil of New Hampshire politics. It gives us a grip on the
origins of the presidential chief of staff, an unofficial position that has
come to be a virtual American prime ministership. And the course of Sherman
Adams' humiliation may even allow us a perspective on the course of John
Sununu's struggle for survival and possibly even a way to predict the timing
of his ultimate demise.;    That Sherman Adams, the first ""assistant
president"" and John Sununu, conceivably the last of the imperial chiefs of
staff, were both catapulted from governor of the Granite state into national
prominence is not at all coincidental. Rather it stems from the strange
configuration of American politics and New Hampshire's place in it. With its
""first-in-the-nation"" primary, New Hampshire has historically exerted a pull
far in excess of a population still only marginally larger than the city of
Detroit.;    Sherman Adams had risen in New Hampshire politics of the '30s and
'40s because of his organizational abilities and the perception of his
incorruptibility.;    After graduating from Dartmouth, Adams worked as a
logging camp supervisor and eventually rose to become an executive in one of
New Hampshire's leading timber companies. In 1940, at the behest of his
employers, he ran for a seat in the New Hampshire House, eventually becoming
governor in 1949.;    When he took office, Adams began a program of
streamlining and reducing state government that provided a model followed
three decades later for another new New Hampshire governor, John Sununu.;   
In late 1951, New Hampshire was the launching pad for the campaign of Dwight
D. Eisenhower.;    Eisenhower, with Adams' support, defeated the isolationist
Sen. Robert Taft in the New Hampshire primary. But Eisenhower and Taft ran
neck and neck in subsequent state tests and arrived at the Republican
Convention in Chicago virtually tied. It was then that Eisenhower's top
lieutenants came to Adams and asked him to become their candidate's floor
manager.;    The 1952 Republican convention was the last national convention
to go beyond one ballot. And when Eisenhower did win, he asked Sherman Adams
to become his personal campaign manager.;    Bush's campaign debt;    In a
very similar way, three and a half decades later, George Bush paid off a very
major campaign debt by appointing Sununu chief of staff. Without Sununu, the
chances are very good that the current president of the United States would
not be named George Bush.;    In February 1988, a reeling Bush campaign limped
into New Hampshire after finishing a near-fatal third in the Iowa caucus. But
the savvy Sununu, evidencing some of the high arrogance for which he has
become justly famous, was not at all downcast. ""Isn't it great,"" he reportedly
told a puzzled friend about the news in Iowa. ""Don't you see how much good I'm
going to do for the next president of the United States?"";    And true to his
words, Sununu crafted an attack campaign that painted Bush's chief rival, Bob
Dole, as a closet ""tax and spend"" liberal. That ploy, plus a computerized
get-out-the-vote campaign, crafted by Sununu on his own spreadsheet program,
did the trick, and the rest is history.;    Unlike Sherman Adams, John Sununu
could not be mistaken for a rock-ribbed Granite Stater. Born in Havana, Cuba,
the son of an immigrant Lebanese trader and a Greek mother from El Salvador,
the stubby, rumpled Sununu liked to refer to himself as a ""universal ethnic."";
   Three degrees from MIT;    But an upper middle-class New York upbringing, a
brilliant career at military school and three degrees from MIT put the reputed
180 I.Q. Sununu on the fast track. In the early '60s, he began building a
solid career running the several engineering firms he founded and also became
a professor of physics at Tufts University.;    Sununu was elected to the New
Hampshire Assembly in 1972, and 10 years later became governor of New
Hampshire on a conservative campaign theme of nuclear power, increased
business and no new taxes.;    It was a propitious era to be governor of New
Hampshire. The state was coming out of the '82 recession and beginning a
six-year boom that pumped enough revenue into the coffers to build a new state
hospital and prison and still have money left over to give state employees
raises. According to Concord Monitor editor Mike Pride, ""Sununu did well; he
fell into an easy time to be governor."";    Sununu was re-elected twice and
gained a reputation as an activist governor.;    He also developed a
propensity for the excesses that would prove so costly in Washington.
Eschewing the mansion in Concord, Sununu chose to live an hour away from the
capitol and be chauffeured to and from every day. The Wall Street Journal
noted that Sununu ""became an extremely powerful figure in a state where the
powers of governor are not great."";    More or less the same thing could have
been said about Sherman Adams when he gave up the New Hampshire governorship
to become Dwight Eisenhower's ""assistant president"" in 1953.;    The reason
for Adams' enormous power lay in the nature of the Eisenhower presidency.
Continuing the staff system that had proven itself during the war, Adams noted
that ""Eisenhower simply expected me to manage a staff that would boil down,
simplify and expedite the urgent business that had to be brought to his
attention."" It also meant that Adams would decide who and what crossed the
president's threshold. This power as the presidential gatekeeper has
characterized the chief-of-staff position ever since.;    Adams managed to
keep the Eisenhower administration on a more or less even keel through the
worst of the McCarthy outrages, through Eisenhower's heart attack in 1955, the
Suez crises in 1956, the Little Rock school integration crimes in 1957 and the
invasion of Lebanon in 1958.;    According to Eisenhower, Adams was successful
because ""From our first meeting in 1952, Sherman Adams seemed to me best
described as laconic, abrupt, businesslike and puritanically honest."" Adams
was the shining example that Republicans could hold up that they had done
something about their 1952 campaign slogan to ""clean up the mess in
Washington."";    Thus, the spring 1958 revelations that Adams had for years
enjoyed free hotel accommodations and accepted the now legendary vicuna coat
and an expensive rug from an unsavory New England industrialist named Bernard
Goldfine, while at the same time interceding with regulatory agencies on
Goldfine's behalf, came as a major shock.;    Adams waged a vigorous and
seemingly successful defense before a congressional committee, asserting that
his worse crime had been ""a mistake of judgment, not of intent."";    And there
things stood throughout the summer of 1958, with a somewhat tarnished Adams
carrying out the role he had defined over the previous six years. When pressed
about Adams, the president insisted that he was his ""right-hand man . . . the
only man who really understands what I am trying to do."" And when really
pressed about why he kept Adams on, Eisenhower wailed at a press conference,
""I need him."";    In 1958, an Eisenhower administration without Sherman Adams
was unthinkable. Certainly more unthinkable than a Bush administration without
John Sununu. But as the summer of '58 progressed, it became clear that Adams
was becoming an issue that could help the Democrats. So when, in September
1958, Republicans were badly beaten in elections in Maine, and campaign
contributions began to dry up, the pressure on Eisenhower to do something grew
enormous. But Eisenhower refused to personally fire his aide. Instead, he
delegated Vice President Nixon and the chair of the Republican Party to visit
Adams.;    Ever the good soldier, Adams finally listened, and in late
September quit. The gesture was largely futile. The year 1958 was the
beginning of the Democratic renaissance that led to the election of John
Kennedy in 1960.;    Today, as Vice President Dan Quayle could tell you, John
Sununu is no Sherman Adams. Sununu is as brash as Adams was self-effacing and
far more self-serving than Adams at his vicuna-coat worst. Nevertheless, the
continuing flap over Sununu's excesses and arrogance seem to mirror a
transgenerational anger at a public official who flaunted the Washington
establishment, who has made too many enemies trying too hard, and enjoying too
much, being the bad cop to the president's good.;    And even if a
controversial Supreme Court nomination has temporarily taken the spotlight off
of Sununu, the current chief of staff ought to ponder well next year's coming
election. He might question if his strange, parochial antics may just provide
the kind of ammunition in 1992 that the similarly alien behavior of Sherman
Adams did 34 years before. Ammunition that his own party will use to get rid
of him in time for an upcoming election if not before. (box)  ",3,"[ 0.4180072  0.         0.        ...,  0.         0.         0.       ]"
25,"     The message to the chief of staff was meant to be taken as a suggestion
that Sununu offer to resign, one highly placed source said. Instead, Sununu
sought to prove to the president that his supporters outnumber his critics and
that he should remain in his post.;   One senior official Monday described the
White House as ""a collection of small groups of aides holding their breaths,""
waiting to see whether Sununu survives. One GOP source, reporting on a call
from the chief of staff to a Republican leader, said Sununu lamented that ""the
noose is tightening around my neck, and I need your help."";   Another highly
placed source said the president's son met with Sununu last week after holding
a series of conversations about the structure of the White House staff and of
the campaign with other Bush loyalists and GOP activists. The source said the
younger Bush ""sketched out for Sununu"" problems the president is encountering
because of the chief of staff's tenure.;   ""He was told . . . the handwriting
was on the wall,"" the source said Monday.;   That, the source said, was when
Sununu started calling congressional Republicans and asking them to tell Bush
that the conservative wing of the party, in particular, would object if he
were fired.;   Officials said the president himself met with Sununu Sunday. A
source said the outcome of that session was unclear.  ",3,"[ 0.31469084  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
26,"     Speculation on a successor immediately centered on Transportation Secretary
Samuel Skinner, a Bush favorite and loyalist considered hard-nosed but not as
curt and combative as Sununu. Skinner headed Bush's 1988 campaign in
Illinois.;   Others mentioned as possible candidates for the job were Defense
Secretary Richard Cheney; Craig Fuller, a Republican consultant who was Bush's
chief of staff when he was vice president; and longtime Bush adviser Frederic
Malek.;   As chief of staff, Sununu has been given wide latitude by Bush to
manage domestic policy issues while the president devoted his attention to
foreign affairs.;   Sununu offered his resignation in a handwritten letter
given to Bush as the president was flying on Air Force One from Washington to
Bradenton, Fla., on Tuesday morning.;   ""I have always said I wanted to serve
as chief of staff as long as I could contribute to your success and help deal
effectively with both the issues and the arrows,"" Sununu wrote. ""Until
recently, I was convinced that even with the distorted perceptions being
created, I could be a strong contributor to your efforts and success.;   ""But
in politics, especially during the seasons of a political campaign,
perceptions that can be effectively dealt with at other times can be -- and
will be -- converted into real political negatives. And I would never want to
not be contributing positively, much less be a drag on your success."";   Bush,
in a ""Dear John"" letter in response, praised the 52-year-old Sununu and said
he wanted him to stay in the White House as a counselor with Cabinet status
through March 1.;   ""You have never wavered in your loyalty to us and more
importantly, your loyalty to the principles and goals of this administration.
You have indeed helped with the issues and you have intercepted many of the
'arrows' aimed my way,"" Bush said.;   Later, standing beside Sununu on Air
Force One, Bush told reporters, ""He has taken a lot of hard shots that would
have landed on my chin."";   Despite the effusive praise from Bush, Sununu's
resignation came after Bush's son, George, informed Sununu last Wednesday that
he was becoming a liability. The conversation was reported Tuesday by the
Washington Post. Many political strategists saw the leak of the conversation
as a public signal to Sununu that he should resign.;   GOP consultant Charles
Black said it became clear Sununu had to go when he became the story and
prevented Bush's own message on the economy and other domestic issues from
getting through.;   ""Every day the press was writing about Sununu and the
president wasn't getting anything done. . . . Hopefully the finger-pointing
and controversy is over and the president can focus on the domestic agenda,""
said Black.;   The resignation came amid Bush's struggle to arrest a sharp
decline in his public approval rating, fueled by persistent concerns that the
economy is headed into another recession and that the president has been
inattentive to domestic needs.;   One Sununu ally, Rep. Henry Hyde, R-Ill.,
suggested that Bush's popularity problems may have been a factor in Sununu's
departure. ""I'd hate to think so, but that's certainly one possibility. That
job is the No. 1 flak-catcher, and when you catch enough flak you sometimes
get weighted down."";   House Majority Leader Richard Gephardt, D-Mo., said
Bush shouldn't expect a White House shake-up to reverse his fortunes.
""Changing the nameplate of the president's chief of staff is not going to make
good things happen,"" he said.  ",3,"[ 0.36259603  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
27,"     Sununu submitted his resignation, effective Dec. 15, in a five-page
handwritten letter to Bush as they flew to Florida for a speech at a juice
factory Tuesday.;   The former New Hampshire governor, ending weeks of
speculation and criticism of his performance, told Bush in the letter he
""would never want to not be contributing positively, much less be a drag on
your success."";   In thinly veiled comments, Sununu made it clear that he felt
betrayed because, in many ways, he was doing exactly what Bush had hired him
to do.;   The departing chief of staff was also obliquely reminding the
president that this was not a matter of principle, but of ratings; his
bullying tactics had been fine as long as the opinion polls did not go down.; 
 ""I assure you that in pit-bull mode or pussycat mode (your choice, as
always), I am ready to help,"" Sununu wrote.;   His reference was sardonic. He
had called himself ""a pussycat"" and kept a plush cat on top of the bookcase in
his large West Wing office. But, at close range, it was clear that the toy
animal was really a tiger, and that is exactly how Sununu saw himself.;   As
he stated his credo in his first month in Washington: ""I don't care if people
hate me, as long as they hate me for the right reasons."";   Bush and Sununu
formed a close bond during the 1988 campaign, in the snows of New Hampshire,
when Bush saw his presidential dream slipping away after a humiliating showing
in Iowa.;   ""Whatever they did in Iowa, they will not reject George Bush in
New Hampshire,"" Sununu vowed, as he dragged Bush down from his elite perch to
start what he called a ""see me, touch me, feel me"" campaign among the people.;
  But it was Sununu who embodied the barbed-wire side of Bush's politics; in
many critical ways, he was an accurate reflection of the way Bush believed
things should work.;   During the 1988 campaign, Bush conceded in interviews
that he had to do some of the dirty work in attacking Dukakis; his alternating
nice and nasty faces came to be known as ""George the Gentle"" and ""George the
Ripper."";   But as president, Bush preferred to farm out to aides the duties
of bully and gunslinger.;   By making the abrasive former governor of New
Hampshire his chief of staff, Bush hoped that he could keep a certain balance
of rough and smooth in his governing and in his politics.;   In the many times
over the past three years when Sununu helped land the president in the
political soup, the Washington political cognoscenti speculated that Bush was
keeping his chief of staff only out of loyalty to Sununu for helping him win
the New Hampshire primary, or because Bush was too nice to fire anyone, or
because he was too indecisive.;   The truth is more complicated, and Sununu
put his finger on it Tuesday. While Sununu's lack of political skill in
dealing with political Washington eventually cost him his job, and while his
fatal flaw may have been in believing that he was smarter than Bush, the chief
of staff was -- often in an inept way -- trying to fulfill the mandate he had
been given by his boss.;   In many critical ways, Sununu exacerbated Bush's
limitations, rather than making up for them, and whenever the spotlight swung
away from foreign affairs, it became painfully apparent that this was a White
House without a long-range agenda, without a communications strategy and
without first-rate thinkers in many top jobs.;   As Bush tried to be the
ultimate Washington insider, the chief of staff alienated Congress, Cabinet
members, House Republicans and the press, who disdained Sununu because they
believed he misled them. Sununu even tried to manipulate his boss on occasion,
with the effect that Bush looked weak and waffling.;   When the glow faded
from the Persian Gulf war, and the country began looking to the White House
for leadership on the stagnant economy and the pain of many Americans, the
president once again allowed himself to be guided by Sununu and his closest
White House ally, Richard Darman, the budget chief.;   Sununu and Darman urged
the president to follow his instincts that there was nothing he could do about
the economy and that he should not even try to come up with a drastic plan.;  
Moreover, in the recent fiasco about caps on credit card interest rates,
Sununu did something that is never done in a city that operates strictly on
hierarchy: He blamed the mess on his boss, going on national television to say
Bush had ""ad-libbed"" the idea in a speech.;   Bush appeared out of sync with
the country. His approval ratings began dropping again. Important Republicans
scorned by Sununu began going on the record with their advice to Bush that he
was being ill served by his chief of staff.;   And finally and most important,
the president's wife, Barbara, and oldest son, George, turned on Sununu.;  
And so, finally, Bush invited Sununu to resign.;   In accepting Sununu's
letter of resignation, Bush said he regretted but supported Sununu's ""good
decision."" He said his aide would remain on at the White House until March 1
as a presidential counselor with Cabinet rank.;    Now Bush must find another
chief of staff, and another hired hatchet. But this time, his friends say, he
will look for aides who can play those roles while also playing by the rules
of the Washington game.;   While sources said Transportation Secretary Sam
Skinner headed the list of candidates, White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater
said today he did not believe Bush had made the offer to Skinner.;   Others
said to be in the running were Defense Secretary Dick Cheney, who was chief of
staff under President Ford; former GOP Rep. Bill Frenzel of Minnesota; and
former New Jersey Gov. Thomas Kean, a strong Bush loyalist who now is
president of Drew University.  ",3,"[ 0.3796828   0.00795353  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
28,"     In thinly veiled comments in his resignation letter, Sununu made it clear
that he felt betrayed because, in many ways, he was doing exactly what Bush
had hired him to do.;   The departing chief of staff was also obliquely
reminding the president that this was not a matter of principle, but of
ratings; his bullying tactics had been fine as long as the opinion polls did
not go down.;   ""I assure you that in pit bull mode or pussycat mode (your
choice, as always), I am ready to help,"" Sununu wrote.;   His reference was
sardonic. He had called himself ""a pussycat"" and kept a plush cat on top of
the bookcase in his large West Wing office. But, at close range, it was clear
that the toy animal was really a tiger, and that is exactly how Sununu saw
himself.;   As he stated his credo in his first month in Washington: ""I don't
care if people hate me, as long as they hate me for the right reasons."";  
Bush and Sununu formed a close bond during the 1988 campaign, in the snows of
New Hampshire, when Bush saw his presidential dream slipping away after a
humiliating showing in Iowa.;   ""Whatever they did in Iowa, they will not
reject George Bush in New Hampshire,"" Sununu vowed, as he dragged Bush down
from his elite perch to start what he called a ""see me, touch me, feel me""
campaign. He encouraged Bush to ride a snow plow and wander around a
snow-bound Nashua, shaking hands and offering to help skeptical motorists dig
out their cars.;   On the surface, they seemed like an odd couple -- one tall,
slim and patrician, the other short, pudgy and ethnic; one well-groomed, the
other often slightly disheveled, with his shirt hanging out; one polite and
conciliatory, the other rude and contentious.;    But on matters of politics,
George Bush and John Sununu were not so oddly matched. Sununu embodied the
barbed-wire side of Bush's politics; in many critical ways, he was an accurate
reflection of the way Bush believed things should work.;    During the 1988
campaign, Bush conceded in interviews that he had to do some of the dirty work
in attacking Dukakis; his alternating nice and nasty faces came to be known as
""George the Gentle"" and ""George the Ripper."";   But as president, Bush
preferred to farm out to aides the duties of bully and gunslinger.;   By
making the abrasive former governor of New Hampshire his chief of staff, Bush
hoped that he could keep a certain balance of rough and smooth in his
governing and in his politics.;   In the many times over the past three years
when Sununu helped land the president in the political soup, the Washington
political cognoscenti speculated that Bush was keeping his chief of staff only
out of loyalty to Sununu for helping him win the New Hampshire primary, or
because Bush was too nice to fire anyone, or because he was too indecisive.;  
The truth is more complicated, and Sununu put his finger on it Tuesday. While
Sununu's lack of political skill in dealing with political Washington
eventually cost him his job, and while his fatal flaw may have been in
believing that he was smarter than George Bush, the chief of staff was --
often in an inept way -- trying to fulfill the mandate he had been given by
his boss.;   Sununu was not proclaimed a failure from the start. Indeed, in a
May 1990 cover story called ""Big Bad John Sununu,"" Time magazine said: ""Sununu
has emerged as Bush's most inspired choice for any senior post. His brisk
certainty and willingness to take bold stands complement his risk-averse
boss."";   But in many critical ways, Sununu exacerbated Bush's limitations,
rather than making up for them, and whenever the spotlight swung away from
foreign affairs, it became painfully apparent that this was a White House
without a long-range agenda, without a communications strategy and without
first-rate thinkers in many top jobs.;   As Bush tried to be the ultimate
Washington insider, the chief of staff alienated Congress, Cabinet members,
House Republicans and the press, who disdained Sununu because they believed he
misled them. Sununu even tried to manipulate his boss on occasion, with the
effect that Bush looked weak and waffling.;   When the glow faded from the
Persian Gulf war, and the country began looking to the White House for
leadership on the stagnant economy and the pain of many Americans, the
president once again allowed himself to be guided by Sununu and his closest
White House ally, Richard Darman, the budget chief.;   Sununu and Darman urged
the president to follow his instincts that there was nothing he could do about
the economy and that he should not even try to come up with a drastic plan.;  
Moreover, in the recent fiasco about caps on credit card interest rates,
Sununu did something that is never done in a city that operates strictly on
hierarchy: He blamed the mess on his boss, going on national television to say
Bush had ""ad libbed"" the idea in a speech.;   Bush appeared out of sync with
the country. His approval ratings began dropping again, important Republicans
scorned by Sununu began going on the record with their advice to Bush that he
was being ill served by his chief of staff, and finally and most important,
the president's wife, Barbara, and oldest son, George, turned on Sununu.;  
And so, finally, Bush invited Sununu to resign.;   Now Bush must find another
chief of staff, and another hired hatchet. But this time, his friends say, he
will look for aides who can play those roles while also playing by the rules
of the Washington game.  ",3,"[ 0.34457807  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
29,"
   Putting John Sununu and Ted Kennedy to work on a problem is like putting two scorpions in a bottle. 

   Mr. Sununu, President Bush's chief of staff, is a combative, conservative Republican with a history of ambushing liberal Democrats like Sen. Kennedy. 
Yet Mr. Sununu has just finished going head to head with the Massachusetts senator -- and succeeding in negotiating an agreement on landmark legislation giving sweeping new rights to disabled Americans. 

   Mr. Sununu was typically tough; at one point, he tracked down Sen. Kennedy on a boat for a blunt phone conversation to break a logjam in Senate-White House talks. 
Another White House negotiating session ran triple its scheduled length. 
In the end Mr. Sununu committed the White House's support to the legislation while winning some concessions to minimize the effects on small business -- and a mutually acceptable bill now is whisking through Congress. 

   ""His role on that {legislation} was really impressive, an impressive tour de force,"" Sen. Kennedy says. 
""Once he got involved, we were able to identify the key issues."" 

   As that encounter suggests, Mr. Sununu, the brainy former New Hampshire governor, has begun thriving in Washington even though his brusque style still rubs some people the wrong way. 
His boss, President Bush, is enjoying high public approval, important legislation is moving ahead and Mr. Sununu's relationship with the president is strong. 
Inside the administration, aides say Mr. Sununu has grown more relaxed, more willing to delegate responsibility and surprisingly content to play the role of a detached broker in policy debates. 

   This represents a significant change from the administration's rocky opening months, when some wondered whether the new chief of staff would survive. 
Mr. Sununu was pilloried as John Tower's nomination as defense secretary went down in flames, as an ill-advised idea to charge fees on savings and loan deposits blew up in the administration's face and as the process of filling government jobs bogged down. 

   Many political analysts here believe that Mr. Sununu has moderated his brash style, and that the former governor has adjusted to his White House role. 
But the relentlessly self-confident Mr. Sununu claims that it is Washington that has changed -- that the rest of the city has accustomed itself to the deliberate pace that Mr. Bush chose for tackling thorny problems like the savings-and-loan mess, air pollution and arms talks with the Soviets. 

   ""I think this administration takes pains to work hard to make sure the whole is built up of a lot of pieces done in exactly the right way,"" Mr. Sununu says. 
He likens the Bush style to the process of forming a mosaic by carefully putting in place small parts one at a time. 
""I hope the good feelings that are out there now are reflective of the fact that people are beginning to appreciate that the pieces are coming together,"" he says. 

   Mr. Sununu was a hard-charging governor who ran the New Hampshire statehouse with an iron hand, earning Mr. Bush's trust when he engineered a crucial victory in the 1988 New Hampshire primary. 
But despite the initial fears of some in Washington, Mr. Sununu insists, he has carefully avoided using his powerful new post to be a ""gatekeeper"" who blocks others from the president. 
Indeed, cabinet members and other advisers have enjoyed unusually broad access to the president. 

   Moreover, Mr. Sununu is proving more adept than expected at reining in his personal views and instead brokering compromises among other advisers. 
In the last stages of preparing Mr. Bush's mammoth Clean Air Act proposals, for instance, Mr. Sununu called together Environmental Protection Agency chief William Reilly and White House staffers for a marathon meeting to craft a compromise settling a dispute over regulations to cut auto emissions. 

   Mr. Reilly recalls that in a private chat later, Mr. Sununu, an engineer in his own right, disclosed that he still harbored reservations about one small piece of the bill but had chosen not to push his personal view. 
""We're not preparing this legislation for you or for me. 
It's for him {Mr. 
Bush},"" Mr. Sununu explained. 
Adds Mr. Reilly: ""Contrary to what some people had feared, that he would simply impose his own view because he's a strong man, I don't have the sense that he did that."" 

   Despite such deft internal maneuvering, though, some Democrats and Republicans alike suspect Mr. Sununu, with his combative style, still may be accumulating too many enemies for his own good. 
This was particularly evident during the Tower debacle, when Mr. Sununu privately lashed out at Sam Nunn, the powerful chairman of the Senate Armed Services Committee who led the fight against Sen. Tower, threatening to sour the administration's relations with this critical lawmaker. 

   And although the White House chief of staff has toned down since that early encounter, in a recent meeting with GOP House members, Mr. Sununu suggested that Republicans attack a crime package proposed by Democratic Sen. Joseph Biden of Delaware -- chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee -- as ""mostly plagiarism,"" because it allegedly stole ideas from Mr. Bush's plans. 
The charge offended Sen. Biden, whose presidential campaign last year collapsed amid charges that he had plagiarized speeches. 
The senator was particularly rankled because he carefully backed up his crime plan with a 50-page appendix crediting others with many of the ideas. 

   Mr. Sununu's charges reportedly led to an acrimonious telephone confrontation between the two men, who refuse to discuss the episode. 
But Sen. Biden does say that when Mr. Sununu has ""substantive differences"" with someone, ""the inclination is to respond with personal attacks -- which is bush league, no pun intended. 
It surprised me."" 

   Mr. Sununu also rankled some Republican congressional leaders by dressing them down at a recent White House meeting for failing to properly support Mr. Bush's programs. 
And a group of conservative supporters was stunned at another meeting when one conservative began raising a concern about personnel issues, only to be cut short by Mr. Sununu, who snapped: ""Get your facts straight."" 

   Mr. Sununu suggests that sometimes when he knocks heads he does so because it's part of the job of being the top aide to a president who doesn't like to knock heads himself. 
""There are natural obligations that I have to be willing to carry out,"" he says. 
""It goes with the territory."" 

   One group Mr. Sununu has generally succeeded in pleasing is conservatives, who view him as their champion in a generally moderate White House. 
Mr. Sununu does appear ready to move in when he thinks conservative principles aren't being followed adequately. 
When the Supreme Court rendered its controversial decision curbing abortion rights, for instance, lower-ranking staffers recommended that the White House avoid commenting on the politically explosive decision. 
But Mr. Sununu rejected that advice, ordered up a lengthy statement reiterating Mr. Bush's opposition to abortion, then read the statement personally to reporters. 

   And whatever his relations with others, Mr. Sununu's most important relationship -- the one with President Bush -- appears sturdy. 
Mr. Sununu is confident enough, for example, to weigh in on foreign-policy as well as domestic issues. 
He acknowledges arguing that Mr. Bush should propose even deeper cuts in U.S. and Soviet conventional forces than those he ultimately proposed this spring. 

   And Mr. Sununu is comfortable enough with Mr. Bush to pull an occasional practical joke. 
The other day, Mr. Sununu and two other advisers were sitting in front of Mr. Bush's desk waiting for the president. 
It occurred to Mr. Sununu that the sight of three aides staring at an empty presidential chair was reminiscent of the Doonesbury cartoon strip that lampoons Mr. Bush by portraying him as a transparent wisp of air. 
So he had a White House photographer snap a shot of the scene, later inscribed the picture accordingly and gave it to Mr. Bush -- who was so amused he immediately hurried to the White House press room to show it off. 

",3,"[ 0.18614891  0.00564389  0.17934814 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
30,"
   In response to questions about Mr. Sununu's recent shift
to use of corporate jets in the wake of restrictions imposed
last month on his use of government planes, the White House
released the list of five jets the chief of staff has used
for travel to fund-raisers.
   The identity of owners of two of the jets already had been
publicized, and the others are not large national
corporations. White House counsel C. Boyden Gray's office
approved all the travel in advance, and he vetoed some
suggested corporate jets because of potential conflicts of
interest, White House officials said.
   Use of corporate jets for political travel is legal
provided the corporation is reimbursed for providing the ride
or reports the travel as an ""in-kind"" political contribution.
Reimbursement for Mr. Sununu's travel often is made by the
host of the political fund-raiser he is attending.
   The White House list said that on May 20 Mr. Sununu used a
corporate jet provided by Donald Bryant, a benefits and
insurance executive, to travel to a St. Louis fund-raiser for
Missouri Gov. John Ashcroft. On June 7, Mr. Sununu used a jet
provided by Fiber Materials Inc. of Biddeford, Maine, to
travel to a fund-raiser for the Maine Republican party.
   Mr. Sununu used a jet provided by three individual owners
-- identified by the White House as Howard Bender, Martin
Bender and John Mason -- to travel to a Chicago fund-raiser
June 11. The next day, as previously reported, Mr. Sununu
used a jet provided by Beneficial Corp., a financial
management and planning concern, to return from a fund-raiser
for the New Jersey state party. He had taken his White House
limousine to reach nearby New York to attend a stamp auction
before that event.
   And, as also previously disclosed, Mr. Sununu used a jet
provided by KVI, an Iowa insurance brokerage firm, to travel
Tuesday to a fund-raiser in Des Moines.
   Mr. Sununu has resorted to regular use of corporate planes
for political travel in the wake of controversy over his
heavy use of costly government aircraft for political and
personal travel in the past two years. White House spokesman
Marlin Fitzwater said that use of corporate planes for
political purposes is a ""well-established practice"" that Mr.
Sununu will continue.
   President Bush rose to the defense of his embattled chief
of staff, while also making clear he is chagrined about the
travel controversy. The president said that Mr. Sununu is
""doing a first-class job"" and that there is a ""piling-on
syndrome"" feeding the publicity about his travel.
   But Mr. Bush, who spoke to reporters before a White House
meeting as Mr. Sununu sat nearby, also seemed to suggest that
he would like his chief of staff to avoid creating new travel
controversies. ""I think when you have an appearance problem,
I think all of us would agree you want to try to avoid it as
much as possible, and I think all of us have,"" he said.
",3,"[ 0.19102953  0.01222728  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
31,"
   Even among Democrats, 49% didn't think he should resign,
while 42% thought he should.
   That hardly means Mr. Sununu is out of the woods, of
course. Though President Bush says Mr. Sununu's job is safe
for now, the ruckus over the chief of staff's extensive use
of government and corporate jets and cars has brought to the
surface a host of Sununu enemies who are likely to keep
gunning for his demise.
   And while voters aren't clamoring for Mr. Sununu's head,
they have formed a more negative impression of him. The
survey found that 41% of voters have a negative view of the
chief of staff, while just 10% said they have positive
feelings. Last October, the view wasn't so clearly negative.
Then, just 20% said they had negative feelings about Mr.
Sununu, while 18% reported positive feelings.
   The Journal/NBC poll was conducted jointly by Democratic
pollster Peter Hart and Republican pollster Robert Teeter.
They canvassed 1,006 registered voters by telephone from last
Saturday through Tuesday, a period when the latest flap over
Mr. Sununu's failure to inform the White House counsel's
office accurately about the procurement of a corporate jet he
used to attend a Chicago fund-raiser was in full swing.
   The poll's findings are likely to fuel arguments by Mr.
Sununu's supporters that the controversy over his travel
isn't being taken as seriously in the country at large as it
is inside Washington.
   Mr. Sununu admitted that he made mistakes in using
government planes and his White House car for personal and
political business, and he has adopted a low profile. He
appears to be calculating that he can ride out the storm.
   The criticism isn't likely to stop, though. Enemies of the
combative Mr. Sununu are trying to capitalize on his weakened
position to hurt him, largely through anonymous criticisms
and attacks. Some administration aides and Republican
strategists are arguing, for instance, that he now is a clear
political liability and should be pushed aside before Mr.
Bush's re-election campaign gets into full swing.
   There also is quiet lobbying against Mr. Sununu by
Israel's supporters, who long have been suspicious of him
because of his links to Arab-American groups and his refusal
as governor of New Hampshire to endorse a proclamation
condemning a United Nations vote equating Zionism with
racism. Israel backers, for instance, have been circulating a
1988 proclamation he signed as governor honoring the crew of
the Liberty, a U.S. ship attacked by Israeli forces under
murky circumstances during the 1967 Arab-Israeli war.
",3,"[ 0.21961079  0.01581377  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
32,"
   But Mr. Sununu's removal may not solve the president's
immediate problems. Instead, it could exacerbate the
criticism from the right, where conservatives are
increasingly expressing their doubts about the president, and
where his renomination is under challenge. Moreover, Mr.
Sununu's ouster is unlikely to result in any major changes in
Mr. Bush's economic policies, which have attracted much
criticism recently.
   The nature of the final year of Mr. Bush's first term now
hinges on whom he picks to be his White House chief of staff
and whom he chooses to run his re-election campaign. One
high-ranking official said Transportation Secretary Samuel
Skinner is almost certain to get one of those two jobs --
probably the chief of staff position. Mr. Sununu previously
was offered the opportunity to switch jobs with Mr. Skinner,
administration officials say, but turned it down.
   Mr. Skinner has the advantage of an easy working
relationship with Mr. Bush and has been a respected political
adviser on issues beyond his transportation portfolio. He has
also developed a strong relationship with Vice President Dan
Quayle. Moreover, while Mr. Bush is under attack for lack of
attention to domestic policy, Mr. Skinner can claim credit
for shepherding major highway and mass transit legislation
through Congress.
   But conservatives complain Mr. Skinner is a pragmatist in
Mr. Bush's mold rather than a true conservative. In his first
year in office, for example, he angered conservatives by
declining to use his authority to relax fuel economy
standards for autos; more recently, he has vigorously fought
any tightening of those standards. Moreover, top Republicans
on Capitol Hill, as well as some administration officials,
say Mr. Skinner has a penchant for abrasiveness, although he
is hardly Mr. Sununu's equal on that score.
   Another person mentioned for the chief of staff post is
Defense Secretary Dick Cheney. Many prominent Republican
politicians as well as businessmen would love to see him get
the job. The defense secretary is widely credited for his
performance during the Persian Gulf War and is
well-remembered for his stint as chief of staff under Gerald
Ford a decade and a half ago. But the conservative defense
secretary has said he wouldn't take the job again under any
circumstances.
   Former Rep. Bill Frenzel, a close friend of the
president's, is also mentioned as a possible choice. And GOP
Sen. Nancy Kassebaum of Kansas called the president aboard
Air Force One yesterday and urged that Carla Hills, the U.S.
trade representative, be given the job.
   Mr. Sununu will leave his current post Dec. 15 and become
a special presidential counselor with cabinet rank until
March 1.
   The end of Mr. Sununu's reign at the White House came
without the blustery self-confidence that was the mark of the
governor's suzerainty. In the past several days the chief of
staff, who sometimes seemed to regard members of Congress as
his staff, and who regularly dismissed suggestions from
Republican political strategists, became a suitor rather than
an aggressor. He was almost desperately casting around for
support in the official Washington circles that he
disregarded only a few weeks ago.
   By the time he and the president agreed on his departure,
Mr. Sununu, who made self-confidence a badge of honor, was
despondent. Hours earlier, he had told confidantes that his
departure was assured. But even as he made telephone calls
around the country he was still seeking signs of support,
often from those he had spurned in office.
   The Sununu saga lasted so long in part because of his
survival instincts -- honed as much in the halls of academe
while a professor at Tufts University as in the austere state
house on a Concord hill. The former governor's extended
tenure also reflected the president's unwillingness to
dismiss people who have served him with loyalty. It was,
after all, Mr. Sununu who salvaged Mr. Bush's flagging GOP
nomination struggle in 1988, when he assembled an impressive
political organization that beat back both Sen. Robert Dole
of Kansas and the conventional political wisdom in the New
Hampshire primary.
   But while Mr. Sununu's resignation may have been
personally painful for Mr. Bush, the president apparently
decided it had become necessary to respond to mounting
criticism from both Democrats and Republicans for his
administration's handling of the country's economic problems,
and to increasing disquiet from his political advisers who
were concerned about his slippage in public opinion polls.
   Nevertheless, administration officials say it's unlikely
Mr. Sununu's departure will mean major changes in economic
strategy. Nor is it likely to please the White House's
conservative critics, who frequently relied on Mr. Sununu to
push their causes. Two influential GOP lawmakers, Rep. Henry
Hyde of Illinois and Rep. Vin Weber of Minnesota, even took
the unusual step of calling a news conference yesterday to
voice their support for him.
   But despite Mr. Sununu's ties to conservatives, he had in
recent months abandoned their economic agenda. One
administration official noted that Mr. Sununu was among those
who argued most strongly against reopening the fight over a
capital gains tax cut this year; he argued it would subject
Mr. Bush to unnecessary and unproductive political heat.
   Mr. Sununu, said the official, ""is really more of a
pragmatist."" Another administration official, however, said
Mr. Sununu's departure may force Mr. Bush to get more
involved in economic issues. Mr. Sununu had sometimes denied
access to officials who wished to talk to the president about
economic and domestic issues.
   One area where Mr. Sununu's influence was clearly felt was
abortion, where he held the administration to a stringent
antiabortion stance. Anti-abortion groups were among the
first to express regret over Mr. Sununu's departure.
   According to several adminstration officials, Mr. Sununu
also encouraged Mr. Bush to take a firm position on issues
where Mr. Bush had no strong views, such as vetoing
appropriations bills for the District of Columbia that
allowed it to use its own, locally generated funds for
abortions for poor women.
   As a result, Mr. Sununu became a favorite of many social
conservatives who distrusted Mr. Bush's roots in the moderate
wing of his party. His departure is likely to increase their
suspicions, unless Mr. Bush names a successor who is viewed
as a conservative.
   Mr. Sununu began to face rough political waters a year ago
when, as one of Mr. Bush's chief negotiators on the deficit
reduction agreement, he bruised congressional egos from both
political parties with heavy-handed lobbying and what many
saw as disregard for their stature as elected
representatives. Earlier this year he made headlines again
when his extensive use of government airplanes for political
and personal travel became public.
   The Sununu saga ended with a handwritten note to Mr. Bush
on a trip that Mr. Sununu knew would seal his fate.
   The White House said the chief of staff had offered to
resign in the Oval Office Monday, but the matter apparently
wasn't resolved. Mr. Sununu, according to associates close to
him, planned to confront the president on his trip yesterday,
asking him for an expression of 100% support to be made both
privately and to the White House press corps when Air Force
One returned to Washington.
   He knew that without that expression of full support, he
would have to depart.
   The president had already been searching for a way to ease
Mr. Sununu out of his post gracefully. That effort, however,
had faced formidable obstacles. The former governor was cool
to the idea of accepting a cabinet position even in the early
days of the Bush transition, and indicated that such a move
would be unacceptable now.
   At the same time, Republican political strategists
calculated that Mr. Sununu would be a liability in the
national campaign structure because of an abrasive operating
style that had alienated longtime Bush allies. And the
suggestion of dispatching him back home to New Hampshire to
run the re-election campaign was blocked when Mr. Bush
decided to have his campaign there run by former GOP Gov.
Hugh Gregg and his son, current Gov. Judd Gregg, both of whom
regard Mr. Sununu with suspicion.
   The Greggs, in fact, scheduled a meeting for this evening
in the governor's mansion to plan strategy for the New
Hampshire primary, where Mr. Bush faces a challenge from
conservative columnist Pat Buchanan. ""It's a Gregg
operation,"" said a leading New Hampshire Republican.
   The announcement of Mr. Sununu's departure came in
Meridian, Miss., where the White House distributed
photocopies of the handwritten resignation letter.
Presidential spokesman Marlin Fitzwater didn't answer
reporters' questions.
   In his letter, Mr. Sununu hailed the ""chemistry,
friendship, caring and irreverence"" he encountered during his
tenure in the Oval Office.
   But the letter also contained elements of the traits that
led to his downfall. He seemed to indicate that Mr. Bush's
wishes had dictated the combative style that made him so many
enemies in Washington. He said he remained ""ready to help . .
. in pit bull mode or pussycat mode (your choice, as
always).""
   The comment echoed the latest episode that had called Mr.
Sununu's effectiveness into question. Late last month, in a
television interview, Mr. Sununu suggested that President
Bush had erred by ad-libbing into a speech his view that
banks should lower credit-card interest rates. The result was
that a Republican lawmaker, Sen. Alfonse D'Amato of New York,
swiftly introduced legislation that caused a furor in
financial markets.
   Shortly before boarding the presidential aircraft in
Mississippi, Mr. Sununu told reporters that he ""knew the
rules of the game when he came to town."" But his fall
yesterday reflected his ignorance of those rules and his
refusal to abide by them.
   Mr. Sununu, who plans to go into business to improve upon
his government salary, also obliquely noted the reputation
that has dogged his tenure: ""I think you know that the
responsibility and authority (contrary to the legends out
there) never meant as much to me as the chance to assist you
to be (and to be recognized) a great President.""
   In his reply, Mr. Bush said he accepted Mr. Sununu's
resignation ""with reluctance, regret and a sense of personal
loss.""
   ---
   John Harwood contributed to this article.
",3,"[ 0.29734463  0.00519061  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
33,"
   On the untouched expanse of the Arctic icecap it seemed a mirage
_ preposterous, incredible: ski tracks.
   Will Steger, leading the first unsupported dogsled trek to the
North Pole since Adm. Robert Peary's, saw the unmistakable evidence
of cross-country skis. He knew they could only be those of
Jean-Louis Etienne, a Frenchman who was about to become the first
man to ski alone to the pole.
   It was in April 1986, in a tent on the monotonous frozen
landscape, that the two adventurers sipped tea and dreamed of their
next quest: a multinational trek across Antarctica. After reaching
their destination, they began planning the Trans-Antarctica
Expedition, which is to begin Aug. 1.
   Their previous exploits were for the sheer joy of pitting man
against nature. This one would do that and more: draw attention to
threats against nature and to the need for international
cooperation in protecting Antarctica.
   Steger and Etienne enlisted scientists and explorers from the
Soviet Union, China, Japan and Great Britain for a seven-month,
4,000-mile trip. Others have crossed Antarctica on snowmobiles and
giant snow tractors, but this will be the first unmechanized
attempt.
   Victor Boyarsky of the Soviet Arctic and Antarctic Research
Institute, a popular explorer and veteran of polar travel, is a
co-leader. The other members of the team are glaciologist Qin Dahe
of China; Geoff Somers, who has spent 42 months in Antarctica with
the British Antarctic Survey; and Keizo Funatsu of Japan, a former
economist who turned to dog-sledding and adventure.
   Somers will plot the trek's course; Funatsu is in charge of the
dogs.
   Steger, who in the past has picked his own teams, says he is
honored that the Soviet Union and China will be sending official
representatives. The four members from Western nations are not
formally backed by their governments.
   Steger recalled that when he asked if Boyarsky spoke English, a
Soviet official replied: ``In one year, he will speak English very
well.''
   ``A real interesting diplomatic challenge,'' Steger called it.
   Other international support includes the use of China's Great
Wall Station on King George Island as a staging point. New
Zealanders stationed at the Scott McArdle base donated 12 dogs
whose lineage can be traced to dogs owned by polar explorer Richard
Byrd. The Soviet Union provided an icebreaker to transport 15 tons
of food for the men and 36 dogs; the provisions were cached on the
route in November. The USSR also plans to send a military cargo
plane to pick up the team from its rendezvous at Steger's Minnesota
camp; the U.S. State Department, while not officially sanctioning
the trek, is expected to let the plane land.
   After refueling in Cuba, the team will fly to the Great Wall
Base, about 600 miles south of the tip of South America. The
expedition, which will set out in the middle of the Austral winter,
will at first follow known landmarks.
   ``We'll have maps for the first 1,500 miles. The last 2,500
miles there is virtually nothing. It's flat. There's nothing to
map,'' Steger said.
   They'll cross the Ellsworth Mountains and skirt Mt. Vinson, the
continent's highest spot at 16,860 feet. They'll visit three
American bases _ Palmer, Siple and Amundsen-Scott at the South
Pole, where they plan to celebrate Christmas.
   The next dot of civilization they'll aim for is the Soviet base
at Vostok, near the magnetic south pole. Vostok, the coldest place
on Earth, will serve as a base for a French documentary film crew
that will travel with the expedition for three weeks, and for the
team's pilot.
   By March, the trekkers should reach the Soviet base of Mirnyy on
the east coast, also known as Queen Mary Coast, ending the longest
possible traverse.
   They'll be picked up by the expedition ship, built in France
with a special aluminum hull designed to pop up and settle intact
on top of the ice rather than be trapped and crushed.
   So far, about 45 nations have signed television contracts with
the expedition. ABC has bought exclusive U.S. TV rights. ``We want
the world to know much, much more about Antarctica after our
expedition than it did before we set out,'' Steger said.
   The continent is roughly the shape of a bottle cap. It rises
sharply at the perimeter, then flattens out in a vast, high plateau
at an average elevation of 9,500 feet. Antarctica's 5.4 million
square miles is more than China and India combined. It has no
indigenous people, and wildlife is confined to the coast.
   A treaty signed in 1959 by a dozen nations, with additional
signatories in subsequent years, put all territorial claims on
Antarctica on hold, banned military activity and established
freedom of scientific inquiry.
   But many countries now have designs on the land for strategic,
political and even economic reasons _ some expect to find oil, coal
and mineral deposits under the ice. Some want to see the continent
cut into pie-shaped wedges, but Steger wants the people of the
world to demand that it be protected, intact.
   ``It sounds like a very lofty goal, but Antarctica is a going to
play a very important role in the future of the planet,'' he said.
   Planetary warming of just a few degrees could melt the polar ice
caps, raising sea level and flooding coastal areas, but Steger said
it's simplistic to worry about submerged cities. With 85 percent of
the planet's fresh water stored in the snow and ice of Antarctica,
a thaw would reduce the salinity of the oceans, change ocean
currents and wreak havoc with weather patterns.
   The other environmental nightmare awakening interest in
Antarctica is the discovery of a giant hole in the ozone layer
directly over the continent. Ozone screens the planet from excess
ultraviolet radiation.
   Scientists predict continued ozone depletion will increase skin
cancer, but such thinking is ``myopic,'' Steger said. Most
significantly, increased solar radiation could disrupt the
reproduction cycles of plankton, the microscopic oceanic plants and
animals that are the basis of the global food chain.
   These ominous changes are most apparent in Antarctica, making it
``like a canary in a mine,'' Steger said.
   The team will be under the ozone hole for about 40 days and 500
miles as they cross a 13,000-foot high plateau known as the Area of
Inaccessibility. It's the worst possible place on earth for
ultraviolet exposure.
   The team will carry a monitor and Boyarsky will record ozone
levels at regular intervals, the first cross-section of ozone
across the continent.
   Qin will take snow and ice samples all the way across
Antarctica, recording temperatures and oxygen content for a
geological history of the icecap.
   Etienne, a physician, will monitor cholesterol levels of the
team members, who will rely on the high-fat diet typical of
cultures in cold regions.
   But the experiments that can be done along the way are limited
by time and weight. The trekkers plan to travel 30 miles a day on
cross-country skis, and the three dogsleds can carry no more than
900 pounds of gear.
   Steger admits they won't attempt ``pure science'' but he hopes
the findings will contribute to the knowledge of this frontier.
``We need international cooperation. Solutions to environmental
problems must be global.''
",4,"[ 0.37879209  0.00681903  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
34,"
   Thirty-nine nations meet in Paris this week on
the controversial future of Antarctica. An AP correspondent who has
been to the disputed continent reports on what is at stake.
",4,"[ 0.13134313  0.07566225  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
35,"
   U.S. tour operators are planning to send a
record 4,000 or more travelers to Antarctica, prompting calls for
strict government regulation to protect penguins, other wildlife
and the very fate of the frozen continent.
   ``The number of tourists visiting Antarctica has more than
tripled in the past five years,'' said Bruce Manheim, a Washington
activist of the Environmental Defense Fund who calls existing
controls inadequate.
   Antarctica has become a ``hot'' travel destination for the
1990s, beckoning older Americans seeking more adventure than Europe
and hoping to see a fragile frontierland visited by only a
privileged few in their youth.
   They are fueling fresh growth in the adventure travel industry,
an estimated $1.3 billion-a-year phenomenon.
   About 800 American tourists traveled to Antarctica in 1988,
3,000 in 1989, and tour operators expect at least 4,000 in the
December-February summer season. Manheim says it could reach 5,000.
   ``There's clearly a trend toward these type of expeditionary
visits to remote places in the world,'' said Manheim.
   He filed an appeal Tuesday with the government urging more
regulation.
   ``We are not trying to prohibit tourists from going to
Antarctica, we just think tourism is something that has to be
regulated carefully,'' he said.
   Concern began mounting after the January 1989 grounding of the
Argentine naval ship Bahia Paraiso in which an estimated 175,000
gallons leaked into marine habitats, killing seals, penguins and
other marine life. The vessel remains at the site off Palmer
Station with some oil in its tanks.
   Particularly worrisome to critics are the plans of Ocean Cruise
Lines of Fort Lauderdale to send the largest cruise ship in years
to Antarctica, the 460-passenger Ocean Princess.
   Rates begin at $3,895 per person for a double-occupancy cabin on
its three wine-and-caviar cruises, which are selling briskly. The
first round trip from Buenos Aires, Argentina, begins Dec. 22.
   Manheim's appeal is urging the government to place strict
controls on helicopter flights near wildlife sites, guidelines on
tourist observation of penguins and seals, and coordination of
cruise ship visits to breeding grounds.
   He said ships had made repeated tourist visits to the same
wildlife sites, disrupting the breeding of seals, penguins and
other birds.
   ``A year after Antarctica's most significant environmental
disaster, we still don't have regulations to prevent similar
catastrophes,'' said Manheim.
   The U.S. government responds that effective regulations are
already in place.
   ``We have tried, and we believed we have dealt succesfully with
the explosion of Antarctica tourism,'' said Jack Talmadge of the
National Science Foundation, which regulates U.S. activities in
Antarctica.
   Talmadge said the NSF has issued tourist regulations,
established a mechanism for assessing fines for violations and
taken steps to limit visits to U.S. research stations.
   He said the tour operators are also cooperating with the NSF to
minimize the impact of tourism, including giving advance notice of
ship visits.
   Although 16 nations fly flags in Antactica and seven claim
slices of it, no nation holds title to the continent, which is
larger than the United States and Mexico combined.
   Military flights and small ships carrying about 100 tourists
have been frequent modes of travel to Antarctica since the first
tourists visited in 1958.
   Now, the Chilean government has opened a spartan hotel at its
Teniente Marsh Station on King George island, and LanChile airlines
began commercial flights to that Antarctic stop last year.
   Australian entrepreneurs have proposed a five-story hotel,
airstrip and hovercraft dock. The Canada-based Adventure Network
currently flies tourists to one South Pole station.
   But the bulk of the tourists are Americans brought in by
U.S.-based operators. Conservationists say the United States should
therefore take the lead in adopting a model regulatory policy.
   ``Antarctica tourism originates almost exclusively in the United
States, and therefore we have the responsibility to regulate our
tourism if we are to push for regulation at an international
level,'' said Manheim.
   Operators of the Ocean Cruise Lines said there is no cause for
alarm.
   ``The tourist visiting Antarctica is a determined
environmentalist, an avid lover of wildlife, and I can assure you
that no tourist _ not one _ has hurt or killed a bird or animal,''
said Lars Eric Lindblad, an Antarctic travel pioneer who will
lecture aboard the Ocean Princess.
   James Barnes, with Friends of the Earth in Washington, concludes
that the travelers may leave their footprints, but they often
return home more committed environmentalists _ ``Ambassadors of
Antarctica.''
   Nonetheless, he said, ``The scale of these activities is growing
at such a pace that it does provide cause for concern.''
",4,"[ 0.44516077  0.00915863  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
36,"

Britain and the United States have kept their hopes of issuing mining licenses 
in the Antarctic alive by refusing to accept proposals to turn the continent 
into a wildlife reserve. 


Twelve days of talks here among the 39 Antarctic Treaty nations, discussions 
dominated by the mining issue, broke up Friday night with a wide division 
between the pro- and anti-mining nations. 


Australia and France had proposed that Antarctica be turned into a wilderness 
park and that the Minerals Convention of 1988, which took six years to 
negotiate, be scrapped. 


Britain and the United States refused to discuss this proposal and insisted 
that the conference should talk about implementing the convention and discuss 
clauses that would apportion liability in the case of mining pollution. The 
Minerals Convention creates a framework for mining under strict environmental 
guidelines. 


At the end of the conference, it was decided to hold another two meetings in 
Chile next year. One would discuss comprehensive environmental issues for the 
Antarctic and the second would talk about accident liability clauses for 
minerals. 


Both sides refused to compromise but were aware that walking out of the meeting 
would have destroyed the Antarctic Treaty system that has controlled the region 
for 30 years, prevented armed conflict and promoted scientific cooperation. 


John Heap, head of Britain's delegation, said London is not prepared to discuss 
the wilderness park idea if it excludes all mining. 


""The last great wilderness is the size of the United States and Europe put 
together,"" Heap said. ""Is it inevitable that a mine site somewhere in 
Antarctica would despoil all Antarctica? I don't believe it is."" 


Chief U.S. representative Tucker Scully said that the meeting had agreed on 
other urgent practical steps to protect the environment, including tighter 
rules on marine pollution and waste disposal. 


Litter from the 9,000 scientists stationed on the icecap during the summer, 
plus an estimated 3,000 tourists each year, has already started to pollute the 
coasts where both people and wildlife cluster. 


French officials said the conference had been a failure because Britain and the 
United States had refused to discuss their proposals. 


Jim Barnes, from the Antarctic and Southern Ocean Coalition, representing 300 
environmental organizations, said that the wilderness park proposals were still 
on the table, something he said ""gives us more time to push our case."" 


""The tide is running our way,"" Barnes said. ""We believe the minerals regime 
will never be implemented now, although it may take a long time to kill."" 

",4,"[ 0.          0.          0.02444821 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
37,"

The United States risks losing an unusual opportunity to assert global 
leadership in protecting Antarctica, Sen. Albert Gore (D-Tenn.) said Thursday 
on the eve of an international conference on the future of the frozen 
continent. 


Gore spoke at a news conference sponsored by the Alliance for Antarctica, a 
coalition of environmental groups. It is calling on the United States and other 
nations participating in the conference, which begins Monday in Chile, to 
designate Antarctica as a world science park. 


Rep. Bruce Vento (D-Minn.), chairman of the House Interior subcommittee on 
parks and public land, said he fears that recurring degradation has made 
Antarctica ""an environmental time bomb ready to explode."" 


""We have no time for half-measures if America is to be the world's leader in 
protecting Antarctica,"" Vento said. 


Congressional legislation calling for preservation of Antarctica is awaiting 
President Bush's signature, but there has been speculation that the Interior 
Department might urge Bush to veto the measure. The legislation for the first 
time would apply U.S. environmental protection laws to any activity in 
Antarctica sponsored by an agency of the U.S. government. It also would 
prohibit U.S. exploration or development of minerals in Antarctica. 


The United States ""should be leading the way and trying to protect the island 
instead of trying to protect the mineral convention,"" said Rep. Wayne Owens 
(D-Utah), who introduced the measure in the House. Gore was its Senate sponsor. 


The focus of a dispute between Congress and the State Department is the 
ratification of the Convention on the Regulation of Antarctic Mineral Resources 
Activities, on which the State Department has worked for six years. 


The convention, signed two years ago but not ratified by 17 of 20 nations, 
would regulate mineral exploration but not ban it, as the congressional action 
would. The French and Australian governments are now against the accord, saying 
that no international agreement that would endorse even strictly regulated 
exploitation of Antarctic mineral resources could be acceptable to either 
government. If all 20 nations do not ratify the pact, it is dead. 


Mining in the Antarctic is not compatible with the protection of the 
continent's fragile environment, many environmentalists contend. French 
oceanologist Jacques Cousteau, in an interview with the New York Times last 
year, declared that an oil spill in the Antarctic could damage the food chain 
for decades and affect the entire hemisphere. 


But Tucker Scully, director of the office of ocean affairs at the State 
Department and the lead U.S. negotiator for Antarctic issues, disagreed with 
the hands-off approach to the continent. ""Creating a world park is to stick 
one's head in the sand,"" he said. 


According to environmentalists, Antarctica is being marred by air pollution and 
tourist ships and threatened by mining. They also believe that the continent is 
being damaged by scientists who come to unlock its mysteries. They burn their 
garbage in pits and dump their junk in a landfill by the sea, they charge. 


""We treated Antarctica like a frontier town,"" said R. N. Andersen, the National 
Science Foundation's deputy general counsel. Congress has funded a five-year, 
$30-million program to clean up the Antarctic environment. More than 76 
scientific projects are now under way on the continent. 


During the peak summer months, about 4,000 people inhabit Antarctica, and 
tourism is increasing rapidly. Last year, about 3,000 people paid more than 
$10,000 each to photograph penguins and view the vast sweeps of ice and rock. 

",4,"[ 0.          0.          0.02022521 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
38,"     At a just-concluded session in Madrid, Spain, 39 nations reached a
tentative compromise on updating the Antarctica Treaty.;    Washington,
dragging its feet all the way, needs steady pressure to accept the compromise.
While other nations -- including Japan, Germany and New Zealand -- pushed for
a permanent ban on commercial exploitation, U.S. and British delegates held
out for a short moratorium.;    Public pressure at home likely nudged the
holdouts to accept a 50-year moratorium on mining and mineral exploration. The
draft specifies that, when the moratorium expires, it may be lifted only with
approval of two-thirds of the signatories.;    Next month, the original
Antarctica Treaty will celebrate its 30th anniversary. What better way to
honor a model international agreement than to continue its tradition of
preserving Antarctica for scientific research, and keeping it off-limits to
military bases, commercial development and mining.;    Antarctica is as
pristine as environments come these days. With a climate harsher than the
Arctic's, it has less capacity for absorbing intervention and abuse.;    The
Earth endows us with a wealth worth vastly more than the artificial commodity
value of its resources. It may turn out that preserving Antarctica will reap
humankind more benefits than the yield from digging up and selling off all its
gold, silver and oil.  ",4,"[ 0.4012899  0.         0.        ...,  0.         0.         0.       ]"
39,"
   There is no escape. Fortunately for the furry creatures,
Dr. Testa is interested in seal science, not seal skins.
Today he's after urine samples, using a metal tube attached
to a stick. Soon he plans to bar-code the animals,
supermarket-style, with plastic tags on their flippers.
   Dr. Testa, a bearded University of Alaska biologist, is
trying to learn why so many Antarctic seals starve every few
years. Maybe El Nino, an Equatorial storm system, alters
Antarctic currents, he muses, carrying the silverfish that
the seals feast on out of reach. ""There's no mechanism that
can account for this,"" he says.
   What drives Dr. Testa and hundreds of other researchers to
Antarctica each year is the hope of discovering a hidden
truth about the planet. It's a unique laboratory.
   Antarctic science is science of the extremes. A continent
bigger than America, covered in ice more than a mile thick,
Antarctica is isolated by winds and currents that make it the
coldest, driest place on Earth. It is where scientists
discovered the ozone hole over the Earth in 1985, and where
they now hunt for clues to everything from global warming to
cosmic rays.
   This is the story of three groups of scientific sleuths in
Antarctica: biologists studying the antifreeze systems of
fish; glaciologists examining whether the West Antarctic ice
sheet will break apart and flood the world; and cosmologists
searching for the birth of galaxies.
                                                                                                       

   A Fish Story
                                                                                                       

   If it's so cold in Antarctica, why don't the fish freeze?
   Arthur DeVries has wondered why since his first visit here
in 1961. Seawater under the Ross Ice Shelf ranges from 28
degrees to 29.5 degrees -- cold enough to freeze most fish as
hard as Mrs. Pauls's. (The water doesn't freeze at 32 degrees
because salt and pressure lowers its freezing point.) The
fish he hooked beneath the ice swam contentedly in tanks
filled with frigid water, but died when the water was warmed.
He had found his life's work.
   Over the next seven years the biologist returned
repeatedly to Antarctica. He experimented with a family of
ugly gray and brown fish, called ""notothenioidei,"" that
thrive in the waters here. After dissecting hundreds of them
and analyzing their blood, he learned they produce an
antifreeze molecule that lowers their freezing point just
enough to survive. ""They live at the edge of freezing,"" he
says.
   Now 52, with a graying walrus mustache and walrus girth,
Dr. DeVries is one of the last of the old Antarctic hands
still conducting research ""on the ice,"" as the place is
called here.
   Dr. DeVries became a pioneer in cryobiology -- the study
of the effects of extremely low temperatures on living
things. He and his colleagues found a half-dozen different
fish that produce antifreeze. A former grad student, Jack
Duman of Notre Dame, found antifreeze proteins in Midwestern
beetles, spiders and dandelions. Cryobiologists dream of
using antifreeze to preserve hearts for transplants, or
making freeze-resistant orange groves.
   Among the results of Dr. DeVries's yearly three-month
stints here are two divorces. His third wife, biologist Chris
Cheng, collaborates with him at their base at the University
of Illinois, trying to isolate the fish gene that makes
antifreeze proteins.
   Dr. DeVries calculates that fish antifreeze is 200 times
more effective than an equal amount of Prestone, but he can't
figure out why. Somehow, the antifreeze binds to tiny ice
crystals that the fish swallow as they swim.
   One sunny afternoon in November, Dr. DeVries and Joseph
Eastman, a longtime associate who teaches at Miami University
in Ohio, fish through a hole in the ice. That night, they
dissect a few dozen small ""notothenioidei"" and place their
organs in test tubes filled with seawater. They want to see
if ice collects in fish organs, and if it does, how the
organs and antifreeze keep the ice in check.
   The next afternoon at McMurdo's aquarium, a blue metal
shack with six big holding tanks, Dr. DeVries takes a small
fish and puts it in a bath chilled to 19 degrees -- well
below the temperature fish antifreeze works at. The fish
convulses, then stiffens, its eyes turn gray with ice. The
ice inside the fish had grown explosively at the lower
temperature, Dr. DeVries explains, wrecking the fish's
nervous system and cells.
   He repeats the test with each fish organ. The heart, ""No
ice,"" he tells a young scientist taking notes. ""Liver, no
ice. Ovaries, no ice. Blood, no ice."" Finally, he dips a test
tube with a red spleen into the bath. It quickly becomes
encased in ice. The ice collector is found.
   But so is a new mystery. Ice buildup should overload the
spleen and kill the fish, he says, but it doesn't. He
speculates there may be a kind of ""hot spot"" in the fish,
that melts ice crystals. ""There's still so much to do,"" he
sighs.
   Meanwhile, Canadian scientists are trying to breed salmon
with antifreeze genes so the fish can flourish in the icy
waters off Nova Scotia. DNA Plant Technology Corp. in
Cinnaminson, N.J., is testing tomatoes implanted with
antifreeze genes to see if they better withstand freezing and
thawing. General Foods has experimented with fish antifreeze
to see if it can prevent ice crystals from ruining ice cream
that's left out of the freezer and put back melted.
   But none of the research has panned out yet, and Dr.
DeVries is deeply skeptical it will until scientists
understand better how fish and their antifreeze work.
                                                                                                       

   The Great Flood Watch
                                                                                                       

   Robert Bindschadler sits in his dorm room at McMurdo -- a
place with the charm of a trailer park. He's staring at
satellite photos that may foretell the fate of hundreds of
millions of people.
   The photos don't look dramatic. Just a field of ice marked
by ripples and bumps, revealing crevasses and shifting ice.
The markings also show the immense forces of nature shaping
Antarctica.
   Four groups of glaciologists are setting up camp in West
Antarctica to see whether the ice sheet there -- a hunk of
ice as big as Greenland -- is beginning to collapse. If so,
sea level would rise so quickly that, within decades, some
coastal areas would lose 10 feet of shoreline a year. ""Then,
it's curtains for Bangladesh,"" says Ohio State glaciologist,
Ian Whillans.
   Dr. Bindschadler, a National Aeronautics and Space
Administration glaciologist, points to tracks on his photos
that mark the mouth of two huge streams, 30 miles wide, of
solid ice. He plans to drive stakes into the ice along a
90-mile line just below the mouth, and come back two years
later to see how far the stakes have moved. Some ice streams
move a half mile a year, pulling ice from Antarctica's
interior to the sea. There it breaks into icebergs.
   By comparing the outflow of ice with measurements of snow
accumulation in the interior, scientists can calculate
whether the ice sheet is shedding ice. If so, they warn, a
cataclysmic cycle may be underway. The thinner the ice sheet
gets, the faster the ice streams will flow. And the faster
the ice streams flow, the thinner the ice sheet gets, until,
eventually, it collapses. Then, ""prepare for the worst,"" says
Dr. Bindschadler.
   Just 20 years ago, the threat of a great flood from a
melting Antarctica was the stuff of supermarket tabloids. But
after experiments on two ice streams in the mid-1980s, even
former skeptics began taking the threat seriously. Scientists
found that the streams changed speed and direction rapidly --
showing the ice sheet as far more unpredictable than
imagined. And they found 500,000-year-old marine fossils
under the ice, indicating the ice sheet had melted before
when the Earth had warmed.
   If the ice sheet is melting, humans probably aren't to
blame. Glaciologists say Antarctica is responding to the
long-term warming of the Earth since the last ice age 18,000
years ago, and to the weird geology of the frozen continent.
   For the most part, the half-mile thick ice sheets slide
along a layer of mud. But occasionally the ice stream rolls
over a patch of dry rock -- a ""sticky spot,"" says the
University of Wisconsin's Charles Bentley. That stops the ice
cold. Dr. Bentley figures that one ice stream he has studied
hasn't moved much since it hit a sticky spot during the Civil
War.
   This year, Dr. Bentley will hunt for sticky spots using
radar. He and his team plan to lay out 10 rectangular grids,
each consisting of 1,000 bamboo poles jammed into the snow
atop an ice stream. Then they will use a big tracked vehicle
to lug a radar antenna up and down the grid, looking for
radar patterns that signal a hard surface below.
   ""Things are changing rapidly, and we don't have ways to
predict the future"" of the ice sheet, Dr. Bentley says.
Hidden in the snows of Antarctica are some clues.
                                                                                                       

   A Cosmic Quest
                                                                                                       

   Just how cold is it at the South Pole?
   -- So cold they put heaters in walk-in refrigerators to
keep beer from freezing.
   -- So cold that most all the water vapor freezes, making
the Polar atmosphere drier than the Sahara's.
   The latter explains why two groups of cosmologists have
come to the South Pole in November -- springtime in
Antarctica -- when temperatures warm to 50 degrees below zero
and 30-mile-per hour winds blow. This is the best place on
Earth for studying the heavens, they explain, because the
drier the air, the better their telescopes can see the cosmic
radiation that bathes the planet.
   Scientists believe the radiation was produced about
500,000 years after the birth of the universe and is the key
to understanding the central paradox of cosmology. If the Big
Bang sent energy and matter hurtling outward uniformly in all
directions, how did stuff ever clump together, through
gravity, to form the galaxies and stars we see today?
Somewhere in the sky, the cosmic radiation must either be
more intense or hotter than other places -- marking sites
where galaxies formed.
   ""Otherwise it's all magic,"" says George Smoot. Dr. Smoot,
a 45-year-old blithe spirit from Lawrence Berkeley Laboratory
in California, leads a team of scientists from the West Coast
and Italy. Jeffrey Peterson, 36, leads the other team, from
Princeton University and several East Coast labs. The team
that finds the signal in the cosmic radiation that shows
galaxy formation -- or proves that a signal doesn't exist --
will have found the Holy Grail of cosmology.
   The Princeton team has come to the Pole every other year
since 1986. Every trip has brought calamity. The first year
they ran out of liquid helium to cool the telescope. In 1988,
their telescope broke as often as an old Ford. In 1990, they
ran out of liquid nitrogen, another coolant; this was the
only year they got any useful data, but just about half of
what they wanted. In 1991, a new government storage tank of
liquid nitrogen was supposed to supply the team, but one
night it exploded, shattering in two.
   The Berkeley team is having better luck. In 1989, the
team's telescope found an energy source powerful enough,
perhaps, to account for the birth of galaxies -- and now
they're back to make sure their measurements weren't
mistaken. Antarctica, they say, is Earth's clearest window to
the cosmos.
",4,"[ 0.93590092  0.00156273  0.01568189 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
40,"
   ""Many countries will resign their activities in Antarctica
{because} there is no hope of profits in the near future,""
says Krzyzstof Filcek, a Polish ecologist who studies
Antarctic marine life.
   With the demise of the Soviet Union, the end of the Cold
War and worsening economic problems, former East Bloc
countries are slashing Antarctic research budgets. Four of
nine Soviet research stations, which were strategically
placed around the continent to act as markers for future
claims, have been closed. Poland, noted for Antarctic marine
biology, has managed to staff its Arctowski base with just 14
scientists and workers -- about one-fourth its usual
complement -- and has cut back programs in meteorology and
geology.
   In the U.S., Antarctic budgets have been rising steadily,
mostly to pay for logistics. But the National Science
Foundation, which runs U.S. bases, thinks that the
government's commitment to Antarctica will wane, what with
new restrictions on mineral development and declining Soviet
competition. ""We've been living on a tripod-geopolitics,
future uses of Antarctica and research,"" says Guy Guthridge,
an NSF Antarctic spokesman. ""Now two of the three legs have
been taken away from us.""
   The U.S. Navy, for instance, regularly pays for about
one-fourth of all oceanographic research, much of it centered
on the Southern Ocean surrounding Antarctica. But with the
end of the Cold War, the military may cut back because ""there
is no enemy,"" Columbia University oceanographer Arnold Gordon
fears. This year, after a budget battle, more money was
appropriated for U.S. Antarctica research, partly by
redirecting funds earmarked for housing for the poor.
   Such environmentalists as Jacques Cousteau campaigned for
the Antarctic minerals ban so Antarctica could be used as an
environmental laboratory to study the ozone layer, global
warming and pollution. But a major reason the number of
Antarctic research bases doubled to 68 over the past 20 years
had little to do with science. It ""was politically inspired,""
says Alfred Fowler, head of the Council of Managers of
National Antarctic Program. Countries ""wanted a seat around
the table"" if there were mineral riches to divide, he says.
   Proof of a nation's continuing interest in Antarctica is
that it supports scientists there. Nations realized they
needed a base to qualify for membership in the treaty system
that governs Antarctica, which was up for renegotiation this
year.
   During those negotiations, Australia, New Zealand and
France, responding to environmental concerns, blocked an
agreement that would have permitted nations to survey
Antarctica for minerals and oil -- even though the pact would
have set difficult hurdles before development could begin.
Instead, in October, the Antarctic treaty nations approved a
substitute that bars mineral and oil exploration for at least
50 years and requires environmental safeguards for research
bases.
   Critics say the environmental provisions will make science
more expensive in Antarctica, already the costliest research
site apart from outer space. Of the $193 million the U.S.
plans to spend this fiscal year in Antarctica, only $22
million is budgeted for science. The rest is earmarked for
planes, ships and helicopters to ferry researchers; for other
logistics; and for environmental cleanup.
   For many countries, the cost of Antarctic science is
already prohibitive. At Vostok station, famed for its studies
of ice cores that disclose ancient atmospheres, the Soviets
were so strapped for cash that they asked France to pay the
salaries of Soviet workers as part of an international
program. The French refused, say Antarctic scientists, but
agreed to pay for scientific instruments for the Soviets
instead.
   Stanislaw Rakusa-Suszczewski, who runs the Polish
Antarctic program, says he has tried to persuade Hungary and
Czechoslovakia to chip in enough money to make Arctowski a
""post-Communist country"" base, but to no avail. ""I must look
for another partner,"" he says. ""Maybe Ukraine?""
   The countries with the strongest commitment to Antarctica
may turn out to be the ones that are tied to the continent by
nationalism, not science. Argentina and Chile claim parts of
Antarctica as extensions of their countries, even though the
Antarctic Treaty effectively makes the continent
international territory. They bring families to live in
Antarctica, not just scientists, encourage women to give
birth at their bases and postmark letters there -- all to
back claims of sovereignty.
   `They call them true settlements, not artificial science
bases,"" says Jack Child, an American University expert on the
region.
",4,"[ 0.21712748  0.0104233   0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
41,"
   The Trans-Antarctica Expedition Mr. Steger writes about in
""Crossing Antarctica"" (Knopf, 304 pages, $25) was born of the
ambitions of Mr. Steger and Jean-Louis Etienne, who met in
1986 in the middle of separate arctic journeys. Mr. Steger
was leading the first confirmed unsupported dog-sled
expedition to the North Pole and Dr. Etienne was making the
first solo ski there. They met in Mr. Steger's tent, shared
tea and their Antarctic dreams and exchanged phone numbers.
   But why would anyone back a trip to the South Pole, where
all the firsts seemed to have been garnered long ago?
Norwegian Roald Amundsen had been there first, followed a
month later by British Royal Navy Capt. Robert Scott in
December and January of 1911-12. More Britishers had crossed
Antarctica with tracked vehicles in 1958 and 1981. Another
trio had skied ""in the footsteps of Scott"" in 1986. What was
left? In answer, Messrs. Steger and Etienne decided to ski
and dog-sled across the continent by the longest possible
route, a trek that took them from July 27 until March 3.
   The success of Trans-Antarctica owed a lot to the pride,
resilience, determination and widely different skills and
personalities of the men involved: Geoff Somers, stubborn,
taciturn and wryly humorous, an expert dog-sled driver and
veteran of the British Antarctic Survey; Victor Boyarsky, a
boisterous, mercurial, Soviet glaciologist; Keizo Funatsu, a
quiet, conscientious Japanese with spiritual reserves,
devoted to his dogs; and Qin Dahe, a dedicated Chinese
scientist.
   When I traveled with these men and their dog teams for
three days in the Minnesota wilderness in February 1989, it
was Mr. Qin's first experience with skis, sled dogs or
communicating at length in the English language. Clearly no
athlete, his command of all three was shaky. None of that
bothered Mr. Steger, who was more interested in Mr. Qin's
fierce determination to share camp chores and pull his weight
in subzero cold. ""Dahe will do well,"" Mr. Steger decided, a
judgment vindicated over 3,741 miles in windchills sometimes
approaching minus 100 degrees Fahrenheit.
   Mr. Steger is also a keen judge of dogs, who share equally
in the credit for Trans-Antarctica. Because their lives
depended on the dogs, the men knew them all intimately, their
strengths and foibles. They were inspired by their canine
colleagues and despaired when they sometimes wilted from
exhaustion. The death en route of Tim, half wolf, became the
focus of a rift between Messrs. Steger and Somers.
   The hardships that the party faced were tremendous, but
familiar polar fare. Men and dogs stumbled forward in snowy
whiteouts, fell into and rescued one another from crevasses.
Storms slowed them early and confined them to their tents for
days on the Antarctic Peninsula and buried some food caches
irretrievably under drifts of snow, gravely imperiling the
expedition. Bone-chilling head winds froze painful cracks in
their fingers and faces, sapping the strength of men and
dogs. Within 16 miles of the end, Mr. Funatsu stepped out in
a storm to tend his dog team and couldn't find his way back.
Feared dead, he was found 13 hours later, 300 feet from his
tent near a ditch he had scraped in the snow with a pair of
pliers.
   Trans-Antarctica faced such problems with a different
style than Amundsen, Scott, Ernest Shackleton and explorers
who traveled in an age when leaders gave orders and the rest
followed. Amundsen consulted his teammates but his leadership
was authoritarian, and the Scott expedition followed Royal
Navy traditions of command. Mr. Steger is a leader of a
different stripe: experienced, laid back, determined and
flexible. ""Those who get into trouble in places like
Antarctica,"" he writes, ""are those who . . . fall back on a
stringent system, either philosophical or physical. You must
be willing to bend. You cannot allow nature, or an
undertaking, to imprison you, no matter its rigors.""
   As polar literature, Mr. Steger's account, written with
Jon Bowermaster, cannot equal the technical fascination of
Amundsen's ""The South Pole."" Nor can it approach the tragic
drama of Apsley Cherry-Garrard's ""The Worst Journey in the
World,"" which recounts the death of Scott's party after much
agony only 11 miles from a cache of food and fuel. The
photographs are good, but lack the breathtaking scenery of ""A
Walk to the Pole"" by Roger Mear and Robert Swan.
   ""Crossing Antarctica"" succeeds, however, as a clear and
factual account of modern man pitting himself against the
elements, bending before the blast, suffering, sacrificing,
enduring and prevailing.
   ---
   Mr. Ulman is a news editor in the Journal's New York
bureau.
",4,"[ 0.18777928  0.00983392  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
42,"
   Iraq's Saddam Hussein, facing U.S. and Arab troops at the Saudi
border, today sought peace on another front by promising to
withdraw from Iranian territory and release soldiers captured
during the Iran-Iraq war.
   Also today, King Hussein of Jordan arrived in Washington seeking
to mediate the Persian Gulf crisis. President Bush on Tuesday said
the United States may extend its naval quarantine to Jordan's Red
Sea port of Aqaba to shut off Iraq's last unhindered trade route.
   In another mediation effort, the Soviet Union said today it had
sent an envoy to the Middle East on a series of stops to include
Baghdad. Soviet officials also said Soviet women, children and
invalids would be allowed to leave Iraq.
   President Bush today denounced Saddam's ``ruinous policies of
war,'' and said the United States is ``striking a blow for the
principle that might does not make right.''
   In a speech delivered at the Pentagon, Bush seemed to suggest
that American forces could be in the gulf region for some time.
``No one should doubt our staying power or determination,'' he said.
   The U.S. military buildup in Saudi Arabia continued at fever
pace, with Syrian troops now part of a multinational force camped
out in the desert to guard the Saudi kingdom from any new thrust by
Iraq.
   In a letter to President Hashemi Rafsanjani of Iran, read by a
broadcaster over Baghdad radio, Saddam said he will begin
withdrawing troops from Iranian territory on Friday and release
Iranian prisoners of war.
   Iran said an Iraqi diplomatic delegation was en route to Tehran
to deliver Saddam's message, which it said it would review ``with
optimism.''
   Saddam appeared to accept a border demarcation treaty he had
rejected in peace talks following the August 1988 cease-fire of the
eight-year war with Iran.
   The move seemed aimed at heading off more trouble with Iran,
which had condemned Iraq's invasion of Kuwait on Aug. 2 but also
criticized the multinational force dispatched to Saudi Arabia.
   Saddam said he sought to ``turn the gulf into a lake of peace
free of foreign fleets and forces that harbor ill intentions
against us.''
   In other developments:
   _The Pentagon said that Defense Secretary Dick Cheney is
considering urging Bush to order a national callup of armed forces
reserves for active duty because of the drain on units sending
soldiers abroad. Bush can call up to 200,000 reservists for up to
180 days without seeking congressional approval.
   _Soviet Foreign Ministry spokesman Yuri Gremitskikh said special
ambassador Mikhail Sytenko left Tuesday for consultations with the
governments of Syria, Jordan, Egypt and other Arab countries.
Sytenko, a former deputy secretary-general of the United Nations,
is also expected to visit Baghdad, Gremitskikh said at a regular
news briefing today.
   _The outlook darkened for about 3,000 Americans caught in Iraq
and Kuwait when Saddam sent his forces into the small, oil-rich
sultanate.
   The Iraqi ambassador to Greece said in Athens the Americans and
other stranded foreigners could leave ``as soon as the threats from
the United States and its allies are eliminated.'' ABC quoted an
Iraqi Foreign Ministry official in Baghdad as saying Americans in
Iraq are ``restrictees'' who will stay there until the crisis ends.
   _The Soviet Foreign Ministry said Soviet women, children and
invalids would be permitted to leave Iraq. Spokesman Yuri
Gremitskikh said the first group of 230 evacuees was assembling in
Baghdad today, but evacuation plans were hampered by desert heat
and lack of transportation.
   Nearly 9,000 Soviets were among the hundreds of thousands of
foreigners trapped in Iraq and Kuwait. Iraq has agreed to allow all
880 Soviets in Kuwait to leave, but only by a 1,200-mile road route
through Iraq and to the Iraq-Jordan border.
   _The British Foreign Office said today conditions in Kuwait
appear to be deteriorating. There have been reports of wholesale
looting but food and gasoline were still available, said a
spokesman, who by custom was not identified. Banks remained closed.
   _The Iraqi ambassador to Venezuela said on Tuesday that Iraq
would retaliate against Venezuela and other OPEC oil cartel members
if they boost oil production to fill the gap created by blocked
supplies from Iraq and Kuwait. With Kuwait now ``annexed,'' Iraq
has control of 20 percent of the world's oil reserves. A steep rise
in world oil prices followed the Kuwait invasion.
   The U.N. Security Council on Aug. 6 ordered a global embargo on
trade with Iraq as punishment for seizing Kuwait. Bush then sent
U.S. troops and planes to Saudi Arabia, saying Iraqi troops massed
nearby in Kuwait threatened Saudi Arabia and its vast oil reserves.
   Twelve Arab League nations voted for an Arab force to protect
Saudi Arabia, with the vanguard of Syria's contingent arriving
Tuesday, according to diplomatic sources in Riyadh, the Saudi
capital.
   Egyptian and Moroccan troops are already there.
   The predominantly Moslem nation of Bangladesh said today its
troops would join multinational forces in Saudi Arabia. The size of
the contingent was not disclosed.
   Turkey and Saudi Arabia in effect shut down Iraq's major oil
outlets through those countries, but according to Jordanian
officials, a smaller line into Jordan remained operating.
   Truckloads of goods rolled into Iraq from Jordan on Tuesday and
Iraqi-bound cargo was unloaded from ships at the Red Sea port
ofAqaba despite the U.N.-ordered sanctions.
   King Hussein was reportedly carrying a message to Bush from
Iraq's Saddam, with whom the king met Monday. The monarch will meet
Bush on Thursday in Kennebunkport, Maine.
   Crown Prince Hassan, King Hussein's brother and political
adviser, was asked today about the message the king was said to be
carrying. In an interview from Jordan on ABC, he declined to
discuss details, but said: ``I don't think that his majesty would
be traveling at this crucial moment if the Iraqi leadership did not
have a rational approach to the future.''
   A CBS News report citing unidentified Jordanian sources said
that Saddam's message called for an international conference to be
convened to discuss an Iraqi withdrawal from Kuwait. In exchange,
the buildup of U.S. forces in the region would halt. Bush, however,
says he sees no short-term hope for a diplomatic solution to the
gulf crisis _ at least until economic sanctions force Saddam to
withdraw his army.
   Bush held out the prospect of more aid to Jordan if it
cooperates with the trade embargo.
   On Tuesday, the United States and Soviet Union conferred in
Washington on putting an anti-Iraq naval blockade under a United
Nations umbrella.
   The United States has provided most of the naval vessels so far
to block Iraqi trade, with Britain, West Germany and Australia
among the other nations lending support at sea.
   The embargo is meant to cripple Iraq by cutting off its exports
of oil and imports of food and military supplies. Iraq imports
about three-quarters of its foodstuffs.
   U.S. allies and other U.N. members have objected that the
Security Council embargo resolution did not specifically authorize
such a naval operation.
   Bush told a news conference on Tuesday that the naval barricade
now in force might be extended to Jordan's Aqaba ``if it is a hole
through which commerce flows'' in and out of Iraq.
   In Saudi Arabia, today is the eighth day of ``Desert Shield,''
the operation designed to confront an estimated 200,000 Iraqi
soldiers now in Kuwait. Iraq boasts an army of 1 million members.
At least 50,000 U.S. troops are expected to be committed to Desert
Shield within weeks, including Marines, Army air assault forces,
paratroopers and infantry.
   Iraq said it invaded Kuwait because of disputes over oil and
money. It accused Kuwait of deliberately slashing Iraqi oil
revenues by overproducing oil and driving down prices, among other
charges.
   Iraq has 17 million residents, and Kuwait about 1.9 million.
",5,"[ 0.42657122  0.00646666  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
43,"
   The Persian Gulf showdown between Iraq and the United States
took a more personal turn Thursday when Iraq's Saddam Hussein
called President Bush a liar and said the outbreak of holy war
could bring thousands of Americans home in coffins.
   Bush, commenting on the two-week-old gulf crisis from his
vacation home in Maine, said he saw little reason to be optimistic
about a settlement of the dispute, which stems from Iraq's invasion
of oil-wealthy Kuwait and its subsequent military buildup on the
border of Saudi Arabia.
   After a two-hour meeting at his Kennebunkport home with King
Hussein of Jordan, Bush said, ``I did not come away with any
feeling of hope'' that Iraq would withdraw its army from Kuwait.
   Bush also said Thursday that King Hussein assured him Jordan
would close the last remaining free port to most Iraqi trade as the
economic embargo on materials to Iraq continued unabated.
Foodstuffs are among the goods being blocked from entry; Iraq
imports about three-quarters of its food.
   Pentagon sources in Washington meanwhile said the Bush
administration plans to deploy 45,000 Marines to the region to back
up the thousands of Army, Navy and Air Force troops already in
place in the gulf and the Saudi desert.
   At a news conference, Secretary of State James A. Baker III said
Jordan ``is seeking some guidance'' about a provision in the
U.N.-backed trade embargo that allows food for humanitarian
purposes.
   Worries however grew about the safety of Americans and other
Westerners trapped in Kuwait. Iraqi military authorities ordered
all Americans and Britons in Kuwait to assemble at a hotel,
officials said.
   ``Very few'' of the 2,500 Americans in occupied Kuwait complied
with the order, a senior U.S. official told The Associated Press.
   Iraq said the roundup was to protect them from unspecified
threats; British Foreign Office minister William Waldegrave called
the order ``grave and sinister.''
   ``What we fear is that they will be interned somewhere, most
likely in Iraq,'' Waldegrave said.
   A total of about 3,000 Americans, 3,000 Britons and more than
450 Japanese are in Iraq and Kuwait. Overall, more than 2 million
foreigners are in both countries. Iraq has called them
``restrictees.''
   In addition to the estimated 45,000 Marines to ultimately be
part of Operation Desert Shield, Stealth fighter planes and the
aircraft carrier John F. Kennedy are also headed to Saudi Arabia to
protect it from Iraqi expansionism.
   In Washington, Pentagon spokesman Pete Williams said Iraq has
continued to increase its armed forces in Kuwait and they now
number about 160,000.
   Saddam has been under international quarantine since his Aug. 2
power-grab, or what he calls an ``eternal merger'' with Kuwait.
   In a long verbal attack read on Iraqi television Thursday,
Saddam repeatedly called Bush ``a liar'' and said a shooting war
could produce body bags courtesy of Baghdad.
   ``We continue to pray and pray hard to God so that there will be
no confrontation whereby you will receive thousands of Americans
wrapped in sad coffins after you had pushed them into a dark
tunnel,'' Saddam said.
   He called U.S. soldiers massing in Saudi Arabia the real
occupiers in the Persian Gulf.
   Replied State Department deputy spokesman Richard Boucher, ``We
haven't really analyzed the statement in detail but it appears to
be just another example of his outlandish rhetoric and his attempts
to distort the truth.
   ``We believe that his words cannot distract the world from the
facts of Iraqi aggression.''
   An international land, sea and air force has mobilized since
Iraq's invasion, which was sparked by disputes over oil, land and
repayment of war loans.
   In the largest U.S. military operation since Vietnam, an
estimated 20,000 American GIs have already massed to defend Saudi
Arabia.
   ``We don't just arrive,'' said four-star Gen. John Dailey,
assistant commandant of the U.S. Marine Corps. ``We're there to
stay for a fairly lengthy period.''
   Egypt, Syria, Morocco and Bangladesh also committed ground
troops, to a much lesser degree.
   The U.S. Navy has 27 ships in the maritime barricade of Iraq.
They are aided by Britain, West Germany, Australia, Canada, the
Netherlands and Belgium. Bush was expected to authorize naval
commanders to use ``the minimum force necessary'' to interdict
shipments to and from Iraq, a U.S. official said. That could
include firing across the bow to halt a ship.
   In the air, U.S. Air Force fliers say they have engaged in ``a
little cat and mouse'' with Iraqi warplanes, which have retreated
when weapons radar locks onto them. ``They don't want to play with
us,'' one U.S. crew chief said.
   In Kuwait, the Iraqis have rimmed the capital city with an
air-defense system, according to a U.S. official who spoke on the
condition of anonymity. He declined to say if the weapons included
missiles, but the Iraqis have them in their arsenal. The Iraqis
also possess chemical weapons.
   The combined operations are designed to isolate and strangle
Iraq until it retreats from Kuwait. The quarantine hopes to staunch
the flow of Iraqi oil, which is Iraq's economic lifeblood, and
clamp down on food and supplies going in.
   Iraq now controls 20 percent of the world's oil reserves with
its conquest of Kuwait. Only Saudi Arabia has more oil reserves.
   The economic chokehold appears to be working.
   The Lloyd's List International newspaper, which monitors
worldwide shipping, said Iraq's fleet of 80 tankers and cargo ships
has stopped regular trading.
   John Prescott, a shipping correspondent, said there was no
shipping in Kuwaiti or Iraqi ports and that activity was trailing
off in the Jordanian port of Aqaba.
   Bush's chief objective in his meeting with Hussein was to press
the king to shut down Iraq's food and oil supply route from Aqaba
on the Red Sea.
   Aqaba is Iraq's only outlet now that an international noose has
tightened. Bush has indicated the U.S. Navy will barricade the port
from Iraqi ships. The president also has offered to help offset
Jordan's costs because 40 percent of its exports go to Iraq and 90
percent of its oil comes from there.
   ``It's our only outlet to the sea and the rest of the world,''
Hussein said. He also said of trade with Iraq: ``There are no
shipments at the moment.''
   A day earlier, scores of trucks, many with Iraqi license plates,
streamed north out of Aqaba to Amman and onto the desert highway
bound for Iraq.
   The Jordanian monarch met this week with Saddam, but he told
reporters he had no message from Baghdad. ``I am not talking on
behalf of anyone in the area ... but myself,'' Hussein said.
   In the United Nations, Libya called for the replacement of U.S.
forces in the Persian Gulf with Arab League forces and U.N.
soldiers.
   Libyan leader Moammar Gadhafi, in a letter to the U.N.
Secretary-General, also called for an emergency Security Council
meeting in Geneva to remove U.S. forces. There was no decision on a
meeting.
   Thirty-two of the 159 U.N. members had filed compliance reports
by Wednesday, and all were honoring the sanctions Iraq.
   Also Thursday, Saudi Arabia called for an emergency conference
of the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries to discuss how
much oil to pump.
   The minister denied the kingdom had notified any of its
customers of any cutbacks in oil supply. Reports attributed to the
Japanese foreign ministry said Saudi Arabia told U.S., European and
Japanese oil companies of a 15-20 percent cutback in its oil supply
in September.
   Meanwhile, Egypt's official Middle East News Agency said
Thursday that Saddam was the target of an assassination attempt,
which led to ``large-scale'' arrests, including some close
associates of the Iraqi strongman.
   The agency quoted witnesses as saying tanks and armored cars are
patrolling the streets of Baghdad. There was no independent
confirmation of the report by the government-run news agency, which
did not say when the reported attempt occurred.
",5,"[ 0.47640591  0.00638235  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
44,"
   Late July: George Steinbrenner is still
running the Yankees, the governor of Louisiana is deciding whether
to veto an abortion bill and the first tropical disturbance of
summer, a storm named Arthur, makes its appearance in the Caribbean.
   The American press seems bent on finding out who David Souter is
and what his thoughts are about abortion. President Bush has just
nominated him to the Supreme Court.
   Few Americans much notice that Saddam Hussein of Iraq is
accusing his small neighbors of harboring an ``imperial-Zionist
plan'' to drive down the price of oil.
   Don't blame yourself if you missed the rumblings that were to
suddenly put the United States on war footing and land a vast
military force on the searing Saudi desert, where American troops
had never before been welcomed.
   What led to that, the quarrel between Iraq and its little
neighbor, Kuwait, just seemed like another of those wrangles over
oil production and pricing that occur before the meetings of OPEC
sheiks and statesmen.
   Oil? Wasn't there a glut?
   War? Wasn't this the era of the peace dividend?
   The oil glut was the problem for Saddam Hussein of Iraq. After
eight years of war with Iran, ended by a cease-fire, his country
was powerful but broke. Oil prices and oil revenues were falling.
   Saddam found a pair of villains _ Kuwait, his wartime supporter
and financier, and the United Arab Emirates. Kuwait is just across
the border; the UAE is tucked away on the other side of Saudi
Arabia.
   Kuwait and the UAE were in fact, as Saddam Hussein charged,
exceeding their OPEC oil production quotas by over a million
barrels a day and thus helping to keep oil prices depressed. Oil
was bringing $14 a barrel, 20 percent lower than the year before.
   That was the background to the events that brought out the
battleships, the troops _ and the gas masks.
   July 17: Saddam uses the 22nd anniversary of the coup that
brought his Baath Party to power to lay out his demands. He wants
Kuwait to forgive $15 billion in loans extended during the
Iran-Iraq war. And he wants Kuwait and the United Arab Emirates to
pay $14 billion to compensate for what he says Iraq lost due to low
oil prices.
   ``If words fail to protect Iraqis, something effective must be
done to return things to their natural course and return usurped
rights to their owners,'' he says. ``Iraqis will not forget the
maxim that cutting necks is better than cutting the means of
living. Oh, God Almighty, be witness that we have warned them.''
   July 18: A letter from Saddam's foreign minister to the Arab
League accuses Kuwait of having stolen $2.4 billion worth of
petroleum over the past decade from an Iraqi oil field along the
two nations' disputed border.
   Kuwait puts its 20,000-man army on alert.
   July 19: Kuwait cancels its state of alert. ``It was all a
summer cloud that has been blown away,'' says an unidentified
Kuwaiti source who turns out to be monumentally wrong.
   July 20: Thousands of Kuwaiti workers in Iraq, sensing trouble,
head home.
   July 22: A pro-government newspaper in Iran, in a surprise show
of support for a former enemy, says a ``means of punishment against
quota violators seems a necessity.''
   July 23: Unconfirmed reports say that Iraq has massed 30,000
troops to its border and that the Pentagon has put its warships in
the Persian Gulf on alert.
   July 24: Iraq accuses Kuwait of stealing Iraqi oil. Kuwait
reinstates its alert. The Pentagon announces naval exercises in the
Persian Gulf.
   July 25: President Hosni Mubarak of Egypt, seeking to carve out
a peacemaker's role, says Iraq and Kuwait have agreed to send
delegations to the Saudi Arabian summer capital of Jiddah to
discuss their differences.
   July 27: At a tense meeting in Geneva, OPEC agrees to limit oil
production and raise its target price by $3 to $21 a barrel. Kuwait
and the United Arab Emirates promise to abide by the new production
quotas. Because of Iraq's threats to use force against countries
that ignore the limits, industry observers expect the measure, this
time, to stick.
   In Washington, the House and Senate defy Bush administration
opposition and vote for economic sanctions against Iraq. These
reflect an accumulation of complaints over Iraq's attempt to
intimidate neighbors, its human rights record, its use of poison
gas during the Iran-Iraq war against its Kurdish minority, its
drive to build nuclear weapons. The State Department says the votes
will not be helpful to diplomatic efforts to modify Saddam's
behavior.
   Aug. 1 _ Talks in Jiddah start with an embrace. But two hours
later, they break off. The Iraqi delegation walks out, saying they
did not sense ``any seriousness'' from the Kuwaitis. Tensions _ and
oil prices _ rise.
   Aug. 2 (7 p.m. EDT Aug. 1) _ Tank-led Iraqi infantry units storm
into Kuwait. They advance unchecked down a highway across the flat
desert terrain to the capital, Kuwait city.
   The Financial Times says the advance is so unchallenged that
some troops travelled down the road by bus. The emir, Sheik Jabir,
flees by helicopter. Kuwait's hopelessly outnumbered troops wage
pitched battles around the sheik's residential palace. The sheik's
younger brother is reported to have been killed defending the
palace.
   Kuwait's crown prince and premier, Sheik Saad al-Abdallah Al
Sabah, goes on the radio and television and calls for resistance:
``Let them taste the chalice of death.''
   Kuwait calls for urgent American military assistance but Iraq
threatens to turn Kuwait into a ``graveyard'' if an outside power
intervenes.
   The invasion seems to catch Washington by surprise, but the CIA
takes the unusual step of issuing a statement saying it was not
surprised and had ``provided policy-makers with very useful and
timely information.''
   President Bush reacts swiftly. First he condemns Saddam's
``naked aggression.'' Then he engineers a United Nations-sanctioned
embargo of Iraq. Finally, he commits massive American force, the
largest dispatched since the Vietnam war, to protect Saudi Arabia
from Kuwait's fate. He says they will serve until Saddam withdraws
from Kuwait.
   By now the story has captured America's attention. The latest
developments are writ large on the front pages.
",5,"[ 0.40986881  0.00761649  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
45,"
   Here is a chronology of the Iraq-Kuwait crisis:
   
   Aug. 1 _ Iraq pulls out of talks with Kuwait on Iraqi grievances
over oil pricing, Kuwaiti war loans to Iraq, and Iraqi claims on
Kuwaiti territory.
   Aug. 2 _ Iraq's powerful army overruns Kuwait before dawn,
seizing the emir's palace and other government buildings. President
Bush orders U.S. economic embargo against Iraq.
   Aug. 3 _ Shelling and gunfire echo through Kuwait City as
Kuwaiti forces mount last-ditch resistance. Iraqi troops push to
within few miles of Saudi Arabian border. State Department says
American civilians are trapped in Kuwait.
   Aug. 4 _ Iraq announces new military government for
Iraqi-occupied Kuwait. European Community imposes trade embargo on
Iraq.
   Aug. 5 _ Kuwait's new Iraqi-installed government claims Iraqi
troops begin pulling out of Kuwait, but United States skeptical.
Japan suspends Iraqi oil imports.
   Aug. 6 _ U.N. Security Council orders worldwide embargo on trade
with Iraq. In Saudi Arabia, U.S. Defense Secretary Dick Cheney
confers with Saudi leaders about defending the oil kingdom against
any Iraqi attack.
   Aug. 7 _ Bush orders deployment of U.S. combat troops and
warplanes to Saudi Arabia. A fresh U.S. Navy task force sets sail
for region. Turkey cuts off exports from Iraqi oil pipeline through
Turkish territory.
   Aug. 8 _ Iraq declares Kuwait has been annexed. Britain agrees
to join multinational force in the gulf. Other oil-producing
nations indicate they will step up production to make up for
embargoed Iraqi and Kuwaiti oil.
   Aug. 9 _ American troops take up position in Saudi Arabia's
oil-producing province. Iraq says it has canceled its estimated $15
billion debt, incurred during the Iran-Iraq war, to Kuwait. Iraq
closes its borders for foreigners, trapping thousands of Americans
and other Westerners in Iraq and Kuwait.
   Aug. 10 _ Twelve of 20 Arab League states vote to send all-Arab
military force to join Americans in defense of Saudi Arabia. First
Egyptian contingent arrives in Saudi Arabia. Iraqi President Saddam
Hussein urges Arabs to sweep ``emirs of oil'' from power in gulf
states.
   Aug. 11 _ Saudi Arabian anti-aircraft batteries reportedly fire
on Iraqi reconnaissance planes near Kuwaiti border. Thousands of
Arabs demonstrate in Yemen and Jordan against United States. Bush
suggests Saddam risks overthrow from within unless he ``changes his
spots.''
   Aug. 12 _ Saddam says he is ready to resolve the gulf crisis if
Israel withdraws from territories it occupies. Secretary of State
James A. Baker III says the U.S. Navy will interdict Iraqi oil
shipments.
   Aug. 13 _ Iraqi troops in Kuwait round up American and British
visitors from two hotels in Kuwait for transport to Iraq. King
Hussein of Jordan secretly meets with Saddam in Baghdad.
   Aug. 14 _ King Hussein flies to Washington in effort to mediate
U.S.-Iraq confrontation.
   Aug. 15 _ Saddam offers to withdraw from Iran territories and
release prisoners of war in bid to with favor with Tehran against
the United States.
   Aug. 16 _ Bush pressed King Hussein to close Iraq's access to
the sea through Aqaba, Jordan, but Hussein indicated Bush made
little headway.
   Aug. 17 _ Bush has decided to call up military reserves to meet
shortages of doctors, cargo handlers and other specialists in the
gulf crisis.
   Aug. 18 _ A U.S. frigate fired warning shots across the bow of
an Iraqi oil tanker in the Gulf of Oman and U.S. forces briefly
went to battle stations over the incident.
   Aug. 19 _ Saddam offers to free all foreigners in Iraq and
Kuwait if the United States promises to withdraw its forces from
Saudi Arabia and guarantee that an international embargo will be
lifted.
   Aug. 20 _ Iraq announces it has carried out a plan to move
Western hostages to vital military installations to use as human
shields to deter any U.S. attack and warned its people not to try
to hide any of the thousands of foreigners trapped in the country.
   Aug. 21 _ Arab and Western nations condemn Saddam's threats
against hostages and continue adding armed forces to the region.
Saddam defends the holding of foreigners and promises ``a major
catastrophe'' if war breaks out.
",5,"[ 0.31978197  0.01601873  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
46,"
   Cracks appeared Tuesday in the U.N. trade embargo against Iraq
as Saddam Hussein sought to circumvent the economic noose around
his country.
   Japan, meanwhile, announced it would increase its aid to
countries hardest hit by enforcing the sanctions. Hoping to defuse
criticism that it is not doing its share to oppose Baghdad, Japan
said up to $2 billion in aid may be sent to nations most affected
by the U.N. embargo on Iraq.
   President Bush on Tuesday night promised a joint session of
Congress and a nationwide radio and television audience that
``Saddam Hussein will fail'' to make his conquest of Kuwait
permanent.
   ``America must stand up to aggression, and we will,'' said Bush,
who added that the U.S. military may remain in the Saudi Arabian
desert indefinitely.
   ``I cannot predict just how long it will take to convince Iraq
to withdraw from Kuwait,'' Bush said.
   More than 150,000 U.S. troops have been sent to the Persian Gulf
region to deter a possible Iraqi invasion of Saudi Arabia.
   Bush's aides said the president would follow his address to
Congress with a televised message for the Iraqi people, declaring
the world is united against their government's invasion of Kuwait.
Saddam had offered Bush time on Iraqi TV.
   The Philippines and Namibia, the first of the developing nations
to respond to an offer Monday by Saddam of free oil _ in exchange
for sending their own tankers to get it _ said no to the Iraqi
leader.
   Saddam's offer was seen as a none-too-subtle attempt to bypass
the U.N. embargo, in effect since four days after Iraq's Aug. 2
invasion of Kuwait, by getting poor countries to dock their tankers
in Iraq.
   But according to a State Department survey, Cuba and Romania
have struck oil deals with Iraq and companies elsewhere are trying
to continue trade with Baghdad, all in defiance of U.N. sanctions.
Romania denies the allegation.
   The report, made available to The Associated Press, said some
Eastern European countries also are trying to maintain their
military sales to Iraq.
   A well-informed source in Tehran told The Associated Press that
Iran has agreed to an Iraqi request to exchange food and medicine
for up to 200,000 barrels of refined oil a day and cash payments.
There was no official comment from Tehran or Baghdad on the
reported food-for-oil deal.
   But the source, who requested anonymity, said the deal was
struck during Iraqi Foreign Minister Tariq Aziz's visit Sunday to
Tehran, the first by a senior Iraqi official since the 1980-88 gulf
war. After the visit, the two countries announced they would resume
diplomatic relations.
   Well-informed oil industry sources in the region, contacted by
The AP, said that although Iran is a major oil exporter itself, it
currently has to import about 150,000 barrels of refined oil a day
for domestic use because of damages to refineries in the gulf war.
   Along similar lines, ABC News reported that following Aziz's
visit, Iraq is apparently prepared to give Iran all the oil it
wants to make up for the damage Iraq inflicted on Iran during their
conflict.
   Secretary of State James A. Baker III, meanwhile, met in Moscow
with Soviet Foreign Minister Eduard Shevardnadze, two days after
the U.S.-Soviet summit that produced a joint demand that Iraq
withdraw from Kuwait.
   During the summit, Bush encouraged Mikhail Gorbachev to withdraw
190 Soviet military specialists from Iraq, where they remain to
fulfill contracts. Shevardnadze told the Soviet parliament Tuesday
the specialists had not reneged on those contracts for fear it
would jeopardize the 5,800 Soviet citizens in Iraq.
   In his speech, Bush said his heart went out to the families of
the hundreds of Americans held hostage by Iraq, but he declared,
``Our policy cannot change, and it will not change. America and the
world will not be blackmailed.''
   The president added: ``Vital issues of principle are at stake.
Saddam Hussein is literally trying to wipe a country off the face
of the Earth.''
   In other developments:
   _A U.S. diplomat in Baghdad said Tuesday up to 800 Americans and
Britons will fly out of Iraqi-occupied Kuwait this week, most of
them women and children leaving their husbands behind. Saddam has
said he is keeping foreign men as human shields against attack.
   On Monday, a planeload of 164 Westerners arrived in Baltimore
from Iraq. Evacuees spoke of food shortages in Kuwait, nighttime
gunfire and Iraqi roundups of young people suspected of involvement
in the resistance.
   ``There is no law and order,'' said Thuraya, 19, who would not
give her last name. ``A soldier can rape a father's daughter in
front of him and he can't do anything about it.''
   _The State Department said Iraq had told U.S. officials that
American males residing in Iraq and Kuwait who were born in Arab
countries will be allowed to leave. Iraq generally has not let
American males leave. It was not known how many men the Iraqi move
could affect.
   _A Pentagon spokesman said ``some increase in military
activity'' had been detected inside Iraq near its borders with
Turkey and Syria. He said there was little indication hostilities
are imminent.
   Defense Secretary Dick Cheney said the cost of the U.S. military
buildup in the Middle East was rising above the $1 billion-a-month
estimate generally used by government officials. He said the total
cost _ if no shooting war breaks out _ could total $15 billion in
the next fiscal year beginning Oct. 1.
   Cheney promised disgruntled lawmakers ``a significant increase''
in help from Arab nations and other U.S. allies for Operation
Desert Shield.
   Japan, which has been accused of responding too slowly to the
crisis in the gulf, said Tuesday it may give $2 billion to Egypt,
Jordan and Turkey, hit hardest by the U.N. prohibition on trade
with Iraq.
   ``The pressure from abroad is getting so strong,'' said Hiroyasu
Horio, an official with the Ministry of International Trade and
Industry.
   Local news reports said the aid would be extended through the
World Bank and International Monetary Fund, and $600 million would
be sent as early as mid-September.
   On Friday, Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady visited Tokyo on a
world tour seeking $10.5 billion to help Egypt, Jordan and Turkey.
   Japan has already promised a $1 billion aid package for
multinational peacekeeping forces in Saudi Arabia, including food,
water, vehicles and prefabricated housing for non-military uses.
   But critics in the United States have said Japan should do more
because its economy depends heavily on oil from the Middle East.
Japan imports 99 percent of its oil.
   Japan's constitution bans the use of force in settling
international disputes and Japanese law restricts the military to
Japanese territory, except for ceremonial occasions.
   On Monday, Saddam offered developing nations free oil if they
would send their tankers to pick it up.
   The first two countries to respond Tuesday _ the Philippines and
Namibia _ said no. Manila said it had already fulfilled its oil
requirements, and Namibia said it would not ``sell its
sovereignty'' for Iraqi oil.
   Venezuelan President Carlos Andres Perez dismissed Saddam's
offer of free oil as a ``propaganda ploy.'' Venezuela, an OPEC
member, has led a drive among oil-producing nations to boost
production to make up for the shortfall caused by the loss of Iraqi
and Kuwaiti oil from the world market.
   Their oil makes up 20 percent of the world's oil reserves. Only
Saudi Arabia has higher reserves.
   But according to the State Department, Cuba, which faces an oil
deficit because of reduced Soviet deliveries, has received a
shipment of Iraqi petroleum since U.N. sanctions were imposed five
weeks ago. And Romania, it said, expects to receive oil indirectly
from Iraq.
   Romania's ambassador to the United States, Virgil
Constantinescu, denied that claim Tuesday, calling it ``absolutely
false and without foundation.''
",5,"[ 0.46244559  0.00665997  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
47,"

Here is the text of President Bush's address to the people of Iraq, as released 
by the White House: 


 I'm here today to explain to the people of Iraq why the United States and the 
world community has responded the way it has to Iraq's occupation of Kuwait. My 
purpose is not to trade accusations, not to escalate the war of words, but to 
speak with candor about what has caused this crisis that confronts us. Let 
there be no misunderstanding. We have no quarrel with the people of Iraq. I've 
said many times, and I will repeat right now, our only object is to oppose the 
invasion ordered by Saddam Hussein. 


On Aug. 2, your leadership made its decision to invade, an unprovoked attack on 
a small nation that posed no threat to your own. Kuwait was the victim; Iraq, 
the aggressor. 


And the world met Iraq's invasion with a chorus of condemnation, unanimous 
resolutions in the United Nations. Twenty-seven states, rich and poor, Arab, 
Muslim, Asian and African, have answered the call of Saudi Arabia and free 
Kuwait and sent forces to the gulf region to defend against Iraq. For the first 
time in history, 13 states of the Arab League, representing 80% of the Arab 
Nation, have condemned a brother Arab state. Today, opposed by world opinion, 
Iraq stands isolated and alone. 


I do not believe that you, the people of Iraq, want war. You've borne untold 
suffering and hardship during eight long years of war with Iran. A war that 
touched the life of every single Iraqi citizen. A war that took the lives of 
hundreds of thousands of young men, the bright promise of an entire generation. 
No one knows better than you the incalculable costs of war, the ultimate cost 
when a nation's vast potential and vital energies are consumed by conflict. No 
one knows what Iraq might be today, what prosperity and peace you might enjoy 
had your leaders not plunged you into war. 


Now, once again, Iraq finds itself on the brink of war. Once again, the same 
Iraqi leadership has miscalculated. Once again, the Iraqi people face tragedy. 


Saddam Hussein has told you that Iraqi troops were invited into Kuwait. That's 
not true. In fact, in the face of far superior force, the people of Kuwait are 
bravely resisting this occupation. Your own returning soldiers will tell you 
the Kuwaitis are fighting valiantly in any way they can. 


Saddam Hussein tells you that this crisis is a struggle between Iraq and 
America. In fact, it is Iraq against the world. When (Soviet) President 
(Mikhail S.) Gorbachev and I met at Helsinki we agreed that no peaceful 
international order is possible if larger states can devour their neighbors. 
Never before has world opinion been so solidly united against aggression. 


Nor, until the invasion of Kuwait, has the United States been opposed to Iraq. 
In the past, the United States has helped Iraq import billions of dollars worth 
of food and other commodities. And the war with Iran would not have ended two 
years ago without U.S. support and sponsorship in the United Nations. 


Saddam Hussein tells you the occupation of Kuwait will benefit the poorer 
nations of the world. In fact, the occupation of Kuwait is helping no one and 
is now hurting you, the Iraqi people, and countless others of the world's poor. 
Instead of acquiring new oil wells by annexing Kuwait, this misguided act of 
aggression will cost Iraq over $20 billion a year in lost oil revenues. Because 
of Iraq's aggression, hundreds of thousands of innocent foreign workers are 
fleeing Kuwait and Iraq. They are stranded on Iraq's borders, without shelter, 
without food, without medicine, with no way home. These refugees are suffering, 
and this is shameful. 


But even worse, others are being held hostage in Iraq and Kuwait. Hostage 
taking punishes the innocent and separates families. It is barbaric. It will 
not work. And it will not affect my ability to make tough decisions. 


I do not want to add to the suffering of the people of Iraq. The United Nations 
has put binding sanctions in place, not to punish the Iraqi people, but as a 
peaceful means to convince your leadership to withdraw from Kuwait. That 
decision is in the hands of Saddam Hussein. 


The pain you now experience is a direct result of the path your leadership has 
chosen. When Iraq returns to the path of peace, when Iraqi troops withdraw from 
Kuwait, when that country's rightful government is restored, when all 
foreigners held against their will are released, then, and then alone will the 
world end the sanctions. 


Perhaps your leaders do not appreciate the strength of the forces united 
against them. Let me say clearly, there is no way Iraq can win. Ultimately, 
Iraq must withdraw from Kuwait. 


No one -- not the American people, not this President -- wants war. But there 
are times when a country, when all countries who value the principles of 
sovereignty and independence, must stand against aggression. As Americans, 
we're slow to raise our hand in anger and eager to explore every peaceful means 
of settling our disputes. But when we have exhausted every alternative, when 
conflict is thrust upon us, there is no nation on Earth with greater resolve or 
stronger steadiness of purpose. 


The actions of your leadership have put Iraq at odds with the world community. 
But while those actions have brought us to the brink of conflict, war is not 
inevitable. It is still possible to bring this crisis to a peaceful end. 


When we stand with Kuwait against aggression, we stand for a principle well 
understood in the Arab world. Let me quote the words of one Arab leader -- 
Saddam Hussein himself: ""An Arab country does not have the right to occupy 
another Arab country. God forbid, if Iraq should deviate from the right path, 
we would want Arabs to send their armies to put things right. If Iraq should 
become intoxicated by its power and move to overwhelm another Arab state, the 
Arabs would be right to deploy their armies to check it."" 


Those are the words of your leader, Saddam Hussein, spoken on Nov. 28, 1988, in 
a speech to Arab lawyers. Today, two years later, Saddam has invaded and 
occupied a member of the United Nations and the Arab League. The world will not 
allow this aggression to stand. Iraq must get out of Kuwait -- for the sake of 
principle, for the sake of peace and for the sake of the Iraqi people. 

",5,"[ 0.          0.          0.01199997 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
48,"     United Nations Security Council;    November 29, 1990;    ...; War Pros;
Here are the major justifications for war that have been advanced by Bush or
his supporters:; Counter aggression:; Saddam Hussein's invasion of Kuwait has
posed the first crisis of the post-Cold War world. If a new, peaceful
international order is to be established, Iraq's aggression must be rebuffed
quickly and decisively.; Sanctions won't work:; Although sanctions have shut
down Iraq's trade and squeezed its economy, they could take a year or more to
inflict widespread hardship. By then, the alliance against Iraq could crack,
weakening international resolve. There also could be no guarantee that
sanctions will force Saddam to pull out of Kuwait.; Oil:; About one-fourth of
the world's crude oil comes from the Middle East, and about two-thirds of the
world's oil reserves are in the region. With its occupation of Kuwait, Iraq
now controls about 20 percent of the world's reserves. If allowed to corner
the world energy market, Saddam could threaten access to oil at reasonable
prices.; Iraq's weaponry:; Iraq which has a stockpile of chemical weapons and
is developing biological and nuclear weapons, could one day threaten the
security of other oil-rich Arab countries and Israel if its arsenal is not
destroyed now.; Military readiness:; U.S. forces, which will eventually total
some 430,000, will not be able to maintain their readiness indefinitely. The
onset of blistering hot weather will also make U.S. ground operations
difficult between March and October.;   
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx; War Cons; Here
are some of the main reasons cited by Bush's critics for not going to war.;   
World cop:; Once again, the United States is bearing a disproportionate share
of the burden of combating aggression. By some estimates U.S. soldiers would
suffer 90 percent of the casualties in a war.; Let sanctions work:; More than
90 percent of Iraq's imports and 97 percent of its exports have been shut off,
which should eventually cripple the nation. But even if war becomes necessary
to force Saddam Hussein out of Kuwait, it would be better to wage it after the
sanctions have weakened the Iraqi army and air force, depriving them of spare
parts and supplies.; Oil:; Most of the oil output from Iraq and Kuwait could
be saved through tougher fuel conservation measures. Cheap oil isn't worth
fighting over. Indeed, a war would make the price of oil skyrocket and Iraq
could damage production in Saudi Arabia, which pumps more oil than Iraq and
Kuwait combined.; U.S.-Arab relations:; Even if defeated, Saddam could emerge
a hero to Arab masses. Fundamentalists in the Middle East would be emboldened,
U.S. allies would be threatened and anti-American resentment would be
heightened.; Kuwait: Before Iraq's invasion, the Bush administration took no
position on Iraq's border dispute with Kuwait. Now Kuwait has been redefined
as a vital interest of the United States. Some of Iraq's differences with
Kuwait may be legitimate.;   
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx; HOW THE WAR MIGHT
UNFOLD; PHASE 1 (DAY ONE TO THREE) (includes small graphics);    Objective:
Destroy the country's air defense systems, air force installations and command
centers through bombing raids, cutting off most of the Iraqi troops from
Baghdad's central command. Attack and kill Saddam Hussein. Radar-jamming
planes such as the F-4G and EC-130 would disrupt Iraqi communications
equipment.;    F-16 fighters would launch air-to-surface missiles to take out
Iraqi missile sites that could pose a threat to Saudi Arabia or Israel. Those
attacks would be followed immediately by strikes from the Stealth and F-111s
from Saudi Arabia, as well as Navy A-6 fighter-bombers from ships in the
gulf.;    B-52s from Saudi Arabia and the Indian Ocean island of Diego Garcia
would take out the layers of radar, surface-to-air missiles and air defense
guns that protect Iraq's major cities and military and industrial
Installations.;    Air Force F-15s and F-16s from Saudi Arabia and F-14s from
ships in the gulf would try to destroy Iraqi combat planes. Warplanes would
attack Saddam at likely locations in Baghdad and throughout Iraq.;   
Obstacles: The key problem would be disabling Iraqi rocket launchers and array
of anti-aircraft artillery.; ...; PHASE 2 (DAY FOUR TO SIX);    Objective: To
eradicate Iraq's chemical sites and nuclear research facilities. Raids on
Iraqi ground troops and an initial Infantry thrust would begin.;    F-111s,
based in Turkey, would destroy northern and western targets, while F-111s in
Saudi Arabia would demolish southern targets.;    Having rid the Iraqi skies
of planes, aircraft would conduct low-level bombings of sites in both Kuwait
and Iraq, where troops have dug in. The hope Is that such firepower, never
experienced by Iraqi troops, would demoralize them.;    U.S. Army and Marine
infantry would begin their advance into Iraq from Saudi Arabia. With Iraq's
ground forces stunned, Turkish and Syrian troops amassed on the northern
border would invade.;    Obstacles: Though most Iraqi air defenses and forces
could be eliminated, many of the country's enormous supply of air defense guns
would be functional and deadly. Also, much of the U.S. technology, including
the Stealth, hasn't been fully battle-tested.; ...; PHASE 3 (DAY SEVEN TO 90);
   Objective: To liberate Kuwait by isolating it and overcoming the Iraqi
troops there.;    U.S.-led forces would use aircraft such as the A-10
Thunderbolt (Warthogs) and Apache helicopters to smash Iraqi tanks and
undermine resistance to ground forces, both in Kuwait and Iraq.;   
Paratroopers would be dropped behind the Iraqi lines in Kuwait.;    Marines
would attempt another amphibious amphibious assault on the shore of Kuwait.;  
 Alliance troops on the Saudi-Kuwaiti border would push across it, slowly
smashing and pushing aside the fortifications the Iraqis have set up along the
frontier.;    The alliance forces Would attempt to engage the elite Republican
guard forces, which number some 105,000, most of which are stationed near
Basra.;    Obstacles: The Iraqi troops are war-tested and have the home
advantage: Protecting Iraq and what they believe to be an extension of their
nation's territory. Iraq could use chemical weapons, which U.S. and Arab
forces could only partially counter. More likely to bog down the alliance is
the static defense line the Iraqis have built up around Kuwait, which include
concrete trenches;   
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx; INTERNATIONAL
FORCES IN THE GULF; Iraqi forces total 1,030,000. A militia may number as many
as 5 million Iraqis. President Saddam Hussein's armaments include 5,500 tanks,
3,500 heavy artillery and more than 500 combat aircraft, along with other
equipment. He is up against an array of International troops and firepower,
some of which is listed below.; Superpowers (includes map); United States:
More than 430,000 military troops or personnel are in the gulf region or on
the way. Deployments could be pushed higher in the event of war. The American
fleet in the gulf and Arabian Sea waters immediately outside totals about 50
ships. The Pentagon has also sent Stealth fighter-bombers and hundreds of
other aircraft.; Soviet Union: One destroyer and an anti-submarine ship.;   
...; Europe (includes map); Belgium: Two mine hunters and a supply ship.;
Britain: Has a flotilla of 10 ships in the gulf and has contributed three
warships, plus about 40 bombers and fighter-jets. Some 35,000 troops sent by
mid-January.; Czechoslovakia: Two hundred chemical warfare experts.; Denmark:
Sent one corvette warship.; France: Fourteen ships, in the gulf or en route,
including the aircraft carrier Clemenceau with anti-tank helicopters, a guided
missile cruiser and two destroyers equipped with anti-ship Exocet missiles,
two frigates and one corvette. A force of 10,000 by mid-January.; Greece: Has
pledged to send its top frigate, the Limos, with a 180-member crew.; Italy:
Two frigates and a support ship are in the gulf. Two corvette warships are in
the eastern Mediterranean off the coast of Turkey.; Netherlands: Has sent one
air defense frigate and one standard frigate. The Dutch navy has sent six
Stinger missiles.; Portugal: Sent a naval support ship.; Spain: Sent one
frigate and two corvette warships.; Germany: Has provided ships to transport
U.S. troops, air fighters to Turkey and promised $2 billion toward
multinational forces, though little money has been received.; ...; Asia
(includes map); Bangladesh: Two thousand troops sent.; Japan: Some $4 billion
pledged, though only $500,000 donated. Handful of medical personnel sent have
since returned.; Pakistan: Thirteen thousand troops sent.; ...; Mideast
(includes map); Egypt: Has sent 29,250 ground troops.; Gulf Cooperation
Council (Saudi Arabia, Bahrain, Oman, United Arab Emirates, Qatar and Kuwait):
In all, GCO and other local Arab troops total 150,000.; Saudi Arabia: Has sent
55,000 soldiers and assorted air and ground weaponry.; Syria: Has sent 21,000
ground troops.; ...; Other countries; Australia: Two guided-missile frigates
and a supply ship.; Canada: Two destroyers and a supply ship; Morocco: Has
sent 1,700 ground troops.; Niger: Has sent 480 ground troops.; Senegal: Has
sent 500 ground troops.;
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx; THE ECONOMY AND
WAR; SHORT WAR SCENARIO; Foreign crude oil (includes graph on prices by
quarter for 1990 and 1991); Key assumptions; A quick, positive solution to
Kuwait crisis achieved this winter.; Oil prices drop below $20 by late spring.
Consumer, business confidence recover, aborting recession after one quarter.; 
  Civilian unemployment (includes graph on unemployment by quarter for 1990
and 1991); Business Impacts;    Economy recovers fast from minirecession; real
GNP jumps 5 % from mid-1991 to mid-1992.; Big-ticket items, housing lead the
charge, spurred by cheaper credit, recovery of confidence.; ...; LONG WAR
SCENARIO; Foreign crude oil (includes graph on prices by quarter for 1990 and
1991); Key assumptions; War with Iraq is neither short nor cheap.; Damage to
gulf oil facilities leaves world short by 2-3 million barrels per day through
1991.; Civilian unemployment (includes graph on unemployment by quarter for
1990 and 1991); Business Impacts; GNP falls 2.3% over four quarters.; Energy
crisis adds two percentage points to 1991 consumer price inflation.;   
Source: DRI/McGraw-Hill;   
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx; GULF CRISIS
TIMELINE; AUGUST; 2: Iraq invades Kuwait. U.N. Security Council condemns
invasion. President Bush freezes Iraqi and Kuwaiti assets in the United
States, bans trade with Iraq and bars Iraqi aircraft and ships from U.S.
ports; 3: Arab League condemns invasion.; 6: U.N. Security Council authorizes
economic sanctions against Iraq. Bush orders U.S. forces to Saudi Arabia in
response to fears of an Iraqi invasion of that country.; 9: U.N. Security
Council declares Iraq's annexation of Kuwait null and void. Saddam Hussein
seals off Iraq's borders, trapping an estimated 550 Americans in Iraq and
3,000 in Kuwait.; 16: U.S. begins intercepting ships carrying goods to or from
Iraq and Kuwait; 18: U.N. Security Council demands that Iraq free all
foreigners.; 25: U.N. Security Council authorizes military action to halt
maritime trade with Iraq.; 28: Iraq declares Kuwait its 19th province. U.S.
expels 36 of 55 personnel from Iraqi Embassy in Washington; SEPTEMBER; 14:
U.N. Security Council orders strict controls on humanitarian food aid to Iraq
and Kuwait.; 25: U.N Security Council authorizes air embargo of Iraq.;
OCTOBER; 1: House votes 380-29 in support of gulf deployment of U.S. troops.;
2: Senate votes 96-3 in favor of deployment.; 30: U.S. forces begin 10-day
amphibious training exercise. Boiler pipe on USS Iwo Jima ruptures; 10 sailors
killed.;    NOVEMBER; 4: Pentagon announces call-up of major reserve combat
units.; 8: Two days after fall elections, Bush orders near doubling of U.S.
forces in the gulf to 400,000 to give the United States an ""adequate offensive
option.""; 15: Saddam says he wants to negotiate with the United States but is
unwilling to leave Kuwait first.; 19: Iraq adds 250,000 troops to the 430,000
already in or near Kuwait.; 29: U.N. Security Council votes 12-2 to authorize
""all means necessary"" to remove Iraq from Kuwait if it does not withdraw by
Jan. 15. It is the first time since the outset of the Korean War that the
United Nations has authorized force against a member nation.; 30: Bush
proposes meetings between the United States and Iraq, saying he wants to ""go
the extra mile for peace.""; DECEMBER; 6: Saddam says all hostages may leave.; 
  JANUARY; 3: Bush proposes talks in Geneva between Secretary of State Jim
Baker and Iraqi Foreign Minister Tariq Aziz.; 4: Iraq accepts Bush's proposal
for talks between Baker and Aziz.; 8: French officials once again promise
peace plan linking Iraqi withdrawal to Arab-Israeli conference.; 9: Baker,
Aziz meet, but talks fail to resolve crisis.; 12: Congress votes to approve
resolution for use of military force.;
xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx; GULF POLLS; Santa
Clara County residents on U.S. action in the gulf; 60% Support; 40% Do not
support; ...; Americans on U.S. action in the gulf; 62% Support; 38% Do not
support; ...; ... And whether congressional approval is needed tor war.; 60%
Need; 40% Do not need; Source: For national figures, The Washington Post and
ABC News. For Santa Clara County figures, The Mercury News  ",5,"[ 0.30944713  0.01320458  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
49,"     Iraq's half-million troops must complete their withdrawal within one week,
and Baghdad must free all prisoners of war in the first 48 hours. Coalition
forces will not attack withdrawing troops, the White House said.;    Bush's
attempt to dictate terms drew strong support from congressional leaders as
well as from officials in London and Paris, key allied capitals.;    In
Moscow, officials unveiled a refinement of their day-old peace plan, moving
closer but not meeting the coalition terms. Claiming support from Iraqi
Foreign Minister Tariq Aziz, a Soviet spokesman said the plan envisioned a
total withdrawal within 21 days of a cessation of hostilities.;    Saddam must
signal ""publicly and authoritatively"" his acceptance of the allied withdrawal
terms, Bush said. He accused the Iraqi leader of launching a ""scorched earth
policy"" in Kuwait by setting fires in the oil fields.;    There was no
immediate response from the Iraqi president, and Fitzwater said that based on
the oil-field destruction, there was ""not much reason for optimism"" that
Saddam was ready to quit the war.;    More than 700,000 allied troops are
deployed against Iraq in the sands of Saudi Arabia, and officials said all is
in readiness for an overwhelming assault by air, land and sea against Iraqi
forces entrenched in Kuwait.;    ""Any breach will bring an instant and sharp
response from coalition forces,"" the spokesman said.;    ""High noon"" would be
marked by clocks at the United Nations, EST, and Fitzwater suggested Saddam
should communicate his acceptance of the conditions to the U.N. Noon in New
York is 8 p.m. in Saudi Arabia and 9 a.m. local time.;    At noon today, U.S.
officials summoned Iraqi diplomat Khalid Shewayish and presented the list of
requirements for a cease-fire. ""This goes to Saddam Hussein,"" said Fitzwater,
""The ball is in his court."";    He said he wouldn't telegraph in advance when
ground action might begin.;    What's in it for Saddam?, Fitzwater was asked.
""A chance to save his country,"" he replied.;    Shortly after Bush issued the
allied ultimatum, a Soviet spokesman in Moscow announced a new six-point set
of provisions he said were agreed to by Aziz for a withdrawal from Kuwait.;   
The provisions include Iraqi withdrawal from Kuwait within 21 days of a
cease-fire and supervision of the withdrawal by the United Nations, Vitaly
Ignatenko said.;    In his initial statement, Ignatenko made no reference to
Bush's ultimatum.;    Ignatenko told the hastily called news conference that
Soviet officials and Aziz had come up with a ""number of new provisions"" on the
peace proposal first set forth Thursday night.;    Ignatenko said the plan had
been passed on to Baghdad and that a final response to it from the Iraqi
leadership was anticipated.;    Asked about the response of Soviet President
Mikhail Gorbachev to Bush's ultimatum, Ignatenko said, ""It's the proposal just
outlined."";    Among the requirements for Iraq, said Fitzwater, was that
withdrawal from Kuwait City must be complete within 48 hours and from the
country of Kuwait in one week.;    Iraq also must release all prisoners of war
and third-country civilians within 48 hours and remove booby traps and mines
from Kuwait.;    Fitzwater's list did not touch on the issue of war
reparations, or discuss what military equipment, if any, the Iraqis would be
forbidden to take back to Iraq with them.;    Bush's statement was his first
public response to a Soviet-brokered peace plan -- an effort the president
said he appreciated, even while he declared that it attached unacceptable
conditions on an Iraqi withdrawal.;    Bush said he had consulted with
Operation Desert Storm coalition leaders and they had agreed to the demands
for Iraq's withdrawal.;    ""We must hear publicly and authoritatively his
acceptance of these terms,"" Bush said. He accused Saddam of launching a
""scorched earth policy"" in Kuwait by setting fires in the oil fields.;    ""The
time has come to make public with specificity just exactly what is required of
Iraq if a ground war is to be avoided,"" Bush said.;    Bush said Saddam ""risks
subjecting the Iraqi people to further hardship unless the Iraqi government
complies fully"" with the demands.;    At the Pentagon, a senior military
official said the diplomatic activity was not derailing the allied war plans.;
   ""Desert Storm continues to swirl on, regardless,"" the official said. ""We
have our plan and we continue to follow it. Round-the-clock air attacks
continue."";    Bush made his comments as members of the allied coalition
arrayed themselves against Iraq and lawmakers were offering their own
assessments.;    Turkish Foreign Minister Ahmet Kurtcebe Alptemocin told
reporters before meeting with Bush at the White House that ""we should not
allow him (Saddam) to withdraw heavy weapons, especially chemical weapons."" He
conceded that imposing such a condition on any settlement ""will be very
difficult."";    Of the original Soviet-brokered peace initiative, British
Prime Minister John Major said it was ""not good enough"" but still an
improvement worth studying. France said the Soviet plan ""represents a step in
the right direction."";    Sen. Richard Lugar, R-Ind., said the
Soviet-sponsored talks with Iraq are ""not in our best interest at all."";   
Rep. Lee Hamilton, D-Ind., said the proposed peace plan had ""very positive
aspects"" but also ""plenty of things wrong with it,"" chiefly a call for lifting
sanctions on Iraq.;    The original Soviet-Iraqi peace plan followed days of
diplomacy between Moscow and Baghdad.  ",5,"[ 0.63011104  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
50,"  IRAQI President Saddam Hussein has sought to tighten his grip on power by
turning over key government roles to trusted family members.;    He has also
taken steps to portray Iraq as committed to ""democratization"" by:;    (check)
Holding autonomy talks with Kurdish leaders.;    (check) Abolishing the secret
Revolutionary Court.;    (check) Easing restrictions on travel and news
organizations.;    (check) Promising to hold elections and disband the ruling
Revolutionary Command Council.;    Threatened by the revolts of the Kurds in
the north and the Shiite Muslims in the south, as well as rumblings in the
army, he has closed his circle around him.;    Since Iraq's defeat, Saddam has
adjusted his Cabinet twice, shifting the portfolios of longtime senior
officials and promoting others known for their loyalty to him.;    On the
surface, the reshuffling looked as if he were moving to democratize.;    In
March, for example, he relinquished the title of prime minister and gave it to
Saadun Hamadi, a Shiite who has held several important positions in the Baath
government.;    Personal loyalty seems to be the litmus test for Saddam's new
appointees:;    (check) His cousin, Ali Hassan al-Majid, is minister of
interior.;    (check) His half-brother, Sibawi, retains direct control of the
intelligence services.;    (check) Son-in-law and former bodyguard Hussein
Kamel al-Majid is his minister of defense.;    Publicly, Saddam is seen on
Iraqi television presiding over meetings of the Revolutionary Command Council
and visiting villages, and he has promised his people to rebuild the country
""scores of times"" better than what the allied forces destroyed.;    But most
experts see Saddam's efforts as aimed at reviving relations with the outside
world and at relieving some of the pressure at home. Only the autonomy talks
with the Kurds are considered serious.; IRAQ; MONTHS OF SANCTIONS ARE TAKING
THEIR TOLL; IRAQ'S economy was severely damaged by the war, and the trade
sanctions imposed by the United Nations shortly after Iraq invaded Kuwait last
August are starting to take a toll.;    Iraq is allowed to import food and
medicine under the sanctions. But until it can export its oil, it will have
little cash to obtain reasonably priced supplies of basic necessities.;   
Many of the goods coming into the country are being bought by private
businessmen with hard currency they stockpiled before the war. They must in
turn sell the goods at high prices to make a profit.;    An ambassador from a
Third World country, who spoke on condition of anonymity, predicted that if
the sanctions were continued six more months it would increase the threat of
internal unrest in Iraq.;    President Bush has said the sanctions will remain
as long as Saddam Hussein is in power. But so far, there is no clear
alternative to Saddam.;    In the meantime, government officials have told
people to brace for the worst.;    Iraqis line up for rationed food and
gasoline and try to make ends meet by taking on second jobs.;    The official
exchange rate for the Iraqi dinar is $3.20. But on the street, it takes 3 to 6
dinars to buy one dollar.;    Before sanctions were imposed in August, two
pounds of rice cost one-fifth of a dinar. Today, it costs 6 dinars. Two pounds
of meat went from 6 dinars in December to 14 now. Tea costs 15 times more now
than it did then.;    The average monthly salary is about 150 dinars, or $480
at the official exchange rate.;    Many small factories have closed or reduced
operations because of shortages.;    Businesses have been told not to expect
help from the government and to rely on their own resources.;    THE
ENVIRONMENT; WAR LEAVES GULF IN ECOLOGICAL RUINS; THE environmental upheaval
caused by the Persian Gulf war is of such proportion and complexity that the
word ""disaster"" seems to trivialize it. The damage is everywhere: in air,
water, earth and fire.;    Smoke and soot continue to pour from hundreds of
oil wells set ablaze by the fleeing army of Iraqi President Saddam Hussein.;  
 KUWAIT; WAR-RAVAGED NATION IS SLOW TO REBUILD; KUWAIT is lacking in
leadership, stripped of its workforce, gutted of supplies and apparently in
little hurry to do anything about it.;    Hundreds of homes, shops, offices,
schools and power plants have been looted -- but not leveled. The estimated
cost of rebuilding has fallen from $100 billion to about $14 billion.;    But
Kuwaiti society seems utterly directionless.;    Few government employees are
back at work. About half the old workers were foreigners, especially
Palestinians, who either fled the country during the war or have been ordered
by the Kuwaiti government to stay off work because of alleged Iraqi
sympathies. Most of the Kuwaiti employees still live abroad.;    The business
areas remain littered with rubble and broken glass. Heavy lifting and sweeping
up are the sort of menial tasks previously left to Filipinos and Bangladeshis,
most of whom left the emirate after the invasion.;    In fact, of the nearly
1.5 million foreigners who lived here a year ago, only about 250,000 remain.; 
  Shortages of basic supplies such as water, electricity and hotel rooms have
hampered efforts by Western companies to make contacts and sign contracts.;   
Last week, the government announced the extension of martial law for another
month, and the prime minister ordered a crackdown on armed vigilantes who have
been rounding up foreigners suspected of collaborating with Iraqi occupation
forces.;    The government itself has contributed to the tension, holding the
first trials of alleged collaborators and handing out harsh sentences for
apparently trivial crimes.;    Western diplomats predict the regime may face
an uprising if the ruling Sabah family fails by year's end to call elections
for a new parliament.;    THE U.S. MILITARY; HIGH-TECH WEAPONS, NEW WAR PLAN
WORKED; THE Pentagon's fascination with sophisticated weaponry appears to have
won a ringing endorsement, thanks to the convincing victory over Iraq. But so
did the revolutionary restructuring of the way the Pentagon commands a war,
forged by Congress five years ago over bitter Defense Department opposition.; 
  The volunteer military proved itself during the conflict, as did the Army's
AirLand Battle doctrine, a previously untested scheme for melding the Army and
Air Force into a fighting force capable of defeating a more numerous foe.;   
Many in the Pentagon are grinning ear-to-ear over the successes in the 43-day
war. But they've also had to acknowledge some unexpected lessons:;    (check)
The Air Force's A-10 Thunderbolt anti-tank plane -- long denigrated by the
service for its lumbering style and ugly profile that earned it the moniker
""Warthog"" -- became its star.;    (check) The vital importance of adequate
ships and planes to ferry troops and weapons to battle -- long derided by a
Navy more enamored of aircraft carriers and battleships -- was underscored.;  
 (check) The wisdom of a new law strengthening the chairman of the Joint
Chiefs of Staff, although originally strenuously opposed by the military,
proved crucial to the quick, decisive triumph.;    (check) The value of at
least some aspects of the limping ""star wars"" program. This includes the
Patriot missiles that were used to counteract Iraqi Scud attacks, though
questions have arisen about just how effective the Patriot was in actually
destroying Scuds.;    But while establishing the prowess of American aircraft
and missiles, the war did little to answer questions about Army hardware,
including the M-1 tank and the Bradley Fighting Vehicle.;    Also untested
were the Marine Corps' new machines for amphibious attack -- large air-cushion
hovercraft designed to carry troops and heavy equipment from ship to shore.
While the threat of a landing tied down six Iraqi divisions defending the
Kuwait coast, there was no amphibious assault from the Persian Gulf.;   
REFUGEES; KURDS HEADING BACK TO HOMES IN NORTH IRAQ; RAGGED and weary, Iraqi
refugees are returning home at the rate of 10,000 a day.;    Roughly 1.7
million of Iraq's 3.5 million Kurds fled to Iran and Turkey during civil
uprisings in late March and early April. In the last two weeks, most of those
on the Turkish border have made their way back to the principal northern Iraqi
cities of Zakho and Dohuk.;    Relief officials and allied troops Saturday
closed the last camp on the Turkish-Iraqi border. Six other camps were emptied
in recent days.;    Figures are sketchy, but the allied command estimates that
fewer than 10 percent of 450,000 Kurds who fled to the Turkish border are
still displaced.;    But there are no accurate assessments of what has
happened to 1.2 million more Kurds who settled in Iranian camps. Iranian
officials were not partners in an international relief effort to help the
Kurds, and information from that region has been difficult to verify.;    And
there are indications that thousands of southern Iraqis may never go home.
Roughly 70,000 Shiite refugees from the Basra region are believed to still be
encamped in Iran because they fear reprisals from Iraqi leader Saddam Hussein.
About 20,000 other Shiites are living in a camp in Saudi Arabia.;    In all,
roughly a quarter of Iraq's 19 million people were either routed from their
homes or lost their jobs as a result of the gulf war, according to estimates
from several relief agencies.;    In the first major assessment of the war,
the environmental group Greenpeace reported last week that as many as 221,000
Iraqi people died as a result of the war and its aftermath. That toll
includes: 100,000 to 120,000 Iraqi troops; 5,000 to 15,000 Iraqi civilians;
20,000 Kurdish and Shiite insurgents; and 15,000 to 30,000 refugees.;    And a
team from Harvard University recently visited Iraq and forecast that more than
170,000 children will die in the coming months from disease and war-related
traumas.;    BURNING WELLS; 500 FIRES STILL RAGE ON KUWAITI OIL FIELDS; Crews
capped the 100th well last weekend in the smoke-darkened gloom of Kuwait's
blazing oil fields, about 20 wells ahead of schedule.;    Oil experts and
firefighters are now predicting that at least half the 500 oil fires still
blazing could be out by the end of summer.;    The four companies fighting the
fires estimate that it will take 13 more months to put out all the fires -- a
much shorter amount of time than had been feared when the world first glimpsed
the awesome spectacle of Kuwait's 600 burning oil wells.;    The current pace
of two wells per day is expected to slow in the coming weeks, however, as
crews turn their attention to the most badly damaged wells. Those could take
up to a month each to control.;    Badly damaged wells will have to be
redrilled. That costs a minimum of $600,000 to $700,000 each.;    Crews have
not yet been able to enter the heart of the Burgan oil field, the most densely
drilled reservoir in the world, where as many as 300 fires are blazing
unchecked. Routes into that field are studded with unexploded cluster bombs
dropped by allied warplanes during the war and have been covered by oil
spewing from damaged wells.;    One well is burning in a blazing oil pool that
is two-thirds of a mile across and growing.;    Puffs of white smoke are
beginning to appear among the dense black clouds billowing from the fields,
ominously indicating the presence of water in the reservoir beneath. If the
water has mixed with the reservoir, Kuwait's oil will, in the future, have to
go through additional processes to strip it of its water content, increasing
production costs.;    Kuwait may lose 10 percent to 20 percent of its reserves
of about 92 billion barrels. But the country should still be producing oil
into the late 21st century.  ",5,"[ 0.65669525  0.01618394  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
51,"
   Now, the U.S. faces the danger of fantasy becoming
reality, and the next 48 hours pose the most vulnerable
period. With the U.S. just beginning to convey a massive
military force to the Persian Gulf region, Iraqi ruler Saddam
Hussein has a window of opportunity of about that much time
to freely deploy his formidable army, possibly unleash his
vast chemical-weapons stockpile and test whether the West's
ships really intend to blockade his oil shipments.
   ""If Saddam is going to move militarily, he's going to do
it very soon,"" says William Cohen of Maine, the ranking
Republican on the Senate Select Committee on Intelligence.
""He won't want to wait until we have everybody in place
there.""
   One flashpoint may come as soon as today, when an
Iraqi-owned supertanker attempts to take on Iraqi oil from
the Saudi oil terminal at Yanbu in the Red Sea. According to
industry and other sources, the Iraqis may be using the ship
to force a confrontation with a powerful U.S. naval force
situated near the port. The U.S. hasn't formally declared a
blockade, but U.S. forces are unlikely to simply let the
Iraqi ship pass.
   Both Iraq and the U.S. yesterday appeared to move closer
to confrontation in their public statements. Iraq declared
that it had formally annexed Kuwait, dropping all pretense
that it intended to pull out of the nation it invaded last
Thursday. Referring to the buildup of Western forces in the
region, Iraq said, ""We will fight your criminal force. . . .
The blood of our martyrs will burn you.""
   President Bush, saying that ""a line has been drawn in the
sand,"" vowed in a televised address that he wouldn't tolerate
the Iraqi occupation of Kuwait. The president stressed that
U.S. troops are intended to defend the Saudi kingdom, not to
drive Iraq out of Kuwait.
   The president said he hopes to free Kuwait through
economic pressure on Saddam Hussein, which continued to mount
as the world's oil-consuming nations -- and, just as
importantly, many of its leading oil producers -- joined
together in a campaign to cut off Iraqi oil without causing
global economic dislocation.
   The Arab world continued trying to sort out its response
to the action in the Middle East. Egyptian President Hosni
Mubarak called for an emergency meeting in Cairo today at
which Arab leaders will agonize over whether to support
putting a multinational army in the path of Saddam Hussein.
King Hussein of Jordan, who had been supportive of Iraq, said
he would refuse to recognize the official annexation that
Saddam Hussein announced yesterday in Bagdhad.
   The most pressing question on the minds of many now is:
Just how tough is Iraq? Its army, battle-trained and wielding
the most modern Soviet-made tanks and air-defense weapons,
has already impressed U.S. experts with the skill and
efficiency of its 2 a.m. blitzkrieg attack on Kuwait last
Thursday.
   Its airpower is no match for the U.S. But on the ground,
where any confrontation would be likely to matter most in the
opening scenes, the Iraqi army is far from the rag-tag
assemblage it was 10 years ago when it first attacked Iran.
   The prospect of facing hundreds of thousands of soldiers
in the desert is daunting enough for the U.S., but Iraq's
chemical arsenal adds an additional dimension to the threat.
The Iraqis have moved surface-to-surface Scud missiles into
Kuwait -- missiles that can carry chemical warheads.
President Bush yesterday singled out chemical weapons. Their
use, he said, ""would be intolerable."" He added: ""It would be
dealt with very, very severely.""
   The potential U.S. response to a chemical weapons attack,
according to U.S. officials, could include raids from B-52's
now positioned on Diego Garcia, a base in the Indian Ocean.
Their most likely aim would be to pulverize Iraq's most
sensitive weapons facilities, including those that produce
chemical weapons and those that are experimenting with
missiles and nuclear and biological weapons. Another possible
bombing target, of course, might be Saddam Hussein himself.
   It remained unclear precisely what force the U.S. is
dispatching to meet the 100,000 or more heavily-armored Iraqi
troops massed on Kuwait's border. President Bush, Secretary
of Defense Richard Cheney and Gen. Colin L. Powell, the
chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, refused to disclose
the size of the force they have committed. ""We will deploy
adequate forces for the mission,"" said Gen. Powell.
   Privately, U.S. officials say the estimates for the
eventual U.S. commitment of troops, which began landing at
Saudi bases yesterday afternoon, go as high as 40,000, and
would include a carefully-tailored mix of light and armored
units that may have to remain there for weeks or months. The
duration of the U.S. commitment will, the officials added,
depend on Iraq's response.
   As time passes without an Iraqi military move, the U.S.
position grows stronger, military experts say. ""Every hour
that goes by without an attack now is good,"" said Paul K.
Davis, director of strategy assessment at the Rand Corp. in
Santa Monica, Calif. ""It indicates that he {Saddam Hussein}
is probably facing up to the fact that things have not gone
his way in the world.""
   Mr. Davis, who previously worked on Middle East deployment
scenarios in the Pentagon, expects that it will take ""days,
not hours"" for the U.S. soldiers and airmen arriving to
acclimate themselves to the hot desert arena where they may
have to fight.
   The use of chemical weapons by Iraq would make the battle
conditions all the more intolerable -- necessitating gas
masks and rubberized suits in an area where temperatures
regularly exceed 100 degrees. ""The really appalling thing for
American forces on the ground is the fact of being forced
into anti-chemical warfare gear which will be quite
intolerable in the desert,"" said Elizabeth Sigmund, a British
chemical-weapon expert. ""Let's hope they don't have to.""
   By her measure, Iraq has stockpiled thousands of tons of
mustard gas, a World War I chemical that burns the skin. It
may also have hundreds of tons of Sarin, a nerve gas
developed from insecticides by the Germans in World War II.
One drop on the skin can cause convulsions and sudden death.
   Among Mr. Bush's advisors, though, Gen. Powell expressed
the most confidence about the outcome. He pointed out that
the 3,000 paratroopers from the 82nd Airborne Division that
were now encamped in the desert, primarily to guard U.S.
fighter aircraft, have been trained to fight in heavy,
charcoal-impregnated chemical weapons gear in the deserts of
California.
   Even the mere threat of chemical weapons may have a
powerful psychological effect on troops and civilians --
especially technicians in the Saudi oil fields, who are
particularly important now that the Saudis are being counted
on to increase oil output significantly.
   But no one can predict the mind of Saddam Hussein. Instead
of ordering his tanks, troops and chemical warheads into
Saudi Arabia, he has the opportunity to create an incident
today, using the supertanker that arrived at the Saudi port
of Yanbu yesterday.
   The port sits at the end of one of the major pipelines
from Iraq's oil fields. If, as some industry and other
officials believe, the captain demands that the Saudis honor
their contractual commitment to fill the tanker, the U.S.
will have to decide whether to stop the giant ship, using the
awesome combat power of the nearby carrier Eisenhower and its
twelve escort ships.
   While pondering his water options, Saddam Hussein must
weigh his major vulnerability to attacks from the air. More
than 100 U.S. aircraft, largely F-15s coming from Langley Air
Force Base in Virginia, have already arrived to augment the
two carriers and their 80 warplanes each.
   Geoffrey Kemp, a former National Security Council Middle
East specialist now at the Carnegie Endowment for
International Peace, says that despite its hard-fought years
up against Iran, the Iraqi army has never before been
confronted with that kind of air power. Indeed, most of
Iran's jet fighters were either destroyed in the early days
of the war or were grounded for lack of spare parts.
   ""I think we're overestimating the ease with which he can
roll into Saudi Arabia,"" Mr. Kemp said.
   Although the sudden U.S. moves to Saudi Arabia may seem
ad-hoc, they draw on the experience of many war games, such
as the one staged in Leavenworth last June by the Army
Materiel Command. The Army's Saudi games began more than ten
years ago, when U.S. and Saudi officials began to worry that
Soviet armored forces could quickly sweep down through Iran
or Iraq and take the oil fields. U.S. policy assumed then
that the Saudis would not give U.S. forces basing rights, at
least not in the initial stages of a conflict.
   The real-life scenario began Saturday when, according to
Mr. Cheney, the White House began planning to send him to
Saudi Arabia. The following afternoon, he and Robert Gates,
the president's deputy advisor for national security; Paul
Wolfowitz, Mr. Cheney's top policy aide; and Gen. H. Norman
Schwarzkopf, soon to become overall commander of the growing
nucleus of U.S. forces, were aloft.
   In Jeddah, after two hours of discussion, King Fahd, the
Saudi ruler, gave his approval to the military options the
U.S. officials presented. As Mr. Cheney put it, the Arab
leaders agreed that Saddam Hussein's menacing behavior
""represented a qualitative shift in the rules of behavior"" in
the Middle East.
   After the Sunday meeting, Mr. Cheney immediately called
President Bush and the president authorized him to give the
orders to the Joint Chiefs to set their plans in motion,
assigning specific U.S. units. The orders were issued Monday
evening, and the first U.S. unit to move -- believed to be
the command staff of Gen. Schwarzkopf's Central Command at
Tampa, Fla. -- took off at 7:30 a.m. EDT Tuesday.
   By midnight, paratroopers of the Ready Brigade of the 82nd
Airborne Division, the nation's most often-alerted unit, were
lining up at Pope Air Force Base in Fayetteville, N.C., to
take their places on the hard, nylon-webbing seats in the
transports that would carry them and their hastily-assembled
gear on the long trip across the Atlantic.
   Meanwhile, flight after flight of F-15's was taking off
from Langley Air Force Base heading east, seeking the line of
airborne tankers that were hovering, mid-ocean, to refuel
them. What military planners call the ""aluminum bridge""
across the Atlantic was now in operation.
   Hundreds of Air Force reservists -- men and women with
practiced skills in the art of airlifts -- were moving across
the U.S. to help prepare other units. Army reservists
prepared mechanized infantry units, which will likely use
eight fast ""roll on roll off"" ships to carry them across the
Atlantic and through the Suez Canal.
   In the Indian Ocean, the Navy was moving special
pre-positioned ships toward the Gulf from their base at Diego
Garcia. They are designed to supply Marine forces, which can
be flown rapidly from U.S. bases to ""marry up"" with their
equipment at points where the ships arrive. Indeed, according
to the Associated Press, hundreds of marines had already
appeared last night near Khafji, an oil-terminal city near
the Saudi border with Kuwait where the Japanese-owned Arabian
Oil Co. operates. That may indicate that the job of
protecting the oil fields belongs to the Marines.
   Gen. Powell dismissed concerns that the early arrivals
might face the greatest danger, saying that fighters and
attack aircraft from the carrier Independence, believed to be
in the Gulf of Oman, were close enough to the Saudi shore to
provide air cover to the arriving troops. The Eisenhower,
from its position in the Red Sea, can also hit Iraq. Soon a
third carrier task force, led by the Saratoga, will arrive in
the Eastern Mediterreanean, putting it within lethal range.
That group includes the battleship Wisconsin, carrying cruise
missiles that can be aimed precisely toward Iraqi targets.
   Each carrier hauls a kind of mini-Air Force, including
radar search planes and planes specially equipped to jam
enemy communications and radars, along with a powerful
assemblage of bombers and fighters. The planes use special
""buddy stores,"" or refueling kits that would allow them to
reach their targets in the area -- generally more than 600
miles, or a little more than an hour's flying time, away --
and return safely.
   Summing up his views of the potential enemy, Gen. Powell
said, ""We view them as a capable military force. But they're
not invincible and they're not ten feet tall.""
",5,"[ 0.29459793  0.00484879  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
52,"
   Even as Saddam Hussein was searching for a ploy to ease
his isolation, though, the international pressure against him
clicked up another notch. The White House yesterday disclosed
that Kuwait's ousted government has formally asked the U.S.
to enforce the total trade embargo the United Nations has
imposed on Iraq, allowing the U.S. and other nations to
immediately begin stopping ships carrying Iraqi goods.
   Secretary of State James Baker, speaking on ABC News'
""This Week,"" said the Kuwaiti request gives the U.S. and
other countries ""a legal basis for stopping the export of oil
and that sort of thing."" The U.S. maintains that under the
U.N. charter, the Kuwaiti request triggers steps for the
collective enforcement of international sanctions.
   Mr. Baker declined to use the word blockade, but said that
""interdiction"" of Iraqi shipments would begin ""almost
instantly."" In a statement, the White House said it would do
""whatever is necessary"" to ensure compliance with the
sanctions.
   Other Bush administration officials said that the
international naval force in the area -- consisting of
American, British, French, Canadian, Soviet, German and
Australian ships -- may be used both to stop oil exports from
leaving Iraq and Kuwait and to stop shipments of food and
other goods from going in. President Bush implied as much
yesterday when reporters asked whether the interdiction would
apply to food. The president responded, ""Everything,
everything."" While shying away from actually using the word
""blockade,"" Mr. Bush acknowledged that the U.S. and others
were trying to block shipping to Iraq. ""No point getting into
all these semantics,"" he said. ""The main thing is to stop the
oil from coming out of there.""
   The naval interdiction force is part of an overall
American strategy that officials say is designed to leave the
Iraqi leader with only the stark choice of backing out of
Kuwait or launching new attacks to change his situation.
Though they insist they aren't trying to lure Saddam Hussein
into an attack, officials hope that if he strikes again, the
U.S. and its allies will have such an impressive force in
place in Saudi Arabia that they will be able to crush him in
retaliation.
   Iraq's first option, of course, may be simply to sit tight
and hope it can endure a trade embargo longer than the West
can live without Iraqi and Kuwaiti oil. Speaking on the ABC
program, Abdul Amir al-Anbari, Iraq's ambassador to the U.N.,
asserted that an embargo on Iraq could plunge the U.S. into a
""depression"" and the rest of the world into an economic
""crisis.""
   Iraq clearly is trying to woo back more Arab support in
case the conflict drags on, hoping that its neighbors
eventually will help it survive a prolonged war of economic
attrition with the West. So Saddam Hussein on Friday tried to
scare other Arab leaders into supporting him by calling on
Arabs to rise up in a holy war against leaders who invited
American and other Western soldiers into Saudi Arabia to
protect the oil-rich kingdom.
   Then yesterday, he tried to entice Arab leaders with his
proposal for a diplomatic solution linking his occupation of
Kuwait with Israel's occupation of the West Bank. The
proposal also called for replacing American and other Western
troops in Saudi Arabia with Arab forces. The Bush
administration immediately said it ""categorically"" rejects
the proposals. And President Bush yesterday, asked whether he
was at least glad Iraq is discussing negotiations, replied:
""I don't see anything to be pleasing in there at all.""
   American strategists are calculating, though, that the
trade sanctions -- enforced by an effective though perhaps
undeclared naval blockade -- will hold tightly enough to
convince Iraq that it will lose in the long run by simply
standing pat.
   At that point, rather than go through the humiliation of
backing out of Kuwait, the Iraqis might well conclude that
they need to lash out in some way to shake things up. In that
event, Saddam Hussein appears to have three choices.
   The first would be to launch the much-feared direct
invasion of Saudi Arabia, hoping to seize some Saudi oil
fields and improve his bargaining position. But that option
is growing less and less likely as thousands of American,
British, Egyptian, Syrian and Moroccan forces assemble in and
around Saudi Arabia to protect the kingdom. The Saudis even
have in their possession 48 Kuwaiti jet fighters, virtually
the entire Kuwaiti air force, which managed to escape the
Iraqi invasion, Saudi officials said. The Saudi ""window of
vulnerability . . . is closing very fast,"" Prince Bandar bin
Sultan, the Saudi ambassador to Washington, said over the
weekend.
   The second possibility would be to start a fight with
Israel, in hopes that all Arabs would have to move behind
Iraq in a fight against their common Israeli enemy. In such
an event, Saddam Hussein also might calculate, the Saudis
would be under pressure to kick out U.S. troops because of
America's close ties with Israel.
   Iraq could start hostilities with Israel either through a
direct attack or by attacking Jordan. Israel has publicly
declared that it will respond to an Iraqi attack on Jordan
because it won't allow Iraq's dangerous army to take control
of Jordan's long border with Israel.
   Iraq's third attack option would be to start an undeclared
war on the U.S. and other Western nations through terrorism.
Two Middle East terrorists with records of successful attacks
against Western targets, Abu Nidal and Abu Abbas, have ties
to Baghdad. And even terrorist groups that opposed Iraq in
its war with Iran show signs of swinging behind Saddam
Hussein now that he is in a confrontation with the U.S.
   And Iraq still has thousands of Americans and other
Westerners under its control in Iraq and Kuwait. They aren't
being allowed to leave and could become hostages.
   If Iraq chooses a simple war of nerves and economic
attrition, the Bush administration knows a long stalemate
could try the patience of the American public and the West in
general, and could open the possibility that moderate Arabs
-- even including Saudi Arabia -- might drop out of the
effort against Iraq and accept some deal from Saddam Hussein.
   But U.S. officials have sized up Saddam Hussein as a man
who, despite some recklessness, will back down if he must.
""This is a guy who is impulsive, and therefore capable of big
miscalculations,"" says one senior administration official
involved in managing the crisis. The official adds, though,
that ""at the same time, we think he is someone who is capable
of rational judgments when it comes to power. And when he
finds something is unprofitable, then one can see certain
accommodations.""
   Thus, administration aides will be trying to calculate
whether Saddam Hussein's proposed diplomatic formula for
getting out of Kuwait represents the first sign he is
searching for a way out or simply is a public relations
stunt.
   There are disagreements among experts about how much
pressure will be needed to make Saddam Hussein decide he's up
against the wall and whether simple economic pressure will
ever be enough. The biggest worry is that if he decides he
needs a way out of his predicament but doesn't see a
face-saving method, he could lash out in dangerous and
unpredictable ways.
   U.S. officials claim they already see signs Saddam Hussein
is getting nervous. In the first days after President Bush
announced the dispatching of U.S. troops, they note, the
Iraqi leader made several nationwide addresses indirectly --
having them read by a television announcer. ""That shows he's
nervous about pinpointing his location, either because he's
afraid we'll find him, or that internal enemies will,"" says
one U.S. official.
   The unpredictability of Iraq's leader is a principal
reason the U.S. is going to such great lengths to build a
mammoth force in and around Saudi Arabia. Pentagon officials
say the goal is to put 40,000 troops in the region by the end
of the month. But the administration isn't putting any upper
limit on how high the force could go after that, calculating
that it would be a mistake to underestimate and an advantage
to keep Saddam Hussein guessing. U.S. commanders in charge of
planning for Middle East crises have indicated in the past
that they were capable of deploying as many as 300,000
troops.
   And the U.S. is taking similar steps to ensure that its
naval force is adequate to carry out a blockade of Iraq and
support a war if necessary. Over the weekend, Pentagon
officials confirmed reports that a fourth U.S. aircraft
carrier -- the John F. Kennedy -- and its powerful group of
support ships could head for the Middle East within a few
days. Three other carriers and their escort vessels already
are stationed within striking distance of Iraq or are
steaming toward the area.
   But unless the military situation changes drastically,
military officials say, the most likely plan will be for the
Kennedy to eventually replace the carrier Dwight D.
Eisenhower, which has been on patrol since March and was
scheduled to return to port before hostilities erupted in
Kuwait.
   ---
   Andy Pasztor contributed to this article.
",5,"[ 0.27622166  0.00636487  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
53,"
   Nevertheless, the Iraqi formula came close enough to
meeting Mr. Bush's frequent demands for an ""unconditional
withdrawal"" that the U.S. will find it hard to dismiss it out
of hand -- and equally hard to launch a bloody ground war
while the proposal remains pending. The plan actually
contains the seeds of a significant political victory for Mr.
Bush, if he can nurture it successfully. And Press Secretary
Marlin Fitzwater said last night that the U.S. would study
the plan.
   Mr. Fitzwater said that President Bush, in a lengthy
telephone conversation, told Mr. Gorbachev he has ""serious
concerns"" about the plan. For now, the allies will ""continue
to prosecute the war,"" he added. In fact, some military
officials said allied bombing likely would intensify while
diplomatic maneuvering continues so that more Iraqi targets
can be destroyed before a possible cease-fire begins.
   Rep. Lee Hamilton, for one, last night said that while the
proposal has deficiencies it goes far enough that the U.S.
should postpone a ground war for now while continuing
military pressure in other ways. The Indiana Democrat, a
senior member of the Foreign Affairs Committee, admitted that
the plan presents a dilemma for the U.S., but said it ""far
advances any previous proposal.""
   Most important, last night's plan was the first Iraqi
withdrawal offer that wasn't encumbered by any linkage to
other Middle East problems, notably the Palestinian issue.
That has been the main sticking point that has brought prompt
Bush administration objections to past formulas from Baghdad
and Moscow.
   The survival of a still-potent Saddam Hussein would be a
problem not only for President Bush but for many of America's
chief allies, particularly Israel. And many leaders of Arab
coalition partners -- Egypt, Saudi Arabia and Syria --
privately have been hoping the U.S. will proceed with the
crushing ground assault on Iraqi troops that seemed imminent
before the Iraqi announcement. Having enraged Saddam Hussein,
leaders of those Arab states aren't eager to live with him.
   Yet some allied Arab officials also worry about the sight
of their American friends gunning down hundreds or thousands
of Arab soldiers from Iraq; this may leave them as torn now
as Mr. Bush.
   Above all, the U.S. will be unhappy that the plan would
remove economic sanctions after only two-thirds of Iraqi
forces are withdrawn. In addition, it doesn't set a specific,
speedy timetable for a withdrawal, and it would cancel all
U.N. resolutions that provide for postwar punishment. Those
aspects of the plan might allow Saddam Hussein time to
withdraw all his military gear, and to quickly rebuild his
economy so that he can purchase new weapons.
   And there are other questions. The Soviets said more
details will be announced today, which carries potential
promise and peril for the plan's success. The U.S. is also
growing suspicious of the Soviet role in rescuing its old
ally, Iraq. And it's clear that Iraq, like the U.S., isn't
going to stop its armed actions in the meantime; the Moscow
announcement barely had been delivered when Iraqi Scud
missile attacks were reported near eastern Saudi Arabia.
   So President Bush seems certain to press for changes in
the Soviet-Iraqi formula that would allow the United Nations
Security Council to leave economic sanctions in place. He'll
also want a timetable for withdrawal that would force Saddam
Hussein to leave much of his weaponry behind, as well as
assurances that the U.N. can continue pressing Iraq to pay
war reparations.
   ""Let's be very cautious,"" said Sen. Robert Dole, the
Senate minority leader and a close White House ally. ""Let's
remember that Saddam Hussein may be playing a stalling game.""
   But Mr. Bush also now seems caught in the gap between the
formal war aims he and the United Nations have proclaimed --
which focus narrowly on Iraq's withdrawal from Kuwait and the
restoration of Kuwait's rulers -- and the allies' unofficial
desire to do away with Saddam Hussein's regime along the way.
   The announcement of the peace plan in Moscow occurred only
hours after Saddam Hussein had delivered a defiant speech in
Baghdad in which he seemed to dare the U.S. and its allies to
launch a ground attack to drive his troops out of Kuwait.
That speech now looks as if it was an attempt to deliver a
final rhetorical blast to save face in the Arab world before
seeking a diplomatic cover for withdrawal.
   The eight-point Iraqi proposal, a response to a plan put
forward by Soviet President Mikhail Gorbachev, was read by
Vitaly Ignatenko, a Soviet spokesman, around 2:30 a.m. Moscow
time (6:30 p.m. EST).
   ""It is possible to find a way out of the military conflict
in the Gulf,"" Mr. Ignatenko announced. He then proceeded to
outline a plan he said Iraq had accepted under which Iraq
would stage a ""full and unconditional withdrawal"" from
Kuwait. The pullout would begin on the second day after
hostilities stopped -- an apparent reference to a cease-fire.
It would occur in an unspecified, but ""fixed,"" time frame.
   U.N. economic sanctions against Iraq would be lifted once
two-thirds of the Iraqi troops had withdrawn. After the
withdrawal, the U.N. resolutions condemning and punishing
Iraq for its invasion of Kuwait would cease to exist. Once
the ceasefire had taken effect, all prisoners of war would be
released.
   The withdrawal of Iraqi forces would be monitored by
countries appointed by the U.N. Security Council that aren't
directly involved in the war. Further details of how the plan
would work were still being worked out in Moscow and are to
be forwarded to the security council sometime today.
   The eight points contained some elements that Mr. Bush had
privately told Moscow just this week that he needed in any
deal, including freeing of war prisoners and a timetable for
withdrawal. If Iraq really is prepared to withdraw from
Kuwait, which it proudly proclaimed for six months as its
permanent ""19th province,"" Mr. Bush could frame that alone as
a significant diplomatic and political victory.
   It would look particularly stunning because it would have
been achieved with a surprisingly low level of U.S.
casualties -- 20 U.S. soldiers killed in combat and 23
American planes lost in fighting to date. Moreover, the
administration could at least hope that the political
humiliation of a withdrawal after the damage his country has
endured would undercut Saddam Hussein at home and eventually
cause him to be toppled from within.
   But the plan was vague on many details, such as just what
the timetable for withdrawal would be. And it was silent on
other points Mr. Bush sought, such as Iraqi help in clearing
mines from Kuwait.
   U.S. officials have speculated all along that Saddam
Hussein might choose survival over continued occupation of
Kuwait when he thought his options were that stark. Iraq's
acceptance of the agreement suggests that, after 35 days of
ferocious bombing by U.S. and allied warplanes, the Iraqi
leader now may see that his position has become too
precarious.
   But for precisely that same reason, some U.S. officials
have grown increasingly eager to press on with the war to
finish off Iraq's military machine while the chance is
available. What's more, officials suggest that they have
hoped not only to drive his forces out of Kuwait but also to
deliver a death blow along the way to the elite Republican
Guard that have been instrumental in keeping Saddam Hussein
in power.
   Officials now suggest, in fact, that a central purpose of
the land offensive wouldn't be simply to drive Iraqi troops
out of Kuwait but to destroy the Republican Guard units
sitting along the Kuwait-Iraq border. Those units are
essential to Saddam Hussein both politically and militarily,
for the Guards are his best fighters as well as the trusted
home guard that protects him from coups and military
insurrection from within.
   By bloodying the Guards now, the U.S. may hope to make it
more difficult for Saddam Hussein to survive and cause
trouble down the road, even if he is left standing when the
war ends.
   For this reason, officials say the relentless allied
bombardment of bridges crossing the Tigris and Euphrates
rivers has been aimed not only at cutting supply lines but
also at making it more difficult for the Guards to escape
with their heavy equipment to the north when fighting
intensifies. ""They want to destroy the Republican Guard,""
said one person familiar with the thinking of the U.S.
military command in Saudi Arabia.
   Now, the Bush administration has to face the prospect of
giving up that hope. And that is a problem for America's Arab
friends as well. Saddam Hussein just yesterday viciously
attacked both Egyptian President Hosni Mubarak and Saudi
Arabian King Fahd in his radio address, calling them lackeys
of the U.S. and traitors to the Arab and Islamic worlds --
and virtually inviting their overthrow or slaying. Saudi
leaders, in particular, don't want the war to stop until
Saddam Hussein is out of power because they must share a
long, thinly guarded border with an Iraq that even now could
remain militarily more powerful than the thinly populated
Saudi kingdom.
   Syrian President Hafez Assad will be equally chagrined if
Saddam Hussein, also a neighbor of Syria, is still around to
make trouble. Syria has hoped that the demise of his regime
would increase Syrian power in the region.
   Egypt's Mr. Mubarak is likely to have more ambivalent
feelings. He, too, would be more comfortable if Saddam
Hussein were finished. But in Egypt, more than in Saudi
Arabia, there was growing popular sentiment not to
participate in a ground war in which Iraqi soldiers might be
slaughtered.
   For Israel, there also would be unhappiness if Saddam
Hussein's military machine isn't further dismantled in war.
Still, no matter how the diplomatic maneuvering turns out,
Israel already has seen the Iraqi chemical, biological and
nuclear weapons capabilities it most feared wiped out by
allied bombing raids.
   For the U.S., one of the public complaints is likely to
involve the failure of the plan to comply with all 12 U.N.
resolutions passed to compel Iraq to leave Kuwait. But in
fact, many of them either aren't binding or have been
overtaken by events.
   Five of the resolutions deal with various aspects of the
economic embargo. Others pertain to such matters as the
treatment of embassies in Kuwait City, which are now closed,
and to freeing Western hostages, who were released before the
war started. The murkiest U.N. statement deals with
reparations or war-crimes charges Iraq might have to face
after the war. Though the Security Council voted to hold Iraq
liable for war damages and invited countries to collect
evidence for a possible judicial process later, no such
process was actually established.
   The broader dilemma is that the proposal forces Mr. Bush
to make a choice he had hoped to avoid: between the prospect
of achieving the minimum goal of freeing Kuwait without
further bloodshed, and the chance to crush President Hussein
and his military might at the risk of a bloody ground war.
   By presenting Mr. Bush with that choice, Saddam Hussein
may not only be posing an agonizing decision but finally
taking a step toward splitting the extraordinary
international coalition that Mr. Bush built -- many of whose
members will want to accept the Iraqi withdrawal and declare
victory.
   And the Soviets, whose help was instrumental in pressing
the anti-Iraq campaign at the U.N., certainly will urge
American acceptance. That, too, poses a dilemma for Mr. Bush.
   Increasingly Mr. Gorbachev's Kremlin, which is influenced
more and more by oldline military officers and party
hardliners, has seemed to want to preserve its old ally,
Saddam Hussein, to ensure Soviet influence in the Middle
East. That makes U.S. officials suspect Soviet motives as a
peacemaker -- and also raises questions about whether the
diplomatic process now under way could lead to a less
hospitable new order in the region than the U.S. had once
hoped.
                                                                                                       

   Walter S. Mossberg contributed to this article.
   ---
                 The Persian Gulf War
                                                                                                       

   Aug. 2 Iraq invades Kuwait.
                                                                                                       

   Jan. 16 U.S.-led forces launch air attacks on Iraq aimed
at driving Saddam Hussein's troops from Kuwait. The response
from Iraq's military is limited.
                                                                                                       

   Jan. 17 Baghdad tries to draw Israel into the conflict by
firing missiles at major cities in the Jewish state. The
anti-Iraq coalition presses its air assault.
                                                                                                       

   Jan. 20 Saddam Hussein's army lobs a barrage of Scud
missiles at Saudi Arabia, but batteries of U.S.-made Patriot
missiles intercept the weapons.
                                                                                                       

   Jan. 22 Iraq sets fire to oil facilities inside Kuwait,
U.S. officials say, in an apparent attempt to disrupt aerial
bombardment and surveillance. An Iraqi missile strikes Tel
Aviv.
                                                                                                       

   Jan. 24 The Gulf hostilities expand to the sea as U.S.
forces capture a small Kuwaiti island and as a Saudi warplane
downs two Iraqi jets that may have been hunting allied ships.
                                                                                                       

   Jan. 25 The U.S. says Iraq releases millions of gallons of
oil into the Persian Gulf.
                                                                                                       

   Jan. 27  The U.S. bombs Iraqi-controlled oil facilities in
Kuwait in an attempt to stanch the mammoth spill.
                                                                                                       

   Jan. 28 Scores of Iraqi planes flee into Iran in an
apparent attempt to avoid U.S.-led raids.
                                                                                                       

   Jan. 29 Bush delivers his State of the Union address and
says the U.S. ""will prevail"" in forcing Iraq from Kuwait.
                                                                                                       

   Jan. 30 A dozen U.S. Marines are killed as Iraqi soldiers
launch ground assaults against allied forces, crossing into
Saudi Arabia and battling in and around the town of Khafji.
                                                                                                       

   Feb. 5 Bush says he is ""somewhat skeptical"" that air power
alone will force Iraqi troops to leave Kuwait, as new
intelligence reports suggest Iraq's ability to resist a
ground offensive is diminishing rapidly.
                                                                                                       

   Feb. 12 Iraq says it is ready to work with the Soviet
Union to end the war.
                                                                                                       

   Feb. 13 U.S. bombs hit what Iraq calls a bomb shelter in
Baghdad, killing scores of civilians. The U.S. says the
facility was a military communications center.
                                                                                                       

   Feb. 15 Iraq says it is prepared to discuss withdrawing
from Kuwait if certain conditions are met. Bush rejects the
offer as a ""cruel hoax.""
                                                                                                       

   Feb. 18 Moscow offers Iraq a plan to end the war. The plan
appears to demand an unconditional withdrawal from Kuwait but
offers in return some assurances that Baghdad's government
will remain.
                                                                                                       

   Feb. 19 Bush, appearing intent on launching a ground
attack against Iraq, says the Soviet plan falls short of his
conditions for ending the fighting.
                                                                                                       

   Feb. 21 Iraq responds positively to a Soviet proposal for
the withdrawal of Baghdad's forces from Kuwait.
",5,"[  9.92030240e-01   5.54022689e-04   1.76053898e-02 ...,   0.00000000e+00
   0.00000000e+00   0.00000000e+00]"
54,"
   ""So far, the offensive is progressing with dramatic
success,"" said a buoyant Gen. Norman Schwarzkopf, commander
of U.S. forces. Similarly, while cautioning about the
uncertainty of early battle reports, White House spokesman
Marlin Fitzwater said late yesterday that ""the operation has
been very successful."" Amid reports that thousands of Iraqi
soldiers had surrendered, administration aides were also
upbeat in private, with one even talking of victory within a
week.
   But even continued military success carries political and
diplomatic risks for President Bush and the U.S. The allied
rejection of the last-minute Soviet-led diplomatic effort to
avoid the ground war enabled Mr. Bush to seize the initiative
from an Iraq seemingly bent on dictating peace terms. But it
has offended some, especially in Arab countries, who now
believe that Mr. Bush's real objectives are the demise of
Saddam Hussein and the destruction of the Iraqi military, not
just the liberation of Kuwait.
   ""Why have a war?"" asked Abdul Latif Shekar, a customs
officer in Egypt, a country participating in the attack on
Iraqi troops. ""I think the Gorbachev plan was a good one.
Iraq was ready to withdraw."" Now, he says, ""it looks like the
West just wants to destroy Iraq.""
   Despite the early indications of success, the allied
forces could still suffer greater casualties and become
bogged down militarily, especially when they encounter the
tough Republican Guard, which is entrenched along the
Iraq-Kuwait border. If so, and if it appears that the
American goal actually is to destroy the Iraqi regime even at
the cost of badly hurting Iraqi society, ""the lingering cost
of that could be high,"" worries former national security
adviser Zbigniew Brzezinski. But, he notes, ""If everything
crumbles totally, that won't be such a problem.""
   American officials staunchly disavow any interest in
driving through Iraq toward Baghdad, either in pursuit of
Saddam Hussein himself or to set up some American-controlled
government inside Iraq. The Americans say their battle plans
call for operating against forces inside Iraq as far north as
the city of Basra, about 30 miles north of Kuwait, but say
there isn't any plan to drive beyond that.
   Indeed, French President Francois Mitterrand said
yesterday that some allied forces are crossing Iraqi
territory as part of a ""pincer"" movement to trap the soldiers
occupying Kuwait, but insisted, ""The purpose isn't to invade
Iraqi territory, that's not the aim, that isn't the mandate.""
   Nevertheless, American officials over the weekend became
more open in declaring that by destroying Saddam Hussein's
military machine they hope to destroy his regime -- a goal
likely to be supported by most Americans.
   In a pre-attack message, Lt. Gen. Walter Boomer, the top
Marine in the Persian Gulf, told U.S. Marines that their goal
is to ""restore {Kuwait} to its citizens."" He went on to add
that ""in so doing you not only return a nation to its people,
but you will destroy the war machine of a ruthless dictator.""
   Secretary of State James Baker said on ABC-TV's ""This Week
With David Brinkley"" that the series of United Nations
resolutions condemning Iraq's invasion of Kuwait ""imply that
the restoration of peace and stability in the Gulf would be a
heck of a lot easier if he and that leadership were not in
power in Iraq.""
   Of course, it is still far too early to assume that the
military situation on the ground will stay as smooth for
allied forces as it appears to have been so far. Iraq still
has the potential to cause significant problems by using
forces and weapons that don't yet seem fully engaged.
   For one thing, Iraq still apparently hasn't unleashed its
stockpile of chemical weapons. Gen. Schwarzkopf said that
some early reports that chemical weapons were used against
allied troops turned out to be ""bogus."" Iraq is believed to
have the ability to deliver chemical weapons in artillery
shells or, perhaps, atop Soviet-made Frog7 missiles.
   Perhaps more important, it appears that allied troops
haven't yet fully engaged Iraq's vaunted Republican Guard,
which has been sitting just north of the Iraq-Kuwait border
and is considered the most potent element in the Iraqi
defense. It remains to be seen how much damage the allied air
campaign was able to inflict on the Guard, and whether
President Hussein will commit his most valued troops to a
fight-to-the-death finish.
   Certainly Saddam Hussein continues to implore his country
to fight on. ""Fight them,"" he urged Iraqis in a radio
address. ""All Iraqis, fight them with all the power you have,
and all struggle for everything.""
   American war planners have long assumed that the early
stage of the ground attack, in which American forces would
use their speed to sweep around Iraqi defenses and their
strength to punch through the relatively weak Iraqi front
line, would be the easiest part.
   Despite these early successes, the mere fact that a ground
campaign has begun almost guarantees that the Bush
administration will face fresh problems growing out of the
military situation. There are likely to be additional
American prisoners of war taken, and there are signs that
President Hussein is taking Kuwaiti hostages. U.S. and
Kuwaiti officials say there are reports that large numbers of
civilians from Kuwait City are being rounded up and held by
Iraqi troops, apparently either for use as human shields or
for use later in bargaining once the war is over.
   President Bush's political argument for going to a ground
war has been strengthened by the growing stream of reports of
wanton Iraqi destruction inside Kuwait. U.S. officials say
that hundreds of Kuwaiti oil wells now may have been set
afire. And Robert Gates, Mr. Bush's deputy national security
adviser, asserted in an interview on the Cable News Network
that Iraqi troops have set fire to ""large sections"" of Kuwait
City.
   Mr. Bush and his aides were leaning toward a military
conclusion of the crisis even before the latest reports of
Iraqi atrocities in Kuwait came to light. The president and
his top aides tentatively decided on Feb. 11 that a ground
war would be necessary. The decision was made after Defense
Secretary Dick Cheney and Gen. Colin Powell, chairman of the
Joint Chiefs of Staff, returned from a visit with military
commanders in Saudi Arabia, administration officials say.
Then, a week or so ago, Gen. Schwarzkopf secretly picked
Saturday night as the optimal time to start the offensive.
   The date was unaffected by the last-ditch Soviet peace
initiative. The real problem with the Soviet proposals, U.S.
officials now say, was that they all would have required
lifting economic sanctions against Iraq. The Bush
administration considers the sanctions essential to keeping
Saddam Hussein under control should he survive the war.
   Mr. Bush forestalled further diplomatic maneuvering by
issuing an ultimatum on behalf of the allies demanding that
Iraq withdraw within a week, starting at noon Saturday.
Administration aides said that the idea of the ultimatum was
Gen. Powell's. He argued setting an explicit deadline for
Saddam Hussein to break would, when it was broken, give the
U.S. military a clear green light to proceed.
   In setting out his final challenge to Saddam Hussein, Mr.
Bush continued the intensive personal diplomacy he began
after the invasion last August. After cabling world leaders
about his intention to give Saddam Hussein a final deadline
to exit Kuwait, he offered him a week to withdraw fully,
instead of the four days he originally considered, because of
objections from some European partners that four days seemed
punitive and unrealistic.
   And when he and President Gorbachev spoke about the
decision in a talk lasting nearly an hour, the President took
pains to listen to what his counterpart had to say, although
he already had decided that the Soviet alternative to the
allied deadline was unacceptable.
   Finally, when Iraq failed to respond to the U.S.
ultimatum, Mr. Bush let the ground offensive begin as
previously planned Saturday night.
   The attack was lightning quick, as allied forces punched
through tall sand berms on the border and pushed forward into
Iraq and Kuwait. U.S. Marines were said to have breached
troublesome mine fields along the Iraqi lines but Pentagon
officials said no amphibious assault on Kuwait's beaches had
begun. Long columns of Iraqi prisoners of war could be seen
trudging through the desert toward the allied rear. U.S.
commanders said 5,500 Iraqi prisoners were taken in the first
hours of the ground war, though some military officials later
said the total may have climbed above 8,000.
   The U.S. hopes its troops will drive Iraqi forces out of
Kuwait quickly, leaving much of Iraq's offensive military
equipment destroyed or abandoned in Kuwait. It expects that
tens of thousands of Iraqi soldiers will surrender to the
U.S. and its allies over the next few days.
   If the allies succeed, Saddam Hussein will have plunged
his country first into a fruitless eight-year-long war
against Iran and then into a humiliating war against the U.S.
and the allies to defend his conquest of Kuwait, leaving much
of his country's military establishment and modern
infrastructure in ruins.
   Meanwhile, the U.S. hopes, economic sanctions and an
international arms embargo will remain in effect until Iraq
pays war reparations to Kuwait to cover war damages. That
would undermine any chances of rebuilding either Iraq or its
armed forces in short order as long as Saddam Hussein remains
in power. The American hope is that someone from within Iraq,
perhaps from the army's professional ranks, will step forward
and push Saddam Hussein aside so that the country can begin
recovering from the disaster.
   Outside analysts think Saddam Hussein's position is indeed
precarious. ""I think frankly Saddam is finished, no matter
what happens,"" says Christine Helms, a Middle East scholar
who has written extensively about Iraq. ""These guys simply
don't retire to condos over the Euphrates.""
   Despite the lack of any obvious successors, the Iraqi
leader's internal power base appeared to be narrowing even
before the war began. Some analysts say he appeared to be
relying on a smaller and smaller circle of close advisers and
relatives. If that's true, the narrowing of his support would
make it easier for someone to push him aside from within.
   Yet, paradoxically, the perception that the U.S. wants to
destroy Iraq may increase Saddam Hussein's support within the
Iraqi military. And the U.S. now will face sharper questions
in the Arab world since it didn't back the peace proposals
worked out in Moscow. ""We looked to the United States, we
expected you to have the moral edge,"" says Nasser Tahboub, a
Jerusalem-born Jordanian who has an American wife and a
doctorate in political science from Duke University. ""Now we
see that edge eroded. For me, it is a great tragedy. For the
first time in history, the U.S. has gone to war with an Arab
and Muslim nation, and we know a peaceful solution was in
reach.""
   ---
   Geraldine Brooks in Amman, Jordan, and Craig Forman in
Cairo, Egypt, contributed to this article.
",5,"[ 0.29811497  0.0055398   0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
55,"
   That decisive contest may have begun last night, as M1-A1
tanks of the Army's Third Armored Division swept eastward
across southern Iraq in a driving rainstorm to pummel and
defeat a Guard division.
   Pentagon officials said that early reports from the field
indicated that U.S. forces captured or neutralized a
Republican Guard mechanized division -- that is, one with
mainly artillery and light armored vehicles. Before the U.S.
bombing began last month, the division had about 10,000
troops.
   U.S. forces suffered only a handful of casualties, the
officials said. After the confrontation with the mechanized
Guard division, U.S. forces continued to push against Guard
armored divisions along a front dozens of miles wide, the
officials said. Those divisions contain hundreds of
top-of-the-line Soviet-made T-72 tanks, and are the prize of
the Iraqi army.
   The Persian Gulf war's final issue is rapidly becoming
just one man: Saddam Hussein. The war is continuing rather
than being ended politically because the U.S. is intent on
putting an end to the Iraqi leader as both a military threat
and an Arab hero. The trick now is to accomplish that without
making him a martyr in the process.
   Yet even as the military rout continues, U.S. officials
are concluding that Saddam Hussein is unlikely to ever accept
President Bush's demand that he acquiesce to all United
Nations resolutions condemning and punishing Iraq. And they
reluctantly concede the Iraqi leader is likely to remain
standing even after his army is totally ejected from Kuwait.
So the mission for U.S. forces now is to disarm and humiliate
him so thoroughly that he isn't a serious threat during what
could be a cold peace following the war. In addition, the
Bush Administration has been planning for details such as a
demilitarized zone along the Iraq-Kuwait border.
   ""He is trying to save the remnants of power and control in
the Middle East by every means possible,"" President Bush
declared in a brief address in the White House Rose Garden.
""And here, too, Saddam Hussein will fail.""
   Those presidential remarks, aides said, were intended to
lay down the principles that will guide the U.S. and its
coalition partners in the last stages of the war. The
fighting inside Kuwait will stop, Mr. Bush declared, when
Iraqi soldiers in and around Kuwait ""lay down their arms.""
   Aside from disarming the better half of Iraq's million-man
army that sits in and around Kuwait, the American aim is to
ensure that Saddam Hussein isn't allowed to frame the
withdrawal of his troops as a political victory. That is
precisely what he attempted to do in a radio address
yesterday in which he congratulated his soldiers for standing
up to a 30-nation coalition assembled by the U.S.
   Mr. Bush now has plenty of cheerleaders urging him on in
the humiliation of Saddam Hussein, even among those who
doubted the wisdom of the war in the first place. Emerging
from a White House meeting yesterday, Sen. Patrick Leahy (D.,
Vt.), who last month opposed the congressional resolution
authorizing war, said, ""I think that the president would make
a terrible mistake if he allowed Saddam Hussein to be in the
position where he could declare to his own people some sort
of victory, and there is no sign President Bush intends to do
that.""
   As Sen. Robert Dole left the meeting, he turned to the
president and urged: ""Don't let Saddam Hussein off the hook.""
   The Pentagon is even refusing to rule out seizing or
shooting down Saddam Hussein's plane if he tries to flee
Iraq.
   There is a danger of overreaching. If the effort to make
Saddam Hussein lose power and face becomes too severe, the
U.S. could turn his image from that of a humiliated tyrant to
that of a victim of superpower bullying. Perhaps worse, the
allies could tarnish a victory if they seem willing to
inflict too much damage on Iraq itself in an attempt to
punish Saddam Hussein personally.
   ""I don't care if he's a martyr, and I don't think we
should care,"" said former defense secretary Harold Brown.
""But if it appears that we are making the Iraqi people
martyrs, that would concern me.""
   The more immediate problem for U.S. officials, though, is
the final confrontation with Saddam Hussein's
90,000-man-strong Republican Guard. Despite weeks of fierce
bombing, officials say, the Guard unitsespecially their tank
divisions -- remain strong. According to one Pentagon
estimate, less than 30% of the Guard's T-72 tanks were
knocked out of commission by the air war, primarily because
of Iraqi expertise in camouflaging and shielding their
equipment.
   The huge allied armored corps north and west of the Guard
is the biggest combat tank force assembled since World War
II, with more than 1,300 heavy tanks and about 100,000 U.S.
and British soldiers, supported by hundreds of Apache
helicopters and A-10 jets.
   Relying on night-vision goggles, infrared scopes and the
element of surprise, the fast-moving armored column sought to
flush the Guards out of their carefully camouflaged defensive
positions. At that point, facing overwhelming air power and
the cream of the allied army's tanks, Guard commanders will
have the choice of giving up or seeing their divisions
destroyed.
   ""The plan is to do all sorts of things to force {Iraqi}
tanks into the open,"" Lt. Col. Terry Branham, commander of an
Apache squadron with the VII Corps, told reporters recently.
""The whole corps plan is written upon that premise, that he
will have to move to come"" toward advancing U.S. tank
columns.
   Late last night, Pentagon officials said that contact
between U.S. and Iraqi tanks had been light, and it was too
early to tell what strategy the Guards would adopt.
   Early indications were that the Republican Guard is
fighting back, even though it has been bombed for weeks, has
had its communication lines disrupted, and now faces an
allied strike force of more than 100,000 soldiers bearing
down from the west and the north. According to preliminary
reports from the front, one Pentagon official said, it
appeared that the Guard maintained discipline and that
companysize units weren't abandoning the battlefield without
orders.
   As the clashes with the Guard intensified, one Army unit
captured a convoy of 50 of the big T-72 tanks trying to flee
northward toward Bagdhad, and allied forces set up a
defensive line near the Euphrates River west of Basra to
block future escape attempts.
   Recently, bad weather has prevented A-10 ""Warthog"" jets
and and Apache attack helicopters from pounding the dug-in
armor, and the rain and clouds are expected to continue to
inhibit air raids for the next few days.
   If the Iraqi tanks remain in position and refuse to
surrender, the Army's VII Corps probably will attack the
dug-in tanks with close-range, precision artillery and
missile barrages and tank volleys. Then, if the Iraqis still
don't budge, said one Pentagon official familiar with the
battle plan, infantry units now a few miles from Iraqi lines
will creep closer in Bradley fighting vehicles and lob
explosives into the Iraqi trenches and underground shelters.
   More broadly, U.S. commanders reported yesterday that
allied forces have destroyed or rendered ineffective 21 Iraqi
divisions, more than half the total in and around Kuwait.
   Saddam Hussein apparently was hoping to stop this
devastation yesterday with a radio address to his troops and
nation in which he said that Iraqi troops are withdrawing
from Kuwait but that Iraqis should be proud to have stood up
to a 30-nation coalition. He also didn't appear to entirely
give up his claim to Kuwait as a province of Iraq, saying
that the country was annexed on Aug. 8 and ""became part of
Iraq legally, constitutionally and actually,"" while adding
that the situation will change with the pullout.
   By choosing to fight the allies initially and by refusing
to clearly accept all U.N. resolutions ordering him out of
Kuwait, Saddam is ""giving us every opportunity to shake the
foundations of his power,"" said one Bush administration
official.
   U.S. officials are preparing to live with a hostile Saddam
Hussein for at least a while after the liberation of Kuwait.
They intend to push the U.N. Security Council to keep in
place economic sanctions, and State Department officials
yesterday were working on a statement warning of the
consequences Iraq will face if it continues to fire Scud
missiles at Saudi Arabia or Israel once fighting stops.
   U.S. officials say they are well aware of the danger of
making Saddam Hussein a martyr figure through U.S. overkill,
and believe they can avoid that outcome. For starters, the
U.S. hopes that the Iraqi people themselves will conclude
that Saddam Hussein botched both his war with the U.S.-led
coalition and his various attempts to stop it once it was
underway. That, they hope, will prompt forces inside Iraq to
topple him within weeks or months.
   Secondly, the U.S. is calculating that Saddam Hussein will
remain a sympathetic figure to those who revere him no matter
how the U.S. treats him -- and that those who are skeptical
about him will become more so.
   But others, including Soviet officials who have been
trying to broker a peaceful way out for their old ally, warn
of risks. Aleksander Belonogov, a Soviet deputy foreign
minister, said the Kremlin favors restoring Iraq to its
""rightful place"" in the Arab world. Failure to do so ""would
be a serious mistake because this would lead precisely to the
feelings of rejection that would become the nourishing base
for various revenge-seeking tendencies.""
   Of course, the amount of pressure the U.S. will apply
depends on how events on the battlefield play out in the next
two or three days.
   While the tank battles began to the west, allied forces
continued to consolidate positions around Kuwait City, amid
numerous reports from U.S. soldiers and Kuwaiti citizens that
nearly all of the Iraqi troops already have pulled out. Navy
A-6 pilots fresh from air strikes north of Kuwait City
described the roads there as clogged with Iraqi military
vehicles fleeing toward Basra. They said the vehicles were
easy targets.
   ""This morning it was bumper tobumper,"" one pilot told pool
reporters on the carrier USS Ranger. ""We hit the jackpot,""
another pilot was quoted as saying.
   Rear Admiral Mike McConnell, director of intelligence for
the Joint Chiefs, said that allied forces found a document,
which he said was written to Iraq's senior generals before
the war started, ordering Iraqi troops to inflict ""maximum
casualties"" on U.S. troops and also to destroy Kuwaiti oil
facilities.
   Lt. Gen. Thomas Kelly, director of operations for the
Joint Chiefs of Staff, said Iraqi prisoners of war climbed to
about 30,000, but other officials said the total may be
closer to 40,000 and is growing rapidly. Allied commanders
face major problems in providing food, transportation and
medical care for what is likely to turn into well over
100,000 prisoners. Bush administration officials have said
that winning the good will of the prisoners and then sending
them back to Iraq angry at their treatment by Saddam Hussein
is likely to be an important tool in trying to unseat the
current regime.
   Of course, the amount of pressure the U.S. will apply
depends on how events on the battlefield play out in the next
two or three days. The ""great tank battle"" against Republican
Guard units many U.S. officers anticipated ""hasn't
materialized yet,"" said Lt. Gen. Thomas Kelly, director of
operations for the Joint Chiefs of Staff, ""and whether it
will or not remains to be seen.""
   To the south, allied forces continued to consolidate
positions around Kuwait City, amid numerous reports from U.S.
soldiers and Kuwaiti citizens that nearly all of the Iraqi
troops already have pulled out. Navy A-6 pilots fresh from
air strikes north of Kuwait City described the roads there as
clogged with Iraqi military vehicles fleeing toward Basra.
They said the vehicles were easy targets.
   ""This morning it was bumper to bumper,"" one pilot told
pool reporters on the carrier USS Ranger. ""We hit the
jackpot,"" another pilot was quoted as saying.
   Overall, Pentagon officials described Iraqi forces as
confused, leaderless and battle-weary, adding that the few
Guard units that have engaged in tank duels so far haven't
been ""any tougher"" to defeat than the rest of Saddam
Hussein's army.
   Gen. Kelly said Iraqi prisoners of war climbed to about
30,000, but other officials said the total may be closer to
40,000 and is growing rapidly. Allied commanders face major
problems in providing food, transportation and medical care
for what is likely to turn into well over 100,000 prisoners.
Bush administration officials have said that winning the good
will of the prisoners and then sending them back to Iraq
angry at their treatment by Saddam Hussein is likely to be an
important tool in trying to unseat the current regime.
",5,"[ 0.31187401  0.00460666  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
56,"
   The president ordered a cease-fire -- but a temporary one,
contingent on Iraq's freeing its captives, complying with
United Nations resolutions and taking other steps to help
defuse the region. He said that Secretary of State James
Baker will ask the Security Council to begin arranging the
war's conclusion, and that Mr. Baker will travel to the Gulf
next week for consultations on establishing a permanent
peace.
   Late last night it was reported that Iraq's U.N. mission
had sent a letter to the U.N. accepting all the Security
Council resolutions on the Gulf war.
   Although Mr. Bush took pains to note that ""no one country
can claim this victory as its own,"" the triumph will clearly
leave the U.S., along with its friends in Egypt and Saudi
Arabia, as the dominant powers in the Middle East.
   Yet even in the moment of victory, a whole new set of
challenges and anxieties emerges. As the final tank clashes
drew to a close it became clear that allied success came only
at a grisly cost in Iraqi lives, a reality that could
increase the volume and anger of radical voices in the
region.
   No one can be sure whether the smashing U.S.-led victory
will create a region safe from aggression -- or one so
bruised and disheartened it is ripe for radicalization and
destabilization. And America's longtime adversary, Iran, now
might step into a power vacuum, agitating for the departure
of Western forces, opposing Saudi oil policies favorable to
the West, and spreading its brand of Shiite fundamentalism
into a weakened Iraq.
   Winning the war, in short, doesn't guarantee the peace.
   ""The problems, the question marks in this war have always
been political, not military,"" says Zbigniew Brzezinski, the
former national security adviser.
   President Bush himself acknowledged the new and difficult
course ahead. ""There can be and will be no solely American
answer to all these challenges,"" he said. ""But we can assist
and support the countries of the region, and be a catalyst
for peace.""
   The Bush administration already is laying plans to make
sure its gains aren't squandered after the war. U.S. policy
makers are talking tentatively of securing Kuwait with
demilitarized zones and an Islamic peacekeeping force drawn
largely from Persian Gulf states and Egypt. Then the U.S.
would extract its ground forces from the region while relying
on Gulf governments to craft a new security system that could
be silently supported by Washington. The U.S. could at that
point refocus on the Arab-Israeli problem.
   Before last night's cease-fire -- effective at midnight
EST -- allied forces yesterday were still concluding what
Gen. Norman Schwarzkopf called a ""classic tank battle""
against the two remaining divisions of Saddam Hussein's
Republican Guard. That battle raged just inside Iraq to the
north of Kuwait, where a broad sweeping maneuver by U.S.,
French and British forces trapped the premier Iraqi force.
   Iraq's army otherwise now lies in ruins. Following the
allies' lightning-fast ground attack and unrelenting air war,
as many as 3,700 of the roughly 4,200 tanks Iraq had in and
around Kuwait have been destroyed or captured, and well over
50,000 Iraqi soldiers have been taken prisoner, Gen.
Schwarzkopf estimated.
   Early yesterday, Saddam Hussein had made another seemingly
desperate attempt to stop the fighting. In a statement read
on Baghdad Radio, Iraq finally agreed to President Bush's
demand not only to withdraw from Kuwait, but also to accept
U.N. Security Council resolutions that require Baghdad to
drop its claim to Kuwait and that make Iraq liable for paying
war reparations.
   The Bush administration quickly batted down that overture,
as it had every other recent Iraqi peace bid. The statement
was unacceptable, officials said, because Iraq also insisted
that the U.N. simultaneously drop the three resolutions that
imposed trade and economic sanctions. The U.S. wants to keep
those sanctions in place as long as Saddam Hussein remains in
power -- one more incentive, perhaps, for the Iraqi people to
topple him.
   The very terms of the cease-fire are crafted partly to
maintain negotiating pressure over Saddam Hussein. An
administration official said the U.S. doesn't expect him to
give in to all of Mr. Bush's demands of last night. But, the
official said, the administration can say it won't discuss
lifting economic sanction until Saddam Hussein takes the step
of negotiating a formal armistice.
   But the postwar problems go well beyond this. ""At this
point, making it very clear Saddam Hussein has been defeated
and there are no illusions about it is good -- provided that
we know how to play the next phase,"" said William Quandt, a
former National Security Council Middle East analyst now with
the Brookings Institution.
   Here are some of the challenges and opportunities as they
now appear on the eve of a clear military victory:
   The first order of business will be simply pacifying the
stormy border between Iraq and Kuwait. The problem is
exacerbated by the growing likelihood, acknowledged privately
by Bush administration aides, that Saddam Hussein will
survive in power for at least a while longer. The task is
made all the more difficult by new signs that he retains the
ability to launch an occasional Scud missile attack to shake
up any postwar tranquility. U.S. commanders yesterday
conceded that Iraq went into the war with far more mobile
Scud launchers than U.S. intelligence had estimated. Mr. Bush
last night emphasized that the temporary cease-fire would be
off the minute that Iraq fired any Scud missiles.
   So Bush administration officials have privately planned a
series of steps to protect newly liberated Kuwait.
   To insulate Kuwait from follow-on attacks, they are
discussing what one aide calls ""reciprocal"" demilitarized
zones along the Iraq-Kuwait border. These might be built
along the model of demilitarized zones in the Golan Heights
between Israel and Syria, which have proven highly successful
in keeping the peace.
   Under those arrangements, Kuwait and Iraq would agree on
precisely what kind and how much military equipment and
troops would be allowed in specified border areas. Compliance
might be monitored by aerial surveillance.
   Beyond that, officials of the Gulf Cooperation Council, a
military alliance of Saudi Arabia and the five smaller Gulf
Arab states, already have worked out plans for an Islamic
peacekeeping force to guard Kuwait. Its core would come from
Council states and Egypt, though other Islamic nations such
as Morocco and Pakistan might be represented.
   In that way, U.S. troops could withdraw quickly from the
slice of southern Iraq that they have swept through in their
attacks on the Republican Guard. American officials insist
they haven't any interest in occupying pieces of Iraq or
trying to set up a different government there. And they say
they don't plan for U.S. forces to provide the security
blanket Kuwait needs. Removal of foreign forces would help
prevent another nightmare turn of events or the internal
disintegration of Iraq.
   ""We've been saying these are Arab matters for a specific
reason,"" says one Bush administration official. ""We don't
want to be there. And that's not a trick.""
   The overall security and prestige of America's friends, of
course, is sure to be enhanced by the crushing defeat allied
forces have dealt to what was widely considered the Arab
world's best army. This particularly enhances the position of
Egyptian President Hosni Mubarak and Saudi King Fahd, who
gambled that they could defy Iraq and rely on the U.S. to
stand with them -- and who now can claim that their gamble
paid off handsomely.
   ""This is almost unqualified good news"" for the Egyptian
and Saudi rulers, Mr. Quandt of Brookings says. Though some
Egyptian students have violently protested Egypt's
participation, the dissent has been less than feared.
   The picture is more complicated for Syria. President Hafez
Assad's power clearly is enhanced by the defeat of his
archrival next door, Saddam Hussein, and his new chumminess
with Washington.
   But Mr. Assad also bucked overwhelming public opinion at
home by joining a U.S.-led military coalition. Syrians don't
love Saddam Hussein, but they aren't fond of the U.S.,
either.
   In private discussions with the U.S., Syria acknowledged
that it faced serious internal unhappiness over sending
Syrian forces along on the ground attack in Kuwait. But in
the authoritarian Syrian system, public unhappiness can't be
vented. So Mr. Assad is gambling that he will be able to use
the Iraqi defeat to enhance his own strength in the region
and secure his control over Lebanon while the U.S. and other
Western countries keep silent in appreciation for his help in
the Gulf.
   But there's a troubling long-term question for these
American partners, and for President Bush himself: Precisely
how much anti-Western sentiment has been stirred up by the
sight of allied armies crushing Iraqi soldiers? That
sentiment could vent itself through Islamic fundamentalism, a
potential problem for Egypt and Saudi Arabia as well as for
Syria.
   The air campaign against Iraq, while swift and decisive,
was more brutal than many in the region had anticipated. That
may not translate into much sympathy for Saddam Hussein --
never personally beloved in the Middle East -- but it may
feed anger in the streets.
   In response to the potential for a backlash, America's
regional allies are likely to put new pressure on Washington
to address the Palestinian problem. That, they will argue,
will show that the U.S. is interested in the Middle East for
more than its oil.
   Yet that problem may be harder to solve now, rather than
easier. For starters, there's likely to be new resistance in
Israel, where some are already asking what this war would
have been like with a pro-Iraqi Palestinian state next door.
   Palestinians' support for Saddam Hussein has only deepened
Israeli suspicions. And Yasser Arafat's pro-Iraq stand has
cost him whatever support he had in the Bush administration
and Gulf states.
   Similarly, Jordan's open sympathy for Iraq has deeply
strained relations with the U.S., creating another impediment
to solving the Palestinian problem. Jordan has long been
considered the Arab state most likely to help identify and
shepherd moderate Palestinians into a peace with Israel.
   And even though U.S.-Israeli ties have been strengthened
by Israel's restraint in the face of Scud attacks, strains in
the relationship between the Shamir government and President
Bush surface easily.
   During a recent Oval Office meeting between Mr. Bush and
Israeli Defense Minister Moshe Arens, for instance, Mr. Arens
annoyed the president by complaining about how hard it was to
exercise such restraint, and implied that Israel's air force
could do a better job than America's of destroying Scud
sites. Mr. Bush and other officials were miffed that so
little appreciation was expressed for U.S. efforts to
eliminate the Iraqi military threat.
   Yet an opportunity is hidden among the problems. The new
U.S. bonds with Syria and Saudi Arabia create an opening to
address the Arab-Israeli conflict on a more comprehensive
plane in which the U.S. tries first to lead Arab states to
make peace with Israel, then addresses the Palestinian issue
in that broader process.
   The biggest wild card, though, may be Iran. It is
strengthened simply because its Iraqi foe has been cut down
to size. Tehran will insist on being a part of any new
Persian Gulf security system, and may use its influence
within it to agitate for expelling any Western forces from
the region.
   A muscle-flexing Iran also could clash with Saudi Arabia
on oil policy. The Saudis appear willing to support oil price
moderation as they concentrate on keeping their own
production high after the war; Iran, still rebuilding from
its own debilitating war with Iraq, feels its interests are
best served by higher prices.
   In addition, some Middle East specialists think radical
fundamentalists within Iran will begin trying to undermine
Iraq's government by extending their influence over Shiite
areas in southern Iraq. In 1979, after the Iranian
revolution, Shiite clerics funneled money to this region,
preaching there and calling for the establishment of an
Islamic state in Iraq, which has a large Shiite population.
   ""If Saddam Hussein is weak enough, you'll see that kind of
thing going on again,"" predicts Kenneth Katzman, a former
U.S. intelligence analyst who now is a defense consultant.
Any drift toward a radical Shiite government in Iraq, in
turn, would alarm Saudi Arabia.
   Mr. Katzman believes that Iranian President Ali Akbar
Hashemi Rafsanjani, who is considered a pragmatist, wouldn't
favor such actions. But he probably would have to go along,
much as he did when Iranian Revolutionary Guards sacked the
Kuwait and Saudi Embassies in Tehran following rioting in
Mecca some time ago.
   Iran also may get some leverage from the nearly 150 Iraqi
warplanes ""parked"" in its territory. Shaul Bakhash, a George
Mason University scholar, says Iran worries that the U.S. and
Saudi Arabia will dominate postwar regional politics. Tehran
could use its control over the warplanes both to secure its
place at any regional security meeting and to press old
demands against Iraq.
   ---
   Robert S. Greenberger contributed to this article.
",5,"[ 0.37681101  0.00482373  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
57,"
   Between the invasion of Kuwait last August and the end of
the Gulf war, many brave souls inside and outside the U.S.
government worried about clever stratagems that Saddam
Hussein might employ to defeat the U.S. What if he split the
coalition by making enticing offers? What if he dragged
Israel into the war? What if he inflicted heavy casualties?
What if he suddenly withdrew from Kuwait to save his huge
army and then built nuclear weapons -- as Lenin saved his
Bolshevik regime by surrendering a third of Russia to the
Germans in the Brest-Litovsk treaty? Well, Saddam Hussein may
be twice as brutal as Lenin, but he is only one-tenth as
smart.
   George Bush, by contrast, developed a coherent strategy to
liberate Kuwait; backed up his diplomacy with a war plan that
provided for sufficient force to achieve a clear military
objective; obtained at every step the endorsement not only of
America's allies but -- miraculously -- also of the U.N.
Security Council; secured public support at home and the
consent of a divided, reluctant Congress; wisely left
military campaigns and tactics to his commanders; and fended
off a last minute attempt by Mikhail Gorbachev to turn Iraq
into a Soviet protectorate.
   Now, for the coming final round in ""Bush vs. Saddam,"" I
certainly wouldn't place my bets on the half-witted Butcher
of Baghdad.
   To be sure, many critics now fear President Bush has
walked away from this final round, leaving Iraq a vast
disaster area, like an abandoned Chernobyl reactor, and
condemning Kurds and Shiites to choose between permanent
refugee camps, prison or death. Even if the president wanted
to, he could not walk away from Iraq's internal affairs. Not
without destroying the U.N., and thus destroying any chance
of success for his Middle East peace diplomacy; not without
inscribing ""his"" Gulf war on the same tablet as Woodrow
Wilson's League of Nations and Lyndon Johnson's war in
Vietnam.
   Saddam Hussein will, of course, try to turn America's
victory into a Pyrrhic one. In an hour-long speech on March
16, he praised political pluralism, democracy and Iraq's
future contribution to stability in the Middle East. He was
appealing, it seems, to Washington's interest in some balance
among Iran, Iraq and Syria; to Ankara's concern about turmoil
on Turkey's southern border; and perhaps to friendly German
arms merchants who would again want to do business with him.
But then he hurled at his neighbors and at the world at large
acts of mass cruelty that compelled Ankara and London, Tehran
and Paris, Bonn and -- yes -- Washington, to recognize that
one's own moral integrity is more important than Iraq's
territorial integrity.
   Even though the Bush administration's response to the new
challenge has been mysteriously slow and inept, Saddam
Hussein's most recent depredations have killed his last
chance to plead for ""magnanimity in victory,"" or to posture
himself as the ""lesser evil,"" who would, at least, give us
the blessings of ""stability"" in Iraq. He also prevented his
few remaining supporters in the U.N. from diluting the tough
cease-fire terms.
   Now the U.N. is committed to implementing the destruction
of all of Iraq's chemical and biological weapons,
longer-range ballistic missiles, and nuclear materials and
components. And once Iraq is permitted to resume oil exports,
it must contribute part of its earnings to a
U.N.-administered fund for reparations to Kuwait and other
victims of its aggression. It is most implausible that Saddam
Hussein could survive as Iraq's dictator and comply with
these terms. To become a law-abiding ward of the U.N. is too
alien to his mindset, too contrary to the thuggery that his
henchmen are forced to practice.
   When Saddam Hussein is told to hand to the U.N. a list of
all his prohibited weapons as a first step in complying with
the ceasefire, he might well respond by arguing: (1) Iraq
never had any of these weapons, (2) if it had, American
bombing raids have destroyed every one of them, and (3) if
there were remaining weapons, all records have been burned by
Kurdish terrorists. But he will not refrain from using more
brutal ways as well to obstruct the implementation of the
U.N. directives. We should expect unexplained disappearances
of U.N. arms control inspectors, crashes (blamed on Kurds) of
U.N. helicopters looking for hidden chemical weapons, and the
killing of thousands of Iraqi soldiers, scientists and
technicians who might reveal the location of prohibited
weaponry.
   Saddam Hussein may not realize it, but as he begins to
obstruct, violate and sabotage the U.N. implementation of the
ceasefire agreement, he must take on not just some
bureaucrats at U.N. headquarters and the U.N. flag. He must
take on George Bush and Old Glory. Since Mr. Bush has just
succeeded in turning the U.N. into a useful instrument for
enhancing world order, he can't let Saddam Hussein steal his
success. Moreover, the president will depend on the U.N. ""to
put an end to the Arab-Israeli conflict,"" a key policy goal
he announced after Desert Storm.
   Nearly all suggestions for the Arab-Israeli conflict call
for territorial concessions by Israel in exchange for
internationally guaranteed security arrangements -- the
""territory for peace"" principle to which the president
referred. How could the U.S. ever help to promote such a deal
if it permitted Iraq to violate the U.N. cease-fire terms?
Since the U.S. achieved total military dominance over the
Iraqi forces and now plays a leading role in the U.N., the
conditions for enforcing U.N. prohibitions on armaments are
optimal. If international security guarantees were to fail in
this instance, the deal that could be offered to Israel would
no longer be ""territory for peace,"" but territory for a
worthless U.N. document.
   Senior administration officials are saying that the Desert
Storm victory opened ""a window of opportunity"" for U.S. peace
efforts in the Arab-Israeli conflict. For this to be true,
Saddam Hussein must not be allowed to slam the window shut.
   Five weeks ago, in his triumphant speech to Congress,
President Bush said that ""our commitment to peace in the
Middle East does not end with the liberation of Kuwait.""
Indeed, it does not. The U.S. is committed to support the
U.N., and the U.N. is now committed to inserting itself
deeply into the internal affairs of Iraq. The success or
failure of this endeavor will largely determine the prospects
for peace in the Middle East. It will also determine the
final winner in the contest between George Bush and Saddam
Hussein.
   ---
   Mr. Ikle, now with the Center for Strategic &amp;
International Studies in Washington, D.C., was Undersecretary
of Defense in the Reagan Defense Department.
",5,"[ 0.19595277  0.00806297  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
58,"
   In the two years since his appointment to the
U.S. Supreme Court was rejected, Robert Bork has found a new forum.
From his base at a conservative think tank he has become a
best-selling author and he's soon to hit the lecture circuit. No,
he doesn't think he will ever get another shot at the high court.
",6,"[ 0.10213193  0.05883468  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
59,"
   Robert H. Bork, who once hoped for a Supreme
Court seat, instead stood before the nation's highest court Monday.
   He was there in the capacity of a lawyer _ apparently making him
the first defeated Supreme Court nominee ever to argue before the
justices.
   Representing Citibank in a big-stakes battle, Bork argued that
U.S. banks with branch offices overseas should not be required to
pay depositors after foreign governments seize or freeze those
accounts.
   The Senate rejected Bork's nomination to the high court in 1987
after a bitter political battle. He was branded a conservative
extremist by opponents.
   Bork, nominated by then-President Reagan, has said he was the
victim of a campaign of lies and distortions led by liberals.
   There were no references to that fight Monday as Bork engaged in
debate with the justices and opposing lawyers over the complexities
of federal banking law and related matters.
   Bork was treated much the same as any attorney who appears
before the justices. They questioned him vigorously, occasionally
interrupting him for clarification and elaboration.
   Justice Anthony M. Kennedy, who occupies the seat that eluded
Bork, directed a few questions at Bork.
   Bork, 63, a former federal appeals court judge, is a fellow at
the American Enterprise Institute and will begin teaching
constitutional law in the fall at the George Mason University law
school in Arlington, Va.
   He will be paid $25,000 a year to teach one course each semester
as a part-time professor.
   Bork was only the sixth man this century to be denied a Supreme
Court seat by the Senate and the 26th in its history.
",6,"[ 0.37971507  0.01988552  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
60,"

In this town of reproach and recrimination, it seems increasingly clear that 
publishing well is the best revenge. In that spirit, one of the latest to join 
the parade of let-me-tell-you-my-side authors is Robert H. Bork, the former 
appeals court judge who was nominated to the Supreme Court by President Reagan 
but was rejected by the Senate. 


His version of the events is contained in ""The Tempting of America,"" to be 
published in November by the Free Press. 


But at a preview-of-coming-attractions press briefing at the annual convention 
of American Booksellers Assn. in Washington over the weekend, Bork -- the 
target of the first all-out, national political campaign to defeat a Supreme 
Court nominee -- insisted that his book was more about the general ""tendency to 
run law into politics"" than about his own particular unhappy experience. 


His unsuccessful bid for a seat on the nation's highest court forms only a part 
of his book, Bork said. The contentious debate over his nomination is simply an 
example of what he sees as this country's increasing, dangerous tendency ""to 
achieve political responses through the courts."" 


""The consequence,"" Bork writes, ""is a steady erosion of the most basic American 
right, the right of the people to govern themselves when the Constitution does 
not say otherwise."" By politicizing the courts, Bork elaborated, Americans have 
eaten away at ""the people's right to legislate the laws we want to live by."" 


No better example comes to mind, Bork said, than the ongoing furor over 
abortion. As a federal judge in Washington, he recalled, ""my office overlooked 
Pennsylvania Avenue."" Twice a year, ""there was a march, once by 
pro-abortionists and once by anti-abortionists."" 


But as the protesters proceeded up Capitol Hill, ""they went straight past both 
houses of Congress with nary a pause, and straight to the Supreme Court,"" Bork 
said. 


""So far as they were concerned, for their purposes, the Supreme Court was their 
branch."" Both sides, Bork said, ""regard the court as in large part not a legal 
institution, but a political body."" 


To Bork, ""that means that a major heresy has entered into the American 
political system."" The constitutional sacrilege, Bork contends, is ""the 
introduction of the denial that judges are bound by law."" 


Bork's constitutional expertise was one of the qualities that Reagan said 
figured strongly in his decision to nominate Bork for the Supreme Court and to 
support Bork's decision to tough out his bitter, ultimately unsuccessful 
five-month fight for the position in 1987. 


But his rigidness and his archconservative views frightened many people, inside 
and outside the Senate. Many feared his effect on Supreme Court decisions 
because they said he already was too arrogant when contending that his 
interpretations of the law were the ones that best matched the original intent 
of the framers of the Constitution. 


""The Founders of this nation thought the primary means of assuring our liberty 
was not the courts,"" Bork said this weekend, ""but rather the assignment of 
different functions to different branches of government."" 


Whereas the Constitution specified that laws were to be made by legislators who 
were elected by the people, not judges appointed by the President, Bork said, 
""a lot of Americans now simply assume that the courts should produce results 
they like rather than sticking to the Constitution."" 




'The Great Temptation' 


Though without its subtitle, ""The Political Seduction of the Law,"" a book 
called ""The Tempting of America"" does sound rather like a collection of 
regional dessert recipes, Bork maintains that mass assumption explains ""the 
great temptation,"" expecting ""political results from the courts."" 


In his own confirmation hearings, ""many senators wanted political results from 
the courts,"" Bork said. ""They had what they accused President Reagan of having, 
and that is, they had a litmus test."" 


The angry sessions were marked by a level of communication that was ""not very 
high,"" Bork said. ""We talked right past each other."" 


On the matter of Bork's leanings on possible Supreme Court action on the 
abortion issue, ""I was told by two Republican senators that they would vote 
against me because I might vote to overturn Roe against Wade,"" Bork said. ""I 
was told by two Democratic senators that they would vote against me because I 
might not vote to overturn Roe against Wade."" 


But this ""tempting,"" or political manipulation of the courts, long predated his 
attempt to secure a seat on the Supreme Court, Bork said. ""It started at the 
very beginning of the Republic,"" he said. 




Not Just a Liberal Sin 


""Nor is it a liberal sin,"" he went on. ""Conservative courts have done the same 
thing. But it is illegitimate no matter who does it."" 


In large part, Bork blasts law schools for undermining what he describes as 
""constitutional legitimacy."" With a wave of a beefy arm, Bork asserted, ""The 
majority opinion in the law schools today is that the Constitution is not law."" 


As he writes in his book, ""A new generation of law school professors and other 
elite groups no longer trust the people enough to let them decide what our laws 
should be."" 


Among consequences of this trend toward politicization of the courts, Bork 
said, is that ""we may expect (judicial) confirmation battles that are 
increasingly bitter. We may also expect a constitutional law that lurches 
suddenly in one direction or the other."" 


Constitutional law, in short, Bork said, has come to be seen as ""a political 
weapon."" 




Book on Legal Theory 


Now a resident scholar at the American Enterprise Institute in Washington, Bork 
said he has devoted the last 1 1/2 years to research, lectures and to writing 
his book. Much of it was turned out aboard airplanes on his laptop computer. 


""At bottom,"" he said, his new book is ""about legal theory."" Nevertheless, it 
will tell his side of the story of his battle with the Senate. 


""Of course,"" Bork declared with the same bombastic assertiveness that became 
familiar in the lengthy confirmation hearings. 


""Well, I wouldn't want anyone else to tell it, would I?"" Bork challenged. His 
furry eyebrows were arched decisively. End of discussion. 

",6,"[ 0.          0.          0.01243485 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
61,"
   In choosing federal Judge Robert Bork for the Supreme Court, President Reagan has tapped a leading architect of conservative legal theory -- and has ensured a tough confirmation battle in the Senate. 

   The selection of the 60-year-old Judge Bork to replace retiring Justice Lewis Powell gives the president his third Supreme Court appointment and by far his greatest opportunity to alter the court's direction. 
The high court, with Justice Powell often the swing vote, has been narrowly divided for a number of years on volatile social issues, including upholding abortion and affirmative action. 

   But in Judge Bork, appointed by Mr. Reagan in 1982 to the U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia, the president has picked a rare judicial -- rather than a political -- conservative, a judge committed to a narrow role for the courts rather than to the Reagan administration's political agenda. 
A scholar and formidable writer, the former Yale Law School professor has made his mark in antitrust law and a wide range of constitutional issues, urging judges to base their rulings on the intent of the framers of the Constitution. 

   However, judicial conservatives most often tend to reach conclusions that support conservative political views. 
And liberal Democrats on the Senate Judiciary Committee, fearful that Mr. Reagan's choice may upset the Supreme Court's moderate balance, have made clear they will fight any candidate whose views about the Constitution and the courts are too conservative. 

   Yesterday, Democratic Sen. Edward Kennedy of Massachusetts, a Judiciary Committee member, lost no time urging that Judge Bork should be defeated. 
""He stands for an extremist view of the Constitution and the role of the Supreme Court,"" Sen. Kennedy said. 
""No justice would be better than this injustice."" 

   President Reagan announced his choice yesterday afternoon in the White House press room, lavishing praise on the nominee's intellectual abilities. 
""Judge Bork, widely regarded as the most prominent and intellectually powerful advocate of judicial restraint, shares my views that judges' personal preferences and values should not be part of their constitutional interpretations,"" Mr. Reagan said. 
He described Judge Bork, who stood next to him without comment, as an ""impressive legal mind"" and ""a premier constitutional authority."" 

   The announcement came just five days after Justice Powell announced his retirement, citing his health and the approach of his 80th birthday. 
From the outset, Judge Bork was the clear front-runner to fill the vacancy, being favored by Attorney General Edwin Meese and his aides. 
The only questions were whether to go with a younger conservative whose influence would last well into the next century and whether the strength of Judge Bork's conservative views would make his confirmation too difficult. 

   While the White House put aside the age issue, the confirmation process is likely to be a contentious one, both in the 14-member Senate Judiciary Committee and on the Senate floor. 
But the expectation, even among some Democrats, is that Judge Bork will be approved. 

   The initial skirmish is over when confirmation hearings will begin. 
Committee Democrats say they don't expect to start hearings until September, raising questions about whether Judge Bork would be approved by the Supreme Court's opening next Oct. 5. 
President Reagan urged the Senate ""to expedite its consideration""; his aides will push for a July start, although they aren't sure they will succeed. 

   The nomination presents a political problem for some Democrats. 
Judge Bork is a difficult target, since his intellectual prowess is widely respected in legal circles, even by those who disagree with him. 
Judiciary Chairman Joseph Biden, a Delaware Democrat, and Democratic Sen. Paul Simon of Illinois, both presidential candidates, must satisfy liberal civil-rights groups that are already gearing up to battle the nomination and at the same time must avoid embarrassing themselves by using specious arguments, especially if the fight against Judge Bork proves futile. 

   The president's nominee to become the 104th justice is a bear of a man. 
At 6 feet, over 200 pounds and rotund, with hair like a scouring pad and a beard to match, he is an imposing figure, made more so by his deep baritone voice. 

   An affable man, he occasionally grows impatient with lesser intellects and inefficiency. 
His wife, Mary Ellen, a former nun, has been a calming influence, friends say, although also a very conservative one. 
It is his second marriage. 
His first wife, Clare, died of cancer in 1980, and he remarried in October 1982. 

   Judge Bork was at one time a cross-country skier and tennis player, and he recently resumed playing tennis out of apparent concern about his weight and general health. 
But friends say his pursuits tend more to the intellectual. 
He sometimes listens to books on tape while driving to work from his northwest Washington home, and while solicitor general in the Nixon administration, he pored over the New York Times crossword puzzle daily. 
He does enjoy a good party and has on occasion been the one to close the bar. 
At a solicitor general's office reunion in 1978, the dinner went some $250 over budget because Judge Bork kept the bar open well after the planned closing. 

   He first caught the eye of the legal community writing about antitrust law as a Yale Law School professor in the 1960s. 
In 1971, he earned his reputation as an intellectual, conservative legal scholar with an article taking a narrow view of the First Amendment guarantee of freedom of speech. 
In 1973, President Nixon tapped him to be solicitor general, the Justice Department official who represents the executive branch before the Supreme Court. 

   It was as solicitor general that in October 1973 he fired Watergate special prosecutor Archibald Cox, after Attorney General Elliot Richardson and Mr. Richardson's deputy, William Ruckelshaus, resigned rather than carry out President Nixon's order. 
Judge Bork returned to Yale from 1977 to 1981 when he practiced law for a year before he was nominated for the federal appeals court in Washington, D.C. 

   Mr. Richardson, now a Washington lawyer, defends Mr. Bork's actions. 
Mr. Richardson says Mr. Bork considered resigning but that he urged him to remain for the stability of the Justice Department. 
Nevertheless, Sen. Kennedy yesterday suggested that the ""Saturday Night Massacre"" will be an issue, saying the president ""should not be able to reach out of the muck of Irangate {and} reach into the muck of Watergate"" for a Supreme Court nominee. 

   But it is Judge Bork's prolific and forceful writings as a law professor and judge that have earned him his reputation as an intellectual leader of conservative legal thought for a generation of law school graduates. 
And it is those views that will be scrutinized closely by the Senate. 

   ""Unless Judge Bork can demonstrate to me that he comes to the court with an open mind, I would have some difficulty,"" said Sen. Biden at a press conference yesterday in Houston. 

   Many civil rights and women's groups reacted quickly against the nomination. 
""There is tremendous potential for rolling back the gains we have made in civil rights and civil liberties over the past 30 years,"" said Judith Lichtman, executive director of the Women's Legal Defense Fund. 
And the AFL-CIO urged senators to refrain from endorsing Judge Bork until they can carefully review his record. 

   Once a New Deal liberal, Judge Bork became more conservative while at the University of Chicago. 
There he studied economics under Aaron Director, a pioneer in applying economic logic to challenge a variety of theories and liberal beliefs. 

   In 1963, he wrote an article in the New Republic magazine challenging part of the proposed 1964 Civil Rights Act that would require desegregation of private facilities serving the public, such as lunch counters and hotels. 
The law would impose the majority's morality on the minority, he said. 
But in 1973, he told the Senate Judiciary Committee he had abandoned his view and fully supported the civil-rights law. 

   In 1968, in a Fortune magazine article, he was strongly critical of the Supreme Court under Chief Justice Earl Warren, saying it ""is in the process of descending in national estimation from a position above the battle to the status of a political institution."" 
The justices, he said, ""decide cases not according to the criteria they cite but according to their social and political sympathies."" 

   In that article, he described a landmark 1965 opinion recognizing a right to privacy that entitled married couples to use contraceptives in their home as ""shallow, murky and rhetorical"" and ""one more slogan that some justices will use . . . in the process of writing their own tastes into the law."" 

   It was that 1965 ruling that was the basis for the Supreme Court's 1973 decision recognizing a woman's right to an abortion, and Judge Bork's criticism of sexual privacy has caused alarm among women's groups over his nomination. 

   Indeed, in a 1984 appeals-court ruling, he declined to extend the right of sexual privacy to homosexual conduct and criticized the Supreme Court's record on privacy. 
""If the revolution in sexual mores . . . is in fact ever to arrive,"" he wrote, ""we think it must arrive through the moral choices of the people and their elected representatives, not through the judicial ukase of this court."" 

   But some friends and colleagues say his views don't mean that he would automatically vote to overrule the right to abortion. 

   ""He is a true judicial conservative,"" says Dennis Hutchinson, a University of Chicago law professor, ""and that means judges are supposed to defer to the decisions of the legislature."" 
Another hallmark of judicial conservatives is putting great weight on the importance of honoring precedents. 

   In a 1985 interview with District Lawyer magazine, he explained that he is more likely to stick to precedents in constitutional cases if so much legislation and so many other decisions have relied on them that ""they have become part of the structure of the nation."" 
But he hasn't said how he would handle challenges to controversial precedents on which the Supreme Court is divided: abortion, affirmative action, school prayer and school busing, among others. 

   Judge Bork has been widely and sharply critical of the Supreme Court's 1964 decision establishing the principle of ""one person, one vote."" 
His criticism is based largely on the view that it is purely a political issue that is best left to the legislatures to decide for themselves. 

   Views he expressed in 1971 in a series of lectures at Indiana University Law School argued that the First Amendment protects only speech expressly about government and politics. 
But he has since modified his position, concluding ""that many other forms of discourse, such as moral and scientific debate, are central to democratic government and deserve protection."" 
He excluded obscene and pornographic material from the First Amendment altogether. 

   As a judge, he has devoted much of his energy to questions of what are proper issues for courts to decide, taking a tough view on when a plaintiff has suffered sufficient injury to bring a lawsuit. 

   In a 1985 opinion, he argued against including sexual harassment as a form of job discrimination that is barred by the 1964 Civil Rights Act. 
But in two 1984 cases, he cast votes giving a moderate reading to the free-speech and free-press clauses of the First Amendment. 

   In the antitrust field, he has argued long and effectively that the laws were only intended to regulate consumer welfare and weren't intended to protect smaller or less efficient companies from competition. 
As a result, he has often opposed government efforts to block mergers that created conglomerates. 

   Those who know him expect he would be a powerful force at the Supreme Court, although he was sometimes slow and even bored with his work at the appeals court. 
He isn't the kind of judge who invests a lot of time trying to lobby others to join him, but he hopes to persuade them with the force of his opinions, associates say. 

   If he gets to the Supreme Court, associates expect him to help form a strong conservative coalition. 
He is a good friend of President Reagan's last nominee, Justice Antonin Scalia, and Chief Justice William Rehnquist used to stay with Judge Bork on visits to Yale. 

",6,"[ 0.26587964  0.00437612  0.25616598 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
62,"
   Members of the Senate will soon face one of the most difficult votes of their careers when they evaluate Robert H. Bork's fitness for the Supreme Court. 

   Currently on the Federal Court of Appeals in Washington, D.C., Judge Bork is recognized as perhaps this country's most distinguished judicial scholar. 
He has been a law professor at Yale and solicitor general of the U.S. 
As solicitor general, he was in charge not only of representing the U.S. before the Supreme Court but also of deciding when the government should appeal decisions to higher courts. 
It is the only position in government required by statute to be filled by someone ""learned in the law."" 

   Commenting on Judge Bork's nomination to the Supreme Court, Geoffrey Stone, dean of the University of Chicago Law School, called it ""a four-star appointment"" and commented that it was rare ""to get anyone with anywhere near his credentials."" 
Indeed, when Judge Bork was nominated for the appeals court post in 1981, the Senate unanimously approved. 

   Why then the current controversy? 
The answer is that Judge Bork is a ""neutral-principled"" judge -- a judge who makes decisions based on established legal principles irrespective of the ""bottom line"" of who may win and who may lose. 

   As Columbia University law Prof. Herbert Wechsler explained almost 30 years ago, a neutral-principled judicial decision rests ""on reasons that in their generality and their neutrality transcend any immediate result that is involved."" 
Judge Bork's elevation to the Supreme Court may very well tip the balance toward this neutrality of interpretation, and there are those who fear that the court -- no longer able to do what the individual justices may think is ""good"" or ""moral"" or ""right"" -- will reject activist social, economic and criminal-justice agendas. 

   The Constitution, however, commands a neutral-principled approach to judicial decision making, and a Bork confirmation would help restore the balance among the three branches of government the framers so carefully crafted. 
Indeed, the framers specifically rejected a system that would have permitted the judiciary to exercise the legislative and executive functions it has arrogated over the past 35 years. 

   Two hundred years ago in Philadelphia, the delegates to the Constitutional Convention considered a proposal to join executive and judicial authority in a ""council of revision"" - a body that would have authority to reject and reshape laws enacted by the legislature. 
The proposal lost. 
James Madison's notes relate the debate: Nathaniel Gorham reflected that judges did not ""possess any peculiar knowledge"" of policy that would justify giving them that power, and Elbridge Gerry reminded the delegates that such a role would be ""foreign from the nature"" of their office. 

   Later, in explaining the Constitution he helped to forge, Alexander Hamilton called the judiciary the ""least dangerous"" branch, despite the life tenure for federal judges, because it had neither ""FORCE nor WILL but merely judgment"" and because it could take ""no active resolution whatever"" in policy matters when that would require a choice among competing legitimate social values. 

   Limited judicial authority was not a new concept even in 1787. 
More than 150 years earlier, Francis Bacon had warned judges to remember that ""their office is jus dicere, and not jus dare; to interpret law, and not to make law, or give law."" 
The framers recognized that choices among competing social values should be made by the people's elected representatives and not by the judiciary. 

   Over the years, however, many judges began to eschew the proper limitations of their office for a more activist role. 
They began, in the words of the late Supreme Court Justice Felix Frankfurter -- a social liberal but a judicial conservative -- ""infusing into the vagueness"" of constitutional or statutory provisions their ""mere private notions"" of social policy and traded their black robes of ""judgment"" for the mantle of what sociologist David Reisman has called ""omnicompetent arrogance."" 

   Law making -- policy making -- by judges has become so pervasive that, of late, many see it as the judicial function against which potential judges must be measured. 
This ""bottom-line"" mentality is why Judge Bork's nomination is at risk even though Judge Bork recognizes that constitutional interpretation must be sufficiently flexible to accommodate changing times. 
This is how he put it in a September 1985 interview, which appeared in Judicial Notice: 

   ""The job of a judge is to understand the principle that the framers were trying to protect, and apply that principle in today's circumstances, which the framers could not have foreseen. 
But the idea is always to protect the value or the freedom that the framers were trying to protect -- and not some new freedom."" 

   Far from being ideologically partisan, as some have charged, Judge Bork holds fast to a neutral-principled approach irrespective of whose ox is being gored: ""The sin of wanting judges to do good things simply because the electorate won't do them,"" he explained in the same interview, ""is not confined to liberalism. 
Conservatives have been known to be infected with that desire, too."" 

   Our system of justice was designed to resolve disputes and not reshape society according to the whims of even well-intentioned judges. 
Daniel Webster once warned ""that the Constitution was made to guard against the dangers of good intentions."" 
He noted that there ""are men in all ages who mean to govern well, but they mean to govern. 
They promise to be good masters, but they mean to be masters."" 

   In many respects, the judiciary has become the ""master"" branch of government because we have permitted judges' personal views to supplant the rule of established law. 
Judge Bork's elevation to the Supreme Court would help restore a proper constitutional balance. 
He should be confirmed. 

   ---
   Mr. Fine is a Wisconsin Circuit Court judge and the author of ""Escape of the Guilty"" (Dodd, Mead, 1986). 

",6,"[ 0.22834612  0.00773778  0.20706231 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
63,"
   Judge Robert Bork is the most qualified American alive to serve on the Supreme Court. 
Not since the great Holmes and Frankfurter have we had a jurist with such impeccable credentials. 

   Legal resumes get no better than Judge Bork's. 
He practiced law in Chicago. 
Then he taught at Yale Law School, until leaving to become U.S. Solicitor General, the government's top litigator. 
He returned to Yale as the Alexander Bickel Professor of Public Law. 
After a stint as a law partner in Washington, he was approved unanimously as an appeals judge on the District of Columbia Circuit. 
Not one of the 416 opinions he has written or joined has been overturned by the Supreme Court. 

   During this entire period, he has inquired boldly and publicly into the nature of law and our society. 
As a student at the University of Chicago, he made the conversion from mild socialist to enthusiastic democratic capitalist. 
At Yale, he moved from pure libertarian to the Founders' view of ordered liberty under the rule of constitutional law. 

   He has written wisely on many topics. 
His ""The Antitrust Paradox"" is the book with the single most influence on the Supreme Court. 
Many federal judges look to his 1984 lecture on ""Tradition and Morality in Constitutional Law"" as a guide to approaching constitutional issues. 
His integrity and intellect have won admirers who range across the political and ideological spectrum. 
Lloyd Cutler, counsel to President Carter, supports Judge Bork as a jurist who ""believes that judges should interpret the Constitution and the laws according to neutral principles, without reference to their personal views as to desirable social or legislative policy."" 

   Despite his pre-eminent qualifications, in the last few weeks an awful fury has been unleashed against Judge Bork, centered on the canard that he is somehow outside the legal mainstream. 
But Robert Bork is not a ""right-wing activist."" 
He does not have a list of public policies he would use his clout on the Supreme Court to achieve. 
Any likely alternative, such as Orrin Hatch, would be a much more activist judge, though a far less distinguished one. 

   Judge Bork's critics do indeed have much to fear from him, but they have not been honest about what keeps them up nights. 
Their fear is precisely that the power of his intellect and scholarship would leave his stamp on the law and the nation. 
They do not oppose him because he is unqualified; they oppose him because he is overqualified. 
They would much prefer Senator Hatch. 

   Judge Bork is the leading proponent of judicial restraint. 
This doctrine is nothing more radical than the assumption of our constitutional democracy that judges must be the ""least dangerous branch."" 
That judges should set aside the decisions made by the elected branches of government only when the Constitution demands it. 
That judges must not concoct new rights in order either to further their own political preferences or to extend their power over the other branches. 
That they should not obfuscate their opinions by inventing five-layer, three-prong tests. 
That they should refuse to hear cases that raise purely political, not legal, issues. 

   These once-conventional doctrines are seen as threatening by the elites of the law schools, bar associations and judiciary who enjoy the power of activism. 
Judges are usurping the role of others by running school systems, jails and the telecommunications industry. 
To the hurrahs of many liberals, judges busily discover new rights in constitutional ""penumbra."" 
The Bork nomination, says Hodding Carter, ""requires liberals like me to confront a reality we don't want to confront, which is that we are depending to a large part on the least democratic institution, with a small 'd,' in government to defend what it is we no longer are able to win out there in the electorate."" 

   Yet in attacking Judge Bork his opponents have not been willing to defend judicial activism against judicial restraint. 
Instead, he is caricatured. 
Critics claim he is an agnostic, yet in favor of school prayer. 
One case where Judge Bork ruled for a labor union against a federal agency was classified by critics as ""pro-business"" because unions are ""in the business"" of representing workers. 
In another case, he ruled against a conservative group picketing near the Nicaraguan and Soviet embassies. 
Which is it? 
Liberal or conservative? 
Or does he apply legal principles neutrally, without regard to the parties? 

   The critics chased themselves into the corner of results-based evaluation of prospective judges by drawing the logical conclusion of judicial activism. 
Law is just politics, judges just politicians in robes. 
As the Justice Department says, they ""view courts as simply another political playing field for competing special interests"" with judges ranked ""the same way they rank politicians: according to the number of times they deliver results desired by a particular special interest to further a political agenda."" 

   The campaign against Judge Bork is shrill, mean and anti-intellectualan assault on the notion of law itself. 
His critics are living evidence of how badly he is needed on the Supreme Court. 

",6,"[ 0.17292062  0.00905578  0.16660313 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
64,"
   If Robert Bork's Supreme Court confirmation hearings this week can be said to have had a moment of epiphany, it came Wednesday morning. 
That is when Judge Bork was explaining to Sen. Alan Simpson how Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes, the famous civil libertarian, had once upheld a law that allowed the sterilization of the mentally retarded. 

   ""Three generations of imbeciles are enough,"" Holmes had written, in what Judge Bork described, in charitable understatement, as ""not (Holmes's) finest hour."" 

   Sen. Simpson then paused for a moment, looked around at his colleagues, and quipped, ""Perhaps we ought to bring him back up here,"" and the hearing room broke up in laughter. 

   Sen. Simpson has a searing wit, but the unfunny truth is that, having written that phrase, even the eminent Justice Holmes would have trouble making it through the political swamp that passes for today's Senate confirmation process. 
Justice Holmes would have spent much of his confirmation battle explaining how it was that he could hold such benighted views, and defending why he really wasn't prejudiced against the handicapped. 

   Judge Bork isn't Justice Holmes, though he is probably one of the half-dozen best qualified Supreme Court nominees since Holmes. 
He is surely the most prolific, as well, and so the capital's standing army of activists and senators has this week been busily replaying everything he ever wrote or said, all in an attempt to prove he is a judicial extremist, a threat to the republic. 
Judge Bork defended himself well this week, with scholarly precision and often with humor, but in Washington reasonableness alone is not enough to win a seat on the Court. 

   By now, the politics of judicial appointment in the Reagan years has become drearily predictable, like a Herblock cartoon. 
Any nominee at all at odds with the judicial orthodoxy of recent decades is immediately attacked as someone out of ""Invasion of the Body Snatchers."" 

   The essential weapons are, as Sen. Simpson put it in his opening statement, ""a deft blend of emotion, fear, guilt or racism."" 
The idea is to raise such a public furor about the nominee's ""extremism"" that the fanatic moderates who often hold the balance of power in the Senate won't dare risk guilt by association by voting in favor. 
If a nominee's reputation happens to be shredded amid all of this politicking, well, too bad, but that's life in the big city. 

   The activists started things off by supplying the emotion and fear. 
A group known as ""People for the American Way"" papered Washington with ads headlining the case of ""Robert Bork vs. 
The People,"" suggesting, apparently, that anyone who supports Judge Bork opposes ""the people,"" not to mention the American way. 

   The same ads implied that Judge Bork had no objection to ""sterilizing workers,"" didn't believe in any right to privacy, and just might ""Turn the clock back on civil rights?"" 
The question mark was a nice touch, apparently meant to suggest the ad writers might actually have some doubt. 

   Once the hearings began, the directors of these lobbying groups huddled amid the marble colonnades in the back of the Senate Caucus Room, smiling or wincing as events played out. 
Ralph Neas, the amiable leader of the activist troops and the subject of a flattering profile in Tuesday's Washington Post, was always ready with a quote. 
""I think things are going well,"" he'd say, time and again. 
""We're laying out the record that shows how extreme he is."" 

   The senators themselves were more respectful, perhaps because they know that TV cameras have been unkind lately to inquisitors. 
Judiciary Chairman Joe Biden appeared to have taken a course from Miss Manners; he displayed none of the florid sarcasm that drove Ursula Meese to tears when her husband was seeking to be confirmed as attorney general. 

   The questioning, however, left little doubt about its goal -- to suggest that Judge Bork cares not at all for the rights of women, of minorities, of the press, or of pretty much anyone else. 

   Hadn't Judge Bork done something ""illegal,"" charged Sen. Howard Metzenbaum, by dismissing the Watergate special prosecutor in 1973? 
Judge Bork explained -- as he has dozens of times before -- his moral dilemma in seeking as solicitor general to follow the orders of a president, yet also keep the special prosecutor team from disbanding. 
He succeeded on both accounts, as the special prosecution force's own final report concluded. 

   Isn't Judge Bork beyond the pale, implied Sen. Biden, for believing there is no right to privacy in the Constitution? 
Judge Bork had to explain that, yes, there are all kinds of privacy rights in the Constitution (the First, 4th and 5th amendments, for example), but he didn't believe there is any ""generalized, undefined"" right. 

   Isn't Judge Bork in effect a racist because he once opposed that part of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 that outlawed discrimination in public places? implied Sen. Edward Kennedy. 
Judge Bork explained that he was concerned at the time about government coercion in private decisions, but that he had retracted that position more than a decade ago. 
So Americans were left with the spectacle of this distinguished judge and scholar having to plead in public that he is not a bigot, that, indeed, he had once persuaded the senior partners in his Chicago law firm to end their quota on Jewish attorneys. 

   Judge Bork's supporters in the White House believe that all of this helped his cause, that it proved he wasn't, as one put it, ""a neanderthal."" 
They believe he has improved his chances to win the support of at least one of the three undecided senators on the Judiciary Committee, and thus make it at least to the Senate floor. 
If Judge Bork is not confirmed, however, the record of this week suggests that the reason will result less from his own failings than from the ferocity and distortions of his opponents. 

   --
   Mr. Gigot is a writer on the Journal's editorial page. 

",6,"[ 0.2405724   0.00769919  0.21890646 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
65,"
   Legal experts differed sharply in testimony before the Senate Judiciary Committee over what impact Judge Robert Bork's free-market approach to antitrust law would have on competition and consumers. 

   ""A wide array of anti-competitive practices which have been specifically outlawed by statute or (by) settled Supreme Court precedent would be rendered lawful if Judge Bork's antitrust views held sway,"" New York Attorney General Robert Abrams warned yesterday, as the committee concluded 12 days of hearings on the Supreme Court nomination. 

   But Donald Baker, a Washington lawyer and former chief of the Justice Department's Antitrust Division, said in a statement that Judge Bork is in the ""mainstream of antitrust,"" which ""means his antitrust thinking . . . . 
is widely used by antitrust practitioners, antitrust courts and even antitrust professors."" 

   Meanwhile, President Reagan launched a new, more vigorous campaign on behalf of Judge Bork's nomination, which is losing momentum. 
Speaking to representatives of groups supporting the nomination, he portrayed Judge Bork's opponents as liberal ""special interest groups,"" asserted that Judge Bork would be tough on criminals, and said there has been a ""deliberate campaign of disinformation and distortion"" waged against the nominee. 

   Separately, Sen. Robert Packwood of Oregon, the only Republican senator to publicly oppose the nomination so far, said he knows of between three and five other Republicans who may oppose Judge Bork. 
""There are three I can count on for sure,"" he told reporters. 
He added: ""They're pretty experienced and tough"" and may be able to withstand White House pressure to support Judge Bork. 

   Sen. Packwood's prediction is significant because moderate Republicans are one of two groups, along with southern Democrats, who may tip the balance for or against Judge Bork in the closely divided Senate. 
Democratic strategists say they need at least three or four Republican votes against the nomination to defeat it. 

   White House Chief of Staff Howard Baker yesterday dismissed an earlier assessment by Sen. Alan Cranston of California, the assistant Democratic leader. 
Sen. Cranston said on Tuesday that he estimated 49 votes against Judge Bork, 40 in favor and 11 undecided. 

   Mr. Baker said yesterday that Sen. Cranston ""is the worst vote counter in the United States Senate today."" 
Mr. Baker said that he counts ""40 plus"" votes for the nominee, ""30 plus"" votes against him, and ""30 souls yet to be saved."" 
Sen. Alan Simpson of Wyoming, the chief Republican vote counter in the Senate, also disputed Mr. Cranston's count. 

   The full Senate isn't likely to vote until November, but the Judiciary Committee is set to vote Tuesday on whether to send the nomination to the Senate with no recommendation or whether to forward it with a positive or negative report. 

   The 60-year-old Judge Bork, a federal appeals court judge, is a recognized expert in antitrust law. 
In a book and other writings he has argued that antitrust laws don't always fulfill their goal of promoting competition, and has urged greater use of economic analysis to decide what business activities are anti-competitive. 

   In yesterday's testimony, Robert Pitofsky, dean of Georgetown University Law School and a former Federal Trade Commission member, said Judge Bork advocates ""an antitrust program more conservative than proposed by almost anyone else."" 

   He said Judge Bork favors making legal practically all price and other restrictive agreements between manufacturers and distributors, and that his approach to mergers between competitors would make the Reagan administration's ""lenient"" policy ""seem recklessly restrictive."" 

   But in testimony delivered Tuesday night, Mr. Baker and University of Michigan Law School professor Thomas Kauper praised Mr. Bork's contribution to antitrust theory. 
Mr. Kauper said there isn't any reason to assume Judge Bork would overrule antitrust precedents or federal laws and that Judge Bork advocates an antitrust approach ""designed to promote consumer welfare."" 

   In his White House speech to Bork supporters, President Reagan delivered his sternest defense yet of his Supreme Court nominee and his harshest attack on foes of the nomination. 

   He said the vote on Judge Bork will be a ""crossroad of conscience"" for the Senate. 
""We will not be satisfied with allowing special interests to determine the qualifications to serve on our country's highest court,"" he asserted. 

   Mr. Reagan maintained, as the White House has for months, that Judge Bork's philosophy is in the ""mainstream of contemporary thought."" 
But the president also emphasized, in stronger terms than previously, his view that Judge Bork would be a law-and-order justice who would aid the fight against crime. 

   ""Judge Bork has argued for more reasonable interpretations of criminal procedures that assure both justice and the prompt conviction of criminals, rather than allowing dangerous criminals to go free on unjustified technicalities,"" Mr. Reagan said. 

   White House officials think the view of Judge Bork as a champion of crime fighters is politically appealing but believe it hasn't gotten enough attention during the Senate's confirmation hearings. 
The White House intends to keep hitting away on this and similar themes. 
President Reagan is scheduled to deliver another pitch for Judge Bork today when he speaks at the swearing-in of William Sessions as the new chief of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. 

   ---
   Monica Langley contributed to this article. 

",6,"[ 0.26273062  0.0075675   0.2404754  ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
66,"
   Who is this man a multi-million dollar ad campaign and a senator from Massachusetts said would turn back the clock on civil rights to the days of segregated lunch counters? 
Who is this man who would want to reopen such old national wounds? 

   Robert Bork was the young associate in a Chicago law firm who in 1957 demanded that the partners end their Jewish quota and hire Howard Krane. 
Mr. Krane is now a senior partner there, and told the Judiciary Committee that ""Bob Bork is a person without prejudice against any group."" 
U.S. Solicitor General Bork was quick to rescue Jewel Lafontant, the first black woman to be a deputy in that office, when she told him of her exclusion from meetings due to her sex. 
""The very next day was the beginning of my attending so many briefings,"" Ms. Lafontant told the senators, ""I wondered to myself whether I had been wise in complaining."" 

   The deeds of Robert Bork in his personal life are matched by the words of his professional duties as appeals court judge and solicitor general. 
The evidence is that the distortions of Mr. Bork's civil-rights record are nothing more -- or less -- than a grotesque lie. 

   --Record as Appeals Judge. 
Bork opponents have tried to substitute result-oriented statistics for careful analysis of his legal reasoning to impugn Judge Bork as anti-women, pro-business, etc. Yet even on the basis of the opposition's anti-intellectual methods, Judge Bork's civil-rights record is clear. 
In his five years on the U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia, Judge Bork has heard eight cases involving the rights of minorities or women -- and ruled in their favor in seven. 
In no case did he render an opinion less sympathetic to minority or women's rights than the Supreme Court. 
Perhaps even more telling, his opinions are among the circuit's most notable civil-rights rulings. 

   In this year's Emory v. 
Secretary of the Navy, Judge Bork ruled for a black Navy captain who wanted to sue the promotions board. 
The issue was whether the military branches are subject to judicial review where civil rights are at stake. 
Judge Bork held for the first time that federal courts can decide these cases. 
Also this year, in Doe v. 
Weinberger, Judge Bork held that a plaintiff fired from the National Security Agency due to his homosexuality was illegally denied a hearing. 

   Judge Bork has written or joined several opinions protecting women's rights, especially at work: Laffey v. 
Northwest Airlines (1984) demanded that stewardesses get paid as much as male pursers for comparable work; Palmer v. 
Shultz (1987) held for women foreign service officers alleging discrimination by the State Department in assignments and promotions; and Ososky v. 
Wick (1983) reversed the lower court to bring women in the Foreign Service under Equal Pay Act protections. 

   --Record as Solicitor General. 
When the critics ask, where was Robert Bork during the great civil-rights victories? the best answer is that he was standing in front of the Supreme Court making the winning arguments. 
Indeed, perhaps the best measure of Robert Bork's civil-rights record is his four years as the government's chief litigator. 
Solicitors general have great freedom to file briefs weighing the claims of private parties in cases where they are not required to act as the government's defense lawyer. 
Mr. Bork used his position to argue more pro-civil rights cases than any Supreme Court nominee since Thurgood Marshall. 
In 17 of the 19 cases, Solicitor General Bork argued for the civil rights plaintiff or minority interest; the NAACP Legal Defense Fund was on his side in nine of the 10 cases where both filed briefs. 

   Indeed, perhaps the most lasting accomplishment of his solicitor generalship in the mid-1970s was building on the civil rights gains of the 1960s. 
He was ahead of the times in 1976 in Runyon v. 
McCrary. 
The issue was whether private schools can deny admission to blacks. 
This controversial case raised the conflict between the freedom of private groups to set their own rules and the public goal of non-discrimination. 
The civil-rights law, Solicitor General Bork said, ""reaches the actions of private individuals not in any way facilitated by state law."" 
The Supreme Court agreed, with Lewis Powell dissenting. 

   In several cases, Solicitor General Bork took the controversial position that plaintiffs do not have to prove the defendant's discriminatory intent in order to win discrimination cases. 
Black workers brought the 1975 case of Albemarle Paper Co. v. 
Moody against their employer and their union. 
They argued that they had been locked into low-paying jobs by testing policies and union rules. 
Mr. Bork successfully argued that even if the employer didn't mean to discriminate against black workers, the mere existence of a discriminatory effect entitled the plaintiffs to back pay. 
Solicitor General Bork tried to take the law even further. 
In the 1977 case of Teamsters v. 
U.S., the Supreme Court refused to accept his argument that a wholly race-neutral seniority system is unlawful if it perpetuates discriminatory effects. 

   Despite Judge Bork's record of public service to civil rights, Sen. Joseph Biden claimed that ""throughout his career, Judge Bork has opposed virtually every civil rights advance."" 
How can this be? 
The critics cite Mr. Bork's speculative academic writings -- yet distort even these: 

   --Brown v. 
Board of Education. 
Whatever Sen. Biden was referring to, it couldn't have been the landmark Supreme Court case that desegregated the public schools and gave courage to a politically deadlocked Congress to act on civil rights. 
Judge Bork has said that by the 1954 Brown case, ""it had become abundantly apparent through repeated litigation that separate was never equal."" 
This isn't a recent conversion: In a 1968 Fortune article, he called the ruling ""surely correct."" 

   In his 1971 Indiana Law Review article, then-Yale Prof. Bork said that the 14th Amendment ""was intended to enforce a core idea of black equality against governmental discrimination."" 
At a Federalist Society meeting this past January, Judge Bork defended Brown's reasoning against critics who insisted that the 14th Amendment was not intended to prohibit segregated schools. 
He said, ""To have chosen separation rather than equality would have been to read the equal protection clause out of the Constitution."" 
Judge Bork calls Brown ""perhaps the greatest moral achievement of our constitutional law."" 

   --Public Accommodations. 
Much has been made of Mr. Bork's three-page article in The New Republic in 1963 making the libertarian case against government-coerced desegregation of private establishments. 
Unlike the segregationists, he was not motivated by a desire for racial separation. 
Indeed, he stipulated that ""of the ugliness of racial discrimination there need be no argument."" 
Instead, his purpose was to warn against the dangers of government intervention into private relations even for a cause as noble as desegregation. 
""It is sad to have to defend the principle of freedom in this context,"" he wrote, ""but the task ought not to be left to those Southern politicians who only a short while ago were defending laws that enforced racial segregation."" 

   Robert Bork long ago rejected the extreme libertarian argument. 
The Civil Rights Act of 1964 ""did an enormous amount to bring the country together and bring blacks into the mainstream,"" he said at his 1973 confirmation hearings as solicitor general. 
""That is the way I should have judged the statute in the first place instead of on these abstract libertarian principles."" 
Does this sound like someone who would undo racial progress? 

   --Voting Rights. 
Critics of Judge Bork make the startling claim that he favors poll taxes, the device once used to deny blacks their right to vote. 
Judge Bork told the Judiciary Committee that he has ""no desire to bring poll taxes back into existence. 
I do not like them myself."" 
He has criticized Harper v. 
Virginia Board of Education, the 1966 case that invalidated state poll taxes. 
But the case had nothing to do with race. 
The high court in Harper explicitly said that there was no evidence of any racially discriminatory application of the $1.50 poll tax. 
Judge Bork told the committee that if the tax had been ""applied in a discriminatory fashion, it would have clearly been unconstitutional."" 

   Judge Bork's point was that if there is no racial discrimination, then there can be no equal-protection-clause justification to invalidate a state poll tax. 
The 24th Amendment, he noted, prohibited only federal poll taxes, intentionally leaving states free to assess such taxes if they chose. 
Judge Bork has said that a better ground for invalidating a poll tax would be if it were so high an amount that it interfered with the constitutional provision guaranteeing a republican form of government. 

   Apart from Judge Bork's extraordinary civil-rights record, there is a strong argument that minorities above all others should demand judicial restraint and an honest reading of the Constitution and its civil rights amendments. 
If justices of the William Brennan variety can make the Constitution mean what they like it to mean, the Supreme Court becomes another branch of government subject to buffeting by public opinion. 
The history of activist judges until recently is a history of black oppression; justices in Plessey v. 
Ferguson (1896) ignored the text of the 14th Amendment to create separate but equal. 
Judges such as Robert Bork insist that the law adhere to the Constitution, preserving a text that protects minority rights that today could again lose popularvor. 

   A reading of Judge Bork's voluminous cvil rights record leaves the inescapable conclusion that the partisan campaign against him was one of intentional distortion. 
If only the special interests had shown a fraction of the compassion for the truth as Robert Bork has shown for minorities. 
As it is, senators who take the time to review his record will find no honest argument that minorities or women have anything to fear from a Justice Bork. 

   ---
   Mr. Crovitz is assistant editor of the Journal's editorial page. 

",6,"[ 0.16785423  0.00483475  0.15363574 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
67,"
   As the Senate takes up Robert Bork's nomination to the Supreme Court, we would like to believe that there might be some senators among his declared opponents with the statesmanship to admit they were initially misinformed. 
Sadly, the more evidence that accumulates, the more heatedly they seem to deny it. 

   If these deliberations are serious, the evidence on this page and elsewhere the past two weeks should cause some thoughtful senators to reconsider. 
The true record of Judge Bork could not be more different from the claims of Archie Bunker ads and Archie Bunker senators. 

   Contrary to the smears, Robert Bork has not been a racist, sexist, sterilizer or bedroom spy in his careers as Yale law professor, U.S. solicitor general or appeals judge. 
His civil-rights record? 
As judge, he's sided with the minority plaintiff in seven of eight cases. 
As solicitor general, he argued more civil-rights cases than any Supreme Court nominee since Thurgood Marshall, urging an extension of a civil right in 17 of 19 cases. 

   Women? 
Judge Bork ordered Northwest Airlines to pay stewardesses as much as male pursers for comparable jobs. 
He wants a new reasonableness standard for the 14th Amendment that would effectively adopt the Equal Rights Amendment. 
Privacy? 
He ridicules the flighty excesses of the Warren Court, but refers to settled First, Fourth and Fifth Amendment rights to privacy. 

   The bloody campaign of distortion now lies dissected. 
Ralph Neas was already gunning for whoever was nominated to replace Lewis Powell when Teddy Kennedy rallied the troops with his outrageous speech. 
The lobbyists actually did a poll to find the best issues for distorting Judge Bork's views. 
Even Harvard's Laurence Tribe got into the game by mischaracterizing Judge Bork's Ninth Amendment views, not to mention Justice Black's. 

   A Howard Metzenbaum staffer successfully and possibly criminally intimidated a black law professor into canceling his testimony. 
Jewel LaFontant had to risk a threatened boycott of Revlon to testify for Judge Bork. 
A Harris Poll that included a falsified quote from Judge Bork was trumpeted to ""prove"" that most Americans opposed Judge Bork. 

   Now, to justify supporting this assault, the supposedly statesmanlike Howell Heflin is attacking Judge Bork from the right. 
He told an Alabama radio station that he ""was troubled by Judge Bork's extremism -- an admission that he had been a socialist, a libertarian, that he nearly became a Communist, and actually recruited people to attend Communist Party meetings, and had a strange life style. 
I was further disturbed by his refusal to discuss his belief in God -- or the lack thereof."" 

   The liberal Advocacy Institute has scheduled a seminar for Monday on how the left beat Judge Bork. 
The theme is that ""facts count, but symbols may count even more."" 
With the success of this campaign, in short, it will be open season on the independence of the judiciary. 

   The symbols they created for Judge Bork were brazen lies about a distinguished jurist. 
His opponents will take the nation's finest legal scholar for mounting as a trophy. 
But in our experience, this is the sort of victory for which the victors eventually pay. 

",6,"[ 0.19449694  0.01244922  0.18739118 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
68,"
   Separate strong earthquakes rocked northern Japan
and the main Philippine island of Luzon today, swaying buildings
and trees but apparently not causing any serious injuries or
damage, officials said.
   The Japanese quake registered a preliminary 5.2 on the Richter
scale and was the second strong temblor to hit the northern island
of Hokkaido in less than three days, Central Meteorological Agency
officials said.
   They said it struck at 7:44 a.m. (6:44 p.m. Sunday) and was
centered in the Hidaka mountain range, 45 miles away from
Saturday's earthquake, which measured a preliminary 6.4 on the
scale. Local police said there were no immediate reports of damage
or casualties.
   The pre-dawn Philippine earthquake struck at 3:45 a.m. (3:55
p.m. Sunday) and registered a preliminary 5.4 Richter reading, the
Royal Observatory of Hong Kong said. The Philippine Institute of
Volcanology and Seismology said it was centered 110 miles northwest
of Manila under the Luzon Sea.
   Earthquakes measuring 5 on the open-ended Richter scale are
classified as strong and capable of causing considerable damage in
populated areas. However, both quakes were located deep below the
earth's surface and therefore caused little damage, officials said.
   Both earthquakes also occurred in quake-prone areas where edges
of the earth's crustal plates are thought to rub together, a
Central Meteorological Agency official said.
   ``It's been some time since we had earthquake activity in that
area of Hokkaido, so it's not surprising to have some now caused by
a build-up of pressure between the plates,'' he said, speaking on
condition of anonymity.
   The official said there was no way of knowing whether the
Japanese quake was related to the one in the Philippines, 2,250
miles away.
   The Philippine islands are thought to be located on the edge of
a separate, smaller crustal plate which extends up to southern
Japan.
   Institute spokesman Ulpiano Trillanes said the Philippine
earthquake affected a wide area of Luzon island, including Manila,
but apparently caused no serious damage or injuries.
   In the past 35 years there have been two major earthquakes in
Hokkaido. In 1968, the Tokachi-Oki earthquake measuring a 7.9 on
the Richter scale killed 52 people.
   The Richter scale measures the total magnitude of an earthquake.
Every increase of one digit in the scale represents a tenfold
increase in magnitude, thus a reading of 4.5 would be 10 times
stronger than one of 5.5.
",7,"[ 0.30562361  0.0146716   0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
69,"
   A predawn earthquake in Soviet Central Asia
unleashed a 50-foot-high wall of dirt and mud that buried a mountain
village and swept through at least two others Monday, killing up to
1,000 people as they slept, officials said.
   The devastating earthquake in the republic of Tadzhikistan was
the second to strike the Soviet Union in two months.
   ``Almost everybody died,'' Zainiddin Nasreddinov, editor-in-chief
of Tadzhikistan's official news agency, said by telephone after
visiting the wrecked farming settlement of Sharora. He estimated the
number of dead there alone at 600.
   Sharora ``had more than 150 peasant households before that tragic
moment,'' the Soviet news agency Tass reported. ``Now most of it is
razed to the ground by the ruthless force of the natural calamity.''
   Tass said the number of dead in the disaster zone 1,800 miles
southeast of Moscow was estimated at 1,000, but cautioned that was a
preliminary figure.
   ``Rescue work is being continued and distant mountain villages
have not been checked yet,'' Tass said. Damaged roads were hampering
those efforts.
   The quake struck the southwestern part of Tadzhikistan, a Soviet
republic of more than 4.8 million people that borders Afghanistan
and China.
   The 40-second tremor, at 5:02 a.m. (6:02 p.m. EST Sunday) was
centered about 20 to 30 miles southwest of Tadzhikistan's capital of
Dushanbe, a city of more than 460,000 people, in the fertile Gissar
district, a center of grapegrowing and livestock-raising, Tass said.
   An official at Dushanbe's seismic center said the quake was
strong enough to knock things off shelves in tall apartment
buildings in the city, but that it caused no known damage or
injuries there. He declined to give his name.
   The U.S. Geological Survey in Reston, Va., estimated the quake at
5.4 on the Richter scale, which measures ground motion as recorded
on a seismograph. The Dec. 7 earthquake in northwestern Armenia,
1,300 miles west of Dushanbe, registered a 6.9 on the Richter scale
and killed 25,000 people.
   The earthquake unhinged a wall of sodden dirt and mud at least
five miles wide that buried the village of Okuli-Bolo and much of
Sharora, said Erkin Kasimov, an official of Tadzhikistan's Foreign
Ministry.
   ``Almost all of the victims died asleep in their beds,'' Police
Maj. Alexander Loparev, duty officer at Tadzhikistan Interior
Ministry headquarters in Dushanbe said by telephone.
   Residents of another village, Okuli-Poyen, apparently roused in
time, fled in panic before the mudslide, which traveled 1\ to 1{
miles, could reach their homes, Kasimov said from Dushanbe.
   Officials and Soviet media said the devastation was vast, and
total in places.
   In Okuli-Bolo and Okuli-Poyen, near the epicenter, ``everything
is destroyed _ all the homes, the schools, the hospitals and
clinics, the stores,'' Nasreddinov said.
   Okuli-Bolo is a ``heap of rubble'' and the chairman of a local
economic cooperative, Hairrulo Yuldashev, said the households of 70
peasant families were ``completely demolished and buried by the
landslide,'' Tass said. More than 70 villagers were buried by the
landslide, it said.
   In Sharora, ``cries and wails can be heard everwhere,'' Tass
reported. ``Some are bemoaning and burying their near and dear ones,
while others are trying to find the few survivors between the thick
layer of sand and clay.''
   It said all of the village's streets had been buried under the
50-foot-high layer of earth that the earthquake detached from a hill
near the village.
   The TV news program ``Vremya'' showed aerial footage of Sharora,
with white roofs of buried homes peeking through the dirt like
seashells scattered on a beach.
   Kasimov said that according to preliminary figures, the quake and
landslide destroyed about 100 buildings, including five schools and
a maternity hospital near the epicenter.
   The hospital was evacuated of mothers and newborns before the
wall of mud arrived and there were no victims, he said.
   There was no exact count available for the population of the
stricken villages. But the official at the Dushanbe seismic center
said families are traditionally large in the mostly Moslem republic,
and that one dwelling often houses eight to 10 people.
   The quake and landslide downed three miles of power lines,
destroyed nine miles of telephone lines and inundated four miles of
a navigation canal with mud, Kasimov said.
   ``Thousands of head of publicly owned cattle have perished,''
Tass said. It said thousands of acres of fertile farmland were
covered ``by a thick layer of sand and clay.''
   Nasreddinov said the buildings destroyed were one-story brick
structures. Soldiers went to the villages to keep order and restore
communications, electricity and water, he said.
   Kasimov said geologists believed water from mountain springs had
accumulated under the soil of the hills in the Gissar region, making
them prone to mudslides.
   ``When the earthquake came, it was like a catapult, and it hurled
the sodden earth onto the villages below,'' Kasimov said.
   Tass said bulldozers, cranes and excavators had been rushed to
the quake zone to help dig for survivors, and that volunteers had
come from Dushanbe and other nearby areas to help in rescue and
relief.
   Equipment, food and fuel were also sent to the scene, Tass said.
   On ``Vremya,'' a statement of condolences from the Kremlin
leadership was read, and aid promised from the national government.
According to Nasreddinov, President Mikhail S. Gorbachev telephoned
Tadzhikistan officials to promise Moscow's help.
   In Washington, U.S. State Department spokesman Charles Redman
said he knew of no request for assistance from the Soviets. ``Our
sympathy certainly goes out again to the victims of this most recent
earthquake,'' he said.
   The experience of the Armenian earthquake shows the death toll in
Tadzhikistan could be much higher than the first estimates. Soviet
officials, including Foreign Minister Eduard A. Shevardnaze,
initially spoke of ``thousands'' of victims in the Armenian quake.
Kremlin spokesmen later estimated 55,000 people had been killed, but
on Dec. 29, Armenian officials gave what they called an accurate
death toll of 25,000.
",7,"[ 0.40407797  0.00727423  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
70,"
   The earthquake that killed 25,000 people in
Armenia pushed last year's earthquake-related death toll worldwide
to the highest level since 1976, when a Chinese earthquake killed at
least 10 times as many, the U.S. Geological Survey reports.
   The estimated earthquake death toll in 1988 includes an
additional 2,000 or more people who died in other earthquakes around
the world, the Survey reported Monday.
   Although the annual average death toll for earthquakes is about
10,000, in 1987 only 1,100 lives were lost.
   In addition to the deaths, some 13,000 people were injured and
more than a half-million were left homeless in the Armenian
earthquake, which had a magnitude of 6.8 on the Richter scale. The
death toll of 25,000 is the most recent reported by the Soviets. The
exact toll in unknown.
   The main shock was followed within minutes by a second, measuring
5.8 on the Richter scale, which estimates the energy released by an
earthquake. An earthquake of 5.0 can cause considerable damage, and
the strength rises by 10 times for each whole number on the scale.
   Many of the deaths in Armenia were blamed on collapsing
buildings, as the earthquake rattled concrete structures until they
fell to the ground, according to subsequent analyses.
   Another recent earthquake in the Soviet Union, claiming about
1,000 lives, struck in Soviet central Asia. That one occurred in
January, however, and so does not count in the 1988 toll.
   Last year's second most deadly earthquake occurred Aug. 20 on the
Nepal-India border, killing 1,000. That earthquake, measuring 6.6 on
the Richter scale, destroyed thousands of homes and injured many
people.
   On Nov. 6 an earthquake measuring 7.3 on the scale claimed 730
lives and injured about 4,000 people on the border between Burma and
China, the Geological Survey reported.
   And on the India-Burma border three deaths were reported in an
Aug. 6 earthquake that caused landslides.
   The Survey said it recorded 61 significant earthquakes last year,
15 fewer than the year before. An earthquake is considered
significant if it has a magnitude of 6.5 on the Richter scale.
Earthquakes of lesser magnitude are included if they cause
casualties or considerable damage.
   Three significant earthquakes were recorded in the United States
last year, including the strongest shock of the year. That
earthquake, measured at 7.6, occurred March 6 in the Gulf of Alaska
and resulted in only minor damage.
   The only U.S. earthquake death last year occured when someone
suffered a heart attack after an earthquake measuring 4.8 in
Whittier, Calif., in February. The other significant U.S. earthquake
occurred Dec. 3 in Pasadena, Calif. It was measured at 4.6 on the
scale and caused some injuries and property damage.
   An earthquake centered in eastern Canada on Nov. 25 was felt
widely across that country and in the northeastern United States as
far south as Washington, the Survey reported. It had a magnitude of
5.7. Earthquakes in the eastern part of North America tend to be
felt over larger areas than earthquakes of similar strength in the
West.
   Europe recorded three earthquake deaths last year when one rated
at 3.0 killed a group of miners in Czechoslovakia on Sept. 2.
   In addition an earthquake rated at 5.8 caused several injuries in
Albania on Jan. 9.
   Injuries were also reported from two offshore earthquakes, one in
the Ionian Sea near Greece Oct. 16 and another near the Azores
Islands Nov. 21.
   In Africa, eight people working in a gold mine in South Africa
died Jan. 5 in an earthquake rated at 5.2.
   And Japan, usually very seismically active, recorded only one
significant earthquake last year, the Survey reported. That
earthquake measured 5.4 and resulted in 10 injuries and minor damage
in the Tokyo area.
",7,"[ 0.30561124  0.0092659   0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
71,"
   A strong earthquake shook the Caspian Sea
region of the Soviet Union and Iran before dawn Sunday, the third
relatively strong earthquake in the area since Tuesday, Iran's
official Islamic Republic News Agency reported.
   There was no word of casualties or damage from the quake centered
in Soviet Azerbaijan 250 miles northwest of Tehran, measuring 5.6 on
the Richter scale, said the agency monitored in Nicosia.
   An observatory in Hong Kong said the quake was centered in the
Caspian Sea about 120 miles northeast of the Azerbaijani capital and
port city of Baku and measured 6.5 on the Richter scale.
   IRNA, monitored in Nicosia, said Tehran and other cities in
northern Iran were jolted by the earthquake registered by the Tehran
University Geophysics Center at 4:24 a.m. (8:54 p.m. EDT Saturday).
   IRNA reported Saturday that an earthquake registering 5.5 on the
Richter scale shook the region Saturday. The U.S. Geological Survey
in Washington said that quake, also with an epicenter east of Baku,
registered 6.6.
   Another tremor registering 5.2 shook the area around Gorgan, 185
miles east of Tehran on Tuesday, IRNA said.
   Iran is shaken by hundreds of earthquakes a year, ranging from
2.4 to 5.5 on the Richter Scale. The last major earthquake,
registering 7.7, was in September 1978. It killed 25,000 people.
   The Richter scale is a measure of energy released by an
earthquake as recorded on seismographs. Every increase of one whole
number means a tenfold increase in magnitude.
   An earthquake of 5 on the Richter scale can cause serious damage
and one of 7 can cause widespread heavy damage.
",7,"[ 0.27556929  0.01763844  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
72,"
   A major earthquake registering 7.1 on the Richter
scale struck off northeastern Honshu Island early today, officials
said. Three coastal villages were ordered evacuated for fear of
tidal waves, officials said.
   There were no immediate reports of casualties or damage from the
quake, which struck at 3:26 a.m. Thursday (1:26 p.m. Wednesday
EST). It was centered about 60 miles off the coast and at a depth
of 20 miles, the Central Meteorological Agency in Tokyo said.
   After the quake, officials closed the major expressway through
the affected region for inspection and overnight trains were
stopped to check the condition of the rails.
   The agency warned of a tsunami, or seismic tidal wave, hitting
coastal towns on northeast Honshu and the northernmost main island
of Hokkaido. The agency said sea levels two hours after the quake
had risen nearly three feet in the region.
   Officials ordered the evacuation of the villages of Taro,
Sanriku and Ozutsu, about 300 miles northeast of Tokyo on Honshu's
eastern coast.
   The agency said the quake had a magnitude of 7.1 on the Richter
scale, the same as the Oct. 17 earthquake that devastated the San
Francisco Bay area. In Washington, the U.S. Geological Survey said
the quake measured 7.3 on the Richter scale.
   U.S. Geological Survey scientists said they recorded an
aftershock measuring 5.8 about 10 minutes after the main quake.
   The main earthquake was the strongest in that region in more
than 58 years, since a magnitude 7.7 earthquake March 9, 1931, said
Don Finley, a spokesman for the U.S. agency.
   The earthquake occurred in the same general area as a series of
earlier tremors during the past several weeks. The strongest of the
earlier quakes was a magnitude 6.5 on Sunday.
   The Richter scale is a measure of ground motion as recorded on
seismographs. Every increase of one number means a tenfold increase
in magnitude. Thus a reading of 7.5 reflects an earthquake 10 times
stronger than one of 6.5.
   An earthquake of 3.5 on the Richter scale can cause slight
damage in the local area, 4 moderate damage, 5 considerable damage,
6 severe damage. A 7 reading is a ``major'' earthquake, capable of
widespread heavy damage; 8 is a ``great'' quake, capable of
tremendous damage.
   Japan is situated on a major fault line that produces frequent
earthquakes, few of which cause serious damage.
",7,"[ 0.29507643  0.01416528  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
73,"
   A major earthquake rumbled through the
jungles of southern Sudan on Sunday near the war-torn region's
largest city, but officials said there appeared to be no casualties
and little damage.
   The quake measured 7.5 on the Richter scale. A temblor of that
size is capable of causing widespread destruction.
   The official Sudan News Agency said the earthquake caused no
deaths or injuries. But much of the area affected by the quake is
so isolated that any news might take days or weeks.
   Juba, southern Sudan's largest city, is 60 miles southwest of
the quake's reported epicenter. The region has been hit by famine
as well as fighting between the government and the rebel People's
Liberation Army, and Juba is crammed with refugees from the
7-year-old civil war.
   In Nairobi, Kenya, Bob Koepp, a Lutheran World Federation
official, said a pilot flying relief supplies to Juba returned late
Sunday and said the city had not been seriously affected. He said
there was some ``negligible'' damage.
   ``It wasn't very heavy at Juba. The epicenter apparently was in
the swamps and the ground may have just soaked it up,'' Koepp said.
   Scientists said the quake's epicenter was 700 miles south of
Sudan's capital, Khartoum. It occurred in sparsely populated
territory controlled by the rebels, who hold most of the southern
countryside.
   Relief workers in two rebel-controlled villages, Bor and Torit,
apparently told officials in Nairobi, Kenya, the earthquake caused
no damage there.
   ``It's pretty low area over there, with low buildings and quite
remote,'' Koepp said.
   A crew with Koepp's organization landed in the region with
relief supplies two hours after the quake struck at 4:22 a.m. and
reported seeing nothing amiss.
   Late Sunday, a Khartoum airport tower operator said flights to
the southern city had not been disrupted.
   Pierre-Andre Conod of the International Committee of the Red
Cross said he had no details about injuries or damage. He said
colleagues in Juba had not made their regular radio contact with
Khartoum but cautioned that ``maybe they have a problem with the
antenna. We cannot say it is due to the earthquake.''
   People seeking haven from the war and from famine have more than
doubled Juba's population of 125,000. In recent years, hundreds of
thousands have died in southern Sudan, an area the size of Texas.
   Egypt's two principal earthquake monitoring stations, including
one at the Aswan High Dam, 600 miles south of Cairo and just north
of the Sudan border, recorded the quake at 7.5 on the Richter
scale. The U.S. Geological Survey in Menlo Park, Calif. reported an
identical reading.
   ``It's such a big quake that the monitoring stations are
saturated with data,'' said geologist Rashad M. Kebeasy, president
of Egypt's National Research Institute of Astronomy and Geophysics.
``This is an extremely dangerous earthquake. It is the first time
that such a quake has struck this area.''
   He said ``large and very dangerous aftershocks'' were to be
expected for the next two days.
   The Richter scale is a gauge of energy released by an earthquake
as measured by the ground motion recorded on a seismograph. Every
increase of one number, say from magnitude 5.5 to magnitude 6.6,
means that the ground motion is 10 times greater.
   A magnitude of 7 is considered a major earthquake capable of
widespread heavy damage. Magnitude 8 is a great earthquake capable
of tremendous damage. Last October's earthquake near San Francisco
registered 7.1 on the Richter scale.
   Kebeasy, an expert on earthquakes of northeastern Africa, said
the epicenter was just west of the Great African Rift. That
earthquake zone stretches 4,000 miles from Mozambique through the
Red Sea to Lebanon.
   The proximity to the rift accounts for the quake's magnitude,
Kebeasy said.
",7,"[ 0.36592578  0.01053986  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
74,"
   The earthquake that struck northern Iran brought
reminders of another quake that devastated Soviet Armenia in 1988.
   Like Thursday's earthquake in Iran, the Dec. 7, 1988, earthquake
in Armenia killed about 25,000 people. Most died in structures that
collapsed when the quake hit.
   ``It's very similar to what we had in Armenia,'' said Russ
Needham, a geophysicist with the U.S. Geological Survey.
   The Armenian quake was measured at 6.9 on the Richter scale, but
Thursday's earthquake shook the earth with a magnitude of 7.7
according to the U.S. Geological Survey.
   In the Iranian quake, the casualty count was pushed up by the
fact that people were indoors and asleep at the time, just after
midnight. Many of the victims lived in fragile homes built of a
ceramic-type brick or adobe that collapses easily.
   In the Armenian quake, a Soviet parliamentary report later
blamed the high number of fatalities on shoddily built buildings.
   ``Most casualties from earthquakes are caused by something
falling on top of you,'' said Needham in a telephone interview from
Golden, Colo.
   The quake struck an area of Iran where most of the buildings are
built on a flood plain of loosely deposited soil that shifts in an
earthquake and allows structures to collapse, Needham said.
   The 7.7-magnitude quake was the largest ever recorded in that
area, where two major plates of the earth's crust meet, he said.
   ``Iran is in a very active seismic region,'' he said, and that
there have been many smaller quakes.
   Twelve earthquakes greater than magnitude 7 have occurred in
Iran during the last 30 years, Needham said.
   A quake of magnitude 7 is considered a major earthquake, capable
of widespread, heavy damage in populated areas.
",7,"[ 0.34797858  0.01670487  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
75,"

Far beneath this modern metropolis, the powerful forces of nature are locked in 
a slow but deadly battle that will some day bring this great city to its knees. 


Already overcrowded and growing at a staggering rate, Tokyo sits on a deep 
sedimentary basin that is like a bowl of jello cradled by one of the most 
treacherous geological formations on the planet. Bluntly put, there are few 
places on Earth that are geologically less suited as a site for a great city 
than here on the shores of Tokyo Bay. 


Three of the giant slabs of the Earth's crust grind together here in what 
scientists call a ""triple junction."" Two of the plates sink beneath the islands 
of Japan and then collide again as they plunge deep into the Earth directly 
below Tokyo, setting the stage for catastrophic earthquakes that have destroyed 
the city in the past and could well do so again in the future. 


Most other earthquake-prone regions, including California, only have to worry 
about two colliding plates. 


The threat will get worse in the years ahead because more and more land is 
being reclaimed from Tokyo Bay to serve the needs of millions more who are 
flocking to a city already strangling on its own prosperity. Scientists are 
concerned that land reclaimed from the bay will be particularly hazardous 
because such soils amplify shock waves from earthquakes. 


Painfully aware of its problems, Japan is moving full speed ahead in earthquake 
engineering research, and the country is trying to develop the world's best 
earthquake warning system before the next great quake hits. But some experts 
believe Tokyo is already past due for a catastrophic quake, and scientists 
around the world are watching to see if Japan can win a race against time. 


The impact of a giant quake here could be felt around the world. Tokyo is a key 
player in global economics, and some officials fear that a catastrophic quake 
here could have a devastating effect elsewhere. Frank Press, president of the 
U.S. National Academy of Sciences, has speculated that a great quake here would 
force Japan to reclaim much of its foreign investment, possibly leading to a 
collapse of the world economy. 


Tokyo was leveled once, in 1923, when a monstrous earthquake destroyed a city 
that had ignored the lessons offered in 1906 from a different city by a distant 
bay. ""If we had understood the 1906 San Francisco earthquake, the damages from 
the Great Kanto Earthquake which came just 17 years later could have been 
avoided,"" says Hirokazu Iemura of Kyoto University's Earthquake Engineering 
Laboratory. 


Iemura, who toured the Bay Area after last October's quake, is afraid history 
may repeat itself. The recent San Francisco temblor, he said, demonstrated what 
scientists call ""non-linear"" consequences of an earthquake. 


That means that in some cases the earth may tremble far more than the magnitude 
of the quake would suggest. The Bay Area quake suggested that Tokyo too may be 
much more vulnerable than experts had thought. 


For this and other reasons, Tokyo, most experts agree, has much to worry about. 


A study last year by Japan's National Land Agency concluded that if a great 
earthquake -- magnitude 8 or greater -- should strike Tokyo in the middle of 
the night it would kill about 80,000 people. If it came at lunch time, as it 
did in 1923, or in the evening when stoves would be lit for cooking and 
heating, fires would sweep through parts of the city and the death toll could 
reach 150,000. Many experts here think even those grim estimates are far too 
low. 


When the great quake strikes, as everyone here knows it must, it will hit a 
city that is already so crowded that on a typical day it dwarfs the worst 
traffic jams that Los Angeles has to offer. 


Despite widespread planning efforts, there will be few places for people to 
run, and it will be extremely difficult to reach safety even for those who know 
where to go. The danger will not be just from falling objects. It will be 
mainly from fire. 


""In the 1923 earthquake, 100,000 people burned to death,"" Iemura said. That is 
more than twice as many as were killed directly by the 7.9 temblor. And now, 
all these years later, Iemura and many other experts in Japan are afraid that 
history may repeat itself. 


""We are very afraid of fire,"" said Etsuzo Shima, professor emeritus at the 
University of Tokyo and one of Japan's leading earthquake experts. ""We have 
many wooden houses and the roads are very narrow, and if there is a big fire in 
the region, many of them will be burned."" 


Nario Oyagi, a geologist-engineer with Japan's National Research Center for 
Disaster Prevention, thinks Tokyo's congested streets pose a special problem. 
In his worst nightmares, he sees endless streams of cars ablaze on crowded 
streets, forming ribbons of fire extending out to the suburbs. 


Hampered by ruptured water lines, unable to move on the jammed streets, 
firefighters would be helpless, forced to witness a holocaust of unthinkable 
dimensions. 


Tokyo's Metropolitan Fire Department has estimated that fully one-third of the 
city could be destroyed by fire in a great quake. Japanese authorities are well 
aware of their peril, and have made dramatic progress in earthquake 
engineering. The modern buildings of Japan are among the best engineered in the 
world, and even many older structures are well built because earthquakes here 
are so much a part of life. 


But no amount of planning can reduce the geological hazard that lies beneath 
Tokyo. 


""This is a very complex place,"" said Yoshimitsu Okada, who is in charge of the 
most ambitious effort in the world to predict an earthquake. Okada directs a 
research team that hopes to predict a major quake about 100 miles south of 
Tokyo in time to evacuate several crowded cities. 


Okada knows the quake will come some day because the geological formations 
beneath Japan are constantly active. 


The Earth's crust is made up of giant tectonic plates that drift around the 
planet. The plates slide against each other in some regions, like California, 
causing earthquakes. In other areas, an oceanic plate slides beneath a 
continental plate through subduction. The latter is the process that created 
the active volcanoes of the Pacific Northwest. 


The islands of Japan are on the Eurasia Plate, which is sliding up over two 
other plates, the giant Pacific Plate (which also grinds against California on 
its opposite side) and the Philippine Sea Plate. 


The Philippine and Pacific plates are being pushed under Japan as the powerful 
forces crunch together, creating volcanoes as they heat the underside of the 
Eurasia Plate. And unfortunately for Tokyo, directly beneath the mega-city, the 
two oceanic plates are colliding as they sink into the Earth's mantle. 


Temblors occur as the plates are ripped apart while being forced under the 
Eurasia Plate, so they strike much deeper than the shallow earthquakes in 
California. However, they can be quite large, well above magnitude 8, so they 
pose a great danger to areas on the surface. 


Furthermore, the strength of an earthquake here is magnified by the geological 
conditions that underlie nearly the entire city of Tokyo. Like Los Angeles, 
Tokyo and many other cities in Japan are built on sedimentary deposits that 
have washed down from the mountains over millions of years. 


Those deposits have formed a huge sedimentary basin beneath what is now the 
city of Tokyo. In some cases, that basin is up to two miles thick. 


When an earthquake occurs, the waves of energy flowing from the epicenter are 
magnified by shifting sedimentary deposits, making the ground shaking more 
intense. 


Tokyo has an additional problem because the bedrock on which the sedimentary 
basin sits is shaped somewhat like a bowl. Shock waves striking the bedrock are 
reflected back up toward the surface, extending the life of the earthquake. 


""The duration of the shaking is very long,"" said Oyagi, of the National 
Research Center for Disaster Prevention. 


Officials here know those conditions could add up to disaster for Tokyo, a 
belief that was reinforced by Kyoto University's Iemura when he returned from 
his tour of the San Francisco Bay Area after the Oct. 17 quake. He has 
concluded that Japan still has much to learn from San Francisco as well as 
Mexico City, which was ravaged by a 7.9 earthquake in 1985 that killed about 
9,500 people and caused $3 billion in damages. 


Most experts here had thought that Mexico City was an ""exceptional case,"" 
Iemura said. The sprawling city is built on an ancient lake bed, and scientists 
believe it was particularly vulnerable to ground failure from liquefaction. 
That occurs when a shallow water table causes the loose sediments to assume the 
characteristics of a liquid during a large earthquake. 


""This (liquefaction) had been thought of as very exceptional,"" Iemura said. 


But the Bay Area quake demonstrated that liquefaction can occur ""along the 
coast,"" as in San Francisco's Marina District, he added. 


""Mexico had been thought so exceptional there was no need to think about it,"" 
Iemura said. ""But what about San Francisco? Is that also a special case?"" 


Although he thinks the question needs more study, Iemura is troubled by the 
fact that much of Tokyo is built on areas similar to San Francisco's Marina 
District. 


And like San Francisco, Tokyo is extremely short of land on which to build the 
high rises needed to house the millions who continue to flock to this crowded 
city. 


The answer to the land shortage, Japanese authorities have concluded, is to 
reclaim more land from Tokyo Bay -- a prospect that deeply troubles many 
experts. Many of the new structures going up in Tokyo these days are built on 
filled land, and some people here hope someday to fill in the entire bay, 
making room for even more people and more buildings. 


If San Francisco was not an ""exceptional case,"" that trend could prove 
disastrous, many experts believe. 


Tokyo University's Shima believes there is only one answer, and that is to 
reverse the flow of people into Tokyo. 


One group is proposing that the capital be moved out of Tokyo, hoping that the 
forced move of government workers will result in a lower death toll when the 
quake hits. Local authorities are resisting that suggestion, but Shima insists 
that some people are now taking it seriously. 


""We are very afraid because we are now going to build a lot of high-rise 
buildings in the bay area,"" he said. ""That will increase the population, and 
that's not so good."" 


The earthquake hazards facing Tokyo are not just a local problem because Japan 
has become a major participant -- some say the dominant player -- in 
international economics. A devastating quake here would be felt in board rooms 
around the world. 


Experts believe insurance companies would be able to cover only a small 
percentage of the loss. The Japanese government has put a ceiling of around 
$60,000 on each private residence in a city where a humble abode costs 10 times 
that amount. 


And Tokyo is a major nerve center in the fragile network that constitutes the 
global economy. 


Next: Preparing for The Big One 


DANGEROUS INTERSECTION 


Japan ranks among the most geologically active regions in the world. 
Earthquakes occur chiefly in areas where giant slabs of the Earth's crust, 
called tectonic plates, either grind past each other or crunch together in a 
process called ""subduction"" that forces one plate under another. 


Japan, however, has to concern itself with four plates. Most of the islands are 
on the giant Eurasia Plate, although the North American Plate reaches up over 
the Arctic and down to the northern tip of the archipelago. The Pacific and the 
Philippine Sea plates are being forced under the Eurasia Plate, and the two 
subducting plates collide directly beneath Tokyo. 


That dynamic process is why the region is capable of generating catastrophic 
earthquakes, like the temblor that destroyed Tokyo in 1923, as well as about 
1,000 smaller quakes every month. 

",7,"[ 0.         0.         0.0074796 ...,  0.         0.         0.       ]"
76,"
   A lie detector that measures brain waves would be
more accurate than polygraphs, which measure bodily functions, says
its developer.
   ``It would probably not falsely accuse any innocent people, and
it would probably pick up 70 to 90 percent of guilty people,'' says
J. Peter Rosenfeld, a Northwestern University professor of
psychology and of neurobiology and physiology. ``I think that's
better than existing units.''
   The American Medical Association and the congressional Office of
Technology Assessment have said polygraphs are wrong 15 percent to
50 percent of the time.
   Rosenfeld's lie detector picks up brain-wave activity through
electrodes attached to the scalp, amplifying the signals and
feeding them into a computer, which coordinates the information and
displays it on a video screen.
   ``If sensory information has a special meaning for you ... then
your brain will respond with a special kind of trough called the P3
wave,'' he said.
   In tests at Northwestern, subjects have been asked to look at a
series of words, most with no special meaning. ``Occasionally,
they'll see a word that is meaningful, like some anti-social act
they're involved in _ cheating on tests or using drugs _ which is
sometimes the case here,'' Rosenfeld said.
   ``When they see terms like that, their brain waves break into P3
waves.''
   Polygraphs measure the physical expression of emotions _ pulse,
sweating, blood pressure and breathing, he said.
   Advertising researchers have measured P3 waves to better gauge
what consumers want instead of what they say they want, and
psychiatrists can detect certain disorders, such as attention
deficits, by measuring them, he said.
   Rosenfeld has worked on the detector for almost four years and
says it could be widely used within three more. He published a
study last year and will publish another this summer in the
International Journal of Neuroscience.
   ``It's a perfectly valid way of detecting lies,'' said Sidney
Weinstein, a professor of neurology at New York University College
of Medicine in New York City and editor of the Danbury, Conn.-based
neuroscience journal.
   However, a brain-wave lie detector would probably cost 10 times
as much as the $500 to $600 for a polygraph, and the operator would
need a great deal more training, Weinstein said.
",8,"[ 0.33063424  0.01587225  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
77,"
   Beginning in December, most private employers
will be barred by law from using polygraphs and other types of lie
detectors to screen job applicants or test the current employees
except in rare circumstances.
   Under new regulations issued Friday by the Labor Department,
employers can be fined up to $10,000 for requiring a job seeker or
employee already on their payrolls to submit to a polygraph exam
for voice stress analysis.
   The regulations, which take effect Dec. 27, implement
legislation passed by Congress and signed by President Reagan last
June outlawing about 85 percent of the current use of lie detector
tests.
   The congressional Office of Technology Assessment had estimated
that 2 million polygraph examinations were conducted last year _ 90
percent of them by private employers.
   Some 7.2 million employers nationwide will be required to put up
posters in December summarizing the prohibitions and exemptions and
outlining the rights of any worker asked to take a lie detector
test.
   Fred Alvarez, assistant labor secretary for employment
standards, said the posters will be mailed out in the next three or
four weeks.
   In addition to the fines, anyone required to take the test in
violation of the new law can sue employers in federal and state
courts for relief, such as employment reinstatement, promotion and
any payment of lost wages and benefits.
   Exempted from protection under the ban are employees of federal,
state and local governments or of federal contractors engaged in
national security, intelligence or top secret activities.
   Also exempted from the ban are prospective employees of armored
car, security alarm and security guard firms hired to protect
operations affecting health and safety, national security or money.
   Pharmaceutical concerns or companies manufacturing, distributing
or dispensing controlled substances also can require job applicants
to submit to a lie detector test, but only for those people who
would have direct access to the drugs.
   Polygraphs still can be used by employers to investigate
specific incidents of theft, embezzlement or sabotage, but not a
persistent problem, such as recurring inventory shortages.
   But any workers asked to submit to a polygraph exam under those
conditions must be given at least 48 hours advance notice and a
statement in advance telling them of their rights, including the
right to refuse the test or to terminate it at any time.
   The pre-test statement also must explain the specific incident
or activity being investigated and the basis for the employer's
suspicion that the person asked to take the exam was involved in it.
   Results of a polygraph test or refusal to submit to such an exam
cannot be used alone as a basis for taking any action against an
employee. The regulations also forbid disclosure of the test
results to anyone other than the employee without the employee's
consent or a court order.
",8,"[ 0.33516038  0.01379102  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
78,"
   If you go on a job interview today and are
asked to take a lie detector test, the chances are you would be the
victim of an illegal act.
   The same situation applies if your boss has a polygraph examiner
come into the warehouse tomorrow to hook wires to randomly selected
employees and question them about merchandise missing from the
company's shelves.
   It is now illegal across America for most employers in interstate
commerce to use the controversial polygraph for pre-employment
screening purposes or to use them randomly against workers already
on their payroll.
   These restrictions on lie detectors, whose accuracy has long been
under attack, are enumerated in a federal law that took effect
Tuesday, six months after it was signed by President Reagan.
   ``This is a holiday gift for working people,'' said Judy
Goldberg, legislative representative for the American Civil
Liberties Union.
   ``We expect that the new law will ban 80 percent of the
approximately 2 million polygraph tests given annually,'' Goldberg
said in a prepared statement.
   The law's restrictions will be felt most heavily in 28 states
that lack their own statutes restricting the use of lie detectors,
Goldberg said.
   Not covered by the new rules, however, are federal, state and
local governments and firms doing sensitive work under contract to
the Defense Department, FBI and CIA.
   The only other private-sector exceptions to the general ban apply
to companies that manufacture, distribute or dispense controlled
substances and some types of firms in the security guard, armored
car or security alarm fields.
   The law prohibits an employee from being fired, disciplined or
discriminated against solely for refusing to submit to a polygraph
examination.
   An employer can request an employee to take a lie detector test
if the worker had access to missing or damaged material and if the
employer sets forth in a written statement a reasonable suspicion
that the worker was involved in the loss.
   Any such polygraph exam would have to be conducted under strict
conditions, with no questions about personal beliefs and sexual
behavior, and the exam results alone could not be used as a basis
for discipline or a refusal to hire.
   ``Complaints about polygraph abuse and firings based on polygraph
abuse have been one of the single largest sources of calls to ACLU
offices nationwide,'' Goldberg said.
   ``Now employees can complain to the Department of Labor or go
into court to protect themselves against these inaccurate gadgets,''
Goldberg said.
   She said the law would have the greatest impact in Alabama,
Arizona, Arkansas, Colorado, Florida, Georgia, Illinois, Indiana,
Kansas, Kentucky, Louisiana, Mississippi, Missouri, Nevada, New
Hampshire, New Mexico, New York, North Carolina, North Dakota, Ohio,
Oklahoma, South Carolina, South Dakota, Tennessee, Texas, Utah,
Virginia and Wyoming.
   Goldberg said employers in the following states, which allow
businesses to request people to take lie detector tests, could be
affected by the new law: California, Hawaii, Idaho, Maryland,
Montana, Nebraska, Pennsylvania and Wisconsin.
   The remaining 14 states and the District of Columbia have laws
banning polygraph examinations for employment purposes, and these
laws take precedence over the new federal statute if they are more
restrictive, according to Goldberg.
",8,"[ 0.3738457   0.01266821  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
79,"
   A prosecutor calls it ``witchcraft'' and a
psychologist says it's as reliable as a coin toss.
   After years of debate, court rulings and federal legislation,
use of the polygraph has dropped sharply, despite supporters who
insist the test is a good indicator of whether someone is telling a
lie.
   ``They have been useless and give misleading information,'' said
Leonard Saxe, a visiting professor of psychology at Brandeis
University and a leading opponent of polygraph testing. ``They
suggest whether you're guilty or innocent. You might as well flip a
coin.''
   Last week, the state Supreme Court banned lie detector tests
from being introduced as evidence in criminal trials. Massachusetts
had been one of the last remaining states that gave defendants the
right to use polygraphs to support their alibis.
   The court, noting polygraph studies have shown success rates
varying from 95 percent to just above 50 percent, said: ``There
remains no consensus among experts as to the accuracy of polygraph
testing to detect deceit.''
   The court was not alone in deciding against polygraphs, which
attempt to determine someone's honesty by their physiological
response to certain questions.
   Last year, Congress prohibited most private sector employers
from using lie dectectors to screen job applicants or randomly test
workers.
   Exempted from the rules were federal, state and local
governments, firms that do sensitive work for agencies like the CIA
and FBI, companies that provide security services and those that
make or distribute controlled substances.
   ``I think it's appropriate to seek if someone is lying, and the
most appropriate way is to seek evidence,'' said Judy Crockett, who
fought on behalf of the federal law for the American Civil
Liberties Union. ``Polygraphs tend to be an attempt to short-cut
investigations.''
   The federal law, which took effect a year ago, has taken a big
bite out of the polygraph business.
   ``There's been a definite decline in the private sector,'' said
Chris Fausett, product manager for Lafayette Instrument Co., based
in Lafayette, Ind., one of the country's largest makers of
polygraph machines.
   He declined to give specific numbers, but he said the drop was
``about as sharp as you can get.''
   ``No doubt businesses have had to abandon 75-80 percent of
polygraph tests,'' said Joseph Buckley, a spokesman for the
American Polygraph Association, a trade group based in Chattanooga,
Tenn.
   Buckley said his group had about 3,000 members a year ago, but
the number has dropped by a third. ``A lot of them had to change
careers,'' he said.
   However, these trends do not mean polygraph testing is dead.
   Law enforcement agencies use lie detectors to interview
witnesses when investigating crimes.
   The Department of Defense uses polygraph testing to search for
spies, and also to screen job applicants if something suspicious
arises in background checks, said spokesman Jim Turner.
   Reading from a Defense Department statement regarding the use of
polygraphs, Turner said:
   ``In all instances the polygraph exam process produced data of
important security or criminal significance which was not otherwise
obtainable. It was also invaluable in establishing the innocence of
people confronted with serious accusations.''
   Many states allow polygraph evidence to be introduced if both
the prosecution and defense agree.
   New Mexico is the one state where either party can introduce a
polygraph examination as evidence, with the trial judge deciding
whether the tests meet certain standards. But not everyone in the
state supports it.
   Timothy Cornish, a prosecutor in the New Mexico attorney
general's office, called polygraph exams ``witchcraft.''
   ``It can, if used in an unbridled way, change the entire
truth-seeking process,'' he said. ``It replaces the jury.''
   David Raskin, a University of Utah psychologist often called
upon to support polygraphs in the courtroom, said he favored the
federal law because lie detectors were being misused to predict
future performance in the workplace. But he said they are reliable
tools in determining someone's past actions.
   ``Every piece of evidence has a dose of uncertainty,'' Raskin
said. ``Jurors are very cautious with polygraph evidence. They are
overly skeptical. They do not ignore other evidence and concentrate
on the polygraph.''
",8,"[ 0.44604865  0.01027813  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
80,"
   A grand jury's questioning of a polygraph
expert who is helping investigate the bombing of Pan AM Flight 103
indicates the Justice Department's probe is entering a new phase.
   A federal grand jury in Washington heard testimony last Friday
from James Keefe, a polygraph expert for a security consulting firm
hired by lawyers representing Pan Am in a civil suit over the Dec.
21, 1988 bombing.
   Keefe testified about giving polygraph tests to three Pan Am
baggage handlers in Frankfurt, West Germany, during his appearance
before the grand jury, said a source familiar with the case.
   Keefe told the panel two of the three baggage handlers failed
the polygraph tests when they said they knew nothing about the
transfer of a piece of luggage to Flight 103, said the source, who
spoke on the condition of anonymity.
   The source confirmed a report published in Tuesday's editions of
the Syracuse Post Standard.
   Keefe's appearance before the grand jury indicates U.S.
authorities are stepping up their investigation of the bombing over
Lockerbie, Scotland that killed 259 passengers and crew members and
11 people on the ground.
   Anti-terrorism laws give federal prosecutors in Washington
jurisdiction to bring cases in acts that occur abroad.
   Scottish police believe the bomb was in a suitcase that was
placed aboard Pan Am Flight 103 in Frankfurt before it took off for
London. Passengers and luggage were transferred to a Boeing 747 at
London's Heathrow Airport for the trans-Atlantic leg of the trip to
New York City.
   The suitcase is believed to have been brought to Frankfurt
aboard a plane from Malta. Investigators found clothing fragments
in Lockerbie that were traced to a clothing store in Malta,
according to a federal law enforcement source.
   The bombing investigation has focused on a number of terrorist
organizations, including the Popular Front for the Liberation of
Palestine-General Command.
   Polygraph tests cannot be admitted in court, but the questions
Keefe asked the baggage handlers and their responses may provide
investigators with new leads in the case.
   Keefe works for Interfor Inc., a New York-based security
consulting firm retained by lawyers representing Pan Am's insurance
carrier in a $300 million damage suit filed by relatives of people
killed in the bombing.
   He was served with the grand jury subpoena on Jan. 25 as he
stepped off a plane at John F. Kennedy International Airport in New
York following his return from Europe, said the source.
",8,"[ 0.30724089  0.01361468  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
81,"

A state Court of Appeal ruled Monday that cities and counties may require 
applicants for jobs as police officers to submit to polygraph tests about their 
character and background. 


In a 2-1 decision, the panel rejected claims that such testing violated the 
state constitutional right to privacy or conflicted with statutes that bar such 
tests for public safety officers already on the job. 


""(Municipalities) have a compelling governmental interest in conducting a 
comprehensive background investigation and in utilizing the polygraph 
examination to protect the public from applicants who may be attempting to 
conceal undetected criminal activity, racial prejudice, sexual aberrance or 
violent tendencies,"" Appellate Justice James F. Perley wrote for the court. 


The panel noted that the right to privacy was ""not absolute"" -- and said that a 
city's interest in ensuring its officers were of the highest integrity 
outweighed any harm suffered by an applicant who loses a job opportunity for 
refusing the test. 


The court acknowledged that some critics have questioned the reliability of the 
polygraph, or so-called ""lie detector."" But proponents and opponents of the 
device agree that a polygraph test can distinguish between truth and deception 
""with an accuracy greater than chance,"" the panel said. 


""Given a police officer's unique status in society, compulsory polygraph 
testing of applicants for police officer positions is justified,"" Perley said. 


The decision sought to resolve an important question left open by a ruling by 
the state Supreme Court in 1986 that held unconstitutional any involuntary 
polygraph tests for public employees. State statutes already had barred such 
testing of private employees and police officers. The court's holding, however, 
did not settle the issue for applicants for public safety jobs. 


Monday's ruling, unless overturned by the state high court, will be binding on 
trial courts throughout California. According to attorneys in the case, at 
least half of the cities and counties in the state currently require applicants 
for public safety jobs to take polygraph tests. 


Michael H. Roush, an attorney representing the city of Vallejo in its defense 
of the practice in the case before the court, welcomed the ruling. ""Cities have 
an interest in making sure they hire the right candidates for jobs that have 
important powers in this society,"" he said. 


Richard L. Pinckard, a deputy city attorney representing San Diego and three 
other cities backing Vallejo in the case, said the ruling was especially 
important in view of state laws barring polygraph exams for officers already on 
the job. ""The only place to catch (wrongdoers) is at the pre-employment stage,"" 
he said. 


San Francisco attorney Duane W. Reno, who represented a former officer who 
challenged the tests, said an appeal to the state Supreme Court would be 
considered. Reno said there are ""less intrusive means"" to screen applicants. 


The ruling came in the case of Clarence E. Rust, a former police officer in the 
city of Vallejo who was granted disability retirement for chronic back problems 
but later sought reinstatement to the Police Department. 


Rust refused the city's requirement that he take a polygraph test and filed a 
lawsuit, charging violation of his constitutional and civil rights. In support 
of his suit, he cited the statutes that prohibit officers from being forced to 
submit to such tests against their will, along with language in the 1986 state 
high court decision suggesting cities would bear a heavy legal burden in 
justifying the tests for applicants for public safety jobs. 


A Solano County Superior Court rejected Rust's claims and the Court of Appeal, 
in its ruling Monday, affirmed that ruling, concluding that both applicants -- 
and ex-officers seeking reinstatement -- could be required to take the tests as 
a condition for getting the job. 


The panel noted that pre-employment polygraph screening is widely used by 
intelligence and law enforcement agencies throughout the United States. 
Although 23 states, including California, have in some way restricted tests, 14 
have specifically permitted law enforcement agencies to conduct them for 
applicants, the court said. 


Perley's 23-page opinion was joined by Appellate Justice Carl West Anderson. In 
dissent, Appellate Justice Marc Poche said that ex-officers like Rust should be 
treated like officers holding jobs and be protected against involuntary testing 
when they seek reinstatement. 

",8,"[ 0.          0.          0.01638058 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
82,"     Trying to save her name; Charles Ogletree, a Harvard law professor and one
of Hill's lawyers, said Hill wanted to take the test to refute the attacks
made on her motives and integrity by Republican senators Saturday.;   However,
the significance of polygraph tests is limited. They are not admitted as
evidence in most courtrooms because the scientific community believes they are
insufficiently reliable and judges believe juries give them too much weight.; 
 The danger of polygraph tests is that ""some people are able to fool lie
detectors because they believe what they're saying, even though it isn't
true,"" Georgetown University criminal law professor Paul Rothstein said.;  
What Hill was asked; Minor, a well known polygraph expert who has taught FBI
polygraph operators, said he put four questions to Hill:;   (check) Have you
deliberately lied to me about Clarence Thomas?;   (check) Are you fabricating
the allegation that Clarence Thomas discussed pornographic material with you?;
  (check) Are you lying to me about the various topics that Clarence Thomas
mentioned to you regarding specific sexual acts?;   (check) Are you lying to
me about Clarence Thomas making references to you about the size of his
penis?;   She answered ""no"" to each question. ""There was no indication of
deception to any of the relevant questions,"" Minor said outside the hearing
room. ""It's therefore my opinion Ms. Hill is truthful."";   Sen. Howard
Metzenbaum asked that Hill's polygraph results be placed in the committee
record, but chairman Joseph Biden, D-Del., refused, noting that courts did not
accept such evidence and that the test had been produced outside committee
control.;   Nevertheless, Rothstein said, ""polygraphs are 60 to 80 percent
reliable, depending upon whom you ask,"" and Peter Tague, also a Georgetown
criminal law specialist, said that ""Prof. Hill's willingness to take a
polygraph test tends to support her credibility."";   The devices purport to
detect untruthful answers by measuring changes in blood pressure, pulse rate
and perspiration.;   While he is considered to be a prominent expert in his
field, Minor's reputation is not without controversy.;   In July 1980, Minor,
who was then with the FBI, administered two polygraph tests to Herman Sillas,
then the U.S. attorney in Sacramento, to determine the veracity of allegations
that he had taken a $7,500 bribe from a prison inmate several years earlier.
The test was later determined to have been improperly administered.;   Minor
could not be reached for comment Sunday.  ",8,"[ 0.3846111   0.01429427  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
83,"     The construction workers on the site where the Oakland hills fire may have
started also took one. They were cleared of suspicion.;   It's a polygraph
test, an examination by that simple machine that supposedly detects the lies
of those who submit to its cold wires and straps.;   Believers in the
polygraph include 2,000 polygraph examiners, plus criminologists, attorneys,
police departments and the CIA.;   They say their tests work because when
people lie, their anxiety and fear of being caught involuntarily cause changes
in their heartbeats and the way they breathe and sweat. Polygraph machines
detect these changes.;   Critics, including psychologists, labor unions and
many judges, say the polygraph is nothing but a crude interrogation tool with
as much credibility as a mood ring. They say it's a mistake to equate fear and
distress with guilt.;   ""Wouldn't it be nice if you had a simple test to prove
deception?"" said David Lykken, professor of psychology at the University of
Minnesota and a nationally  known polygraph expert. ""But we aren't made like
Pinocchio."";   The public usually hears about polygraph tests when somebody
famous takes one, often in situations where it's one person's word against
another. William Kennedy Smith's accuser took the test -- and passed -- to
""prove"" she was telling the truth when she said he raped her.;   Ronald Reagan
was fond of polygraph tests. But in 1985, when he would have forced Cabinet
members to take them, Secretary of State George Shultz threatened to resign
and Reagan quietly dropped the idea.;   Pre-employment testing;   The test
gained popularity in the 1970s, when it was used by retail stores and other
private firms to screen job applicants. It lost ground in 1989, when the
federal Employee Polygraph Protection Act took effect, outlawing
pre-employment polygraph testing in most private industry. The act was
endorsed by unions who said the polygraph was an invasion of privacy with
questionable reliability.;   However, the pre-employment polygraph is still
widely used for job applicants in many government offices, including the San
Jose Police Department.;   The credibility of the polygraph is questioned in
criminal courtrooms throughout the country. Twenty-three states allow
polygraph results to be admitted as evidence, but usually only if both sides
agree in advance. California is one.;   Polygraph literally means ""many
writings."" The instrument measures several body responses -- breathing, blood
pressure and sweat. It was invented in the 1920s by William Moulton Marston, a
lawyer who later went on to create the comic strip ""Wonder Woman."";   The
testing procedure begins with a discussion of the test and the allegations.
One purpose of this pre-test interview is to reduce the subject's anxiety and
fear, and take the surprise out of the allegations. Another purpose is to help
the examiner craft questions aimed at eliciting both true statements and lies
as a basis for comparison.;   Not just physiological;   The test is not merely
physiological. Polygraphers can be sly and manipulative in the interest of
producing an accurate test. They rely on complex assumptions about human
nature and criminal psychology, and their subjects are often unaware how
extensively they are being analyzed.;   The polygraph test itself is short --
usually no more than 10 questions. Two to four questions are directly relevant
to the issue at hand -- ""Did you steal the $400?"";   These questions are mixed
with others that are less relevant but help the examiner analyze the responses
-- ""Do you live in California?"" or ""Have you ever stolen anything in your
life?"";   Then the examiner interprets the test and pronounces the subject
truthful or deceptive.;   The examiner also looks for clues to deception --
movement at this question, sweating at that one, a pause or a blink.;   More
'art' than science?;   ""Candidly, there's a lot of art that goes into it,""
said Paul Minor, former FBI chief of polygraphs, who tested John DeLorean and
Anita Hill.;   Critics say there's too much art involved and not enough
science.;   ""The highly trained examiner is relying on their skill as an
interrogator,"" said Oakland labor lawyer Brad Seligman, who successfully
opposed pre-employment polygraph tests in 1989 at an electronics store chain.
""The machine is a good prop that the examiner uses to convince people that the
machine knows everything."";   Critics say polygraphers' premises are flawed.
They say it is normal for both guilty and innocent alike to be distressed by
relevant questions.;   ""It's a natural reaction to being accused,"" Leonard
Saxe, a polygraph expert and psychologist at City University of New York. ""The
guilty person is going to be afraid of getting caught, while the innocent
person is afraid of being wrongly accused."";   But veteran San Jose
polygrapher George Harman said anxiety and nervousness do not affect his
results.;   ""The problem is when you have a person with not enough
nervousness,"" Harman said. ""You can get an inconclusive test result."";  
Pathological liars;   Studies also have been done by polygraphers to prove
that pathological liars and psychopaths have no advantage because both types
know they're lying and neither wants to get caught, said David Raskin, a
polygraph examiner and University of Utah psychologist.;   Polygraph examiners
claim accuracy rates as high as 95 percent. But they admit that the only way
to prove they were right is when a deceptive person later confesses. Guilty
people who pass the test leave undetected.;   Those accuracy claims are
challenged by polygraph opponents, who point to studies done by polygraphers
themselves that say an innocent person has as much as a 50-50 chance of
failing. Other studies show more accurate results for guilty people, saying
they are correctly identified 79 percent of the time or better.;   One of the
most famous accuracy studies cited by polygraph advocates was conducted in
1969 by psychologist Philip Bersh for the U.S. Department of Defense.;   90
percent agreement;   A panel of lawyers reviewed evidence (other than the
polygraph test) against 400 criminal suspects, then concluded whether the
suspects were innocent or guilty. Results were matched against the suspects'
polygraphs, and in 90 percent of the cases, they agreed.;   ""There isn't any
single study that resolves the controversy when one wants to know the accuracy
of the polygraph in the real world,"" said Frank Horvath, president of the
American Polygraph Association and professor of criminology at Michigan State
University at East Lansing.;   Both sides expect the controversy to go on for
as long as it takes science to come up with the perfect lie detector. Some say
it will never happen; others are content that society has come close enough
with the polygraph.;   ""Ask yourself, how does the polygraph compare to other
methods we have in our society of determining somebody's guilt or innocence?""
Horvath said. ""We all know that innocent people are sometimes convicted and
guilty people frequently walk. The trial process isn't infallible either.""  ",8,"[ 0.46069091  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
84,"
   The House Labor Committee approved a bill that would prohibit private employers from using lie detectors to test workers. 

   The panel voted 25-9 for the measure, which is bitterly opposed by many companies, especially pharmaceutical concerns, banks, retailers and other service-industry employers. 
Unions, especially in food and related industries, have pushed for the legislation, contending that polygraphs are unreliable in showing a person's veracity, and are an invasion of workers' privacy. 

   Before approving the bill, the Labor Committee rejected a spate of amendments that would have exempted pharmaceutical, nursing and day care, security-guard and other businesses from the polygraph ban. 
""We don't accept the legitimacy of the device,"" so there shouldn't be any exemptions, said Ernest Dubester, an AFL-CIO lobbyist. 

   Rather than limit the legislation's curb on polygraph use, the committee adopted by voice vote an amendment offered by Rep. Pat Williams (D., Mont.) that would also prohibit use of such equipment as voice-stress analyzers, but would allow written and oral tests, that are aimed at detecting employee deception. 

   The polygraph bill is one of several labor-backed measures that are picking up steam in Congress after having stalled in past sessions. 
Last year, the House passed a similar lie-detector bill, and the Senate Labor Committee approved its own version. 
But some Republican senators, aided by a veto threat by President Reagan and sizable business opposition, kept the measure off the Senate floor. 

   The Senate is expected soon to produce a new polygraph bill, which may be narrower than the House bill. 
Drafters of the Senate measure are considering limiting the use of lie detectors to workers who are suspects for a specific criminal act, for example, while prohibiting its general use in pre-employment screening or for random testing. 
Critics of polygraph testing contend that tests are especially unreliable when they're used in such general ways. 

   Permitting limited polygraph tests might garner business support that could gain White House backing for the bill, a Senate Labor panel official said. 
Among the options being considered are an outright ban as in the House bill, regulating polygraph use instead of prohibiting it, or letting employers request that workers take a lie-detector test. 

   Banning polygraph use by private employers would affect about 98% of its use, the AFL-CIO's Mr. Dubester said, while allowing government intelligence and other agencies to continue testing of employees in especially sensitive work. 
The prohibition would follow a trend set by many states; 31 states now have laws either banning or regulating the use of polygraphs. 

   But prohibiting polygraphs would strip many employers of a useful tool for fighting rising worker crime, either by uncovering employee theft, or by deterring job applicants or current employees from illegal acts, said Mark de Bernardo, labor-law official for the U.S. Chamber of Commerce. 
He said that Congress in 1985 allowed the Defense Department to expand polygraph screening of personnel with access to sensitive classified information. 

   It's ""ironic,"" he said, that many lawmakers favor a ban on private polygraph use though they voted for allowing more military usage. 
""If it's useful and reliable, it's useful and reliable across the board,"" Mr. de Bernardo said. 
The Chamber supports a measure recently introduced by Reps. 
Bill Young (R., Fla.) and George Darden (D., Ga.) that would require licensing and regulation of polygraph operators. 

   Lie detectors can catch wrongdoers and also absolve innocent suspects, Mr. de Bernardo said. 
The Chamber cites estimates by the National Association of Chain Drug Stores that consumers pay 10% to 15% more for goods to cover losses from employee theft, and a Drug Enforcement Administration estimate that as much as one million doses of drugs are stolen annually by pharmacy, drug manufacturer and distributor workers. 
Legal drugs, stolen and distributed without prescriptions, kill or injure twice as many people as illicit drugs, the DEA has said. 

   (Revised June 12, 1987)
",8,"[ 0.21156918  0.01015648  0.18685306 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
85,"
   Japanese workers at U.S. Navy bases are protesting a policy that requires workers who deal with confidential matters to submit to lie-detector tests. 

   ""The plan neglects our basic human rights,"" said Misao Kamiyama, chairman of the All Japanese Garrison Forces Labor Union, which represents 1,200 workers at the U.S. bases. 

   The union asked the Defense Facilities Administration Agency, which hires Japanese workers for the bases, to urge the U.S. to drop the polygraph requirement. 

   ""In Japan, only criminals get that kind of treatment,"" Mr. Kamiyama said. 
""We are planning a full-scale nationwide protest against the decision"" if the agency doesn't respond by today. 

   The Navy briefed the workers on the tests in April. 
Mr. Kamiyama said about 500 Japanese were asked to sign an agreement to take a polygraph examination and were ""threatened to be transferred to other sections if they refuse to sign."" 

   The accuracy of polygraph tests is widely disputed. 

   An agency spokesman said it consented to the U.S. plan but expressed concern about the ""human-rights standpoint"" of polygraph tests. 
The spokesman, who spoke on condition of anonymity, didn't elaborate. 
The agency acts as liaison between the U.S. military in Japan and the Japanese government. 

   Under the plan, only employees at Navy plants would have to take the tests. 
Since September 1987, the Navy has been requiring the polygraph test before it grants ""limited-access authorization,"" to personnel, a U.S. military spokesman said. 

   About 500 Japanese base workers are subject to the lie-detector test, the spokesman said. 
Most work at ship-repair facilities in Yokosuka and Sasebo. 

   Mr. Kamiyama said transfers of employees who refused to take the tests could fuel anti-American sentiment. 

",8,"[ 0.27816863  0.01602434  0.268006   ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
86,"
   Employees at businesses ranging from retail operations to Wall Street brokerage firms will soon be much less likely to have to play truth or consequences with lie detectors. 

   A bill signed into law Monday by President Reagan will sharply restrict employers' use of polygraph tests. 
Currently, about two million U.S. workers annually take such tests when applying for jobs or when companies are investigating theft or other employee violations. 

   The new law, which becomes effective on Dec. 27, bars pre-hiring polygraph screening and random testing, and it sets strict rules about giving the tests to workers suspected of a particular wrongdoing. 
Some businesses, including pharmaceutical companies and many firms that provide security guards for operations related to ""health and safety,"" are exempt from the ban. 

   Critics of polygraph testing, who claim it's both unreliable and subject to potential abuse, are welcoming the restrictions. 
But many employers -- as well as many of the outside companies that typically administer the tests -- argue that the measure will crimp security. 
They insist that lie detectors are a useful, and even necessary, tool in curbing employee crime. 

   Because of the new law, employers who have relied heavily on lie detectors will have to resort to such alternatives as written tests that are designed to gauge a person's honesty, and background checks of job applicants -- something that critics of polygraphs say they should have been doing in the first place. 

   A broad range of workers will be affected by the new law. 
Wall Street firms, for example, commonly use lie detectors for investigations and pre-employment interviews, mainly of individuals who are likely to deal with confidential information. 

   Such testing isn't confined to low-level employees, according to the Securities Industry Association. 
Managers and other white-collar workers in the securities industry have been subject to polygraph tests where circumstances warrant, the trade group says, adding that the decision to test hinges on the employee's ""access to negotiable instruments, currency or securities -- not on the employee's rank."" 

   While he was chairman of the Securities &amp; Exchange Commission, John Shad testified in a congressional hearing on polygraph testing that brokerage houses need to keep using lie detectors to protect ""trillions of dollars"" of securities. 

   Widespread polygraph testing of bank workers and executives will also be curtailed. 
A survey of some 160 large banks, taken about 18 months ago by the Bank Administration Institute at a bank-security seminar, found that 78% of the banks used polygraphs to check up on their employees. 
This, the trade group says, is far more than the percentage that undertake background investigations, criminal-record checks or urine testing for drug use. 

   The law is expected to have a significant impact as well on the companies that actually administer the tests. 
Victor Kaufman, president of New York Lie Detection Laboratories, a security-services firm whose clients include a number of brokerage houses, figures the law will ""knock out about 98% of our polygraph business."" 
Mr. Kaufman asserts that even the use of lie-detector tests when there has been a theft, which will still be permitted under the new law, will end because employers will have to do such things as give an employee a written statement to the effect that he is ""reasonably"" suspected of stealing. 

   ""That's like buying a lawsuit,"" Mr. Kaufman says. 
""The first thing you would do when you get a letter like that is go to a lawyer -- after a martini."" 

   Some critics of polygraph testing say a major problem with lie detectors is that a conscientious but easily upset truth teller could show the quickened pulse, faster breathing, increased blood pressure and skin reactions that a polygraph typically measures. 
At present, polygraph results generally aren't considered admissible evidence in federal court and are similarly banned in the courts of 27 states. 

   ""Polygraph testing and scoring methods currently used in personnel screening have never been shown to be valid tests of truthfulness,"" said John F. Beary, an assistant dean at Georgetown University School of Medicine, in recent testimony before Congress for the American Medical Association. 
""The polygraph,"" he added, ""cannot detect lies much better than a coin toss."" 

   While polygraph specialists say the devices can achieve 90% accuracy, critics contend that the accuracy rate can be as low as 25% and that a tough-minded liar can often control himself well enough to pass the test. 
Gary Lynch, the director of enforcement at the SEC, recalls some investment bankers who passed their polygraph tests with flying colors during insider-trading probes. 
They later became cooperative witnesses for the commission, Mr. Lynch says, and ""it turns out they were lying"" to the lie detector. 

   One banker who will be glad of the new restrictions is Peter Persaud, who says he was denied a job as a vice president of Amerifirst Bank in Miami after twice flunking polygraph tests early this year. 

   Mr. Persaud alleges in an interview that the young woman examiner who gave him the first test for Amerifirst made him angry by persistently asking questions about stealing and kickbacks; by seeming incredulous when he said that he had no credit-card debt and a mortgage on only one of his three houses; and by implying that he had earlier told her his name was George. 
The second examiner asked similar questions, he claims, provoking more anger. 

   ""I think the polygraph test is designed to make an honest person seem dishonest because of the way it is administered,"" Mr. Persaud says. 
Amerifirst says it doesn't comment on confidential matters involving job applicants. 

   Other employees, too, cite problems arising from polygraph tests. 
Michael Darby, a former manager of a Zale Corp. jewelry store in Duluth, Ga., says that after Zale had a theft problem in an Atlanta store in 1986, the company gave lie detector tests to all of its employees. 
Mr. Darby says he took the test for fear he would be dismissed if he didn't. 
Testifying before Congress in support of the bill, he alleged that the examiners pressured him into writing down any gossip he had heard about the conduct of other Zale workers -- including drug use -- by telling him he would flunk the test and be fired if he didn't comply. 
Mr. Darby quit, vowing he would never take another polygraph exam. 

   Zale says it doesn't comment on former employees. 
Zale's policy, a spokeswoman explains, is to do ""very selective"" polygraph testing during an investigation of suspected theft or loss. 
The company stopped pre-employment tests last year, the spokeswoman notes. 

   The bill to ban most polygraph tests was widely backed by civil-liberties groups, labor unions and Labor Secretary Ann McLaughlin, as well as by such organizations as the AMA and the American Psychological Association. 
Among the opponents was the Justice Department, which tried to persuade President Reagan to veto the bill. 

   In Congress, the legislation passed with bipartisan support. 
Sen. Edward Kennedy, the liberal Massachusetts Democrat who heads the Senate Labor Committee, calls polygraphs ""20th-century witchcraft."" 
Conservative Sen. Orrin Hatch of Utah, the committee's ranking Republican, says 500,000 ""honest people each year are branded as liars"" by false lie-detector results. 

",8,"[ 0.23837429  0.00653901  0.22966551 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
87,"
   The USS Vincennes' destruction of an
Iranian jetliner with 290 people aboard was a tragic result of its
captain and crew doing their duty, members of the ship's namesake
organization said Sunday.
   ``On the basis of what we can find out on news reports, the
captain acted the best way he knew how,'' said William E. Brooks
Jr., publisher of the Vincennes Sun-Commercial newspaper and a
member of the USS Vincennes Association.
   The association is made up mostly of men who served on the two
ships of that name during World War II. The current USS Vincennes
is the fourth naval vessel to bear the name of this southwestern
Indiana city.
   ``The other thing, in my opinon, this is the other side of the
Stark incident,'' Brooks said, referring to the May 1987 Iraqi jet
attack on the U.S. missile frigate Stark, which cost 37 American
lives.
   ``If the captain had stayed there and not done anything, we
might have been reading about loss of life on the Vincennes,''
Brroks said.
   The Islamic Republic News Agency said the Iran Air jet shot down
was a commercial Airbus carrying 290 people from the Iranian port
of Bandar Abbas to Dubai. The news agency said all aboard were
presumed dead.
   The two U.S. missiles were fired by USS Vincennes, an Aegis
class cruiser equipped with sophisticated radar and missiles.
   The current 9,600-ton Vincennes was the third in a new class of
guided missile Aegis-type cruisers and was christened April 14,
1984, at Pascagoula, Miss., and commisioned on July 6, 1985.
   It was the fourth U.S. Navy ship to bear the name of Vincennes.
The first was commissioned in 1826 and assigned to service in the
Pacific. It was decommissioned in 1867.
   Association member Gene Thurmond, 65, of Evansville, served on
the second USS Vincennes, a heavy cruiser commissioned in 1937 and
sunk by Japanese cruisers in 1942.
   A light cruiser named for Vincennes was commissioned in 1944 and
received six battle stars for service in World War II before it was
decommissioned in September 1946.
   Thurmond said he met the captain of the newest ship, Capt. Will
C. Rogers III, at an association meeting in Vincennes in August.
   ``I met the skipper last summer and he's a real captain and
level-headed and I think he did the proper thing,'' he said.
   The association's 500 members meet annually in Vincennes to
reminisce about their years of service and pay tribute to the dead,
said Vincennes liaison officer and honorary member, Bill Toth, 64.
   Members of the association were considering a tribute to the 290
people who were killed.
   ``There's no way of rectifying this kind of situation, so all we
can do is remember these people,'' Toth said. ``Our prayers and
those of the commuity are with the ship's commander and crew
members.''
   ``From what I've heard about the ship, it's like everybody on it
is family and they're trying to be the best in the Navy,'' Toth
said. ``But, as this incident shows, that can be good and bad.''
   ``It's a hard situation today. Until all the knews came in it
was hard to really understand what happened over there,'' said
Toth. ``We have such a close tie to the ship and its personnel, we
regret the situation that happened as far as the civilians
involved.''
   ``But the captain defended the ship and did what he thought was
best for the personnel,'' he added.
",9,"[ 0.37284927  0.01130451  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
88,"
   Here are excerpts of the speech to the
Security Council on Thursday by Foreign Minister Ali-Akbar Velayati
of Iran, delivered in Farsi and translated by the Iranian Mission:
   In the morning of Sunday July 2, 1988, families and friends of
290 passengers and crew said farewell to their loved ones in Tehran
and Bandar Abbas airports _ unaware of the dastardly attack that
awaited them, unaware of the tragic destiny that would be imposed
upon them by a reckless and incompetent naval force led by
aggressive and expansionist policy-makers.
   According to the transcript of the communication between the
pilot and Bandar Abbas tower, before permission for takeoff was
granted the tower asked the pilot to make sure that his transponder
was turned on. Positive response from the pilot was received.
   The plane was flying on a scheduled flight using the
internationally established and published Amber 59 airway that is
used at least 14 times a week, five of which between the same two
airports. The plane was then climbing to the prescribed altitude at
about 320 knots per hour.
   Seconds after the last communication between the plane and the
tower, the plane was targeted by two surface-to-air Standard guided
missiles from USS Vincennes, the most technologically sophisticated
naval ship. ... The plane ws shot when it was at the center line of
Amber 59 airway.
   USS Vincennes had well over 14 minutes _ and not four minutes as
American officials have claimed _ of prior knowledge that the
target was a civilian airliner on a scheduled flight from Bandar
Abbas to Dubai.
   Another story which was fabricated to misguide the international
public opinion was the claim by the United States that the airliner
was not transmitting the appropriate signals.
   Adm. Crowe claimed on July 3, 1988: ``There were electronic
indications on Vincennes that led it to believe that the aircraft
was an F-14.''
   Notwithstanding the fact that the Iranian air force had no F-14
operations in the morning of that unfortunate Sunday in or around
the Strait of Hormuz, it may be noted that the military experts
well-familiar with F-14 and its capabilities have held that F-14
could not have presented any serious danger to the USS Vincennes or
any surface target for that matter.
   F-14 fighters, as it should be known most vividly to the
Americans who made them, are designed for air-to-air attack and not
air-to-surface operations.
   Possibly the most fallacious argument of the American officials
in justifying their inexplicable crime was a claim that the
airliner did not respond to the alleged warnings issued by the
warship.
   While every available evidence including the transcripts read
earlier show that the pilot of the airliner did not receive any
warning, many have contended that in such a short and routine
flight, the pilot was not indeed required to monitor the emergency
civilian frequency.
   Furthermore, because the ship failed to identify the target of
its alleged warnings, the pilot of the airliner of a scheduled
flight should not have reasonably taken it as directed against
himself.
   Finally, the most awkward American explanation for shooting down
a civilian airliner was presented by Adm. Crowe, who claimed that
the plane was coming onto the USS Vincennes in a war zone, while
descending and increasing speed of 450 miles an hour.
   It is necessary to note that the area where the plane was
attacked is well outside the declared war zones of the combatants.
This fact is attested to even by Lloyd's of London.
   The question that needs to be asked is why a warship had
positioned itself right at the center of a civilian airway.
Furthermore, positioning itself right in the middle of an
international civil airway, it is ironic that the ship expected the
plane to go outside of the corridor, not be coming onto the
Vincennes.
   All available evidence suggest(s) that the shooting down of an
Iranian civil airliner ... could not have been a mistake. Certainly
the huge difference in appearance, size, weight, and flight pattern
between an Airbus and those of an F-14, whic is almost a fourth of
the former, would make any claim of mistaken identity absurd.
   Rather, the course of events during that day clearly shows that
the U.S. warships in the area had clear aggressive intentions,
which resulted in the massacre of 290 innocent people.
",9,"[ 0.30673056  0.00981649  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
89,"
   U.S. military experts left the Persian
Gulf on Thursday after a 3{-week investigation of the destruction
of an Iranian airliner by an American warship, Navy officials said.
   The team led by Rear Adm. William M. Fogarty arrived July 5, two
days after missiles fired by the cruiser USS Vincennes hit an Iran
Air Airbus flying over the Strait of Hormuz, killing all 290 people
aboard.
   Pentagon officials said officers of the Vincennes mistook the
Airbus A300 for an Iranian F-14 jet fighter on an attack course.
   Fogarty's team worked in secret and made no statements before
leaving.
   The U.S. Navy officials said the report would ``work its way up
the chain of command'' to Defense Secretary Frank Carlucci. Because
Carlucci is in the Soviet Union until about Aug. 8, they said, the
report could not be released until mid-August.
   Investigators compiled data from computer tapes on the Vincennes
and two other U.S. warships that were in the area, the frigate USS
Elmer Montgomery and missile frigate John H. Sides.
   They also took sworn testimony from the commander of the
Vincennes, Capt. Will C. Rogers III, and other officers of the
three warships.
   An initial 15-day deadline for the investigation was extended at
Fogarty's request.
   The Navy officials would not give details of the investigations
and said contact with Iran for information would have to be through
diplomatic channels. The Vincennes has been assigned to the Arabian
Sea, just outside the Persian Gulf, and is expected to complete its
tour at the end of summer.
   In Ottawa, Iranian diplomat Gholamreza Behtashi said a
five-member team from the International Civil Aviation Organization
is expected to arrive Friday in Tehran, Iran's capital, to pursue
its own investigation into the disaster.
   Behtashi, third secretary at the Iranian Embassy, said the team
is made up of technical personnel from the Montreal-based United
Nations agency.
   ``They will go from Tehran to the Persian Gulf and investigate
the various aspects of the incident,'' Behtashi said.
   Iran asked the governing council of the agency to meet in
special session to condemn the attack, but members refused to
censure the United States.
   The 33-nation governing council ordered the inquiry on July 14.
   U.S. delegate Edmund Stohr said the United States will offer the
investigating team whatever help it can. He said the team had not
asked to board the Vincennes, and he didn't know if such a visit
would be possible considering the military situation in the gulf.
   ICAO is a technical body composed of 159 nations. It sets
standards for civil aviation and airline safety.
",9,"[ 0.39016926  0.01404769  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
90,"
   A five-man U.N. team arrived in the
Iranian capital of Tehran today to investigate the downing an
Iranian jetliner by a U.S. warship. American experts wrapped up
their probe in the Persian Gulf.
   The International Civil Aviation Organization team planned to
start its probe at Tehran international airport, where part of
Iran's air traffic control network is based, said Iran's official
Islamic Republic News Agency.
   The group from the Montreal-based U.N. agency planned to travel
to Bandar Abbas airport in southern Iran, from which the Iran Air
Airbus took off on a brief scheduled flight to Dubai on July 5.
   Iran says all 290 aboard were killed after the plane was hit by
missiles from the cruiser USS Vincennes. Pentagon officials said
officers of the Vincennes mistook the Airbus A300 for an Iranian
F-14 jet fighter on an attack course.
   The ICAO experts also will go to the area where the plane
crashed into the sea near the Iranian island of Hengham in the
Strait of Hormuz, the Iranian agency said in a dispatch monitored
in Cyprus.
   The experts will stay in Iran for a week, the news agency said.
The team is in Iran at the request of the Iranian government to
help resolve discrepancies in accounts given by the two sides.
   The U.S. team left the gulf Thursday after spending 3{ weeks in
the region, Navy officials said. The team led by Rear Adm. William
M. Fogarty arrived July 5, two days after the disaster.
   Fogarty's team worked in secret and made no statements before
leaving. U.S. Navy officials said a report will not be released
before mid-August.
   Investigators compiled data from computer tapes on the Vincennes
and two other U.S. warships that were in the area, the frigate USS
Elmer Montgomery and missile frigate John H. Sides.
   They also took sworn testimony from the commander of the
Vincennes, Capt. Will C. Rogers III, and other officers of the
three warships.
   Iran asked the 33-nation governing council of the International
Civil Aviation Organization to meet in special session to condemn
the attack, but members refused to censure the United States.
   U.S. delegate Edmund Stohr said the United States will offer the
U.N. investigating team whatever help it can. He said the team had
not asked to board the Vincennes, and he didn't know if such a
visit would be possible considering the military situation in the
gulf.
   ICAO is a technical body composed of 159 nations. It sets
standards for civil aviation and airline safety.
",9,"[ 0.31863632  0.01411965  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
91,"
   Psychologists who studied the downing of an
Iranian civilian airliner in the Persian Gulf say the military
needs to better understand stress and should spend more on
psychological research and improve its crew training.
   The judgment of the Navy cruiser crew that mistakenly shot down
the Iranian plane July 3 was clouded by misconceptions caused by
stress, the psychologists said.
   ``There is much knowledge about how decisions go wrong and how
they can be improved that is not being put to use in military
decision-making,'' Dr. Paul Slovic, a psychology professor from the
University of Oregon, told a House panel Thursday.
   Dr. Steven Zornetzer, representing the Navy's office of naval
research, responded that the service does try to consider stress
and is spending $12 million a year on basic research into
psychological questions. Another $18 million is being spent to
apply the results of that research to Navy programs.
   While progess is being made, he said, ``it must be clearly
recognized that these research problems are among the most
difficult and complex in the entire research spectrum.''
   The hearing by the House Armed Services policy subcommittee was
part of the panel's examination of the destruction of Iran Air
Flight 655 that killed all 290 people on board. It was shot down by
the cruiser Vincennes in the mistaken belief that the commercial
jetliner was a military plane diving toward the Vincennes.
   A Navy investigation attributed the incident to stress-related
mistakes made by the crew of the Aegis-class cruiser, one of the
Navy's most sophisticated warships.
   The Navy said crew members, under battle-caused stress after
just finishing a firefight with Iranian gunboats, misread or
misinterpreted a variety of electronic data from the Aegis
computers.
   Rep. Les Aspin, D-Wis., chairman of the panel, said,
``Misinterpretations of data provided by the Aegis weapon system
and chaotic communications in the command center have pointed up
troubles with man's ability to make fast, accurate decisions in
combat.''
   Dr. Richard Nisbett, a psychology professor at the University of
Michigan, noted that the Vincennes crew was on alert for an attack
by Iranian planes. The crew members interpreted the data to see
what they expected to see, he said.
   ``Expectations can color what people think they see, and what
they remember, to a far greater degree than is recognized by common
sense,'' Nisbett said.
   ``Magicians and card sharks have long made a living on this
principle, and in the last 30 years or so psychologists have
learned a great deal about the scope of the principle in daily life
events,'' he said.
   Nisbett also noted the example of the USS Stark, which was hit
by an Iraqi missile in May 1987, killing 37 seamen. Top officers on
the Stark were disciplined for not firing their weapons against the
Iraqi plane, and Navy ships in the region were on a high state of
alert after that.
   The Vincennes crew wanted to avoid another incident like that
involving the Stark, Nisbett said.
   Dr. Richard Helmreich, a psychology professor at the University
of Texas, said the Vincennes crew members didn't communicate among
themselves well enough.
   ``The communications problems evident in the Vincennes incident
closely parallel those uncovered in analyses of the causes of
crashes in civilian and military air transport,'' he said.
   Dr. Richard W. Pew said another risk arises from the highly
automated, computerized nature of modern warships like the
Vincennes.
   ``Research is badly needed to understand when and just how much
automation to introduce in situations where the ultimate control
and responsibility must rest with the human operators,'' he said.
",9,"[ 0.34443145  0.01102306  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
92,"
   The Navy announced Friday that 15 crew members
of the USS Vincennes, the cruiser that shot down an Iranian
jetliner in the Persian Gulf last summer, will be disciplined for
drug abuse.
   ``There is no connection now to the July 3 incident in the
Persian Gulf to what has happened on board the Vincennes,'' said
Navy Cmdr. David Dillon, spokesman for Pacific Fleet Surface Force
headquarters.
   The Vincennes, meanwhile, will be shifted to Long Beach Naval
Shipyard within five weeks for modifications to correct
deficiencies in the Aegis electronic combat control system, The
(San Diego) Tribune reported Friday.
   Aegis, which would enable a ship like the Vincennes to make
computer-recommended battle decisions for entire fleets, was found
flawed in the Persian Gulf confrontation.
   According to Pentagon analysts, split-second decisions were
affected by the inability of radar-scope interpreters to
immediately match the plane's ``blip'' with digital direction,
altitude and speed information displayed on another screen.
   Those problems are one reason the Vincennes will undergo
modernization, an unidentified source told The Tribune.
   None of the sailors involved in the drug sweep were in positions
that may have influenced the decision by Capt. Will C. Rogers III
to fire two anti-aircraft missiles at the jetliner, Dillon said.
All 290 aboard the plane died.
   Of the 15 sailors, six are being processed for discharge from
the Navy, while six others have been given warnings, Dillon said.
   ``Three are petty officers who are being investigated for
possible court-martial in connection with drug sales,'' he said.
   Dillon noted that the 15 sailors represent 3.9 percent of the
384 sailors on board. ``That is less than the 5.4 percent average
for the entire Navy,'' he said.
   The announcement came as preparations were under way at the
Naval Station San Diego for Saturday's change of command aboard the
Vincennes.
   Rogers will be rotated to a new assignment at the Navy's
Tactical Training Group in San Diego. The new Vincennes commander
is Capt. Robert B. Lynch, who had been stationed in Washington,
D.C., and is assuming his fifth sea command.
   Rogers and his wife, Sharon, have been under guard by the Naval
Investigative Service since a pipe bomb exploded under the family
van Mrs. Rogers was driving to her teaching job March 10 in La
Jolla. She escaped injury.
   The FBI is investigating the attack as possible terrorist
retaliation for the airliner's destruction.
",9,"[ 0.36173769  0.01488461  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
93,"
   More than 200 relatives of
people killed when a U.S. warship shot down an Iranian airliner a
year ago have sued the makers of the ship's radar system, a
spokesman said Sunday.
   Nagib Ghafoor said the suit was filed June 28 in U.S. District
Court in San Francisco on behalf of relatives of 83 of the 290
victims.
   The announcement of the lawsuit came on the eve of the July 3
anniversary of the 1988 tragedy, when an Iran Air Airbus was shot
down by the USS Vincennes in the Persian Gulf.
   Vincennes crew members said they mistook the airliner for an
Iranian F-14 fighter coming in to attack.
   The jetliner was on a commercial flight from the Iranian city of
Bandar Abbas, where a large air base is located, to Dubai in the
southern United Arab Emirates.
   Ghafoor said the lawsuit was filed against the General Electric
Corp. ``and other entities which designed and manufactured the radar
equipment on board the USS Vincennes.''
   GE is based in Fairfield, Conn. ``The company has not seen the
suit yet, so it's inappropriate to comment,'' said Jack Batty, a
company spokesman.
   Most of the passengers aboard the ill-fated Airbus were Iranians.
   Pentagon analysts have said split-second decisions aboard the
Vincennes were affected by the inability of radar operators to
immediately match the plane's radar trace with digital direction,
altitude and speed information displayed on another screen.
   Ghafoor said the complaint charged that the radar equipment
indicated the aircraft approaching the Vincennes was an F-14, diving
in an attack mode at an altitude of 4,000 feet, rather than the Iran
Air flight, which was climbing.
   He said claims against the United States on behalf of the
families ``are in the process of being filed as well.''
   The Iranian government has been seeking a World Court verdict
against the United States and demanded financial compensation for
the 290 dead.
   He did not mention any figure for the compensation sought but
said the group would be guided by the amount of compensation the
Iraqi government paid the families of American sailors killed in an
Iraqi air strike on the U.S. frigate Stark in the Persian Gulf on
May 16, 1987.
   The Iraqis said the ship was hit because the pilot of a Mirage
fighter-bomber mistook it for an Iranian warship.
   Iraq has agreed to pay $27.3 million to the families of 37 U.S.
crewmen killed aboard the Stark, meaning each family would receive
around $740,000.
   The United States had asked for $29.6 million for the families,
along with an unspecified amount for 21 sailors wounded in the
incident.
",9,"[ 0.36769738  0.01323861  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
94,"
   A naval commander who had observed the USS
Vincennes in the Persian Gulf said the ship had ``no good reason''
for shooting down an Iranian civilian airliner, killing all 290
aboard.
   The unusually candid article by Cmdr. David R. Carlson in the
U.S. Naval Institute Proceedings magazine this month said others had
remarked on the agressive behavior of the Vincennes, which had been
dubbed ``robo cruiser.''
   Carlson, commander of the USS Sides, a frigate that was on the
scene when the USS Vincennes shot down the Airbus on July 3, 1988,
clearly put the blame on actions taken by the ship and disputed any
notion of self-defense.
   ``No profit has come from the pathetic postincident attempts to
place the blame on the victims,'' he wrote. ``View it as you will,
Iran Air Flight 655 was shot down for no good reason.
   ``Having watched the performance of the Vincennes for a month
before the incident, my impression was clearly that an atmosphere of
restraint was not her long suit. Her actions appeared to be
consistently aggressive, and had become a topic of wardroom
conversation.''
   Capt. Will Rogers, skipper of the Vincennes at the time, said
Carlson's assessment was subjective and not in line with the Navy's
conclusions.
   ``The Navy investigated the events of July 3, 1988, in
excruciating detail and published its findings in the Fogarty
Report,'' Rogers said in a statement issued by the Navy in San
Diego, where he is stationed.
   ``Commander Carlson's comments in the magazine article are his
personal opinions of the Airbus incident,'' he said. ``I fully stand
behind the Navy report and the performance of my crew.''
   Navy spokesman David L. Dillon in San Diego said that the
magazine is not part of the Navy.
   ``It's published by the Naval Institute, a private self-supported
non-profit professional society and it's a forum for people to
express personal opinions and assertions in various articles related
to Navy issues, but the Naval Institute is not part of the U.S.
government, so his comments are his own personal opinion,'' he said.
   Carlson suggests the crew of the Vincennes wanted to prove the
capability of the ship's Aegis missile-defense system in the Persian
Gulf.
   On the day of the incident, Carlson said, a crewman informed him
that the Vincennes had classified the plane as an Iranian F-14
fighter.
   ``I was also prepared to deal with an air threat, but in all
honesty did not perceive one,'' Carlson said.
   According to Carlson, the event started with the Vincennes'
helicopter drawing fire from Iranian speedboats, which he claims
were only warning shots.
   ``The Vincennes saw an opportunity for action, and pressed hard
for Commander Middle East Force to give permission to fire,''
Carlson said.
   ``The tragedy was avoidable, and we must learn from it,'' he said.
   ``A review of the facts is in order,'' Carlson wrote. ``When the
decision was made to shoot down the Airbus, the airliner was
climbing, not diving; it was showing the proper identification
friend or foe ... The Vincennes was never under attack by Iranian
aircraft.''
   A naval investigator told Congress last September that a series
of errors caused by stress, including misinterpreting electronic
data, caused the mistaken attack on the airliner.
   Rear Adm. William M. Fogarty, who headed the Navy's investigating
team, said the captain of the Vincennes, Will Rogers III, ordered
the ship's missiles fired in the mistaken belief the airliner was an
Iranian F-14 fighter plane.
   Carlson, in his article, puts some of the blame on himself.
   ``I wondered aloud in disbelief, but I did not do the one thing
that might have helped,'' he wrote. ``I did not push for a
reevaluation.
   ``Had I done so, the information might have come forward quickly
enough to allow me to attempt to dissuade the Vincennes from
shooting.''
",9,"[ 0.38031202  0.00995839  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
95,"

The wife of Capt. Will Rogers III, skipper of the San Diego-based Vincennes, 
escaped unharmed Friday morning moments before a pipe bomb exploded under her 
van, igniting a fire that gutted her vehicle at a busy La Jolla intersection. 


Hours after the 7:40 a.m. explosion, the FBI took control of the investigation, 
suspecting that the bombing might be an act of ""domestic terrorism"" linked to 
the Vincennes' accidental downing of an Iranian civilian airliner in the 
Persian Gulf last July, killing 290. The Navy and Marine Corps tightened 
security at every military installation in San Diego County. 


""Certainly it raises the question whether there was a terrorist group involved 
in this,"" said Gary Laturno, an FBI spokesman. 




No Motive Yet 


No one claimed responsibility for the bombing, a federal law enforcement 
official said. 


""At this point in time, we have no motive; we have no suspect,"" said Thomas A. 
Hughes, special agent in charge of the FBI in San Diego. ""We do not rule out 
the possibility of retribution against Capt. Rogers."" 


However, a senior Defense Department official said that there was ""no evidence"" 
of a terrorist connection Friday, and some law enforcement officials described 
the bombing as ""amateurish."" 


Nonetheless, federal officials acknowledged that the incident followed an FBI 
lookout report issued in San Diego in late December for a Syrian national 
allegedly linked to the Dec. 21 bombing of Pan Am Flight 103 that killed 259 
passengers and crew members in Scotland last year. 


A copy of the FBI document, obtained by The Times, said the Los Angeles FBI 
office had received an anonymous phone call alleging that the Syrian, 
identified as Farwan Abdin, was ""involved in or responsible for the Flight 103 
bombing over Scotland."" 


The FBI added: ""Also mentioned were Navy quarters or TV station. No further 
information given."" 


The FBI's assessment at the time was that the call was ""shoddy"" but that 
efforts should be made to locate Abdin. Officials said Friday that a serious 
investigation of the call was never launched. 


The Rogerses were being protected Friday night by the Naval Investigative 
Service and other Navy personnel at an undisclosed location. 


""They are not home, and we will not disclose their location,"" said Chief Craig 
Huebler, a Navy spokesman. ""And we won't discuss it beyond that. That gets into 
security, and you can understand the sensitivity to that."" 


He said that no special security precautions had been undertaken for Rogers, 
crew members and their families after the Vincennes returned to San Diego. 


""Why should the Vincennes crew be treated any different?"" he said. ""There was 
nothing to indicate a threat to the crew or to their families."" 


All 360 sailors assigned to the Vincennes were alerted by their commanders 
Friday morning of the bomb in the Rogerses' van and urged to take whatever 
precautions they deemed necessary, Huebler said. 


Police and Navy officials said Rogers and his wife telephoned their son, Bill 
Rogers, at an eastern university, where he is a student. They assured him that 
they were safe. 


After the bombing Friday, an FBI spokesman said the Rogerses' van was usually 
driven by Sharon Rogers, but two highly placed law enforcement sources told The 
Times that Will Rogers drove his wife's van to a doughnut shop without incident 
about an hour before the blast. 


The explosion occurred while the van was in the left-turn lane on Genesee 
Avenue, south of La Jolla Village Drive. A law enforcement official, who asked 
not to be identified, said Sharon Rogers told investigators that she pulled up 
behind three or four cars stopped at a red light at the intersection and then 
suddenly heard two popping sounds. 


The official said she believed that her van had been struck in the rear by 
another car, so she got out and walked to the back of the van to look for 
damage. 


""And then it all went up,"" the official said. ""That's all there was to it. 
There were holes everywhere, and there was plenty of burn."" 


The explosion propelled metal fragments through the roof of the white Toyota 
and ignited a fire that destroyed the vehicle. 


One law enforcement source said several construction workers nearby reported 
that moments after the explosion, a red car quickly made a U-turn over the 
traffic median on Genesee and sped from the scene. No other description of the 
car was available, but witnesses said there were four people in it. 


""It could have been a guy with a remote-control device who popped the bomb,"" he 
said, ""or it could have been somebody who saw the explosion and was trying not 
to get hurt."" 


Sharon Rogers, 50, was on her way to her job as a fourth-grade teacher at La 
Jolla Country Day School when the bomb went off. 




Other Vehicles Undamaged 


Though the van was surrounded on three sides by other vehicles, none of them 
were damaged, witnesses said. 


""I believe she got out just as it blew,"" said Kurt Lent, a laborer who was 
walking down a dirt embankment toward the vehicle as it exploded. 


Sharon Rogers was dazed but walking under her own power, when the laborers 
reached her. They took her to a pickup truck, where she told them that she was 
the van's sole occupant and asked them to call her husband. Will Rogers arrived 
at the scene within a few minutes, and police took the couple to the San Diego 
Police Department's Northern Division headquarters. 


""She looked like she'd just been rear-ended or something,"" said Charles Archer, 
one of two masonry workers to reach Rogers first. ""She was surprised and 
shocked, but she wasn't burned and she wasn't bleeding."" 


San Diego police and FBI agents rushed to the Rogerses' home on Sherlock Court, 
checking two other vehicles and the home with dogs specially trained to sniff 
for explosives. Investigators also used mirrors to look beneath the vehicles. 


Two law enforcement sources said Will Rogers left the couple's home about 6:30 
a.m. and drove in the van to a doughnut shop. He returned, drank coffee with 
his wife, and then Sharon Rogers, who usually drove the van, left in the 
vehicle, investigators said. 


When Sharon Rogers was interviewed, one law enforcement source said, she was 
nervous and shaken, but she did not immediately connect the explosion with any 
possible retaliation for her husband's role in shooting down the Iranian 
jetliner. 


The official also said that the van had been parked in the driveway overnight, 
but that neither the Rogerses nor any neighbors reported prowlers near the 
vehicle. He also said the Rogerses have a family watchdog. 


""The dog didn't bark, and the dog barks at everybody,"" the official said. 


He also said Sharon Rogers told investigators that her family had received no 
threats since the airplane was downed. 


""There were no threats, nothing,"" he said. ""That's what's funny. If you're 
getting telephone calls in the middle of the night and threatening letters and 
graffiti, you would worry. But here there was nothing."" 


Late Friday, the FBI declined comment on most aspects of the investigation, but 
at a press conference, the FBI's Hughes said, ""An explosive device exploded in 
the vehicle."" 


However, two law enforcement sources said one or two pipe bombs had been placed 
on the transmission under the van. 


""If she didn't get out like that . . . well, she was very, very lucky,"" one 
source said. 


He said he and other investigators determined that the two initial loud bangs 
apparently came from one or two explosive devices, and that the apparatus was 
connected under the van's transmission. 


He noted that most of the van's damage resulted from the fire, which he said 
has led investigators to believe that either low-intensity explosives were 
planted on the vehicle or that only a small amount of high-intensity explosives 
were used. 


Within hours, San Diego Fire Department officials confirmed that the blast was 
caused by a pipe bomb. Archer said he found a flattened, 2-by-3-inch section of 
metal pipe near the curb and turned it over to investigators. 


The Vincennes, a guided-missile cruiser based in San Diego, returned from its 
six-month Persian Gulf deployment last October. It remains in port with Rogers 
as its skipper. 


As the Vincennes exchanged fire with Iranian speedboats last July 3, Iran Air 
Flight 655 appeared on the U.S. warship's high-tech radar system. After the 
plane failed to respond to warnings on civilian and military channels, Rogers 
gave the order to fire. 


That decision, he said later, was in defense of his ship and crew. But the 
aircraft that Rogers feared was an Iranian F-14 fighter was actually an Airbus 
A300. All aboard were killed when the plane was knocked out of the air by a 
Vincennes missile. 


After the downing of the plane, Iran said it would seek retribution for the 
deaths of the innocent civilians. 




No Threats 


However, Navy spokesmen in San Diego said Friday that no threats had been made 
against Rogers, the Vincennes or any of its crew members since the ship 
returned to San Diego. The Vincennes and Rogers received some ""negative"" mail 
last July, shortly after the Iranian plane was shot down, a spokesman said. The 
mail was critical of the Vincennes' handling of the incident but did not 
contain threats, the spokesman said. 


Since the Vincennes returned to San Diego, Rogers has been overseeing routine 
ship maintenance and training in preparation for its next deployment. The Navy 
does not disclose the dates any of its ships will be deployed, but surface 
ships normally work in 18-month cycles, spending about six months at sea and 
the remainder of the time at or near their home ports. 


Terrorism experts believe that the bombing of Pan American Flight 103 may have 
been retribution for the Vincennes' shooting down of the Iranian jetliner. But 
no organization that authorities thought capable of the act has claimed 
responsibility for the bombing of the Pan Am aircraft. 


Also contributing to this report were Times staff writers Anthony Perry, H.G. 
Reza, Tom Gorman, Jane Fritsch and Patrick McDonnell in San Diego and Ronald J. 
Ostrow and William Rempel in Los Angeles 

",9,"[ 0.          0.          0.00860556 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
96,"

Capt. Will C. Rogers III was awarded the Legion of Merit, a top military honor, 
on Saturday as he stepped down from command of the Vincennes. 


Rogers was given the award for his performance as commanding officer of the 
guided-missile cruiser, which became the focus of international controversy 
last July when it mistakenly shot down an Iranian airliner in the Persian Gulf, 
killing all 290 people aboard. 


He has been reassigned to shore duty at the Point Loma Tactical Development and 
Training Group in what Navy officials describe as a routine transfer. 


Speaking from the deck of the Vincennes, Rogers paid special tribute to his 
wife, Sharon, who narrowly escaped death in March when a suspected terrorist 
bomb destroyed her van as she was driving to her teaching job at an exclusive 
private school in La Jolla. 


""She literally rode the fireball out of the vehicle, sprinted to the curb, 
combed the shrapnel from her hair and asked a construction worker to call and 
inform me that she had experienced a minor mechanical difficulty,"" Rogers said. 


""When I arrived, she was most concerned, as her lesson plans were in flames and 
she was going to be late for school."" 


His wife, who was seated among 500 spectators on the pier next to the ship, 
drew a standing ovation from the crowd as she accepted a bouquet of red roses 
from the Navy. 


She was fired by administrators of the exclusive La Jolla Country Day School, 
who feared that her presence posed a security threat to the children. She has 
since reached a $135,000 financial settlement with the school. 


Among the guests were a number of children from the fourth-grade class Sharon 
Rogers taught at the La Jolla Country Day School. Giggling and smiling, the 
children gathered around her before the ceremony. 


The ceremony took place amid unusually tight security Saturday. Only invited 
guests were allowed on the base and all had to pass through two security checks 
and a metal detector. The Rogerses remain under the constant protection of the 
Naval Investigative Service. 


Capt. Rogers was presented with a letter saying that while on duty in the 
Persian Gulf, his ""tactical skills and calm direction enabled his crew to 
successfully engage seven heavily armed high-speed Iranian surface craft"" 
attacking the Vincennes in ""confined and confused waters. As a result, five 
craft were destroyed and two retreated."" 


The letter made no mention of the Iranian airliner, which Rogers ordered shot 
down that day in the mistaken belief that it was an Iranian fighter plane. 
Rogers and his crew were cleared of any responsibility for the mistake in a 
Defense Department investigation last year. 

",9,"[ 0.          0.          0.02353941 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
97,"
   Here is a chronology of the captivity of
Terry Anderson, chief Middle East correspondent for The Associated
Press. He is one of 14 foreign hostages, including nine Americans,
missing and believed held in Lebanon.
   1985
   March 16 _ Anderson abducted on Beirut street. Telephone caller
says Islamic Jihad kidnapped him as part of ``continuing operations
against America and its agents.''
   May 16 _ First photo of Anderson in captivity released. Islamic
Jihad warns of ``catastrophic consequences'' if Kuwait does not
free alleged terrorists.
   Sept. 9 _ Rev. Benjamin Weir, another Islamic Jihad captive,
freed after 16 months in captivity. President Reagan says he ``will
not be satisified'' until remaining Americans also are released.
   Oct. 29 _ Beirut television stations broadcast videotaped
birthday message from relatives and friends to Anderson.
   Nov. 8 _ In an open letter, Anderson and three other American
captives held by Islamic Jihad call on Reagan to ``have mercy'' and
negotiate with kidnappers. All four hostages are allowed to write
to their families. Another letter to the Archbishop of Canterbury
appeals for Terry Waite to mediate with Islamic Jihad.
   1986
   Feb. 15 _ Anderson's father, Glenn R. Anderson, dies of cancer
at age 69.
   June 7 _ Anderson's 46-year-old brother, Glenn Richard Jr., dies
of cancer four days after making a videotape from his bed appealing
to Terry's captors.
   July 26 _ Rev. Lawrence Martin Jenco, freed after almost 19
months as hostage, says he was held with Anderson and two other
hostages for a year.
   Oct. 3 _ In a videotaped appeal, Anderson and David Jacobsen
call on the Reagan administration to work as hard for their release
as it did to secure the release of journalist Nicholas Daniloff in
Moscow.
   Oct. 31 _ Beirut TV stations broadcast videotape showing
Anderson's 16-month-old daughter, whom he has never seen.
   Nov. 2 _ Jacobsen, freed after 17 months in captivity, says
hostages ``are in hell.''
   Nov. 15 _ Islamic Jihad releases new picture of Anderson.
   Dec. 28 _ Fourth picture of Anderson sent by captors to Western
news agency in Beirut.
   1987
   Jan. 16 _ Islamic Jihad distributes another picture of Anderson.
   June 7 _ Anderson's daughter is shown on Lebanese television on
her second birthday saying, ``Our hearts are broken. Where is
daddy?''
   Aug. 2 _ Sixth photo of Anderson released by Islamic Jihad.
   Oct. 21 _ Islamic Jihad releases another photo of Anderson.
   Oct. 27 _ Anderson turns 40. Friends and family gather at
Jefferson Memorial in Washington and AP staff in Beirut goes to his
vacant office to mark the day.
   Nov. 26 _ Jacobsen says he learned from sources in the U.S.
government and the Middle East that Anderson is being held again in
chains and blindfolded 24 hours a day.
   Dec. 10 _ Anderson passes his 1,000th day as a hostage.
   Dec. 24 _ Islamic Jihad release a videotape of Anderson.
Appearing to read from a prepared text, he criticizes the Reagan
administration for failing to secure the release of himself and
other Americans and warns ``there's a limit how long we can last.''
   Dec. 30 _ A London newspaper reports that a CIA analysis of the
tape indicated Anderson may be held in Basta prison in west Beirut
with missing Anglican Church envoy Terry Waite.
   1988
   March 16 _ Anderson begins his fourth year in captivity.
   April 10 _ Islamic Jihad threatens in a statement, accompanied
by a photo of Anderson, that it will kill its captives if any
attempt is made to storm a Kuwaiti jetliner hijacked by Shiite
extremists.
   May 4 _ Islamic Jihad freed three French hostages.
   May 9 _ Release French hostage Marcel Fontaine, also held by
Islamic Jihad, says Anderson's greatest fear is that the Americans
will launch a commando raid to free him, an action he believes
would mean his certain death.
   Aug. 18 _ Islamic Jihad issues a photo of Anderson with a
statement saying he and another U.S, hostage will not be freed
soon, squelching speculation they would be released following the
gulf war cease-fire. It also contains new demands: an Israeli
withdrawal from south Lebanon and compensation for the
reconstruction of south Lebanon and south Beirut.
   Oct. 3 _ Mithileshwar Singh, and Indian national and U.S.
rediaent alien, is freed by another Shiite faction.
   Oct. 21 _ Islamic Jihad threatens to ``punish'' its captives in
retaliation for Israeli air raids in south Lebanon. A photo of
Anderson accompanies the statement.
   Oct. 23 _ Islamic Jihad threatens in a statement, accompanied by
a photo of Anderson, that its American hostages will a price that
``will reflect adversely'' on them if the group's demands are not
met.
   Oct. 24 _ Islamic Jihad denies any connection with a Lebanese
woman arrested in Milan with a photo of Anderson and another U.S.
hostage.
   Oct. 27 _ Anderson is 41, his fourth birthday in captivity.
Islamic Jihad issues a photo of him to authenticate a statement
again denying any connection with the women held in Milan.
   Oct. 31 _ Islamic Jihad issues a videotape of Anderson to mark
his 41st birthday. He says the U.S. government is impeding his
release and adds: ``I find it difficult to keep my hope and courage
high.''
",10,"[ 0.39294737  0.00595693  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
98,"
   Six organizations are asking news media around
the world to publicize the fourth anniversary of Terry Anderson's
kidnapping on Thursday.
   ``Today, March 16, 1989, the American journalist Terry Anderson,
41, chief Middle East correspondent for The Associated Press in
Beirut, entered his fifth year of captivity as a hostage in
Lebanon,'' said a statement that the groups asked broadcasters to
air and newspapers to use on their front pages.
   The ``statement of solidarity with Anderson'' is from ``the
leading freedom of expression organizations in the Western world,''
Anne Nelson, executive director of the New York-based Committee to
Protect Journalists, said Monday.
   Ms. Nelson said she also will read the statement Thursday at the
National Press Club in Washington during a news conference
announcing her group's ``annual attacks-on-the-press report.''
   A speech by Vice President Dan Quayle on freedom of the press is
scheduled at the Press Club later Thursday.
   ``We call on President Bush and Vice President Quayle to use
every possible means at their disposal to bring Terry Anderson and
the other hostages home,'' Ms. Nelson said.
   Other organizations urging publication of the anniversary
statement are: Article 19 of London; International Federation of
Publishers in Paris; the International Federation of Journalists in
Brussels; Index on Censorship in London; and Observatoire de
L'Information in France.
   In a separate letter to its members, the 150,000-member
International Federation of Journalists said: ``On March 16, another
shameful date in the calendar passes _ the fourth anniversary of
captivity for American journalist Terry Anderson, who is held
hostage in Beirut.''
   The IFJ asked its members in 37 nations to draw attention to the
plight of British journalist John McCarthy, who marked his 1,000th
day of captivity on Jan. 10.
   The IFJ said it will place advertisements in Beirut newspapers to
urge the release of all hostages.
   IFJ members also were urged to send letters requesting diplomatic
initiatives to the ambassadors of the United States, the United
Kingdom, Syria and Iran and to ``publicize the plight of the
journalists'' in union journals and national media.
   In London, IFJ Secretary General Aidan White will be accompanied
by McCarthy's girlfriend, Gill Morell, and several trade union
leaders when they meet with U.S. Embassy officials.
   Elsewhere, Charles Dale, the president of the Newspaper Guild of
the United States and Canada, will lead a delegation to the U.S.
State Department in Washington on Thursday.
   In Strasbourg, France, Doornaert and French journalist Jean-Paul
Kauffmann, a former hostage in Lebanon, will meet with European
Parliament leaders to press for the hostages' release.
",10,"[ 0.32825428  0.01350685  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
99,"
   Terry Anderson spent a fifth birthday as
a hostage today, a grim milestone in his captivity.
   His relatives and friends marked the event with a flood of
messages and with a Mass in Washington. Radio reports said
Lebanon's three television stations would screen a birthday message
from his 4-year-old daughter, Sulome.
   The daily newspapers An-Nahar and As-Safir and the
French-language L'Orient-Le Jour published English texts of letters
to Anderson, the chief Middle East correspondent of The Associated
Press who was abducted March 16, 1985.
   His sister, Peggy Say, wrote, ``In honor of your birthday on
Friday, we will be in Washington with other hostage families to
mark another sad year in which you have been denied your freedom.''
   The Journalists' Committee to Free Terry Anderson, made up of
colleagues from all over the United States, wrote: ``Please believe
that not a day passes when we do not think of you and pray for
you.''
   The Foreign Correspondents Club of Japan said it was sending a
33-foot birthday scroll to Anderson signed by 59 journalists and
former colleagues in Tokyo.
   Anderson was a member of the club during a working assignment in
Japan 1979-1981.
   Prominent journalists, along with representatives of the State
Department and the embassies of Lebanon, Algeria and Syria,
attended a Mass in Georgetown University's Dahlgren Chapel, where
Mrs. Say said such ceremonies ensure her brother will not be
forgotten.
   Gunmen seized the 42-year-old Anderson in Moslem west Beirut
after a game of tennis that had been a brief respite from his
reporting on Lebanon's civil war.
   He has not held Sulome, born three months after the morning he
was kidnapped. He probably does not know that his father and
brother died of cancer.
   Anderson's fate now appears to be caught up in a power struggle
between Shiite Moslem radicals and moderates.
   He was kidnapped by Islamic Jihad, a group loyal to Iran whose
name means Islamic Holy War. His abductors demand the release of 15
men imprisoned in Kuwait for bombing the U.S. and French embassies
in 1983.
   Islamic Jihad also holds Thomas Sutherland, 57, an American who
was acting dean of agriculture at American University of Beirut.
Sutherland was kidnapped June 9, 1985.
   Police say Lebanese authorities have no information on the
whereabouts of Anderson or the 15 other Western hostages in Lebanon.
   Four days ago, Islamic Jihad made its first statement in a year,
reviving an old offer to trade Anderson and Sutherland for their
comrades jailed in Kuwait.
   A copy of the statement delivered to a Western news agency in
Beirut was accompanied by a photograph of Anderson similar to one
released Nov. 4, 1988, after his last birthday.
   The statement was seen as a response to a declaration Monday by
President Hashemi Rafsanjani of Iran that he would use its
influence to free the hostages if the United States released
Iranian assets worth up to $12 billion that have been frozen since
1979.
   Kuwait has refused to free the prsoners, but two members of the
group were released in February after completing five-year
sentences. The United States has said it will not negotiate with
terrorists.
   Anderson and Sutherland are among eight American hostages, most
believed held by pro-Iranians.
   Islamic Jihad issued its statement as the leader of Iran's
revolutionary radicals, former Interior Minister Ali Akbar
Mohtashemi, was on a three-week visit to Lebanon. He met with
prominent Shiites, including leading figures in Hezbollah, believed
to be the umbrella group for kidnap gangs.
   It was not clear why Mohtashemi, Rafsanjani's main political
rival, came to Lebanon. But the trip underlined his power struggle
with Rafsanjani, leader of the comparatively moderate
``pragmatists'' who want to restore relations with the West.
   A knowledgeable Shiite said privately the Islamic Jihad
statement was ``a clear indication that the hostage-holders are not
under Rafsanjani's control.''
   Hezbollah appears to have split into factions, with the main
groups supporting either Rafsanjani or Mohtashemi.
   Rafsanjani dismissed Mohtashemi after his election as president
July 28. The former interior minister's surprise appearance in
Lebanon quashed reports from Tehran that he was under house arrest.
Mohtashemi returned to Tehran on Wednesday via Damascus, Syria.
   Since he was kidnapped, Anderson has been allowed to write a few
letters to his family and occasionally to see Lebanese newspaper
and television reports about relatives.
   American and French hostages who shared his captivity and were
released have told of his courage and fears, how he has defied his
captors and suffered the agonies of captivity.
   His father, Glenn, and elder brother, Glenn Jr., died of cancer
in 1986. Released hostages said he did not know of the deaths.
   Anderson knows his daughter, Sulome, was born June 7, 1985, but
has seen her only in a few seconds of film his captors allowed him
to watch on Lebanese TV, according to letters from him released by
the kidnappers.
",10,"[ 0.43818605  0.00901514  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
100,"
   Hundreds of demonstrators blocked
streets and train tracks today, halting most traffic in the capital
to press their demands for President Hussain Muhammad Ershad to
resign.
   Stores and offices closed, apparently out of fear of attacks,
when what was intended to be a blockade of transport turned into a
general strike.
   Groups of about 50 demonstrators staged sit-down strikes at
about two dozen rail and road intersections in and around Dhaka, a
city of 7 million people.
   Many people walked to work. Even bicycle-powered rickshaws,
Dhaka's chief mode of transport, stayed off the streets.
   Protesters paraded through the streets shouting ``Down with
Ershad!'' and ``Days of Autocracy Are Over!''
   United News of Bangladesh said 4,000 police and paramilitary
troops were deployed in Dhaka. There were no reports of violence by
midday.
   The blockade was the latest tactic in the campaign by opposition
parties to force Ershad to quit. At least eight people have been
killed by police since the current round of protests started Oct.
10.
   ``We are happy to see that the blockade has turned into a hartal
(general strike). This shows popular support for our cause,'' said
Suranjit Sengupta, a top leader of the Democratic Party. It is one
of eight parties in an alliance headed by the Awami League led by
Sheik Hasina, one of the country's main opposition politicians.
   Ershad has dismissed the campaign against him as ``the work of a
handful of violence-mongers who are out to destabilize
Bangladesh.''
   He was an army general when he seized power in a bloodless coup
in 1982. He later resigned from the military and was elected
president in 1986 in balloting that opposition parties, foreign
diplomats and journalists said was rigged.
   He plans to seek another five-year term in elections scheduled
for next year. The opposition parties say they will boycott the
vote unless Ershad resigns and hands over power to a caretaker
government.
",10,"[ 0.33445117  0.01751507  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
101,"
   Lebanese newspapers published birthday
letters to American journalist Terry Anderson on Saturday, his 43rd
birthday in captivity. One newspaper reported that fellow hostage
Terry Waite will be freed soon.
   Seven newspapers printed birthday greetings to Anderson from his
sister, Peggy Say, his youngest daughter, Sulome, and Madeleine,
Sulome's mother. They published the original English text so that
Anderson, who did not know Arabic when he was kidnapped, would be
able to read them if his kidnappers allowed him to.
   The newspaper ad-Diyar, meanwhile, said British hostage Terry
Waite would be freed either ``by the end of this month or within
the first half of the coming November, at the latest.''
   The short, front-page report attributed the information to an
unnamed security source. The conservative ad-Diyar is not known to
have special insight into the hostage issue, but the report was the
latest predicting Waite's release since Iran and Britain agreed to
restore diplomatic ties Sept. 27.
   Waite, 51, an Anglican Church envoy, was kidnapped Jan. 20, 1987
after leaving his west Beirut hotel to negotiate with
representatives of Anderson's kidnappers.
   He is believed held by Islamic Jihad, the pro-Iranian group that
abducted Anderson.
   Anderson, chief Middle East correspondent for The Associated
Press, is the longest-held of the 13 Western hostages in Lebanon.
He was kidnapped March 16, 1985.
   His birthday was marked by his colleagues as well as local and
foreign journalists with a somber gathering at the Associated Press
bureau. It was held in Anderson's office, which his colleagues
refer to as ``Terry's Room.''
   The staff sang ``Happy birthday, Dear Terry'' and blew out a
candle on a white cake.
   The newspapers also published an Arabic translation of Mrs.
Say's open letter to the captors, pleading with them to release
Anderson and the other captives.
   ``I beg you to release Terry and the others for humanitarian
reasons. Please, in honor of his birthday, give Terry and the
others the gift of freedom this year,'' Mrs. Say wrote.
   ``His daughter Sulome, whom he has never seen, started school
last month. His daughter Gabrielle has matured from a child of 8 to
a young woman of 14,'' she added.
   Along with Sulome's hand-written letter, some papers published a
pencil drawing by the child, who was born 83 days after her
father's abduction. The drawing showed happy children playing.
   ``To Dad. I love you. Happy birthday. I go to proper school. I
do work, tracing, art, math. I can write and read. I love you,''
Sulome's letter said.
   Former Irish hostage Brian Keenan said after his release Aug. 24
that he had spent part of his four years in captivity with
Anderson, and he noted that Anderson has a photograph of Sulome and
was given letters from his family published in the press.
   ``Terry and myself would sit through those long nights and speak
with great pain and remorse and longing for his daughter,'' Keenan
said.
   Madeleine, addressing ``My Dearest Darling Terry,'' wrote:
   ``Another birthday, another year, another letter. A question I
ask myself every day and the answer I always want to give is `soon,
soon.'''
   In addition to Anderson and Waite, the Westerners missing in
Lebanon are five Americans, three Britons, two Germans and an
Italian.
",10,"[ 0.39888276  0.01209382  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
102,"

Terry Anderson's daughter pleaded for the father she loves but has never known 
to come home today, the day Anderson began his sixth year as a hostage in 
Lebanon. 


The journalist's family, friends and colleagues somberly marked the anniversary 
with commemorations and prayers in Washington, New York and Cyprus. Yellow 
ribbons fluttered from trees, signs and poles in Anderson's hometown of 
Batavia, N.Y. 


Anderson, 42, the chief Middle East correspondent for the Associated Press, is 
the longest-held of the American hostages in Lebanon. All told, 18 Westerners 
are believed to be captives there, including eight Americans. 


Former hostages chained themselves to a tree in Paris to protest Anderson's 
captivity, and President Bush pledged to work for the hostages' release. 
(Photo, P2.) 


But no message was as poignant as the one on television this evening in 
Lebanon. 


In a videotape, Anderson's 4-year-old daughter Sulome appeared, wearing a green 
coat and riding a bicycle given to her at Christmas in Anderson's name. 


""I got the bike for Christmas, daddy. Thank you,"" said Sulome, who was born 83 
days after Anderson was seized by a pro-Iranian Shiite Muslim faction in 
Beirut. 


""I love you Daddy, come home, please come home. I love you Daddy. Come home. 
Send me to the circus,"" she beseeched. The videotape was made earlier in the 
week and shipped to the television stations in Beirut. 


Lebanese newspapers also published a letter today signed ""Sulome and 
Madeleine,"" from the girl and her mother, Madeleine Bassil, who wait in Cyprus 
for Anderson's release. 


""The world without God is not the world, it's hell. A home without a husband or 
father is not a home, it's hell,"" the letter said. 


""I am always wondering if you have ever been able to read the letters sent to 
you on different occasions, or even if they were read to you to let you know 
how much we love you and how different and difficult life is without you,"" 
Bassil wrote. 


In Washington, Bush pledged to pursue ""all legitimate opportunities"" to win the 
release of the hostages. 


""I intend to keep open lines of communications with all parties, including 
Iran, who have influence over hostage-takers,"" the President said in a letter 
to Peggy Say, Anderson's sister. 


Say met privately with Bush and his wife at the White House, then addressed a 
ceremony across the street at Lafayette Park. Directing her remarks to the 
captors of her brother thousands of miles away, she said: ""You complain that 
your story has not been told and yet the man who would tell it has been chained 
to a basement wall for five years. . . . 


""I don't want to punish them. I don't want to hunt them down. I just want my 
brother back. But I'm not going to pay them for doing so,"" she said. 


Bush did not attend the ceremony, but said in a radio interview that ""every day 
I'm President I have a heavy heart when I think of the hostages."" 


Bush has declined to say he is optimistic that any hostages would be released 
soon. 


In New York, Anderson's friends and colleagues attended a Mass at St. Patrick's 
Cathedral. 

",10,"[ 0.          0.          0.02113309 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
103,"

Family, friends and colleagues of Associated Press correspondent Terry A. 
Anderson gathered at Lafayette Park on Friday to mark an anniversary they had 
hoped to never see. 


On March 16, 1985, after playing an early morning tennis match with an AP 
colleague, Anderson was kidnaped from a Beirut street. 


Friday marked the end of his fifth year in captivity. 


Since then, both his father and his brother have died of cancer. He has never 
seen his daughter, who will turn 5 in June. 


The solemn ceremony, held across the street from the White House, also brought 
together the families of the seven other Americans who were kidnaped after 
Anderson and are still held in Lebanon. There were songs, prayers and 
remembrances, expressions of outrage and hope. 


But noticeably absent was any evidence that the hostages would be released 
soon. Just two weeks ago, anticipation of a possible release intensified when 
Iranian President Hashemi Rafsanjani said he saw the hostage ordeal ""moving 
toward a solution."" 


Since then, however, the mood has turned sour. The Iranian president openly 
mocked President Bush last week for having accepted a phone call, said to be 
from Rafsanjani, that turned out to be a hoax. The Iranian news media have 
begun referring to the hostages again as American ""spies."" 


On Thursday, the terrorist group calling itself Islamic Jihad for the 
Liberation of Palestine released a statement threatening to execute three 
American professors who were taken hostage in 1987: Robert Polhill, Alann Steen 
and Jesse Turner. 


Asked by reporters Friday whether he had any optimistic news for the families 
of the hostages, Bush demurred. 


""I don't want to get the hopes up through a lot of speculation and have them 
dashed down,"" the President said. ""I respect the families too much to do that."" 


""We don't have any breakthroughs we can report,"" added White House Press 
Secretary Marlin Fitzwater. 


Opponents of the Iranian regime said they see no reason to believe that a 
hostage release is imminent. 


""They use them (hostages) as a card to play for internal political purposes,"" 
said Alireza Jafarzadeh, a spokesman for the Moujahedeen, the principal Iranian 
opposition group. ""It's just not in their interest to release the hostages. The 
weaker the regime gets, the more they need them."" 


Bush declined to appear at Friday's ceremony across from the White House, but 
he and his wife, Barbara, met for half an hour with Anderson's sister, Peggy 
Say. 


In a letter to Say, which she released, Bush expressed his ""great sorrow at . . 
. your brother's merciless imprisonment."" 


Bush told reporters: ""I'm going to do everything I can to get those hostages 
out of there, sometimes privately, sometimes publicly."" 


Say, who in the past has criticized U.S. officials over the lack of progress on 
the hostage issue, said she was reassured that Bush is doing all he can. She 
also said she had ""faith"" that all the hostages would be released ""in the 
coming weeks."" 


The Lafayette Park ceremony was sponsored by ""No Greater Love,"" a 
Washington-based support group for the families of the hostages. 


Yellow flowers were placed beside the names of the nine Western hostages who 
are known to have been slain in Lebanon since 1985. Then, young children came 
forth, one by one, carrying photos of some of the Westerners who are still held 
hostage in Lebanon. Including the eight Americans, they number at least 16. 


In New York, Anderson's friends and colleagues attended a Mass at St. Patrick's 
Cathedral. At press clubs in Tokyo, where Anderson worked for four years, and 
in Washington and Brussels, journalists gathered to raise a symbolically empty 
glass as a toast in his honor. 


In Paris, former hostages Jean-Paul Kauffman and Roger Auque put on blindfolds 
and chained themselves to a tree outside the Iranian Embassy to protest 
Anderson's captivity. The two were among 10 French hostages released by their 
captors in Lebanon between 1986 and 1988. 


Kauffman and Auque were silent during their protest but said in a statement: 
""We have taken this action so people know how Terry Anderson is living at this 
moment. He is chained. He wears a blindfold over his eyes. He must be silent. 
This is how we were. This is how he is today."" 


Meanwhile, in Damascus, former President Jimmy Carter met Friday with Syrian 
President Hafez Assad and also expressed optimism about the fate of the 
hostages. 


""I see movement now . . . better chances than those I have seen for several 
years,"" Carter said. 


In Beirut, local television stations marked the anniversary of Anderson's 
capture by playing a videotape of his daughter, Sulome. The child was shown 
demonstrating her ballet dancing and told her father: ""I love you, Daddy. Come 
home. Please come home. Send me to the circus."" 


In a letter published by seven Beirut newspapers, Anderson's wife, Madeline 
Bassil, told her husband that she and their daughter also feel like hostages. 


""We are in as much captivity, Terry, only our living space is bigger here and 
it's shared by millions. . . . A home without a husband or father is not a 
home, it's hell."" 


The families of the hostages have received little news of their condition other 
than an occasional -- and often distressing -- photo. 

",10,"[ 0.          0.          0.01584349 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
104,"     Perez de Cuellar, who oversaw the negotiations for the release of Western
hostages, said in New York that Anderson was with Syrian officials in
Lebanon's Bekaa Valley, and heavy snow has delayed his transfer to Damascus.; 
 ""I am sure this is a technical problem. I think mainly due to snow, the usual
road they use to go from somewhere in Lebanon to Damascus,"" Perez de Cuellar
said.;   ""I'm still hopeful it will take place today,"" he said, referring to
Anderson's anticipated arrival in Damascus and his hand-over to U.S.
officials.;   ""He is on his way, and he is being protected by the Syrians, I
imagine, because I think he must be in the Bekaa Valley,"" the
secretary-general said.;   Earlier today, it was not clear where Anderson was,
despite reports from Arab and U.S. officials that he was released and turned
over to the Syrians.;   Anderson, 44, an Associated Press correspondent, had
said in a videotaped statement that he was to be freed. The tape, released
very early this morning by his captors, gave no indication when that would
happen. It was not known when the videotape was made.;   An accompanying
five-page Arabic-language statement from the Islamic Jihad group, which has
held Anderson for 2,455 days, also announced that he would be set free.;   In
the initial portion of the tape, Anderson read the Islamic Jihad statement in
English, which he said he did not agree with. Among other things, it denounced
the group's enemies and accused Israel of blocking the hostage-freeing
process.;   ""This is the statement of my captors,"" Anderson said after reading
the kidnappers' statement. ""Mine is only that with my release, and I hope soon
the release of the two Germans and all the Lebanese held in Israel, this
tactic (hostage-taking) will never be used again.;   ""The causes of this
troubled episode are complex and difficult. It is these causes which must be
redressed and eliminated. The holding of innocent people by anyone solves
nothing,"" he added.;   Anderson, wearing a dark sweater and white shirt, spoke
in a clear voice. He appeared in good physical condition.;   At the White
House, spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said U.S. officials had no official word
that reports of Anderson's release were true.;   Anderson is the third
American hostage freed in three days.;   Eight other Westerners have been
freed since August, when the United Nations launched negotiations involving a
complex swap of Western hostages, hundreds of Arabs held by Israel, and
information about missing Israeli servicemen.;   ""We are immensely relieved
that Terry Anderson's 6 1/2-year nightmare is over,"" said Louis D. Boccardi,
Associated Press president and chief executive officer, following the initial
reports of Anderson's release.;   ""He has paid a terrible price for his
commitment to stay with his story. We welcome him back with warmth, affection
and the deepest respect for what he has endured,"" he said.;   As chief Middle
East correspondent, Anderson headed the Associated Press office Beirut from
1983 until he was kidnapped on March 16, 1985. Staff members uncorked
champagne today to toast his freedom.;   The Syrians had said earlier that
Anderson would be handed over to U.S. Ambassador Christopher Ross at the
Foreign Ministry.;   Anderson's daughter Sulome, born three months after he
was kidnapped, was driven to the U.S. Embassy with her mother Madeleine by
American officials. They had flown to Damascus from their home in Cyprus.;  
Anderson's estranged wife, Mihoko, and their 15-year-old daughter Gabrielle,
who live in Tokyo, declined comment.;   The hostage saga has been moving
toward an end for the United States amid changing political alignments in the
Middle East after the Persian Gulf war and the end of the Cold War, moves by
Iran to improve ties with Washington and skillful U.N. mediation.;   In all,
dozens of foreigners have been held hostage by Shiite groups in Lebanon since
1984. Of these, 11 have been reported or confirmed dead in captivity, 38 not
including Anderson were released or escaped.;   In exchange for the hostage
releases, the kidnappers were reported by Iran's Tehran Radio this week to
have been promised that they would not be pursued by the United States,
Germany or any other country.;   The hostage-holders have in the past few
years been isolated by the desire of Syria and Iran to improve ties with the
West.;   Iran, long the chief backer of Lebanese kidnappers, and Syria had
pressed amid shifting international alliances for the Western hostages'
freedom.;   Iranian President Hashemi Rafsanjani is seeking to end Iran's
isolation and shed its image as an outlaw state that supports terrorism. The
Syrians, once the vanguard of Arab radicalism and a longtime Soviet ally, are
realigning with the West after the collapse of communism.;   This week's
releases follow by days Washington's payment to Iran of $278 million for
weaponry impounded during the 1979-80 Tehran hostage crisis. The weapons and
other Iranian assets were frozen by the United States in 1979. Tehran has in
the past linked hostage releases to the return of those assets.;   The U.N.
negotiations for the Western hostages are expected to ultimately involve
freedom for 300 Arab prisoners held by Israel and its proxy militia in
Lebanon. Israel seeks an accounting of four missing servicemen in Lebanon.;  
On Sunday, Israel released 25 Arab prisoners, bringing to 91 the number set
free since August and giving new impetus to hostage releases.;   The two
Germans still held are Thomas Kemptner and Heinrich Struebig. An Italian,
Alberto Molinari, is missing, but reports say he is dead.  ",10,"[ 0.45352601  0.00856592  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
105,"     It was a painful day for his relatives and friends.;   ""It's been like a
big roller coaster ride about his release,"" Anderson's 36-year-old brother
John said from his home in Ocala, Fla. ""But that's the way it's been for
almost seven years."";   He was handed over to U.S. officials in Damascus after
hours of delay apparently caused by snow in the mountainous terrain from
Beirut, Lebanon.;   Anderson, 44, was the third American hostage freed in
three days, and his release ended an agonizing drama for the United States.
Two Germans still are held in Lebanon, however, and U.N. Secretary-General
Javier Perez de Cuellar said his work would not be over until they are
released.;   He has led delicate negotiations involving a complex swap of
Western hostages, hundreds of Arabs held by Israel and information about
missing Israeli military personnel.;   Eight other Westerners have been freed
since August, when the United Nations launched negotiations involving a
complex swap of Western hostages, hundreds of Arabs held by Israel, and
information about missing Israelis. Two German hostages are still being held.;
  The secretary-general said at U.N. headquarters that no deal had been made
by U.N. officials guaranteeing the hostage-takers immunity from retaliation.; 
 In exchange for the hostage releases, the kidnappers were reported by Iran's
Tehran Radio this week to have been promised that they would not be pursued by
the United States, Germany or any other country.;   Confusion about Anderson's
whereabouts arose after a five-page Arabic-language statement from the Islamic
Jihad group that held Anderson announced today he would be set free, but its
wording was unclear as to whether he had already been released.;   Anderson
said in a videotaped statement released today by his captors to the Associated
Press in Damascus that he was to be freed. The tape gave no indication of when
that would happen.;   American, Syrian and Lebanese officials initially said
Anderson had been freed and turned over to Syrian troops in Lebanon. Later,
however, Syrian Foreign Minister Farouk al-Sharaa said, ""We hope he will be
released this evening -- the sooner the better."";   The Syrians said Anderson
would be handed over to U.S. Ambassador Christopher Ross at the Foreign
Ministry.;   Anderson's daughter, Sulome, born three months after he was
kidnapped, was driven to the U.S. Embassy with her mother, Madeleine Bassil,
by American officials. They had flown to Damascus from their home in Cyprus.; 
 Despite the delay, there was a mood of calm and optimism among friends and
relatives who gathered to greet Anderson in Damascus.;   Anderson's estranged
wife, Mihoko, and their 15-year-old daughter Gabrielle, who live in Tokyo,
declined comment.;   Anderson's release marks the end of the seven-year
American hostage drama in Lebanon, which brought an outpouring of public
support for the captives and put intense pressure on the Reagan and Bush
administrations to get them out.;   The hostage saga comes to an end for the
United States amid changing political alignments in the Middle East after the
Persian Gulf war and the end of the Cold War, moves by Iran to improve ties
with Washington and skillful U.N. mediation.;   The hostage-holders have in
the past few years been isolated by the desire of Syria and Iran to improve
ties with the West.;   This week's releases follow by days Washington's
payment to Iran of $278 million for weaponry impounded during the 1979-80
Tehran hostage crisis. The weapons and other Iranian assets were frozen by the
United States in 1979. Tehran has in the past linked hostage releases to the
return of those assets.;   The two Germans still held are Thomas Kemptner and
Heinrich Struebig. An Italian, Alberto Molinari, is missing, but reports say
he is dead. The Germans were seized by Shiite militants seeking the release of
Mohammed and Abbas Hamadi, brothers imprisoned in Germany on terrorism
convictions.; Terry Anderson: chronology of captivity;   1985; March 16 -
Anderson abducted on Beirut street by Islamic Jihad.; May 16 - First photo of
Anderson in captivity released. Islamic Jihad warns of ""catastrophic
consequences"" if Kuwait does not free terrorists.; June 7 - Anderson's
daughter Sulome is born.; 1986; Feb. 15 - Anderson's father dies of cancer at
age 69.; June 7 - Anderson's 46-year-old brother dies.; Oct. 3 - In a
videotape, Anderson and hostage David Jacobsen urge Reagan to work hard for
their release.; Nov. 2 - Jacobsen, freed after 17 months in captivity, says
hostages ""are in hell.""; 1987; Nov. 26 -- Jacobsen says he has been told
Anderson is being held again in chains and blindfolded 24 hours a day.;  
1988; April 10 - Islamic Jihad threatens to kill the captives if any attempt
is made to storm a hijacked Kuwaiti jetliner.; Aug. 18 -- Photo of Anderson
issued with new demands: Israeli withdrawal from south Lebanon and
compensation for reconstruction of Lebanon and Beirut.; Oct. 23 - Islamic
Jihad threatens that the hostages will suffer if the group's demands are not
met; Oct. 31 - In a videotape, Anderson says: "" I find it difficult to keep my
hope and courage high.""; 1989; Oct. 24 - Islamic Jihad again demands the
release of Shiite comrades jailed in Kuwait.; 1990; Feb. 9 -. Anderson's
sister, Peggy Say, begins a new international tour to enlist support in
winning her brother's freedom.; May 7 - Say is told by newly freed hostage
Frank Reed that her brother was in good health during the time they were held
together but he had not seen him since 1989.; Sept. 5 -- Anderson's 2,000th
day in captivity.; 1991; March 13 - In the wake of Iraq's defeat in the gulf
war, U.S. Secretary of State James Baker visits Syria to discuss the hostages.
Syria reiterates that it will work for their release.; Oct. 6 - In a
videotape, Anderson urges all parties to accelerate negotiations to free
Western hostages and says hundreds of Arab prisoners deserve freedom, too.;
Oct. 27 - Anderson's 44th birthday, his seventh in captivity.; Dec. 4 --
Anderson is released.; Associated Press  ",10,"[ 0.29849631  0.01599567  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
106,"     Peggy Say dashed forward and gave her brother a huge hug after he stepped
down from the helicopter at the U.S. Air Force hospital in Wiesbaden.;  
Anderson appeared minutes later on a hospital balcony with Joseph Cicippio and
Alann Steen, the other two American hostages freed this week.;   After a
daylong delay that U.N. officials attributed to snow-blocked roads, Anderson,
chief Middle East correspondent for the Associated Press, had appeared
Wednesday before his colleagues at a press conference in Damascus, Syria, and
said, ""You can't imagine how glad I am to see you."";   The 44-year-old
journalist, who was abducted March 16, 1985, by the Islamic Jihad faction of
Iranian-backed Lebanese Shiite Muslims, looked to be in good health and said
he was sustained in his long ordeal by his companions in captivity, his
religious faith and his ""stubbornness."";   ""You wake up every day. You summon
up energy from somewhere. I don't know how,"" Anderson said as he continuously
searched the packed room in the Syrian Foreign Ministry for Beirut-based
friends and colleagues, waving and giving them the thumbs-up sign.;   At the
news conference in Syria, Anderson said his captors came to his cell Tuesday
afternoon with new clothes -- the first new apparel he had worn in almost
seven years -- and a pair of new shoes that were pinching his feet.;   When
asked what his last words were to his captors, Anderson said simply,
""Goodbye,"" and laughed.;   After the news conference, he met with Madeleine
Bassil, whom he was planning to marry when he was kidnapped, and his
6-year-old daughter, Sulome, whom he had never seen before Wednesday. In his
long captivity, Anderson had treasured a photo of Sulome that his kidnappers
allowed him to receive.;   Anderson was the ninth Western hostage to be freed
since August. His release came after months of negotiations led by a special
U.N. envoy, Giandomenico Picco, who dealt with Iranians, Israelis and the
Lebanese kidnappers.;   In Washington, President Bush, who called Anderson in
Damascus ""to express the love and admiration that all Americans have for
Terry,"" said Wednesday he joined Anderson's family and friends ""in their
happiness for his return to freedom."";   The ordeal isn't over;   But he said:
""While the American hostages have now been released, we cannot say the ordeal
is over. We call for the immediate, safe and unconditional release of all
those held outside the legal system in the region, including the two German
hostages."";   Muslim sources in Beirut and Iranian officials have said Thomas
Kemptner, 30, and Heinrich Streubig, 50, who were kidnapped May 16, 1989, are
expected to be released soon.;   Bush said the United States still wanted a
""full accounting"" of all hostages who reportedly have died or been killed in
captivity.;   Bush called for the immediate return of the remains of Marine
Lt. Col. William Higgins and former CIA station chief William Buckley, both of
whom were killed by hostage-takers in Lebanon. Higgins headed a U.N. observer
force and Buckley was stationed in Beirut.;   White House spokesman Marlin
Fitzwater criticized Iran, with whom most of the hostage-taking groups had
allied themselves, as ""still a terrorist state,"" and insisted that the United
States had made no deals to gain the release of the U.S. hostages.;   In a
great mood;   Anderson appeared to be in an ebullient mood as he joked with
his questioners. Asked how he felt about being labeled the longest-held
Western hostage, he replied, ""It's an honor I'd have gladly given up long
ago."";   Anderson wore dark slacks, a white shirt and a dark sweater. He also
wore a pair of glasses precariously perched on his nose with part of the frame
missing.;   He said his spirits were kept up by listening to British
Broadcasting Corp. newscasts on a radio provided by his kidnappers in the
later period of his captivity, and that he was particularly grateful for
messages from his family that reached him through Lebanese reporters.;  
Before he was released, Anderson read a videotaped message from Islamic Jihad.
The tape preceded him to Damascus, where it was handed to an AP reporter.;  
""Although we are closing the file of the captives,"" the statement declared,
""this doesn't mean the confrontation with the Americans and Israelis is
halted. The captivity of some persons is only one of the styles to confront. .
. . The war is going on."";   Anderson said he made clear that it was the
kidnappers' statement, not his, ""but I thought it was worthwhile to listen to
what they had to say."";   The good news for the hostage in the statement was
brief but meaningful: ""We're going to free our last captive, Terry Anderson,
thus folding this page in the hostage file before glorious Christmas.""; What
he missed; Some of the events Terry Anderson missed during his time in
captivity:; (box)1985: Cruise ship Achille Lauro seized by Palestinians.;
(box)1986: Space shuttle Challenger explodes 73 seconds into flight.;
(box)1987: 37 sailors on USS Stark killed by Iraqi missile in Persian Gulf.;
(box)1988: 270 killed when bomb destroys Pan Am jetliner over Scotland.;
(box)1989: Powerful earthquake strikes Bay Area.; (box)1990: Reunification of
Germany completed.; (box)1991: U.S. launches attacks in Iraq and Kuwait.  ",10,"[ 0.39315254  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
107,"
   An engine fire broke out early today on a cruise
ship carrying more than 700 people in the Gulf of Mexico, but the
blaze appeared to have been brought under control, according to
officials and a nearby ship's captain.
   No injuries were reported, said Petty Officer Brian Lincoln, of
the U.S. Coast Guard's Miami office.
   The Scandinavian Star was about 35 miles off Isla Mujeres, a
Mexican island north of the tourist resort Cancun in the Yucatan
peninsula, said Coast Guard Lt. Jim Mazzonna in Miami.
   ``All we know is that the ship's captain ... is completely out
of fire-fighting equipment and has requested additional
fire-fighting equipment such as foam, water and CO2,'' said
Lincoln, referring to carbon dioxide.
   Coast Guard cutters, the Canada Star cruise ship and the vessel
Vera Cruz stood by to assist in evacuating passengers, Lincoln said.
   The Canada Star's captain, Jens Thorn, said later that the fire
appeared to have been brought under control, and there was no
reason to evacuate.
   Coast Guard Petty Officer Richard Esterline said 707 people,
including crew, were aboard the ship.
   The Scandinavian Star, owned by SeaEscape Ltd., offers daily
``cruises to nowhere'' out of its port in St. Petersburg, records
show.
",11,"[ 0.30436095  0.02191648  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
108,"
   An engine room fire Wednesday disabled a cruise
ship off the Mexican coast, but the crew extinguished the blaze and
the ship with 715 people aboard was towed to port.
   The Navy cutter Vigilant escorted the 465-foot ship, the
Scandinavian Star, as a precaution, according to Chief Petty
Officer Luis Diaz of the U.S. Coast Guard in Miami.
   ``The fire is out and the ship is being towed by the Mexican
navy to Cancun,'' said Diaz.
   There were no injuries from the fire, but a 71-year-old St.
Petersburg man who suffered a heart attack was in stable condition
and on his way home aboard a Coast Guard plane.
   A second person who suffered a spinal cord injury was also
evacuated with the heart attack victim, but Diaz said that injury
also was apparently not related to the fire.
   The ship was expected to arrive in Cancun late Wednesday or
Thursday. The 449 passengers will be flown to St. Petersburg, said
Jill DeChello, spokesman for the ship's owner, SeaEscape Ltd. of
Miami.
   The Scandinavian Star was on a 3-day cruise to Cozumel, Mexico,
and was returning to St. Petersburg when the fire broke out about 1
a.m. EST Wednesday, she said.
   The crew sealed off the engine room and pumped in carbon dioxide
to put out the fire.
   ``They used all their CO2 and closed off the engine room,'' said
Diaz. ``Then they requested more assistance from the Coast Guard.''
The fire was already extinguished when the Vigilant arrived about
10 a.m., he added.
   Ms. DeChello said the company did not know what sparked the fire.
   ``It will take a week before we know the cause and the extent of
the damage,'' said Ms. DeChello.
   In August 1984, a fire struck the Star's sister ship, the
Scandinavian Sun, in the port of Miami, killing a passenger and a
crewman.
   ``I feel they are two totally different incidents that are in no
way related,'' said Ms. DeChello. She said the cruise line was
inspected by the Coast Guard and rigorously enforced all safety
rules.
   Wednesday's fire occurred as the Scandinavian Star was about 35
miles off Isla Mujeres, a Mexican island north of the tourist
resort Cancun in the Yucatan peninsula, the Coast Guard said.
",11,"[ 0.34343627  0.01413156  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
109,"
   Safety standards may not be stringent enough in the
cruise industry, the chairman of a federal agency investigating the
March engine-room fire aboard the Scandinavian Star said Wednesday.
   ``The cruise ship industry is generally not operated under the
U.S. flag. You do have visits by the Coast Guard, but those are
paper certifications,'' said Jim Burnett, chairman of the National
Transportation Safety Board.
   ``There may not be sufficient safety standards,'' he said,
adding that his agency has probed fires aboard four cruise ships in
the past five years. ``The potential for loss of life is enormous.''
   The March 15 engine-room fire aboard the Star, carrying 439
mostly American passengers, was discovered by a crew member as the
ship returned from Cozumel, Mexico to its Tampa home port.
   Smoke detectors apparently failed, as did an automatic system to
douse flames. Also, the ship's emergency generators didn't work for
an hour, leaving the vessel without power in rough seas in the
Yucatan Channel, according to NTSB reports released as the agency's
three-day hearing opened here.
   ``Although there were no injuries or deaths, the failure of the
vessel's safety systems highlights the potential for a catastrophic
loss of life in this accident and future vessel fires,'' Burnett
said.
   The safety board will examine whether the existing Coast Guard
procedures and international regulations are adequate to protect
passengers or whether more rigorous standards are needed.
   Because the NTSB lacks regulatory authority and because cruise
ships are often registered outside the United States, he said his
agency can only make recommendations. These might have to be
followed up with congressional action or with new treaties with
nations where ships are registered, Burnett said.
   The 465-foot Star, operated by Miami-based SeaEscape Limited, is
registered in the Bahamas. Its engine room was badly damaged by the
fire, and there was smoke and water damage throughout the
17-year-old French-made ship, which has since been repaired.
   Burnett estimated damages at about $20 million, but SeaEscape
officials did not answer questions at the hearing.
   SeaEscape lawyer Nils Linfors Jr. vowed to challenge in court
the NTSB's authority to hold such public hearings as Wednesday's.
Atissue is that the board does not permit cross-examinations and
contentions that the Bahamian-registered ship is outside the
agency's jurisdiction.
   An NTSB report said the fire ignited when pressurized fuel
leaked from a line and sprayed against a hot engine exhaust
manifold. The leak continued for 13 minutes after the fire was
discovered, feeding the flames, the report said.
   Because smoke detectors apparently weren't working, Capt. Peter
Schaab said he had to send an officer to the engine room to confirm
there was a fire.
   Firefighting efforts were hampered when an automatic carbox
dioxide extinguishing system failed, and had to be operated by
hand. But the fire was contained to the engine room.
   ``There was no further spreading,'' said Schaab, who was praised
by Burnett for his 268-member crew acting quickly to move
passengers from ship discos, bars, shows and dining rooms. There
were no serious injuries to passengers or crew.
   NTSB records show that between September 1987 and February 1988,
there were at least six leaks in fuel pipes that feed the engines.
   The official analysis of the fire and any recommendations that
come out of the hearings will be adopted by the full NTSB board in
Washington later this summer.
",11,"[ 0.35055883  0.01187911  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
110,"
   Fire broke out aboard a Soviet passenger liner
carrying French tourists on a cruise of the Mediterranean, but the
blaze was put out by the crew and no passengers were injured, Tass
reported Monday.
   The Shota Rustaveli was 25 miles off the island of Malta when a
blaze broke out in the auxiliary engine room, the official news
agency said.
   ``The blaze was put out by the crew. There are no casualties
among the passengers,'' Tass said.
   It cited local news reports as saying the ship had docked at the
Maltese port of Valletta, and that its passengers had been offered
sightseeing trips around the island south of Sicily.
   The tourists were expected to continue their voyage on another
Soviet ship, and the crew of the Shota Rustaveli was to make
repairs and bring the ship home, Tass said.
   It was the second fire aboard a Soviet cruise ship in recent
months. On May 18, a blaze broke out on the liner Priamurye while
it was in the Japanese port of Osaka. Eleven Soviets were killed in
the Priamurye fire, and 26 others hospitalized in critical
condition, Tass reported. The ship was carrying 295 Soviets on a
youth cruise around Japan.
",11,"[ 0.22331699  0.02144087  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
111,"
   The cruise ship Song of America was forced to return
to port after an engine seized up and started a small fire, but no
one was hurt, the ship's owner said today.
   The ship left Miami on Sunday with about 1,300 passengers on a
Caribbean cruise.
   On Tuesday, a few hours out of Cozumel, Mexico, one of its four
engines seized up, touching off a fire in the engine room, said
Royal Caribbean Cruise Line spokesman Rich Steck.
   ``Any time you have a fire it's a big deal, but it was quickly
brought under control,'' Steck said. The passengers were mustered on
deck while crew members doused the blaze, but then allowed to resume
the evening's activities, he said.
   The 705-foot ship turned around and returned to Cozumel on its
remaining three engines to replenish firefighting supplies, Steck
said. Passengers stayed aboard, and the Song of America will return
to Miami on Thursday or Friday.
   All passengers will be offered early flights home, along with
full refunds or the chance to book another cruise, Steck said.
",11,"[ 0.24826428  0.02383608  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
112,"
   Someone set a fire early today in a storage
room on the luxury liner Regent Star, five days after the ship ran
aground in Delaware Bay because of another fire that cut off power,
authorities said.
   No passengers were aboard and no injuries were reported in the 5
a.m. blaze, which was controlled within 90 minutes, said Patrick
McKee, a dispatcher for the city fire department.
   ``The fire on the Regent Star was started in a maintenance
storage room,'' said Lt. Jack Christmas, a fire department
spokesman. ``The fire marshal investigating has determined ... that
the fire was intentionally set.''
   There were no immediate suspects and no immediate evidence to
indicate that the fire was linked to the earlier fire, Christmas
said.
   The 20,000-ton liner was on its way from Jamaica to Philadelphia
on Sunday when a small fire prompted a power loss, allowing the ship
to drift onto a sandbar.
   The 885 passengers left the ship by ferry Monday, a day after
they were supposed to return. No one was injured.
   The liner was freed Tuesday, and the ship was then docked while
the Coast Guard makes safety checks. Thursday, Coast Guard Petty
Officer Ken Beatty said the ship passed all inspections and there
was no serious damage from the grounding.
   The ship had been due to start on a two-day cruise later today,
but that was canceled after the second fire broke out, authorities
said.
   The Coast Guard has said it might be months before a final report
on the grounding is complete.
   An hour after this morning's fire was controlled, about 300 crew
members sat or stood in small groups alongside the Port of History
Museum where the ship was tied up. Many still wearin the orange life
preservers they had put om when they abandoned the ship. Others were
sitting on the preservers.
   Many of them said they didn't speak English, and one who did
refused to be identified and said he didn't know anything about what
happened.
",11,"[ 0.30546861  0.01599727  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
113,"     ""There was no panic,"" said passenger Tom Vento, 56, of Philadelphia. ""I was
surprised that with so many people everyone was so calm.;    ""At first, we
thought it was a joke, but then we saw that it was serious."";    The 14-deck,
800-foot luxury liner left Miami on Saturday for a seven-day voyage to La
Badee, a private island near Haiti; Puerto Rico; and St. Thomas in the U.S.
Virgin Islands.;    Rich Steck, a spokesman for Miami-based Royal Caribbean
Cruise Line, which owns the ship, said it would return to Miami on Wednesday
night after a Coast Guard safety inspection rather than continue the cruise.
Passengers will be given a full refund, he said.;    In Washington, the
National Transportation Safety Board said a two-member team would meet the
ship at Miami to investigate the fire.;    The board has been concerned about
the potential for accidents in the cruise ship industry and has held hearings
around the nation. Last year, it placed cruise ships on its ""most wanted"" list
of safety improvements.;    Steck said the fire, which started in a pantry
between the fifth and seventh decks, apparently was caused by an electrical
problem, but no details were available.;    The fire broke out about 1 a.m.
and spread to the 1,000-seat Follies Lounge, which was closed at the time. It
took about 4 1/2 hours to extinguish the blaze, the Coast Guard said.;    The
2,318 passengers and most of the 818 crew members were evacuated to a nearby
port terminal before they were allowed to return to the ship at daybreak,
Steck said.;    The 74,000-ton Sovereign of the Seas is one of the world's
heaviest cruise ships and the largest in terms of its passenger capacity of
2,521, Steck said.  ",11,"[ 0.50662715  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
114,"     ""Improved cruise ship safety is on the most-wanted list at the board,"" he
said.;   Sadly, it is true that major steps in ship safety have followed great
disasters: The General Slocum fire, which killed 950 people in 1904, brought
tighter requirements for life-saving gear and fire-fighting equipment; the
Titanic, with its loss of 1,500 lives in 1912, brought rules on life-saving
devices and certifying of lifeboat personnel; in the '30s, the Morro Castle
fire, which cost 124 lives, and the Mohawk sinking, with a loss of 45 lives,
brought regulations on the structure, equipment and materials of passenger
ships.;   The Andrea Doria crash in 1956, in which 47 died, inspired
requirements that ship hulls be divided by steel bulkheads.;   When the
Yarmouth Castle burned and sank in 1965, taking 90 lives, Congress banned wood
construction on passenger ships. And the International Maritime Organization,
a United Nations body with headquarters in London, enacted similar regulations
when it overhauled the Safety of Life at Sea code in 1974.;   Despite these
reforms and improvements, Pollock believes the cruise ship industry has been
lucky there haven't been more fatalities during the last decade.;   ""We don't
look at fatalities as a measure of safety,"" he said.;   ""We look at the types
of accidents that occur. Things may go OK under ideal circumstances, but
accidents don't happen under ideal circumstances."";   Pollock fears that
Congress, the Coast Guard and the International Maritime Organization are not
moving fast enough to mandate safeguards, despite 176 deaths last year in an
arsonist's fire on the Scandinavian Star ferry in Denmark, and the dramatic
images of the cruise ship Oceanos, which sank off South Africa early in
August, fortunately without loss of life.;   Safety experts are primarily
concerned with three issues: fire protection, particularly in the big atria of
new cruise ships, the ability of crew members to give safety instructions in a
language that passengers understand, and the aging of the world fleet of
cruise ships.;   American passengers frequently assume that any ship they
board in a U.S. port has met all Coast Guard safety requirements, a notion
reinforced by ""Coast Guard approved"" labels on most life jackets, and fire
systems on smaller boats and domestic ferries.;   In fact, the Coast Guard
gives four inspections a year to ships that dock in the United States, but
when the vessel is registered in another country, the Coast Guard only makes
sure the ship provides whatever is required by international Safety of Life at
Sea regulations: twice as many lifeboat seats as potential passengers and life
jackets for 125 percent of capacity, with the equipment in good condition.;  
Once a year, the Coast Guard observes an evacuation drill. If equipment is not
in order, the Coast Guard can prevent the boarding of passengers until things
are up to snuff.;   The application of the rules is not universal: the older
the vessel, the less stringent the requirements, because Safety of Life at Sea
rules have grandfather clauses.;   Age: no automatic alarm;   A vessel need
comply only with the rules in effect at the time the keel was laid or it last
underwent major reconstruction. When the rules were initially adopted by the
International Maritime Organization, it was assumed that older vessels would
pass out of service, but this did not happen, according to Marjorie Murtagh of
the Coast Guard, the U.S. fire-safety representative at the International
Maritime Organization.;   Of the 100 large vessels now operating from U.S.
ports -- all but two are of foreign registry -- 72 are more than 10 years old,
23 are more than 20 years old and 26 are more than 30 years old, according to
figures in the Coast Guard magazine Proceedings of the Marine Safety Council.
Thus, 70 percent of vessels visiting the United States need not meet the most
recent international rules, enacted in 1974 to cover ships built after May
1980.;   However, everyone who deals with these figures points out that age is
not an automatic indicator of an unsafe vessel. For instance, the Britanis was
built in 1932 of a steel design not required until after the Andrea Doria.;  
Rear Adm. Joel D. Sipes, former chief of the Coast Guard's Office of Marine
Safety, testified in Congress this spring: ""We have been concerned for a
number of years that the grandfather clauses create an incentive to bring more
and more older ships back into service. We already see an aging of the fleet,
and a resurgence in refurbishment without safety upgrading."";   Death rate
falls;   However, the casualty rate on cruise ships has been low in recent
years. The National Transportation Safety Board in 1989 published a study of
36 accidents in 15 years on vessels that touched U.S. ports. Of the 176 deaths
listed, only five were aboard ocean-going cruise vessels under foreign flags.;
  William A. O'Neil, secretary general of the International Maritime
Organization, fears that may change, partly because of the leeway the
grandfather rules give for refitting. ""The average age of ships today is 16
years, which is already fairly elderly in shipping terms and old ships need
more maintenance and repair,"" he said in a statement last month.;   In May,
the safety committee of the International Maritime Organization met in London
to begin amending the Safety of Life at Sea rules.;   The proposed amendments,
which are supported by the majority of the member countries, require that new
ships' atriums have smoke-detection systems, smoke-exhaust systems, two means
of escape and an automatic sprinkler system.;   The committee also discussed a
phase-out of the grandfather rules. One peculiar gap in existing regulations
involves vessels built under the 1974 rules, which banned wood construction,
but for the first time did not require sprinkler systems.;   These vessels
would probably be among the first existing vessels required to install
sprinklers.;   Denmark, Norway, Sweden and the United States have entered
proposals to cover older vessels immediately, or to modify sharply the
permissive rules. Roger Kohn, information officer for the maritime
organization in London, said the loss of the Oceanos ""tended to confirm a
general feeling that something must be done."";   John T. Estes, president of
the International Council of Cruise Lines, which represents the owners of most
of the ocean-going cruise vessels, said that his organization favored all the
proposed new rules, but not the proposed effective dates.;   When the safety
committee met in May, it was considering phasing-in dates for the regulations
beyond 1994 for new ships, possibly as late as 2010 for removal from service
of vessels that cannot meet the new rules.;   Estes said that accounting for
the lead time required for ship design, his organization favors 1996 for
enforcing the rules on new construction and major reconstruction.;   The 15
major cruise ships that call in New York have passed inspections without
difficulty, according to Comdr. Anthony Dupree, chief of the inspection
department of the Coast Guard in New York. In U.S. ports, he said, any work is
generally done quickly ""because passengers are the lines' meat and potatoes,
and we can keep them from boarding."";   These inspections, done every three
months, should assure passengers, according to Lieut. Comdr. John J. O'Brien
Jr., the Coast Guard's deputy chief.;   ""If you fly to another country to save
a few dollars,"" he said, ""let the buyer beware; you don't know if it's been
inspected in the last year, or at all."";   On the other hand, when
U.S.-registered vessels are inspected, O'Brien said, they are required to meet
full Coast Guard standards, including expensive Type I life vests designed to
be very easy to use. But there are only two U.S.-flag vessels in the cruise
trade -- American Hawaii Cruises' Independence and Constitution, operating in
Hawaii.  ",11,"[ 0.35847717  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
115,"
   In their ads, cruise ships are the picture of fun-in-the-sun vacationing on the high seas. 
But according to the U.S. government, the sailing could be treacherous. 

   Last February, Miami-based Carnival Cruise Lines Inc.'s 700-foot Celebration, registered as a Liberian ship, cut a Cuban freighter in half in a collision off Cuba, killing three Cuban sailors. 
Carnival officials acknowledged that nobody was watching the radar at the time, but have refused to cooperate with a U.S. investigation, despite federal subpoenas. 

   In March 1988, an engine fire broke out on SeaEscape's Bahamian cruise ship, the Scandinavian Star, as it headed to St. Petersburg, Fla., from Cozumel, Mexico. 
Automatic fire extinguishers and the emergency generator failed, plunging much of the smoke-filled ship into darkness. 
Because many of the crew members spoke no English, they offered little help to the terrified passengers. 
One vacationer had to show a crew member how to pull a fire alarm. 

   In a voluminous report issued yesterday, the National Transportation Safety Board said these and other incidents carry a clear warning: Many foreign-flag cruise ships that sail from U.S. ports have serious safety problems and the potential for a catastrophic accident is significant. 
""A little bit of laxity,"" warns James Burnett, a member of the board, ""could cost you {the lives of} 1,200 people."" 

   The board, in sweeping recommendations, is seeking both legislation and voluntary cooperation from the industry to improve cruise-ship safety, which it says is marred by the less-than-exacting rules governing foreign-flag carriers. 
Foreign-registered vessels make up the vast majority of cruise ships sailing from U.S. ports and catering to Americans. 

   ""If these companies are going to have their fleets based in the U.S. and carry primarily U.S. passengers, then they should meet U.S. standards,"" says one safety board staffer. 

   An industry spokeswoman says the cruise-ship companies welcome any safety suggestions but question the need for more regulation. 
Diana Orban, a spokeswoman for Cruise Lines International Association, a New York-based group that has 35 members, notes that only two people have been killed on cruise ships serving U.S. ports since 1970. (Both were passengers on the Scandinavian Sun, another Bahamian ship, when it caught fire in August 1984.) ""When you look at that track record, it speaks for itself,"" she says. 
""We don't know any record that's better."" 

   But as the booming cruise-ship industry plans ever larger ships -- some on the drawing boards could carry well over 3,000 people -- the safety board's concerns are rising. (Many cruise ships now carry fewer than 1,000 people.) Ships operating from U.S. ports carried about five million passengers last year, and in anticipation of continued growth, 20 cruise ships are under construction around the world. 
Most will ply their trade as foreign-flag carriers in U.S. ports. 

   The problems, the safety board said, include inadequate fire-fighting equipment and crew training, language barriers and lax accident reporting and investigating. 
But the overriding concern, the board said, is that foreign cruise ships are subject to rules that are less stringent and vigorously enforced than those imposed on U.S. flag vessels. 

   Many Americans hoping for a bon voyage wrongly assume that ships sailing from U.S. ports operate under the supervision of the U.S. government. 
But almost all cruise ships operating out of the continental U.S. sail under foreign flags, and the U.S. Coast Guard conducts only cursory inspections of foreign vessels. 
At least 80 foreign cruise ships operate out of U.S. ports, mostly from southern Florida. 
Many of them sail under the so-called flags of convenience of Liberia, Panama and the Bahamas. 
There are only three U.S. flag cruise ships and they operate in the Hawaiian Islands. 

   Fire is considered the most deadly threat for cruise ships. 
The board said there have been at least nine fires on foreign-flag cruise ships in recent years, several of them serious. 
In July 1986, an acetylene-fueled fire erupted in an engine store room on the Panamanian cruise ship Emerald Seas as it was approaching the Berry Islands in the Bahamas. 
Before long, two explosions rocked the vessel. 
Meanwhile, the ventilation system, instead of shutting down, pumped black smoke into the state rooms. 
Forty-one people were treated for smoke inhalation. 

   Language problems aggravate the safety hazards. 
During an emergency drill on the Bahamian vessel Tropicana, the U.S. Coast Guard saw that the Polish officers had trouble communicating with a lifeboat launch team who spoke Spanish. 
The Coast Guard had to conduct several drills before the ship was permitted to leave port. 

   The location of life jackets is another issue. 
In the 1988 Scandinavian Star accident, passengers were given conflicting information about whether they should go to their cabins or emergency gathering stations to get their life jackets. 
In some cases, passengers tried to fight their way through smoke-choked hallways to get back to their cabins to get their safety jackets. 

   To reduce the chances of a cruise-ship disaster, the safety board is pushing for legislation that would give the U.S. Coast Guard the authority to enforce U.S. safety rules on foreign-flag vessels. 
""The Coast Guard,"" says Board Chairman James Kolstad, ""needs more teeth"" to ensure that the vessels are safe when they leave American ports. 

   In particular, the board believes the ships should be required to have sophisticated, integrated fire-control systems, including remote fire door releases and fire alarms. 
The board also wants cruise-ship companies to install floor-level emergency lights like those on airplanes and to hire a full-time marine firefighter on all vessels with more than 500 passengers. 
And it believes that at least 75% of the crew involved in emergency operations should be able to communicate with each other and the passengers. 

   Despite its strongly worded report, the NTSB knows it could be years before the safety standards for cruise ships are upgraded. 
But in the meantime, one staff member says, ""at least the public can be made aware, when they walk their family across that gangplank, what kind of environment they are going into."" 

",11,"[ 0.18877117  0.00679653  0.18187459 ...,  0.02958597  0.          0.        ]"
116,"
   More than 30 years ago, Life magazine
took a look at the burgeoning little desert town of Las Vegas and
wondered if it wasn't overbuilt.
   The year was 1955 and five new resort hotels had just opened,
prompting the magazine to question where they would get people to
fill them.
   ``Has Las Vegas pushed its luck too far?'' Life asked.
   History has proven doubters to be wrong. Las Vegas has grown
from a dusty town of a few resorts into a booming metropolis of
more than 600,000 people, with nearly 60,000 hotel and motel rooms
to accomodate tourists.
   Now, as Las Vegas undergoes one of the most ambitious of its
periodic building booms, there are few who believe that
overbuilding is a problem. Tourism is growing and the gaming and
resort industries are attempting to capitalize on the trend.
   ``There is still a tremendous amount of demand out there that
hasn't been satisified,'' said Rossi Ralenkotter, director of
marketing for the Las Vegas Convention and Visitors Authority.
``We're in a very strong growth pattern and all indications are
that it will continue.''
   Nearly 20,000 new hotel rooms either are under construction or
awaiting groundbreaking, as resorts compete to add rooms they hope
will bring in even more tourists and gamblers in the near future.
   Part of that optimism is based on figures showing hotels
averaged 90.2 percent occupancy during 1987. Such extremely high
rates meant potential guests often were turned away by a lack of
rooms: on weekends, it is nearly impossible to get a room and on
three-day holiday weekends it's even worse.
   Visitor volume nearly has doubled in the last 12 years, with an
estimated 17 million tourists each expected to spend an average of
2-3 days in Las Vegas during 1988.
   Gaming revenues kept pace, growing 14 percent in 1987 to a
record $2.74 billion in southern Nevada.
   ``We're penetrating markets we've never penetrated before,''
said Dave Verbon, publicity director at the Riviera Hotel. ``There
are vast numbers of people out there we never tried to reach before
and now we're going after them and getting them.''
   Already boasting the world's two largest resort hotels, Las
Vegas soon will have five hotel-casinos with more than 3,000 rooms
apiece. Two resorts _ the Riviera and the Flamingo Hilton _ are
about to begin work on expansions that will bring them to more than
4,000 rooms apiece.
   The Riviera opened a new 1,000-room highrise March 1 and plans
to begin construction of a 1,700-room tower in the fall.
   ``You have to build towers to have a very high volume of
business to drive a large casino with a large number of slot
machines and blackjack tables,'' said Verbon. ``We think there are
enough potential customers to support these huge hotels.''
   The centerpiece of the new construction is the Golden Nugget, a
massive resort rising from a desert parcel adjacent to Caesars
Palace. When finished sometime late next year, the $550 million
resort will have 3,200 guest rooms set in a watery tropical setting
that hotel officials claim will be like nothing Las Vegas has ever
seen.
   ``It's really on a completely different plane in terms of what
we presently have,'' said Nugget President Bobby Baldwin. ``It's
very difficult to compare the new Nugget to anything.''
   Baldwin says he has few worries that the Nugget will be able to
fill its rooms with gamblers and tourists. The company's downtown
resort regularly sells out its rooms.
   ``We're very bullish,'' he said. ``Tour and travel continues to
grow and the individual traveler market continues to expand,
particularly from Southern California. International business has
also expanded in the last few months and we hope to see that
continue.''
   The tourism economy has been helped by the growth in three-day
weekends and a national trend toward mini-vacations of 2-3 days.
Las Vegas has also been very successful in landing conventions,
which attracted 1.6 million people to the city in 1987.
   Part of the Las Vegas lure also comes from room rates that
average $45 a night, far below the $100 or more charged by
non-gaming hotels in other cities.
   ``It's the bargain aspect, the ability to have a very enjoyable
convention or vacation visit at far less expense than any other
destination,'' said Ralenkotter.
   The city's hotels in the past four to five years have begun
exploiting the vast middle-class and tourism markets they once
eschewed in favor of attracting a handful of high-rolling gamblers.
   The expanded customer base, hotel operators believe, gives them
protection against a recession or sudden rise in fuel prices that
could have a negative impact on tourism levels.
   In the early 1980s, a national recession combined with high fuel
prices and the legalization of gambling in Atlantic City stopped
the Las Vegas growth rate in its tracks.
   ``In good times everybody does pretty well and the better
operators do even better,'' said Baldwin. ``In bad times good
operators don't do quite as well but they still do well. The best
operators do great in both times.''
",12,"[ 0.38294904  0.00882415  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
117,"
   Sin City is about to meet its Maker.
   The first contingents of up to 18,000 Southern Baptists began
arriving this weekend for an ``evangelistic blitz'' in the nation's
gambling capital. They hope to leave behind 12 new churches and tens
of thousands of religious tracts by the end of their annual
convention.
   ``I embrace the old philosophy, if someone gives you a lemon, you
make lemonade,'' said John B. Wright, a convention organizer.
   Las Vegas, which has welcomed conventions of strippers and
swingers in recent years, is ready for the Southern Baptists.
   ``We want all the conventions we can get and we don't give a damn
who they are,'' said John Reible, a spokesman for the Las Vegas
Chamber of Commerce.
   The site represents a marriage of convenience for Southern
Baptists and the city built on the vices they condemn.
   The 14.8 million-member Southern Baptist Convention has more than
doubled its membership in a quarter century and surpassed the United
Methodist Church as the nation's largest Protestant denomination.
Las Vegas, a desert town of 5,600 little more than five decades ago,
is growing at the rate of 3,000 people a month and there are now
about 700,000 people in the region.
   Las Vegas is one of only 15 U.S. cities that can provide the
hotel rooms and exhibit space for a Southern Baptist convention,
said Alvin C. Shackleford, a convention spokesman.
   ``It just seemed sooner or later we would accept the invitation
of the people of Las Vegas to come,'' he said. There are about
22,000 Southern Baptists in 71 churches in Nevada.
   Six years after the denomination voted to meet in Las Vegas, the
decision still evokes controversy, and many Southern Baptists have
decided to stay home.
   While conventions in recent years have drawn as many as 45,000
people, estimates for the convention running Tuesday through
Thursday range from 13,000 to 18,000.
   Reasons include the reluctance of Southern Baptists to expose
their children to the gambling scene, the city's remoteness from the
denomination's strongholds in the Southeast and an apparent lack of
burning issues as the struggle between the denomination's moderates
and conservatives stretches into its 11th year.
   Southern Baptists leaders say Las Vegas offers an opportunity to
put aside internal battles and emphasize evangelism.
   ``The choice of Las Vegas was deliberate in that the Southern
Baptist Convention hopes it can do sort of an evangelistic blitz in
Las Vegas,'' said Stan Hastey, executive director of the Southern
Baptist Alliance, a moderate group.
   A series of revivals in city churches led up to a campaign
Saturday in which about 2,000 Southern Baptists were expected knock
on doors around Las Vegas.
   To keep the focus on evangelism when the meetings begin,
convention President Jerry Vines said he is seeking postponement of
a controversial proposal by conservatives to create a Religious
Liberty Commission. The commission would lobby Congress on issues
such as organized prayer in public schools and tax credits for
tuition paid to parochial schools.
   Church leaders said the internal struggle has taken a toll on the
evangelistic efforts of the denomination, where membership has
increased barely more than half a percent in each of the last two
years.
   ``The main thing is to keep the main thing the main thing,'' said
Jay Strack, president of the Conference of Southern Baptist
Evangelists.
   On Wednesday, the conference plans to lead thousands of Southern
Baptists down the gambling Strip to distribute 10,000 New Testaments
and 20,000 gospel tracts, Strack said.
   Las Vegas officials and some church leaders say the city
variously known over the years as Sin City, Sin City West and Lost
Wages is undeserving of special attention.
   ``Las Vegas is probably no more notorious in its pagan qualities
than any other city,'' Hastey said.
   Robert Powers, a spokesman for the Las Vegas Convention and
Visitors Authority, said life in the residential areas outside the
Strip is little different from anywhere else.
   In addition to bringing in up to $15 million in revenue, the
Southern Baptist convention should help the city's image, Powers
said.
   ``I think it's good for the city that a group like this is
meeting here,'' he said.
",12,"[ 0.3803234  0.0091288  0.        ...,  0.         0.         0.       ]"
118,"
   Japanese investors, attracted by bargain
properties and a dramatic increase in tourism here by their
countrymen, have spent or committed $800 million in this
entertainment capital and it's fueling an economic boom.
   The projects range from four hotel-casinos to a downtown office
building and a massive golf course and resort development.
   More than 380,000 Japanese tourists are expected to visit Las
Vegas this year, vs. about 300,000 in 1988. That is not lost on some
of Japan's leading economic players.
   ``More than half the Japanese tourists who come to Los Angeles
will also come to Las Vegas,'' said Yoshi Morichika, who is heading
up a 1,274-acre golf and destination resort community for Japanese
recreation and electronics giant Cosmo World.
   The project, in nearby Henderson, will include 45 holes of golf,
2,700 condominiums, apartments and luxury homes, a dozen tennis
courts, a tennis stadium and a 700-room hotel.
   Cosmo World has projects in Japan, Europe, Hawaii, Los Angeles,
San Francisco and Tucson. It added Las Vegas to the list ``because
the land is not expensive, yet, and there is a huge volume of
Japanese tourists here,'' Morichika said in an interview.
   Jane Wilson, who handles international marketing for the Las
Vegas Convention and Visitors Authority, says Japanese tourism has
been increasing at about 20 percent a year, and is expected to jump
about 27 percent this year.
   ``If they come to the West Coast, we're going to get them,'' she
said. ``In their culture, they want to go where a city is known
worldwide, where there are a lot of things to do such as shows,
shopping, sightseeing, et cetera.''
   The growing identity of Las Vegas in Japan, bargain real estate
prices, a good economic climate and the attractiveness of the city
are proving a magnet for Japanese investors. The Nevada Development
Authority says Las Vegas is the sixth-fastest growing metropolitan
area in the United States.
   Cosmo World's resort project is expected to cost $200 million by
the time it's completed in 1993.
   Japanese billionaire Masao Nangaku, who bought the Dunes Hotel
and Casino two years ago for $157 million, is planning a 35-story
high-rise office building and 300-room nongaming hotel in downtown
Las Vegas. The cost, when completed in 1991, will be about $120
million.
   A group of Japanese investors have agreed to help Orlando, Fla.
developer Bob Snow finance a $130 million dining and entertainment
complex known as Winchester Station. Snow is seeking a new site for
the project because some landowners in downtown Las Vegas balked at
selling their property.
   Japanese businessman Katsuki Manabe, who owns more than 30
arcades in Tokyo, has invested $30 million in the Park Hotel in
downtown Las Vegas and millions more in his Nevada-based Sigma
Games, a gaming equipment maker.
   Millionaire Ginji Yasuda has invested more than $120 million in
the Aladdin Hotel.
   The move by the Japanese into the sophisticated gaming industry
has not been smooth.
   Yasuda, a high-rolling gambler before he bought the Aladdin, has
experienced financial problems at the resort in recent months,
forcing him to dig for sources to pay back taxes and some suppliers.
   However, one top Nevada gaming source, who asked not to be
identified, said Yasuda's license was up for reconsideration earlier
this year and would not have been continued ``if he had not been
able to meet his gaming obligations.''
   The same source said the Japanese had taken over depressed
properties and kept them open ``and any stride forward is a positive
sign.''
   The Dunes and Aladdin had been operating under bankruptcy
protection for years before they were purchased by Nangaku and
Yasuda. The Park, the former Holiday Inn downtown, had been closed
for five years before it was refurbished and opened by Manabe.
   Mike Rumbolz, former Gaming Control Board chairman who now heads
Donald Trump's efforts to enter Nevada gaming, said the Japanese
were hampered because they bought distressed properties that
couldn't make it under American expertise.
   Sukeaki Izumi, who owns five hotels in Japan and Guam, recently
purchased another closed property, the former Treasury Hotel, which
he has renamed the San Remo. Izumi, who looked at properties in
Hawaii but opted for Las Vegas because of the lower costs, has
committed $30 million for the purchase and renovation of the hotel.
   Don Woodsmall, who serves with Morichika as project manager of
the Cosmo World project, said Las Vegas was picked by the Japanese
company, in part, ``because the housing market is so strong here.''
   Representatives of the company began looking for land in late
1987 and selected a site 10 minutes south of the Las Vegas Strip.
   Work on the Cosmo World project is scheduled to start in the
first quarter of 1990. Several major hotel chains have expressed an
interest in running the resort, Morichika said.
   Izumi, a millionaire industrialist, became involved in the hotel
business six years ago when he bought a property in Osaka.
   He switched his focus here, he said, because the city was
smaller, the cost of living was lower, real estate prices were more
attractive, and he liked the way of life.
   Izumi moved to Las Vegas in December and plans to run the San
Remo personally. The 324-room European-style property is scheduled
to reopen July 1. Izumi has plans for a $30 million 16-story,
340-room tower next year, followed by a second tower and expansion
of the casino.
   When Nangaku bought the Dunes Hotel two years ago, his attorney
predicted other Japanese businessmen would follow.
   They did.
   ``This area is very attractive to the Japanese businessman,''
Izumi said. ``There is no other city like Las Vegas in the world.''
",12,"[ 0.39023612  0.00749339  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
119,"
   Plans announced by billionaire Kirk Kerkorian
to build a 5,000-room resort here would allow Las Vegas to claim
the eight largest hotels in the world by 1992, according to
industry statistics.
   Of course, Las Vegas' domination of the list dpends on other
cities not building big hotels between now and 1992.
   The Las Vegas Hilton currently claims the title with 3,174 rooms
but will be surpassed next March when an expansion is completed at
the Flamingo Hilton, giving that Strip resort 3,530 rooms. The
Flamingo will hold the title only a few months, until the Excalibur
opens next summer with 4,032 rooms.
   Steve Wynn's Mirage Hotel opens next month with 3,054 rooms.
   Circus Circus, the parent corporation for Excalibur, currently
has 2,800 rooms in Las Vegas, as does Bally's Hotel on the Strip.
   The Riviera Hotel currently has 2,200 rooms but a planned
expansion will give the resort 3,800 rooms by June of 1992.
   Kerkorian built the International Hotel, now the Las Vegas
Hilton, and the MGM Grand, now Bally's. He also owned the Flamingo
at one time.
   The Hilton Hawaiian Village in Honolulu currently has 2,525
rooms, making it the largest hotel, in number of rooms, outside of
Las Vegas, according to figures in the Hotel and Motel Index. The
number of rooms at the Hawaiian property is not expected to change
in the near future because the hotel recently completed an
expansion, according to Las Vegas Hilton spokesman Bruce Banke.
   Outside the United States, the New Otani Hotel in Tokyo leads in
number of rooms with 2,056.
",12,"[ 0.25827183  0.01653128  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
120,"
   In a state with few people, the city with the
most wins the power game. In Nevada, that makes Las Vegas the
undisputed champ.
   Las Vegas, which welcomes as many as 6,000 new residents a
month, is the reason Nevada is the nation's fastest-growing state.
The city's population is expected to reach 1 million by 1995, four
times what it was in 1980.
   An estimated 800,000 people live there now, out of 1.3 million
in the state as a whole. The three rural counties fighting Clark
County's water plan have a combined population of less than 35,000.
   That means Clark County controls the Nevada Legislature: 36 of
63 state lawmakers are from the Las Vegas area, and the contingent
is sure to grow with next year's reapportionment. So what Clark
County wants, Clark County has the numbers to get.
   ``If there's something in state water law we can hang our hat on
to deter this plan, the power is in Las Vegas and Clark County and
they'll just go ahead and change the law,'' said Steve Bradhurst, a
consultant to the rural counties.
   Las Vegas also is the state's financial anchor. Last year, Clark
County casinos accounted for 70 percent of the state's $4.6 billion
in gaming revenues. Clark County needs to keep growing for the
state's economic health, officials say.
   ``There is one large metropolitan area from which the bulk of
all revenues in this state come, and that's Clark County,'' said
Pat Mulroy, manager of the Las Vegas Valley Water District. ``If .
.. it goes downhill, the whole state goes downhill.''
",12,"[ 0.21655035  0.01782103  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
121,"

Southern California's favorite gambling town is on a roll. 


Spurred by strong increases in tourism and convention business, Las Vegas hotel 
construction is booming as never before. 


Between now and 1992, more than 20,000 hotel rooms will be added to the 61,000 
existing rooms, hotel owners and industry analysts say, and about 7,000 of 
those will be in two hotels. 


One is the $630-million Mirage, being built by Golden Nugget Inc., which will 
have 3,100 rooms when it opens Dec. 1. 


The other is the $290-million Excalibur, a project of Circus Circus 
Enterprises. It will have 4,032 rooms, the most of any hotel in the country 
when it opens in June. 


""Las Vegas is experiencing the greatest growth phase of its history,"" said Saul 
F. Leonard, a gaming industries expert with Laventhol &amp; Horwath, Los 
Angeles. 


""The Mirage and Excalibur will be the first new major projects in the city in 
15 years, and with their unusual features, they will be must-sees."" 


The president of The Mirage, Bobby Baldwin, said most of his hotel's features 
were ""a secret of sorts,"" but earlier reports indicate that it will have a 
$9-million lagoon, a 49-foot waterfall and a 100-foot-high, sky-lit atrium 
filled with 70-foot-high banyan trees, coconut palms and tropical orchids. 


Excalibur will feature a medieval theme, with a moving walkway that will carry 
visitors over a moat and through castle gates to a casino, an amphitheater, 
shops and restaurants. 


Both the Mirage and Excalibur are being built on ""The Strip."" But Fletch 
Brunelle, research coordinator for the Las Vegas Convention and Visitors 
Authority, said that there are hotel construction projects under way all over 
the city. 


He estimated that about 11,500 hotel rooms are being built, and 38,000 more are 
proposed, some of which will be completed after the 20,000 planned to be 
available by 1992. 


Many of the new rooms are being added to existing hotels, which are also 
expanding their casinos and convention halls, Leonard added. 


The construction boom was created, experts say, by an aggressive marketing 
strategy used in the past few years by the state, the city's Convention 
Authority and the major hotels to capture conventions, trade shows and group 
tours. 




Strategy Is Working 


The strategy is apparently working. 


""Las Vegas is the third largest convention city in the United States and 
probably will be No. 2 within the next two years,"" Leonard said. (Experts agree 
that New York is No. 1, but they're split, between Chicago and Atlanta as to 
which city is No. 2.) 


""Nevada, especially Las Vegas, is already one of the top destinations for group 
tours coming from Asia,"" said Rich Moreno, state director of tourism. 


Since an office to stimulate Japanese travel to Nevada was established in Tokyo 
three years ago, the number of Japanese tourists visiting the state jumped from 
165,000 to 300,000, he added. And he expects the number of all Asian visitors 
to grow after a Taipei office is opened in a few months. 




Tours from Europe 


The Las Vegas Convention and Visitors Authority hopes to make the city a top 
destination for tours from Europe as well. ""It's in our budget to help fund an 
office in London or Frankfurt,"" said Frank Sain, the bureau's executive 
director. 


The bureau's advertising budget for the next fiscal year is about $10 million, 
and that will be spent on ads in newspapers, magazines, billboards, and TV and 
radio. 


""Southern California is our primary market,"" Sain said, estimating that 
Californians represent up to 42% of all Las Vegas visitors, which jumped from 
11.7 million to 17.2 million in the past 10 years. 


About two-thirds of the California visitors come from Southern California, said 
Maurice Robinson, a senior manager with KPMG Peat Marwick, Los Angeles. 


The proximity of Southern California to Las Vegas undoubtedly contributes to 
the fact that the growth in Nevada, in terms of casino revenues and visitors, 
is ""overwhelmingly in Clark County,"" said Andy Grose, executive director of the 
state's Economic Development Commission. ""(It) is not a statewide phenomenon."" 




Laughlin a Boom Town 


""If you really want to see a boom town, though, you should go to Laughlin,"" 
Leonard said. 


Laughlin, also in Clark County but a little closer than Las Vegas to Los 
Angeles, had 430 hotel rooms in 1981 but slightly more than 4,000 at the end of 
1988, he noted, and it is expected to have about 13,000 at the end of 1991. 


Laughlin drew some business from downtown Las Vegas, he said, but owners of the 
downtown Las Vegas hotels and casinos have changed their marketing strategy to 
capture richer customers. 


They switched, said Jim Needham of Arthur Young in Seattle, from courting 
""blue-collar workers and moms and pops carrying around milkshake containers of 
nickels to younger people looking for a one-stop place for a show, gambling and 
resort."" 




Seeking Conventions 


Hotel/casino owners throughout Las Vegas responded the same way to business 
setbacks in 1979, when casinos first opened in Atlantic City, N.J., and in the 
early '80s, when there was an economic recession. 


They changed their marketing strategy by seeking conventions and those visitors 
who would stay longer than a day. 


""Las Vegas saw what it had to do,"" said Dave Daley, a partner in the Arthur 
Andersen Real Estate Services Group. 


""Las Vegas turned from a weekend regional, getaway place where people would 
drive to go, to a national convention place competitive with such cities as San 
Francisco, Chicago and Los Angeles,"" said Robinson of KPMG Peat Marwick. 


Most of Atlantic City's 30 million annual visitors do not stay overnight, 
observed Sean Hennessey, a vice president of Landauer Associates, New York. 




Pull from the Midwest 


""And I'd say that Las Vegas still enjoys a tremendous pull from the Midwestern 
states and even from Buffalo and areas approximate to Atlantic City, which is 
still trying to get better airport and convention facilities to emulate Las 
Vegas."" 


But Las Vegas is still improving its airport and convention facilities. 


Although the first of a three-phased, $1-billion expansion of McCarran 
International Airport in Las Vegas was completed a few years ago, the second 
phase is under way, and the city has just launched a $35-million expansion of 
its convention center. 


Many hotels are also adding convention accommodations, including the Sands, 
where a 1-million-square-foot convention center, touted as ""the largest outside 
a facility operated by a community,"" is expected to be completed in 17 months. 


New sites are also coming up for future gaming, convention and hotel 
development. The largest in the city is a 300-acre site owned by the Union 
Pacific Railroad, which is being marketed by Cushman Realty, Los Angeles. 


It's all part of the city's drive to stay on top of the competition, including 
state lotteries, which, gaming experts say, have helped the casinos at the same 
time. 


""Lotteries have made gaming more acceptable, a mainstream activity,"" said 
Landauer's Hennessey. 




New Experiences Planned 


But Las Vegas is banking on more than its current gaming and convention 
capabilities to draw visitors and fill hotel rooms. 


New games and experiences and a proposed train are in the cards. Said John 
O'Reilly, chairman of the Nevada Gaming Commission: ""I think that in the next 
12 to 24 months, there will be some new games with more universal appeal than 
most games of the past."" 


Las Vegas is also betting on what state tourism director Moreno describes as 
""new experiences,"" like the live dolphins that will perform at the Mirage and 
jousting tournaments that will be held at Excalibur. 


""People won't just go to a hotel as a place to stay but as an experience,"" he 
said. 


Las Vegas is also betting on a super-speed train, which would make the trip 
from downtown Las Vegas to downtown Los Angeles in an hour -- for $65, round 
trip. 


""I want it to happen,"" said Assemblyman Richard Katz (D-Sylmar), chairman of 
the 16-member California-Nevada Super Speed Ground Transportation Committee. 
""We'll know in a year if it's financially and environmentally possible."" 


The train would be privately funded at a cost of $3.5 billion, he added. 




The Race is On 


Despite the price, Arnie Adamsen, a Las Vegas city councilman and vice chairman 
of the commission, said, ""It could conceivably start construction in 1993 and 
be on line from 1996 to 1998."" 


In the meantime, the race is on to see which hotel will have the most rooms to 
attract the largest conventions. 


For some time, the 3,174-room Las Vegas Hilton has been billed as ""the largest 
hotel in the free world."" It will be overshadowed by the Flamingo Hilton after 
a 750-room expansion there brings the Flamingo's room count to 3,650 in early 
1990, but Excalibur will be the biggest when it opens in June, 1990. 


A 1,700-room, 42-story tower, which is being called ""the tallest in the state,"" 
is expected to bring the Riviera Hotel's room count to about 4,000 in late 1991 
or 1992. And a 1,500-room tower to be completed in 20 months at the Sands will 
bring that hotel's room total to nearly 3,000. 


The number of rooms under construction is a lot in a short period of time, 
experts agree, but most are optimistic that occupancy rates will remain high 
after a slight downturn. A glut of hotel rooms will exist, said Leonard, but 
only temporarily. 




Occupancy Rates 85% 


Current occupancy rates are in the 85% range in Las Vegas, while occupancies 
range between 65% and 70% for hotels in the rest of the country, according to 
Hennessey. 


""What's dropping is motel occupancy,"" said Sain, of the Convention Authority. 


It's still at a respectable 73%, he noted, ""but they're not getting the hotel 
overflow. In the eight years I've been here, not that many new motels have been 
built because most convention and trade show people want hotels with all their 
amenities."" 


In the long-range, predicted Leonard, Las Vegas will continue to grow ""because 
there is so much happening there. 


""And when you consider that only about 10% of the people in the United States 
have ever been to Las Vegas, you know that the city has a hell of a long way to 
grow."" 




HOTEL ROOM COUNT FOR LAS VEGAS 

<TABLE CWL=""1.67IN:2.77IN"" WDM=""ABS"" NCOLS=""2"">
<ROWRULE>  </ROWRULE>
<TABLEROW>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""C"" CVJ=""C"">
Year 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""C"" CVJ=""C"">
Number of Rooms 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
</TABLEROW>
<ROWRULE>  </ROWRULE>
<TABLEROW>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""C"" CVJ=""C"">
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""C"" CVJ=""C"">
(In thousands) 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
</TABLEROW>
<ROWRULE>  </ROWRULE>
<TABLEROW>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""L"" CVJ=""C"">
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL>
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
</TABLEROW>
<ROWRULE>  </ROWRULE>
<TABLEROW>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""L"" CVJ=""C"">
1981 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""R"" CVJ=""C"">
49.6 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
</TABLEROW>
<ROWRULE>  </ROWRULE>
<TABLEROW>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""L"" CVJ=""C"">
1982 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""R"" CVJ=""C"">
50.3 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
</TABLEROW>
<ROWRULE>  </ROWRULE>
<TABLEROW>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""L"" CVJ=""C"">
1983 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""R"" CVJ=""C"">
52.5 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
</TABLEROW>
<ROWRULE>  </ROWRULE>
<TABLEROW>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""L"" CVJ=""C"">
1984 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""R"" CVJ=""C"">
54.1 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
</TABLEROW>
<ROWRULE>  </ROWRULE>
<TABLEROW>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""L"" CVJ=""C"">
1985 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""R"" CVJ=""C"">
53.1 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
</TABLEROW>
<ROWRULE>  </ROWRULE>
<TABLEROW>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""L"" CVJ=""C"">
1986 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""R"" CVJ=""C"">
57.6 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
</TABLEROW>
<ROWRULE>  </ROWRULE>
<TABLEROW>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""L"" CVJ=""C"">
1987 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""R"" CVJ=""C"">
58.6 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
</TABLEROW>
<ROWRULE>  </ROWRULE>
<TABLEROW>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""L"" CVJ=""C"">
1988 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""R"" CVJ=""C"">
61.4 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
</TABLEROW>
<ROWRULE>  </ROWRULE>
<TABLEROW>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""L"" CVJ=""C"">
1989* 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""R"" CVJ=""C"">
62.7 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
</TABLEROW>
<ROWRULE>  </ROWRULE>
<TABLEROW>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""L"" CVJ=""C"">
1990* 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""R"" CVJ=""C"">
74.6 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
</TABLEROW>
<ROWRULE>  </ROWRULE>
<TABLEROW>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""L"" CVJ=""C"">
1991* 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
<TABLECELL CHJ=""R"" CVJ=""C"">
82.8 
</TABLECELL>
<CELLRULE>  </CELLRULE>
</TABLEROW>
<ROWRULE>  </ROWRULE>
</TABLE>



*Estimate 


SOURCE: Laventhol &amp; Horwath 

",12,"[ 0.17007693  0.          0.00574959 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
122,"

What's On in Las Vegas is a handy biweekly magazine that lists not only 
entertainment and other attractions around the city, but offers much helpful 
general information, too. 


In its regular feature, ""What's On for the Young at Heart,"" it reports that 
seniors get 25% off regular rates at the St. Tropez Hotel, an all-suite, 
non-gaming hotel on Harmon Avenue off the Strip. Since the offer is subject to 
room availability, reservations are suggested. 


The Palace Station, also off the Strip on Sahara Avenue near Interstate 15, 
offers seniors a $30 rate Sunday through Thursday. And the Four Queens in 
downtown Las Vegas has a $35 rate during the same time period. 


For low-cost senior dining, the magazine suggests, among other places, the 
downtown Gold Strike Inn, which has a $1.99 senior dinner buffet from 3 to 10 
p.m. Tuesday and Thursday. 


The magazine also tells about the Southern Nevada University of Cosmetology, 
which gives a 20% discount on all services Thursday and Friday to those 60 
years and older. The Academy of Hair Design offers a similar discount on 
Tuesday and Wednesday, but sets the age at 62 and older. 


The column also tells of the Las Vegas Transit System's sizable senior offer, 
cited in this column before but worth repeating. All that's necessary is a 
Medicare card to get a 10-ride pass for $4.20. A regular Las Vegas bus ride is 
$1.10. 


The magazine also informs readers of discounts on rental cars, motor scooters, 
even wheelchairs for $5 a day. Other senior deals are for bowling, shopping and 
various attractions. 


Seniors can pick up a copy at any hotel in Las Vegas or send $2.50 to What's On 
in Las Vegas Magazine, 610 S. Third St., Las Vegas, Nev. 89101. 


Also from Las Vegas is a $2 reference guide published by the Las Vegas Advisor. 
It's not specifically for mature travelers, but has good tips for those looking 
for the best deals in meals and entertainment. 


The small-but-handy, single-sheet guide includes other senior-oriented data, 
such as the five casinos in town with penny slots. Other features are the costs 
of all Las Vegas production shows, plus a map and toll-free numbers for all 
casinos and other travel services. Send $2 to Huntington Press, P.O. Box 28042, 
Las Vegas, Nev. 89126 


Chandris Fantasy Cruises has announced a series of senior-saver Caribbean 
cruises for travelers 65 years and over next spring and fall. 


Seniors who are the second occupant in a cabin with a full-fare passenger get 
50% off the regular cruise price, a savings that could be as high as $848 for a 
one-week cruise. That includes round-trip air fare from Los Angeles to the 
cruise departure point. 


Fantasy Cruises include the Amerikanis and the Victoria. For more information, 
contact Chandris Fantasy Cruises at (800) 621-3446 or check with your travel 
agent. 


Mature travelers looking for Thanksgiving tours might want to check with 
Trieloff Tours, a longtime senior tour operator with STRAC. 


Trieloff will serve its Thanksgiving meals for seniors in Hawaii, Key West, 
Mexico and Australia. The meals will be served during a 10-day tour to Hawaii, 
a 13-day Florida tour, a weeklong Mexico cruise and a 22-day tour of the South 
Pacific. For more details or brochures, call Trieloff at (800) 432-7125. 


All nine Sheraton Hotels in Hawaii will repeat the chain's ""Gold Guest"" program 
from now to Dec. 20, offering a 25% room discount for AARP members and other 
mature travelers age 60 and older. 


At check-in, guests also receive a Golden Guest card that allows additional 
discounts at selected Sheraton restaurants and shows, as well as more savings 
from local merchants and services. 


The 140 Rodeway Inns have been sold to Quality Inns, bringing the chain's 
number of hotels to more than 1,700. Quality Inns has since changed its name to 
Choice Hotels International. 


For now, no changes in senior discounts are planned at any of the hotels, which 
include Quality Inns, Clarion Hotels, Sleep Inns and Rodeway Inns. 

",12,"[ 0.         0.         0.0158986 ...,  0.         0.         0.       ]"
123,"     The crowd cheers. The tuxedo-clad Chinese performer, whose stage name means
""cucumber"" in Chinese, storms onto center stage through a flood of pulsating
lights and billowing stage smoke.;    Hu Gua, the ""Johnny Carson of Taiwan,""
launches into a snappy Chinese tune.;    ""Oh, he's good,"" one woman swoons.
""He's the king."";    It is a sign of the changing times on the Las Vegas
Strip. Where Liberace, Wayne Newton and Sammy Davis Jr. once ruled, the
marquees now blare with names such as Hu Gua, Ma Shih-li and Yang Lieh.;   
Las Vegas -- that paradigm of American excess and decadence -- has discovered
Asia.;    Stung by seesawing oil prices, competition from Atlantic City, N.J.,
and a moribund U.S. economy, Las Vegas has turned its attention toward Japan,
Hong Kong, Taiwan and other booming Asian countries in search of gamblers.;   
Instead of Middle Eastern potentates or Texas oil barons, it is the Asian
gambler who has become not only the most sought after high-roller of the '90s,
but also, with the growth of the Asian community on the West Coast, the
low-roller as well.;    ""They gamble every day, they wager against each other,
they play hard,"" said Terry Lanni, president of Caesars World Inc., which owns
Caesars Palace in Las Vegas.;    As the world economy shifts toward the Far
East, the ripples are being felt in this opulent outpost in the desert.;   
Casinos are courting the Asian gambler with everything from $6 overnight bus
tours from Los Angeles' Chinatown to all-expense-paid junkets out of
Indonesia, Taiwan and South Korea.;    The largest casinos, such as Caesars
Palace and the Mirage, have opened year-round marketing offices in the Far
East, and most have introduced Asian games into their repertoire, such as pai
gow and sic bo.;    ""The business from Asia has just exploded incredibly,""
said Desert Inn President Kevin J. Malley. ""They are the No. 1 gamblers in the
world right now."";    Old-timers around Glitter Gulch say the importance of
the Asian gambler to Las Vegas has been mounting for the past two decades.;   
Far Eastern gamblers have enjoyed a longstanding reputation as loyal and
persistent players, which they attribute to the entrepreneurial spirit that
created the Asian economic boom.;    But it was only in the 1980s, as the
Japanese gross national product nearly tripled to $3.1 trillion and the Taiwan
stock market index grew eightfold in four years, that the pursuit of the Far
Eastern gambler reached fever pitch.;    In the last five years, casinos have
begun scurrying to outdo each other with ever more opulent Asian parties,
Asian gaming areas and Asian restaurants.;    Las Vegas also exerts a powerful
allure for Asian visitors from the gray industrial centers of the Far East,
who are fascinated by not only the gambling (illegal in most of Asia) but also
the excessive vision of opulence that pervades the city.;    ""Everyone wants
to come to America to become wealthy,"" said Ling Chuang, a 24-year-old
Alhambra student who was on her first visit to Las Vegas. ""This is America. It
is so prosperous, like an illusion."";    The biggest casino market is still
the domestic one, but Asian gamblers exert a power that far exceeds their
numbers.;    Malley estimated that 90 of the casino's top 100 gamblers are
Asians and that about 45 percent of the casino's revenue comes from the
Pacific Rim.;    ""It's not just limited to the Desert Inn,"" Malley said. ""The
same is true of Caesars, the Mirage or whatever."";    The increasing flow of
Asian tourists has transformed not just the casinos, but Las Vegas as well.;  
 The Asian population in town has increased with the demand for bilingual
casino workers. Sightseeing companies, hotels, restaurants and even escort
services regularly advertise in Asian languages now.;    The renowned Chicken
Ranch brothel near Las Vegas recently had its sex menu printed in Japanese,
leading to such translational challenges as ""Fantasy Session"" and ""Y'all come
back now -- y'hear."";    But there have been numerous missteps, as well, as
businesses have leaped into the race to tap into the Pacific Rim.;    The
Mirage had designed a private gambling area with shelves of books along the
walls, only to discover later that the Chinese word for ""library"" is
pronounced the same as ""room of losses."" The books were quickly removed.  ",12,"[ 0.53412384  0.00809711  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
124,"
   A volcano will erupt next month on the fabled Strip: a 60-foot mountain spewing smoke and flame every five minutes. 

   The man-made inferno will tower over a man-made lagoon with more than four acres of pools, grottoes and waterfalls. 
Visitors, whisked from the Strip on a moving walkway, will glide over a habitat for rare white tigers, which will star in performances by the famed illusionist team of Siegfried &amp; Roy. 
Nearby, six dolphins will frolic in a 1.5 million-gallon saltwater aquarium. 

   At the core of all this stands a hotel. 
In the lobby behind its nine-story, orchid-strewn atrium, a 20,000-gallon aquarium will come alive with sharks, stingrays, angelfish, puffers and other creatures of the deep. 

   And oh, yes. 
There's a casino, the financial heart of it all. 

   This is the Mirage, a $630 million island-fantasy hotel-casino now being completed for opening in November by Golden Nugget Inc. 
It's the most stunning example of Las Vegas's concerted effort to transform itself into a world-famous vacation resort for families as well as gamblers. 
Las Vegas has seen nothing quite like it before. 

   Not for 15 years has a big new hotel-casino opened here. 
Now the Mirage and Circus Circus Enterprises Inc.'s $290 million Excalibur are going up. 
The Excalibur, with a castlelike hotel, jousting tournaments and other Arthurian attractions, will be able to handle up to 30,000 visitors a day when it opens in 1990. 

   If MGM Grand Inc. proceeds with its plan for an amusement park -- a $700 million movieland resort with a working studio, casino and 5,000-room hotel that would become Las Vegas's biggest -- the investment in the three properties will total some $1.6 billion. 
MGM Grand has agreed to buy a 117-acre site for the resort for $93 million in cash plus stock currently valued at nearly $30 million. 

   Smaller projects swell the figure to at least $2.5 billion. 
Still other projects that have been announced but not yet started could put expenditures above $3 billion over the next few years. 

   Stephen A. Wynn, who owns 29.4% of Golden Nugget's shares, says the Mirage and other projects will help Las Vegas attract a whole new generation of visitors. 
""If you create a wonderment, if you create something so exciting that the public dreams of being part of it, then they'll come,"" he says. 
The projects already under construction will increase Las Vegas's supply of hotel rooms by 11,795, or nearly 20%, to 75,500. 
By a rule of thumb of 1.5 new jobs for each new hotel room, Clark County will have nearly 18,000 new jobs. 
The county at the end of 1988 had 307,000 jobs, 95,400 of them in the tourist industry. 
Projects in the talking or blueprint stage would add a further 48,000 rooms. 

   Hotel-casino operators play down the possibility of a labor shortage. 
After all, 40,000 newcomers a year are settling in the Las Vegas Valley. 
But Nevada state labor economists think a shortage is probable. 

   Nobody yet seems to have calculated the total number of slot machines, crap tables or roulette wheels Las Vegas will add to the enormous store that Lady Luck already guards here, much less the ultimate impact of the growth on schools and municipal services. 

   ""Traffic is certainly a concern, as is pollution, water and an adequate labor market,"" says Frank Sain, executive director of the Las Vegas Convention and Visitors Bureau. 
City fathers have managed to push through projects that are crucial for tourist growth, such as the expansion of McCarran International Airport to accommodate the 44% of Las Vegas tourists who fly here. 
This year, by one means of transport or another, more than 18 million people will visit the city. 

   The expansion will set off a marketing war among the big hotel-casinos. 
Las Vegas promises, or threatens, to become a giant carnival, with rooms to be had for $45 a day or less, for visitors uninspired solely by gambling. 
Amid a riot of jousting knights, circus clowns, gold-leaf centurions and creatures of the wild, lesser competitors will fall. 

   Caesars World Inc. plans to defend its august reputation by sinking $190 million into its opulent Caesars Palace, next door to the new Mirage, and adding a $100 million shopping area reminiscent of Rodeo Drive. 
The Palace, with its marble fountains and toga parties for high rollers, is already well-known for its Caesarean theme. 
The Flamingo Hilton, Imperial Palace, Frontier and others are pouring millions of dollars into facelifts, new room towers and casino floor space just to keep up. 

   Where's this huge amount of investment capital coming from? 
Golden Nugget, Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.'s first casino client, has borrowed on more than $600 million worth of mortgage notes, mostly sold to private investors by Drexel, to build the Mirage. 
Other casino owners, Circus Circus among them, are financing their expansion with their own cash and revolving credit lines from local lenders such as First Interstate Bank of Nevada. 

   Will the investments pay off? 
The growth of Las Vegas tourism in recent years persuades lenders that they will. 
Casino revenues and hotel occupancy rates are high. 
Last year, the tourists left $3 billion with the area's casinos, nearly 10% more than in 1987. 
The people with a stake in Nevada's gambling industry believe that they have barely tapped the potentially huge family trade. 

   ""If you build a better mousetrap, it will catch more mice,"" says Fred Benninger, chairman of MGM Grand. 
Ellen Cokely, a tourist from Alton, Ill., seems inclined to agree. 
""I'd love it if my daughter had something else to do here,"" says Ms. Cokely, watching seven-year-old Kristin on the water slide at the Strip's Wet `n' Wild water park. 

   ""Two generations ago, Dad came to Las Vegas by himself for a little diversion,"" says Van Heffner, executive vice president of the Nevada Hotel and Motel Association. 
""One generation ago, Mom joined Dad. 
Now, in the `90s, we're headed toward a total resort environment."" 

   Only a decade or so ago, casino managers balked at in-room TV sets and other fripperies that distracted from gambling. 
Casinos today offer bowling alleys, water parks, golf courses, tennis courts, lush swimming pools and other diversions, and more such facilities are being designed. 

   Despite the new emphasis on the family trade, however, tourists in search of naughtier fun than gambling seem certain to find it, with Las Vegas call girls remaining on the scene. 

   A serious economic downturn, pessimists observe, could hurt the expansionists. 
For now, however, the naysayers' voices are drowned by the roar of cement mixers and the clanging of construction cranes along the Strip. 
This is no place for pedestrians, but at 7:30 on a recent morning, when construction choked traffic at the famous Four Corners intersection to one lane, a taxi passenger found it faster to abandon the cab and walk to her destination. 

   The ferocious competition probably will drive some poorly managed properties into bankruptcy or new ownership. 
It has happened before. 
The Dunes, the Aladdin and the Riviera were all acquired by the present owners from bankruptcy proceedings spawned by the last recession, in the early 1980s. 

   Yet that hasn't discouraged investors. 
Some have bought big chunks of Strip property for what may turn into another wave of building. 
Atlantic City casino owner Donald Trump is scouting the Las Vegas market with an eye toward building an appropriately spectacular place. 

   Even before the huge new projects began, the Strip's recent expansion squeezed smaller competitors. 
Many blue-collar customers of downtown's no-frills gambling spots have been lured to the Strip or to Laughlin, Nev., a Colorado River town catering to snowbirds and the recreational-vehicle crowd. 
Hotel expansion and an influx of more-discriminating tourists have hurt motels. 
Since 1979, the number of motel rooms has fallen by 17,000. 

   Many people here expect a room-rate war as the new projects open. 
""There's probably going to be some pressure on occupancy and room rates over the next year, but after that you should see the market return to 80%-plus occupancy and regular rates,"" says Paul Rubeli, casino executive at Ramada Inc., which runs the Tropicana. 

   Skeptics wonder whether mega-resorts such as the Mirage will be able to squeeze a profit from their cash flow. 
The Mirage will cost at least $1 million a day to operate. 
Mr. Wynn seems confident that it will produce a healthy profit, but some securities analysts doubt it. 
Competitors and analysts say that among large existing properties Bally Manufacturing Corp.'s Bally Grand hotel-casino probably will be hardest hit among major properties. 
Bally officials decline to discuss the situation. 

   Bally bought the former MGM Grand hotel-casino from Kirk Kerkorian four years ago. 
Only now is it undergoing a badly needed facelift. 
Its parking lot is inconvenient, the MGM lion's-head logo still appears in places, and customers still call it the Grand, rather than the Bally Grand. 
It has a ""great location, but they're going to have some real problems when everyone around them opens,"" says Daniel Lee, a Drexel analyst. 
Older properties that still have a 1950s image are also vulnerable. 

   Any hotel-casino without a strong identity will get whacked by the new competition, says Glenn Schaeffer, senior vice president of Circus Circus. 
""If you don't know what you are, bigger won't make you better,"" he says. 
""But it'll sure make you poorer."" 

   Circus Circus's flagship casino has become the envy of competitors for its ability to vacuum cash from the pockets of vacationing families. 
The Circus Circus lures them with low room rates, inexpensive buffets and entertainment for children at no extra charge. 
The company's Excalibur will also appeal to families, of course. 
Its castle, Mr. Schaeffer says, will be ""the most compelling piece of folk architecture ever built."" 

   Some casino owners have resisted the temptation to add rooms. 
Instead, they are spending to reinforce the identity that they believe attracts their customers. 
""More rooms aren't the answer for us,"" says Caesars World chairman Henry Gluck. 
While his company's hotel is building a retail complex in Beverly Hills style and redoing existing rooms, it has decreased the number of its rooms. 
Some have been combined into suites for the high rollers. 

   Caesars has made a specialty of catering to high rollers from abroad, who are also being aggressively courted by the Mirage, the Las Vegas Hilton and others. 
Other, smaller concerns are also pursuing market niches -- Hawaiian tourists, for example, or the local trade. 
""There's still room for boutique properties,"" says James Barrett, president of MarCor Resorts Inc. Off the Strip, MarCor is building the Rio, a hotel-casino with a Brazilian theme and only 430 rooms -- all of them suites. 

   Despite the proliferation of tourist distractions, Las Vegans haven't forgot that gambling is still what the town is all about. 
""The days when when the thrust of casinos was all high rollers, with no windows and clocks and lots of red and black decor, are gone,"" Mr. Sain of the visitors' bureau says. 
""But 93% of tourists still come for gambling. 
We can't lose sight of that."" 

",12,"[ 0.26363821  0.00474603  0.25400643 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
125,"
   ""Las Vegas is an accident waiting to happen,"" says David
Shulman, a Salomon Brothers economist who tracks real estate
markets. ""The only reason Las Vegas has been booming is
because it was on the periphery of Southern California. Now,
that's stopped and things are bound to change.""
   Exciting new projects and aggressive marketing could help
the casinos goose their gambling numbers for a while --
barring a shooting war in the Mideast that plays havoc with
fuel supplies. But the same can't be said in the housing
industry, where out-of-state wealth has fueled growth over
the past decade.
   As a city that thrived on the free-spending ways of
others, Las Vegas was made for the 1980s. It grew up during
those years from a purely gambling town to a destination
resort attracting families and conventioneers. While gamblers
spent money wildly, builders transformed the Las Vegas
valley's dirt roads, rock and sand into a carpet of housing
developments, man-made ponds and golf courses. Jobs, crisp
desert air and the cheap cost of living lured immigrants from
around the country, and the population nearly doubled, to
780,000 residents from fewer than 450,000.
   ""We are now a mature and diverse community that just
doesn't have the same reliance on casino gaming as it once
did,"" boasts Don Haze, a commercial real estate broker who
opened a Coldwell Banker commercial leasing office in 1981.
   But a lengthy downturn could undo some of the
image-building that Las Vegas underwent in the 1980s. ""You
must remember that the people who have been successful in
this town have always had their feet on the gas pedal,"" says
R. Keith Schwer, of the University of Nevada, Las Vegas's
Center for Business and Economic Research. When the city was
hit by the recession of 1981, tourism spending grew a little
less than 1%, though visitor volume posted a slight decline.
""The movers and shakers have not been conditioned to deal
with great economic downturns,"" Mr. Schwer says.
   The recession in the early '80s spurred city leaders to
mount a campaign to help Las Vegas break out of its
dependency on the casino industry. In 1983, the Nevada state
Legislature passed a law permitting interstate banking that
led Citibank to move its credit card distribution center to
Las Vegas. Today, 2,000 people work there. By contrast, the
city's huge new Mirage casino employs about 7,000.
   But almost no major companies have followed Citibank's
lead. The Nevada Development Authority estimates that in the
past two years only 3,103 new jobs were created by private
sector firms either expanding or moving into Nevada. As a
result, experts say, the economy still lacks the diversity
that would help it weather another prolonged downturn.
   Still, Las Vegas isn't Phoenix, and there haven't been any
billion-dollar thrift seizures or distressed land sales yet.
Even the most pessimistic economists expect Nevada's
population growth to remain healthy. What's more, the
national credit crunch has saved developers from building
projects with no prospect of success.
   ""What we need to do now is take a few deep breaths,"" says
Donald Snyder, chairman and chief executive of First
Interstate Bank of Nevada, a unit of First Interstate Bancorp
and Nevada's biggest bank.
   Las Vegas does have excesses that are uniquely its own.
Huge new Disney-like facilities such as the 3,000-room Mirage
and the 4,000-room Excalibur have forced the industry into a
Darwinian struggle in which older, undercapitalized
facilities are falling behind more modern competitors.
   ""The strong will survive,"" says Golden Nugget's chairman,
Stephen Wynn, whose $710 million Mirage continues to lure
crowds from neighboring casinos. ""But I am worried about some
of our competitors. You can't just build boxes, rent out the
rooms and get by anymore.""
   Size is no indicator of success, either.
   Bally Manufacturing Corp., one of the nation's biggest
gambling companies, has defaulted on its casino debt, and it
has trimmed its staff by 600 workers. Other big names have
also hit cold streaks. At Hilton Hotels Corp., high-roller
competition from the Mirage and Caesars Palace has cut into
operating profit, which fell 50% in the third quarter. Now
Hilton, Nevada's biggest employer, plans to trim operating
costs -- and staff -- in Las Vegas by about 8%. Altogether,
that means layoffs of more than 500.
   Other once-proud Las Vegas names have been tarnished by
closings and bankruptcy filings. The Landmark hotel and
casino shut its doors earlier this year; the Aladdin has
filed for bankruptcy protection and is slated for auction.
Meanwhile, aging casinos like the Dunes and the Stardust have
struggled to keep pace.
   And even before the town has recovered from the one-two
punch of the Excalibur and Mirage, the industry faces another
challenge from MGM Grand Inc.'s Kirk Kerkorian, who has vowed
to forge ahead with plans for a 5,000-room megafacility. Add
to that the Riviera's 1,600-room new wing, the Stardust's
additional 1,200 rooms and dozens of other projects on the
boards, and further fallout appears certain.
   ""It's what I call the rule of 500,"" says Alan Pomerantz, a
real estate attorney with Weil, Gotshal &amp; Manges in New York
City. ""If a city projects a need for 500 hotel rooms, then
500 developers will build 500 hotels each with 500 rooms.""
   The rule of 500 appears to apply to residential
developers, as well. While the twin engines of Las Vegas's
housing growth -- the casino industry and the spillover from
the California market -- are beginning to sputter, housing
starts continue to climb. Over the next year, builders have
applied for permits to put up more than 49,000 housing units
in Clark County, which includes Las Vegas.
   Tight credit could keep as many as 30% from being built,
says Glen Barton of the Meyers Group, a market research
company based in Los Angeles. But that would still leave
34,000 new homes and apartments to absorb.
   Economists cite another disturbing trend in Las Vegas's
growth pattern: A full 8.1% of all payroll workers are in the
construction sector, suggesting that there aren't enough
indigenous industries to pick up the slack once things quiet
down.
   And home buying has begun to taper off. According to the
Meyers Group, the number of home sales in the third quarter
dropped 27.3% from a year earlier, while the inventory of
unsold homes was up 15.4%.
   Consider the case of Leon Cohen, a 75-year-old former real
estate broker from Encino, Calif. He cashed in on the
California real estate boom last year and moved to the
serenity of the Nevada desert, where he lives in Del Webb
Corp.'s Sun City, a planned community. As a retiree and
former Californian, Mr. Cohen is the type of resident Las
Vegas planners dreamed of when they imagined an economy freed
from the cyclical whims of the gambling industry.
   But there may not be many Leon Cohens left. ""With the
California real estate market going down, I'm sure I couldn't
have made my deal today,"" he says. ""I was lucky things went
so well in California when they did.""
   Some development companies are betting that any slowdown
will be brief and are plunging ahead with ambitious projects.
One is a 25-village city-within-a-city called Summerlin,
developed by Howard Hughes Properties. Designed on 39 square
miles of property, the project won't be completed until early
next century. Construction has already begun on Lake Las
Vegas, a $3.5 billion project bankrolled by the Bass brothers
on 2,200 desert acres.
   ""We all know there'll be a slowdown here, just like
there's going to be one everywhere,"" says Coldwell Banker's
Mr. Haze. ""But they used to say that when California got a
cold, Las Vegas got pneumonia. Now I think when California
gets its cold, we just might only get a case of sniffles.""
",12,"[ 0.29458349  0.00707081  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
126,"

To justify seizing Lincoln Savings &amp; Loan Assn., regulators arbitrarily 
wrote down the value of its $1.4-billion loan portfolio as 50% less and slashed 
the worth of its extensive land, hotel and stock holdings by 75%, the thrift's 
former owner said Wednesday. 


""Without any analysis, they took the entire loan portfolio and said it was 
non-performing,"" Phoenix financier Charles H. Keating Jr. testified in his 
fifth day on the witness stand in his suit seeking to recover the Irvine-based 
thrift. 


Reading from a Federal Home Loan Bank Board analysis of Lincoln's loan and 
equity portfolios prepared a week after the government imposed a 
conservatorship April 14, 1989, Keating called the numbers ""absurd."" 


The analysis, in the form of an April 21, 1989, memo from regulators in charge 
of the Lincoln case to bank board officials in Washington, is the first 
government document specifying regulators' estimate that alleged losses of 
federally insured deposits by the thrift could cost taxpayers $2 billion. 


The document estimated that the thrift's assets were worth only $2 billion to 
$2.5 billion, or $1.85 billion to $2.2 billion less than what they were listed 
on Lincoln's books at the time. 


For nearly a year, Keating has asserted that he ran Lincoln soundly, and that 
regulators could show the thrift was insolvent only by placing a lower value on 
its assets. 


Comparing the figures from the regulators' analysis with those provided by 
American Continental's chief financial officer, he testified Wednesday that 
only 3% of Lincoln's $1.4-billion mortage-loan portfolio was more than 60 days 
in default. 


All of the loans, Keating testified, were fully secured, with the borrowers 
putting up an average 20% down payment on the property. 


The regulators, however, listed the value of those loans at only $703 million, 
accounting for a third of the losses they claim that Lincoln suffered. 


Robert Wurzelbacher, Keating's son-in-law who headed Lincoln's real estate 
investments, likened the analysis to a family buying a $100,000 home with a 
$20,000 down payment and an $80,000 loan. 


Then a regulator comes in and says the value of the home and the loan on it is 
worth only $40,000, even though the monthly payments are still being made, he 
said. 


James Murphy, an attorney representing the Treasury Department's Office of 
Thrift Supervision, repeatedly objected to Keating comparing the numbers from 
the regulators' April 21 analysis and Keating's own figures on the status of 
Lincoln's loans and equity holdings as of Dec. 31, 1988. 


""This is not by any stretch of the imagination the last word on the 
implementation of the receivership"" four months later, Murphy said. 


The Office of Thrift Supervision succeeded the Federal Home Loan Bank Board as 
the industry's chief regulator under the $50-billion savings and loan bailout 
passed last year by Congress. 


The government seized control of Lincoln in April last year under the 
conservatorship, claiming that it was being grossly mismanaged but making no 
assertion at the time that it was insolvent. 


It wasn't until August that the regulators asserted that Lincoln's alleged 
losses actually exceeded the value of its assets and imposed a receivership 
that took ownership of the thrift from Keating. 


U.S. District Judge Stanley Sporkin overruled Murphy's objections, but said he 
wanted testimony from Keating's chief financial officer in addition to hearing 
from regulators on their justifications for the writedowns. 


""You don't write down 50% on a mortgage portfolio,"" said Sporkin, who is a 
former accountant and was at one time the chief enforcement officer for the 
Securities and Exchange Commission. 


Keating's attorneys also introduced documents showing that regulators were 
unhappy with the performance of the consultant they hired at an annual salary 
of $300,000 to run Lincoln after seizing control from Keating. 


In a July 19, 1989, memo to the bank board's top officials in Washington, Mark 
Randall, the government official in charge of managing the conservatorship, 
said the consultant, Roger Clark, failed to address Lincoln's major problems. 


""Roger Clark's inaction, questionable judgment and lack of participation 
establish his inability to function as a CEO (chief executive officer) of 
Lincoln,"" Randall's memo read. 


Keating said that Clark still holds titles as both the CEO and chief financial 
officer of Lincoln under a contract that requires the government to pay him a 
$100,000 termination fee, but that other officials are actually running the 
thrift under the receivership. 

",13,"[ 0.         0.         0.0161401 ...,  0.         0.         0.       ]"
127,"

Charles H. Keating Jr. doesn't flinch when asked if his financial support of 
politicians is intended to influence them to take up his cause. ""I want to say 
in the most forceful way I can, I certainly hope so,"" Keating recently 
proclaimed. 


Keating practices what he preaches. A review of campaign records by The Times 
shows that Keating, his companies and a circle of about 75 family members, 
associates and employees have showered more than $700,000 in campaign 
contributions on three dozen federal and state politicians over the last six 
years. 


Keating's contributions have come under increased scrutiny since his company, 
American Continental Corp. of Phoenix, filed for protection from creditors in 
U.S. Bankruptcy Court on April 13 and Lincoln Savings &amp; Loan, its principal 
subsidiary, was seized by federal regulators the next day. 


Critics charge that Keating and associates have coordinated their contributions 
in a deliberate effort to buy influence with powerful politicians. As evidence, 
they cite donations of about $300,000 to five U.S. senators who went to bat in 
April, 1987, for Keating in two unusual private meetings with savings and loan 
regulators. 




'Concerned' About Seizure 


And one of those senators, Democrat Alan Cranston of California, said Friday 
that he intervened again a month ago by urging federal regulators to allow 
Keating to sell his embattled S&amp;L to a group headed by former Republican 
Rep. John Rousselot of San Gabriel. 


Cranston said he was concerned that the seizure would adversely affect the 
Arizona economy and hurt American Continental bondholders, most of whom are 
Californians. He and the other senators denied that Keating's contributions 
influenced their actions on behalf of Lincoln. 


But others are not so sure. 


""It's absolutely clear to me that Mr. Keating and his cohorts had lots of help 
from the highest quarters, both financially and politically,"" said Joseph W. 
Cotchett Jr., an attorney representing American Continental bondholders who may 
have lost $200 million as a result of the bankruptcy filing. 


""He didn't show any favorites when it came to political parties,"" Cotchett 
said. 


Many of the recipients of Keating's largess have been in positions to help him 
in his business affairs and his escalating encounters with savings and loan 
regulators. And Keating is certainly in need of help these days. 


As chairman of American Continental, a Phoenix real estate development firm, he 
acquired Lincoln, which is based in Irvine, in early 1984 and began 
transforming it from a traditional thrift into a more freewheeling S&amp;L. 
Keating supplemented Lincoln's traditional home loans with investments in 
high-yield securities and riskier real estate ventures. 


Federal regulators, outraged by losses at similar S&amp;Ls across the country, 
spent much of the last three years poring over the books of Lincoln and 
American Continental. 


On April 13, apparently sensing an imminent showdown, American Continental 
filed its bankruptcy petition. The next day, federal regulators seized Lincoln, 
claiming that Keating and American Continental were operating the S&amp;L in an 
unsafe and unsound manner. 


The recipients of contributions from Keating's circle include liberal Democrats 
like Cranston and former presidential hopeful Walter Mondale. But most of the 
money went to the Republican Party and GOP stalwarts like Sen. Orrin Hatch of 
Utah, who shares Keating's brand of staunch conservatism. 


For Keating, campaign contributions are one way that the American political 
system is made more responsive to its constituents. It is practiced by 
executives at major corporations across the land. It is something he has been 
doing since the 1950s. 




Outspoken Critic 


In 1957, Keating plodded through the halls of Congress in search of allies in 
the war on pornography, a personal political crusade that he still pursues. In 
1980, he briefly ran the 1980 presidential campaign of former Texas Gov. John 
B. Connally. Connally's son, Mark, now is American Continental's spokesman. 


Today, Keating contends that his contributions merely give him a fighting 
chance against hostile regulators who drove American Continental into 
bankruptcy proceedings because they didn't like his unconventional business 
strategies and his outspoken criticism of the regulatory structure. Elected 
officials, he has claimed, ought to come to his aid when the government 
bureaucracy runs amok with its regulatory authority. 


""We support and campaign for the political leaders we believe will represent 
the best of American virtues,"" he told reporters last month. ""In the contract 
between the voter and the politician, we have the right to seek their help when 
needed and demand it when justified. This I have done."" 


And he has done it in a big way, with the help of his firms, family members, 
business associates and employees. In the last five years, state and federal 
campaign records show: 


* More than $100,000 has gone to Sen. John McCain (R-Ariz.) and more than 
$55,000 to Sen. Dennis DeConcini (D-Ariz.), both of Keating's home state. 
Congressmen from Arizona also have fared well, including Jon Kyl (R-Ariz.), who 
has received $20,950 while representing the district Keating lives in. 


* More than $52,000 has gone to the two California senators -- Cranston and 
Republican Pete Wilson -- who represent Lincoln's home base. Sen. John Glenn 
(D-Ohio) has picked up $34,500 from Keating's circle. Keating was born in Ohio, 
and American Continental is incorporated there. 


* Nearly $166,000 has gone to 11 members of the Senate and House banking 
committees, where deregulation of the savings and loan industry was conceived 
and implemented in recent years, much to the dismay of some regulators. The 
largest amount, more than $70,000, was given to the Senate panel's current 
chairman, Donald W. Riegle Jr. (D-Mich.). Other members who received donations 
are Cranston, who got $39,100; Jacob (Chic) Hecht (R-Nev.), $19,000; Timothy E. 
Wirth (D-Colo.), $8,000; William L. Armstrong (R-Colo.), $7,000; Phil Gramm 
(R-Texas), $1,000, and Jacob Garn (R-Utah), $1,000. 


House committee members were Reps. Doug Barnard Jr. (D-Ga.), $16,000; Frank 
Annunzio (D-Ill.), $1,000; Stephen L. Neal (D-N.C.), $1,000, and Fernand J. St 
Germain (D-R.I.), $500. 


* At the California Statehouse, where gubernatorial appointees oversee Lincoln 
operations, Keating money has added $41,000 to Gov. George Deukmejian's 
campaign coffers in the last four years. 


* Keating and associates pumped $80,000 into the California Republican Party 
last fall alone. Altogether, he has given the state GOP $97,500 in the last 
four years and has given $3,000 to the Democratic Congressional Campaign 
Committee. Such ""soft"" donations allow contributors to get around federal 
individual contribution limits of $1,000 per candidate per election. 


""In the last five years, there's no question that it has been important that we 
help those who supported the business areas we were in,"" Keating said in an 
interview last week. ""I've always contributed across a broad spectrum of 
philosophical and political boundaries. But from my background, to do business 
(throughout) America, you need to be politically aware."" 




Doesn't Recall Mondale Gift 


With so much money flowing to so many candidates over so many years, Keating 
apparently cannot keep track of the politicians who benefited from his 
fund-raising efforts. 


He does not recall -- and acted surprised when reminded -- that he and his 
family gave $2,500 to Mondale's 1984 presidential campaign. Mondale ""definitely 
has diverse views from me,"" said Keating, a conservative Republican. He said he 
probably responded to someone raising money for Mondale's campaign in the hope 
that he could solicit that person later for funds for one of his own favored 
politicians. 


Interestingly, Keating made no direct contributions in 1984 to one candidate 
who seemed to embody his conservative politics: President Ronald Reagan. 
Likewise, four years later, Keating did not contribute to President George 
Bush's campaign, although American Continental gave $80,000 to the California 
Republican Party. This money, which does not come under federal or state 
contribution limitations, was used for voter-registration and get-out-the-vote 
efforts that benefited Bush. 


Keating has never been bashful about his political persuasion. And he has not 
hesitated to encourage employees to contribute to candidates who support 
deregulation of financial services, the bulwark upon which his business empire 
is built. 


One former executive of an American Continental subsidiary who requested 
anonymity said he made his only political donation ever -- $500 -- in 1987 
because he was made aware by Keating that Sen. Riegle was ""in line 
philosophically with the business we were running."" Riegle also was second in 
line at the time to take over as chairman of the Senate Banking Committee, 
which he now heads. 


Keating frequently invited employees into the company's dining room to hear 
various politicians, said Deborah Karbo, a former vice president of another 
company subsidiary. After Riegle stopped by for a quick visit in March, 1987, 
she contributed $500 to his campaign. 




No Pressure 


Both former employees said their gift-giving was ""entirely discretionary,"" as 
Karbo put it. The other former executive said there was ""never any pressure"" to 
contribute. 


Keating said he ""never put the arm"" on anyone to make contributions. 


Although the donors may have reached independent decisions, they tended to 
reach them at the same time. For example, 51 donations from Keating, family 
members and associates were made to McCain on the same day: March 17, 1986. And 
a March 23, 1987, fund-raiser for Riegle netted 86 checks from Keating's 
circle. More than a third of those checks were executed on one day, March 12, 
and all but two of the rest were written on one of two other days that month. 


Walter Zelman, executive director of California Common Cause, said it isn't 
uncommon to see a large number of executives at a major firm contributing to a 
number of politicians. 


But, Zelman noted, ""when the numbers get real large, there's a question of 
whether individuals are coerced or even encouraged to contribute."" He said that 
encouraging contributions ""gets borderline illegal really fast."" 


Keating lashed out at those who would criticize him for legitimate fund-raising 
activities, saying the public is being ""bullied into not contributing"" to 
political campaigns by people who question every donation. 




Timing of Contributions 


In his case, he said, regulators are raising the campaign contribution issue to 
hold senators and congressmen in check while the federal agencies deal with 
Lincoln Savings. 


But critics contend that Keating has simply used donated dollars to get 
politicians to do his bidding. And the timing of the contributions raises 
questions about his motives. 


Riegle and Keating, for instance, met in Detroit on March 1, 1986, when Riegle 
attended the reopening of the renovated Pontchartrain Hotel, which Lincoln 
owned. A fund-raiser on March 23, 1987, netted Riegle more than $70,000, which 
Riegle returned a year later after Keating's contributions became a public 
issue. 


Riegle was one of five senators who met with regulators on April 9, 1987, to 
find out why a routine examination of Lincoln's financial condition was taking 
more than a year instead of the normal two to three months. Riegle's closest 
aide, Kevin Gottlieb, said the senator attended only at the written request of 
two colleagues, DeConcini and McCain. Cranston and Glenn also were at that 
meeting. 


Never before, top regulators say, had they seen an S&amp;L owner who had enough 
political pull to get five U.S. senators to meet with federal examiners about a 
problem. 


At an earlier meeting, Cranston, McCain, DeConcini and Glenn had met with Edwin 
J. Gray, head of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board. Gray later claimed that the 
four senators tried to cut a deal for Keating. He termed the effort a ""gross 
violation of the integrity of the regulatory process . . . for the benefit of 
one person who happened to be a friend and contributor."" 




Deny Impropriety 


The senators or their aides denied that any deal was offered or discussed. 
Glenn said he met only to find out why a constituent was having a problem with 
an unusually long regulatory examination. DeConcini's press secretary, Bob 
Maynes, said Gray ""has a terrible memory or he's a liar."" 


All of the senators involved said there was no impropriety in taking money from 
Keating and his fund-raisers and then representing him in a dispute with agency 
officials, something they said they do for all their constituents. Gottlieb 
said Riegle returned the money in March, 1988, only because local papers had 
written about it and the senator did not want it to become a campaign issue. 


An individual ""does not suddenly become ineligible for any kind of constituent 
help because he's made a political contribution,"" Maynes said. 


In an Orange County Superior Court lawsuit, however, bondholders who purchased 
$200 million in apparently worthless American Continental debt securities claim 
Keating used his political connections to cover up an alleged fraud. 


The suit alleges that Keating used politicians -- as well as former government 
employees he hired or retained -- to keep regulators at bay while he continued 
to sell junk bonds to unsophisticated depositors. 


Keating vehemently denies the claims in the suit, one of several class actions 
filed in Southern California and Arizona. He said the bondholders' only chance 
at getting any money back is if control of Lincoln is returned to him. 
Regulators have never saved an institution they have seized, he said. 

",13,"[ 0.          0.          0.00784744 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
128,"

A Los Angeles judge Friday refused to reduce the $5-million bail for Charles H. 
Keating Jr., saying the Phoenix businessman is a flight risk after being 
indicted on 42 counts of state securities fraud and other violations. 


Superior Court Judge Gary Klausner said Keating -- pursued by creditors, 
regulators and prosecutors for his role in the failure of Irvine-based Lincoln 
Savings &amp; Loan -- has ""significant reasons not to stay around."" 


The ruling means that the 66-year-old Keating -- a once-wealthy real estate 
developer, lawyer and influential political campaign contributor used to 
pin-striped suits -- will spend more time in blue prison fatigues inside Los 
Angeles County Jail. 


At the same time, Klausner reduced bail for three Keating co-defendants from 
the $1 million he imposed Tuesday when the indictment was unsealed against the 
former operators of American Continental Corp. and its former main subsidiary, 
Lincoln. 


Bail for Judy J. Wischer, 42, former American Continental president, was 
lowered to $200,000. Bail for Robin S. Symes, 37, and Ray C. Fidel, 32, both 
former Lincoln presidents, was cut to $100,000. All three posted bail late 
Friday and were expected to be released during the night. 


The four are charged with wrongdoing in the sale of more than $200 million in 
American Continental bonds to thousands of mostly elderly Southern California 
investors. The bonds were sold through Lincoln branches, allegedly as safe and 
insured investments. 


The bonds became worthless when American Continental filed for bankruptcy in 
April, 1989. The next day Lincoln was declared insolvent and seized by federal 
regulators. The failure is expected to cost taxpayers $2 billion. 


Stephen C. Neal, Keating's attorney, indicated he would appeal Klausner's 
ruling. Keating will not flee and intends to fight to clear his name, Neal 
said. But the decision denies Keating access to his attorneys and to records so 
he can mount a defense effectively, the lawyer said. 


""We think (the decision) is unsupportable on the evidence that was introduced 
this week,"" Neal said. 


Keating had sought to have bail reduced to $500,000, an amount that could be 
paid by his family, Neal said. 


Neal argued that Keating, who three years ago had a net worth of nearly $40 
million, is broke. Keating's former accountant testified that his debts exceed 
his assets by $5.2 million. 


Los Angeles County Dist. Atty. Ira Reiner, whose office has flip-flopped twice 
in its bail recommendations in the case, praised the decision not to reduce 
Keating's bail. 


""Mr. Keating is accused of cheating people out of their savings,"" Reiner said 
in a press conference after the hearing. 


""For many of them, it was their life savings. And whether somebody wears an 
expensive suit or a cheap mask, stealing is stealing and both of them ought to 
be treated the same."" 


The judge's decision came after 1 1/2 days of testimony and arguments in the 
first criminal case to be filed in connection with the collapses of Lincoln and 
Phoenix-based American Continental. 


Keating, unshaven and looking tired, sat impassively in the prisoners' block as 
the judge announced his decision. 


Afterwards, Donald Smaltz, attorney for Symes, criticized Reiner and Klausner 
for their handling of the bail hearing. 


""The most talked about event in the last several weeks has been the Iraqi 
invasion,"" Smaltz said. ""The sole thing that replaced Saddam Hussein on the 
front page was Charles Keating, and Reiner's milking that for all it's worth."" 


He also struck out at the judge, saying, ""He's never going to get arrested for 
flashing his Phi Beta Kappa key. Bail is supposed to assure a defendant's 
appearance in court and must be within the means he could reasonably afford."" 


Klausner also said he was ""troubled"" by the way the district attorney has 
equivocated on the bail issue. 


On Tuesday, when the indictments were unsealed, prosecutors did not object to 
releasing all the defendants on their own recognizance. On Wednesday, 
prosecutors said they were willing to recommend a reduction in bail to $1 
million for Keating and $50,000 for the others. Friday, Deputy Dist. Atty. Paul 
W. Turley argued against reducing the bail. 


Reiner, who was appointed a special state prosecutor by Atty. Gen. John K. Van 
de Kamp to investigate Lincoln, said he was willing to let the defendants go 
without bail on Tuesday because he didn't want to face a difficult battle 
extraditing Keating from Arizona. 


After Klausner first ruled, Reiner said he then supported the bail set. But 
asked why his office changed his mind later, he said, ""I'm not sure that I 
understand the semantic difference."" 


While defense attorneys wouldn't say what they thought of the prosecutor's 
actions, other lawyers connected indirectly to the case scored Reiner for 
allegedly using the case and his changing views on Keating's bail to bolster 
his public image. 


Klausner said that of all the factors to be weighed in determining a proper 
bail, the seriousness of the alleged crimes and the risk of a defendant fleeing 
were the most important in this case. 


Throughout the hearing, defense attorneys brought witnesses and other evidence 
to court to show that their clients were destitute or nearly so. They argued 
that the defendants would return to court for trial to fight for their 
vindication, as they had stayed to fight the massive civil litigation filed 
against them. 


Keating and the others also have known they were targets of state and federal 
criminal investigations for a long time and would have fled the country by now 
if they had wanted to avoid prosecution, their attorneys said. 


They also argued that the indictment contains no information about specific 
wrongdoing, alleging only violations of certain laws regarding the sale of 
American Continental debt securities at Lincoln offices to 20 people. The 
alleged crimes caused the victims to lose nearly $1.2 million, hardly serious 
enough to warrant such high bails, they contended. 


But Turley contended that the 20 people represented a much bigger group of 
investors who lost much more money, throwing in a new figure in the 
often-changing number of total victims. He said 17,458 small investors had 
bought $250 million in American Continental bonds at Lincoln. 


He reminded the court of ""one major distinction"" between this case and other 
thrift fraud cases. ""The victims are individuals deprived of their own 
particular finances,"" he said, not taxpayers asked to foot the bill for the 
entire thrift debacle, now estimated at $500 billion over the next 30 years. 


Reiner said that, though his office had no evidence that Keating would flee, 
""you can't escape the thought of Mr. Robert Vesco in a case like this."" Vesco, 
a New Jersey financier indicted in 1972 for allegedly defrauding four firms out 
of $224 million, fled the country and remains at large. 

",13,"[ 0.          0.          0.01251759 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
129,"

In late 1985, Shirley Lampel was a woman in anguish. Her husband had just died, 
and years of suffering from diabetes had left her without sight in one eye and 
only limited vision in the other. 


The one ray of hope was financial. Her doting husband, Sy, an auto mechanic, 
had left a $30,000 life insurance policy. Prudently invested, it would help 
support her modest but comfortable life in Santa Maria, Calif. 


But Lampel reckoned without Irvine-based Lincoln Savings &amp; Loan and Arizona 
home builder Charles H. Keating Jr., who had acquired the thrift the year 
before. As a result of what she thought was a rock-solid investment with 
Lincoln, her savings were devoured in what was to become one of the great 
financial fiascoes of American history -- one that could eventually cost 
taxpayers about $2 billion. 


""Lincoln gives a whole new definition to bank robbery,"" a bitter Lampel said 
recently. ""It used to be that a person puts on a mask and goes in with a gun 
and robs a bank. Now we go into the bank and we get mugged. When did the bank 
become the crook?"" 


That's not how Keating and his subordinates see it. But what they did was use 
Lincoln's millions of dollars in federally insured deposits as new money for 
his cash-hungry real estate and financial empire. Shunning traditional home 
mortgages, they channeled the S&amp;L's funds into huge tracts of raw land in 
Arizona, luxurious hotel projects, a portfolio of junk bonds and other 
speculative ventures, according to federal regulators. 


Now, federal and state investigators, regulators and lawmakers are poring over 
the details of Keating's activities. Already, regulators have filed a civil 
racketeering lawsuit accusing Keating and other Lincoln executives of 
squandering $1.1 billion in federally insured deposits through a series of 
""illegal, fraudulent and imprudent acts."" The suit and other documents allege 
that Keating and his associates sought to evade regulatory restrictions on such 
investments by making bogus loans to ""straw"" property buyers. 


They also devised a tax plan that let them divert $95 million to Lincoln's 
parent company by creating ""phantom"" profits through sham land swaps and loans, 
the regulators allege, and used accounting gimmicks, legal maneuvering and 
political string-pulling to further their operations and slow down 
investigators. 


The Senate Ethics Committee decided last week to appoint an outside counsel to 
investigate Sen. Alan Cranston (D-Calif.) and four other senators who accepted 
large campaign contributions from Keating and then intervened with regulators 
on his behalf. 


Compounding the ultimate cost to others, Keating and his associates sold about 
$200 million in now-worthless debt securities to unwary customers such as Mrs. 
Lampel at Lincoln's branch offices. Many of the purchasers were elderly 
Southern Californians who thought the securities -- issued by Lincoln's parent 
company -- were federally insured. 


Keating has repeatedly denied the government's charges. He has accused 
regulators of seeking revenge against him, harassing his employees and failing 
to understand real estate development. That, not his own actions, drove Lincoln 
to ruin, he says. 


As a longtime home builder and mortgage lender, he said, his operation always 
has concentrated on single-family housing. He simply turned Lincoln, an 
institution whose financial health was questionable when he bought it, from a 
mortgage lender into a company that prepared raw land for residential 
construction, and he had a number of projects successfully built, he 
maintained. 


Whatever the various government investigations ultimately disclose, it is 
already clear that Lincoln is one of the worst disasters in the nationwide 
savings and loan debacle. 


Began as Lawyer 


Keating, a collegiate gold medal swimmer in the Pan American Games and a Navy 
fighter pilot in World War II, began his business career as a lawyer in 
Cincinnati. In a conservative business community that traced its antecedents to 
the days when the Ohio River was the key to settling the American heartland, 
Keating stood out as an aggressive risk-taker and a stubborn competitor. 


He was once described by his brother, William, as an ""impatient"" person who 
never worried about the popularity of his positions. 


Also, he showed an early taste for combining business with politics. In the 
political arena, he became a vociferous opponent of pornography, aiding 
prosecutions, lobbying elected officials. He was even appointed to a federal 
commission that studied pornography. 


And he managed his brother's successful congressional campaigns in 1970 and 
1972. 


At the same time, Keating pursued a career in real estate development that 
eventually made him a top executive in a firm owned by wealthy Cincinnati 
financier Carl H. Lindner, who specialized in making aggressive takeover bids 
for other companies. The close association they developed continued long after 
Keating left Cincinnati in 1976 to take over a foundering Lindner real estate 
development firm in Phoenix. 


A few years after moving West, Keating had his first serious brush with federal 
regulators. In 1979, Lindner and Keating consented to a Securities and Exchange 
Commission order prohibiting them from fraudulently diverting corporate assets 
to their personal use. 


By the early 1980s, Keating -- riding the tide of explosive growth in the Sun 
Belt -- had built the former Lindner construction firm, renamed American 
Continental Corp., into one of the nation's 10 biggest home builders. 


Moreover, he -- like others -- had noticed a new opportunity: Congress, trying 
to rescue a savings and loan industry saddled with traditional low-rate, 
long-term home mortgage loans in an era of soaring interest rates, was 
dismantling the web of federal regulations that had always circumscribed the 
industry. 


Under deregulation, banks and S&amp;Ls were allowed to place a part of their 
assets in direct investments such as ownership interests in real estate 
projects and other ventures, instead of just making loans on which they would 
collect interest. They were also allowed to place customer funds in high-yield, 
high-risk ""junk"" bonds and other non-traditional investments. 


Real estate developers saw the thrifts as ideal sources of cash for their own 
ventures. They liked savings and loans better than banks because they had 
broader investment powers and were cheaper to acquire. In addition, the rules 
required thrift owners to put up only $3 of their own cash for every $100 in 
S&amp;L investments. The capital requirement for banks was twice as high: $6 
for every $100 in assets. 


California was an especially tempting target for such takeovers. In an effort 
to prevent state-chartered savings and loans from converting to federal 
institutions, California had enacted an even more liberal deregulation law than 
the federal government. In 1983, the state allowed thrifts to put 100% of their 
money into direct investments. 


From his headquarters in Phoenix, Keating spotted a California thrift that 
seemed ideal for his expanding purposes. 


Lincoln Savings &amp; Loan was an Orange County thrift that had experienced 
losses in the early 1980s, but it had returned to profitability by the end of 
1983. Keating bought it in February, 1984, for $51 million. At the time, 
regulators say, they were assured that Lincoln's previous management and 
lending policies would be retained. 


Instead, Keating transformed the traditional mortgage lender into a 
post-deregulation dynamo. Indeed, he said he bought Lincoln to take full 
advantage of California's deregulation law. 


Keating ousted the old executives, turned away from the S&amp;L's traditional 
areas of business and began seeking bigger profits from riskier strategies: 


 -- He used Lincoln's deposits to buy huge tracts of undeveloped Arizona desert 
in an effort to create shining new communities from dust. The most ambitious of 
those projects was Estrella, a 20,000-acre planned community 20 miles southwest 
of Phoenix that was to include 50,000 homes for 200,000 residents as well as 
retail, industrial and office space. 


 -- He assembled parcels of land in the affluent Phoenix suburb of Scottsdale 
to build a $296-million luxury resort hotel called the Phoenician Resort. He 
also bought the Hotel Pontchartrain, a troubled hotel in downtown Detroit, and 
initiated elaborate renovations. 


 -- He used Lincoln funds to buy junk bonds and dabble in foreign currency 
trading. He bought big blocks of stock in other companies, prompting 
speculation that he might be a budding corporate raider. 


He even sold the home-building unit of American Continental as he created a 
complex organization with 55 subsidiaries primarily devoted to real estate 
investment and development. 


Efficacy in Doubt 


In Washington, meanwhile, some were beginning to question the efficacy of the 
government's prescription for the ailing thrift industry. Edwin J. Gray, whose 
position as chairman of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board made him the nation's 
top savings and loan regulator, was one of them. 


Across the country, S&amp;Ls were using their customers' money to acquire 
stakes in windmill farms, restaurants and a host of other businesses they knew 
little about. Such investments, far from returning the industry to health, were 
bringing new losses so huge they threatened the solvency of the federal deposit 
insurance fund. 


Gray began speaking out. What's more, he proposed a rule to require all 
federally insured thrifts, including state-chartered S&amp;Ls such as Lincoln, 
to limit direct investments to 10% of their assets. 


Keating for one was furious. As he describes it, he had barely gotten into the 
S&amp;L game and already the rules were changing. Arguing that Gray's proposed 
restriction would destroy the industry, Keating began lobbying hard against it. 


He hired Alan Greenspan, a respected economist who had served as a senior 
official in the Richard M. Nixon and Gerald R. Ford administrations and now 
heads the Federal Reserve Board, to analyze the proposed rule. Greenspan 
produced a report opposing it. 


Although executives at other savings and loans also lobbied against the direct 
investment rule, Keating was perhaps the most prominent and persistent 
opponent. 


Keating arranged for a congressional resolution that called on Gray to delay 
implementing the investment restriction for six months. Although 225 House 
members signed the resolution, it failed to sway the regulators. 


Unable to stop the restriction, Keating found a way to blunt its impact on 
Lincoln. 


The Gray rule would be adopted in early 1985, Keating learned, but would be 
applied retroactively to Dec. 10, 1984; any direct investments made before that 
date would be permitted to stand, even if they exceeded the 10% limit. 


Three days before the expected deadline, Lincoln won approval from the 
California Department of Savings and Loan to move an additional $800 million 
into direct investments. That increased Lincoln's direct investments to about 
40% of its $2.2 billion in assets. 


Customers Targeted 


In 1986, Keating and his executives came up with an innovative way to raise 
unrestricted funds for American Continental: They would sell debt securities 
similar to the bonds issued by most of America's major corporations. But, 
instead of selling them through Wall Street brokerages and other investment 
firms, they would peddle the securities to Lincoln customers. 


The California Department of Corporations routinely approved American 
Continental's first request to sell the debt securities, called subordinated 
debentures. About the same time, the state Department of Savings and Loan 
allowed American Continental to set up desks in the lobbies of Lincoln's 29 
branches to sell the securities. 


Although the securities were, in effect, junk bonds, Keating said he would have 
recommended them to anyone, even to the Roman Catholic charities he supported 
heavily with donations. In fact, the Sisters of Charity in Cincinnati bought 
$444,000 of the securities. 


In early 1988, American Continental sought approval for a second debenture 
offering. The California Department of Corporations approved the sales, even 
though the agency's own staff and the state's top savings and loan regulators 
expressed concern about the company's financial condition and ability to repay 
the debt. 


In little more than two years, American Continental sold about $200 million 
worth of debt securities to nearly 22,000 investors. About two-thirds of them 
were elderly Southern Californians who bought them at Lincoln branch offices. 


Some of them have said in lawsuits and congressional testimony that they were 
persuaded to buy the securities instead of certificates of deposit by American 
Continental sales representatives, who assured them that the securities were 
safe. 


Some have said they thought that the debentures were backed by federal deposit 
insurance -- a costly mistake, as things turned out. 


Regulators Cool 


By 1986, federal regulators in the regional office in San Francisco were 
becoming distinctly unsympathetic to Keating's operations. They began a 
detailed audit of Lincoln's books that stretched over a full year -- far longer 
than such examinations normally take. They concluded that Keating was handling 
Lincoln in an unsafe and unsound manner. 


In particular, examiners reported that Lincoln had made a substantial number of 
loans without proper appraisals, without verification of borrowers' credit and 
even, in some cases, without a loan application. 


To a large extent, the examiners said in their reports, it appeared that 
Lincoln was making bogus loans in an effort to get around the new restrictions 
on direct investments in real estate and to record profits that it had not 
really earned. 


Many major loans were made to ""straw"" buyers: people who bought properties with 
Lincoln funds on favorable terms and who never intended to repay the loans, 
thus leaving the savings and loan in control of the properties, the regulatory 
reports allege. 


The examiners said that, after making the loans, Lincoln claimed as profits the 
up-front fees and interest such loans normally generate. However, in many cases 
Lincoln had also provided the money for the fees and interest in addition to 
financing the entire purchase price. 


In May, 1987, the examiners recommended to their superiors in Washington that 
the government seize the institution or at least impose a restrictive order to 
curtail its high-flying operations. 


Lincoln executives defended their practices, saying government regulators did 
not understand the S&amp;L's development-oriented business. Regulators 
insisted, for instance, on using standards that applied to single-family loans 
to evaluate Lincoln's commercial loans. The thrift had obtained audited 
financial statements from the borrowers, and those documents provided a better 
picture of possible risks than a consumer credit report, they said. 


They contended also that regulators made simple mathematical errors in 
computing such items as how much Lincoln should set aside in reserves to 
protect against possible losses. 


The big loans were made to borrowers who came up with 25% down payments, 
company executives said. Lincoln did not finance 100% of the purchase price, 
they said, and any other loans that the buyers obtained were not for the 
purpose of providing the down payments. Lincoln, they said, was entitled to 
record the profits on the loans. 


The recommendations of the regional regulators were not adopted by Gray or M. 
Danny Wall, who replaced Gray as head of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board in 
July, 1987. Wall, a former staff aide to the Senate Banking Committee, said 
that there was insufficient evidence to justify the extreme action proposed by 
the San Francisco overseers. 


If the rebuff angered the regional examiners, what came next stunned them. A 
year later, Wall stripped them of their supervisory responsibility for Lincoln 
and transferred jurisdiction to Washington. 


Wall said an internal investigation had determined that substantial animosity 
had developed between Lincoln and the San Francisco regulators and that leaks 
of confidential financial information had damaged the savings and loan. Wall 
ordered a new examination directed by Washington-based regulators. 


Instead of absolving Lincoln, however, the new audit reached even more damaging 
conclusions. Among other things, it called into question the tax-sharing plan 
Lincoln and its accountants had devised in 1986. 


As a subsidiary of American Continental, Lincoln did not deal directly with the 
Internal Revenue Service on taxes. Instead, American Continental collected 
money from all its subsidiaries, then filed a consolidated tax return and made 
tax payments to the IRS on their behalf. 


Over a period of a little more than two years, Lincoln made $95 million in 
tax-sharing payments to its parent company, ostensibly to cover taxes on 
profits it had earned. 


But the government alleges in its racketeering lawsuit and other documents that 
Lincoln did not owe $95 million in taxes at the time and that American 
Continental never paid any of that money to the IRS. 


Keating and his subordinates engaged in a series of sham transactions designed 
to create the appearance of higher profits, and thus higher tax obligations, as 
a device for siphoning money out of Lincoln and moving it to American 
Continental, which kept the extra funds, according to federal investigators. 


Higher profits also boosted American Continental's stock price. That in turn 
helped Keating and his family collect $34 million over five years from 
salaries, gains on stock sales and other benefits, regulatory records state. 
The stock sales were made to American Continental's employee stock ownership 
plan, which obtained loans guaranteed by Lincoln to acquire the shares. 


Lincoln executives said they did not misuse the tax-sharing arrangement. 


The executives contend the transactions that generated the profits were 
legitimate and that Lincoln owed taxes, although they acknowledged that the 
taxes might not have been due immediately. 


And, although Lincoln owed the taxes as a separate entity, they said, American 
Continental could use $250 million in tax credits it had accumulated itself to 
offset any profits on a consolidated basis that it or its subsidiaries made. 
Meantime, executives argued, the parent company could invest Lincoln's tax 
payments any way it chose. 


The tax plan was reviewed and approved by regulators, they pointed out. 


They sold stock to the employee stock ownership plan, the executives said, 
because the plan, by its very nature, required the purchase of American 
Continental stock. 


Because the stock was thinly traded, the plan could not acquire the big blocks 
of stock it needed except through sales by insiders. They said also that the 
price the insiders received for their stock was slightly below prevailing 
market prices. 


And any allegations of boosting stock prices to get money out of the employee 
stock ownership plan through the sales, they said, fall flat because most of 
such stock purchases occurred in 1985, long before the allegedly fraudulent 
transactions occurred. 


Example Cited 


One example of how Lincoln conducted its business, according to government 
regulators, is a loan it made to Ernest C. Garcia, a Phoenix-area developer. 


Early in 1987, Garcia approached Lincoln to see if he could borrow money to buy 
the remaining stock in a company in which he already held a 20% interest. 
Lincoln executives agreed to make the loan, regulators allege, but there was a 
condition. 


According to the government's racketeering lawsuit, the following events 
occurred: 


As a condition of lending him the money he wanted, Lincoln asked Garcia to buy 
1,000 acres of land owned by a Lincoln subsidiary for $14 million. The 1,000 
acres were part of an 8,500-acre tract called Hidden Valley Ranch. 


Garcia told Lincoln that he could not make the purchase himself, so he arranged 
for a firm called Westcontinental Mortgage &amp; Investment Corp. to buy the 
1,000 acres instead. Lincoln agreed to the arrangement and lent Westcon $10.5 
million, or 75% of the purchase price. 


At the same time, Lincoln lent Garcia $20.2 million, and Garcia lent $3.5 
million of that amount to Westcon. The $3.5 million was used by Westcon to make 
the 25% cash down payment on the land purchase. 


Lincoln recorded an $11-million profit on the transaction, even though the only 
cash it received was $3.5 million that had come out of its own coffers, the 
suit contends. Westcon has never made a payment on its $10.5-million loan. 


In a May, 1988, letter, Westcon acknowledged that it had acted as Garcia's 
nominee and asked him to ""arrange for the transfer of this property to its 
rightful owner as soon as possible."" 


That transaction was the first of 10 involving Hidden Valley Ranch property. 
The government alleges that, altogether, Lincoln claimed ""phantom profits"" of 
$82 million from the 10 deals. Those profits resulted in Lincoln's making $31 
million in tax-sharing payments to its parent company. 


American Continental executives rejected the government's characterization of 
the Hidden Valley loans. They said that Garcia, for instance, obtained a 
$30-million line of credit and that the $20.2 million he borrowed on the line 
was wired directly to the Tucson Electric Power Co., which owned 80% of the 
company Garcia had founded in 1981. 


The Hidden Valley deal, they said, was not a condition for obtaining the line 
of credit, and Garcia, a major developer, used his own funds to lend Westcon 
the down payment. 


Senators Intervene 


It was during this period that one of the most controversial episodes in the 
Lincoln case occurred. In his struggle against the regulators, Keating enlisted 
the aid of five U.S. senators, who intervened on his behalf in two 
now-controversial meetings with thrift regulators in April, 1987. 


The five senators -- Cranston, Dennis DeConcini (D-Ariz.), John McCain 
(R-Ariz.), John Glenn (D-Ohio) and Donald W. Riegle Jr. (D-Mich.) -- had 
received more than $300,000 in campaign contributions from Keating, his family 
and his business associates. 


In addition, Cranston solicited $850,000 from Keating for three voter 
registration groups that signed up primarily Democrats. Glenn solicited 
$200,000 for a political organization he controlled. And McCain's wife and her 
father invested nearly $360,000 in a 1986 Keating partnership that put up a 
Phoenix shopping center. 


The first meeting, on April 2, 1987, involved bank board Chairman Gray and 
Sens. DeConcini, Glenn, McCain and Cranston. Gray later stated publicly that 
the four senators tried to make a deal for Keating by promising to get Lincoln 
to make more traditional home mortgages again if Gray would rescind the 10% 
limit on Lincoln's direct investments. 


Their effort, Gray declared, was an ""abuse of senatorial authority"" and 
""tantamount to an attempt to subvert"" the regulatory process. 


The senators heatedly deny proposing any such deal. They say they met with Gray 
to discuss the unusually lengthy audit of Lincoln by the San Francisco regional 
office; their only message, the four senators say, was that the regulators 
should charge Keating with something or get off his back. 


The second meeting occurred a week later. Riegle joined the other four in a 
session with regional regulators who were conducting the protracted examination 
of Lincoln. Minutes of the meeting show that DeConcini mentioned the direct 
investment rule, but there was no subsequent discussion of the issue. The 
minutes indicate also that the session ended abruptly when the regulators said 
they intended to refer the Lincoln case to the Justice Department for criminal 
prosecution. That investigation is now under way. 


Regardless of whether a deal over the 10% rule was ever discussed, critics of 
the senators' actions suggest that their involvement may have delayed the 
ultimate seizure of Lincoln by two years, adding at least $1 billion to the 
taxpayers' bill for bailing out the thrift. 


Last Thursday, the Senate Ethics Committee decided to appoint an outside 
counsel to investigate whether the five senators violated ethics rules by going 
to bat for Keating. 


Cranston, meanwhile, filed a formal response to the committee contending that 
he had done nothing illegal or improper in connection with Keating. He said his 
efforts on Lincoln's behalf never went beyond what a member of Congress can 
legally do for a constituent who is experiencing problems with the government. 


Cranston denied that his actions were in any way responsible for the losses 
facing the government or the people who bought the American Continental debt 
securities. 


Bright Projections 


And what of Keating's enormous bets on the future of Arizona real estate? 


In brochures for Estrella, his big planned community southwest of Phoenix, 
Keating boasted that Phoenix would soon become the 12th-largest metropolitan 
area in the country. Employment was rising at an annual rate of nearly 4% as 
new residents flocked to the Grand Canyon state, and the future seemed as 
bright as the desert sun. 


A Lincoln subsidiary put in miles of sidewalks, created two lakes and made 
other improvements at Estrella. Some businesses began to move in. 


Meanwhile, Keating poured a total of $296 million into the Phoenician Resort in 
Scottsdale, which was designed to attract the affluent tourists who had been 
streaming into the state in increasing numbers every winter. 


Then things went bad. The influx of new residents and businesses to Arizona 
began to slow, but developers kept right on developing. Before long, the state 
was vastly overbuilt. The residential real estate market went flat. The 
commercial market fell through the floor. Even the tourist trade dropped off. 


 Today, Estrella bears little resemblance to Keating's predictions; much of the 
land is still largely undeveloped. The Phoenician opened in late 1988, and, 
although it is generating tremendous income -- $4.3 million last month alone -- 
it is not generating enough to pay off its construction debt, regulators claim. 


""Lincoln never was a viable institution under Keating,"" said Bert Ely, an 
Alexandria, Va.-based consultant to the savings and loan industry. 


Last week, government regulators seized control of the Phoenician and another 
Lincoln property, the Crescent Hotel in Phoenix, ousting Keating and as many as 
30 of his associates from management of the lodges. 


Seizure Occurs 


The government finally seized Lincoln on April 14, 1989, declaring that it was 
being operated in an unsafe and unsound manner and that Keating and his 
executives were dissipating its assets. 


The day before Lincoln was seized, American Continental filed for protection 
from creditors in U.S. Bankruptcy Court in Phoenix. The bankruptcy case 
prevented regulators from assuming full control of some of Lincoln's assets. 


Also, it created an unusual group of victims. Lincoln's regular depositors 
would be made whole by taxpayers through the federal deposit insurance program, 
but the 22,000 investors who had bought the American Continental debt 
securities were left holding worthless paper. There was no federal insurance 
for them. 


One of those investors was Shirley Lampel. 


In 1985, Lampel's husband had died of a heart attack at the age of 58. Despite 
her inability to work because of the diabetes that had left her all but blind, 
Lampel sought no pity. With Social Security payments and the monthly income 
from her husband's $30,000 life insurance proceeds, she would make it. 


One day, after moving from Santa Maria to Tustin, she had noticed a large 
newspaper advertisement about an investment opportunity being offered at a 
Lincoln office near her condominium. She took her life insurance proceeds and 
""practically beat down the door"" at the Lincoln branch to buy American 
Continental debt securities. 


After being assured that Lincoln was safe and sound, she had signed two pieces 
of paper and handed over a $30,000 cashier's check. She could not read the fine 
print, and she said no one ever read the documents to her. 


""I thought I was buying something similar to a certificate of deposit,"" she 
said. ""I didn't know what debentures were. You have home insurance and car 
insurance, but do most of us really understand all that stuff? No. We trust."" 

",13,"[ 0.          0.          0.00404634 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
130,"

Lincoln Savings &amp; Loan owner Charles H. Keating Jr., his family and his 
business empire poured nearly $350,000 into state politics during 1985 and 
1986, with about half of it going to Gov. George Deukmejian's reelection 
campaign, contribution records show. 


Along with the $173,000 donated to Deukmejian's campaign, Keating's family and 
business connections also contributed $176,500 over the two years to Democratic 
and Republican groups and such politicians as then-Assembly Republican Leader 
Pat Nolan of Glendale and Gray Davis in his successful race for state 
controller. 


The figures do not include at least $83,336 in contributions made personally or 
through the firms of two other Keating associates -- Los Angeles attorney Karl 
M. Samuelian and San Diego businessman Tom C. Stickel. 


Keating hired Samuelian, the governor's chief fund raiser, to be one of his 
California attorneys. He also invested heavily in a San Diego company 
controlled by Stickel, who also was a Deukmejian fund raiser and became the 
Republican Party's finance co-chairman in 1987. 


""Charlie Keating's political reach, in retrospect, was phenomenal,"" Stickel 
said in a recent interview about Keating's political muscle. 


The political largess in Sacramento was part of a web of influence that the 
blunt-talking Arizona businessman wove throughout the country to nurture and 
protect his ill-fated financial and investment companies, which regulators now 
contend inflated the value of their assets and deceived investors into buying 
high-risk bonds. 


In April, Keating's American Continental Corp. of Phoenix filed for bankruptcy, 
prompting federal officials to immediately take over its subsidiary Lincoln 
Savings &amp; Loan. The move is expected to cost taxpayers $2 billion -- the 
costliest savings and loan bailout in American history. 


After the seizure, the outspoken Keating candidly declared that he had expected 
the political contributions to prod influential politicians, such as U.S. Sen. 
Alan Cranston (D-Calif.), to fend off hostile regulators. 


""One question, among the many raised in recent weeks, had to do with whether my 
financial support in any way influenced several political figures to take up my 
cause,"" said Keating. ""I want to say in the most forceful way I can, I 
certainly hope so."" 


In California, Keating hired key Deukmejian supporters or appointees to help 
protect his ill-fated Lincoln Savings. As attorneys, he hired fund raiser 
Samuelian and Franklin Tom, a former state commissioner of savings and loan who 
left public service to join Samuelian's Los Angeles law firm. The lawyers 
helped Keating obtain state permission to float more than $200 million in 
high-risk bonds, on which his company subsequently defaulted. 


Keating also paid $200,000 in 1985 for the consulting services of former 
Savings and Loan Commissioner Lawrence W. Taggart, who had left government 
service in December, 1984, for a job with TCS Enterprises of San Diego. Days 
before he left for TCS, Taggart approved a request by Lincoln to increase the 
amount of assets the institution could sink into high-risk real estate 
investments. 


In January, 1985, when Taggart joined TCS, Keating hired him as an executive 
and paid $2.89 million to buy 19.2% of the fledgling San Diego firm's stock as 
it went public. 


Meanwhile, Keating and his associates were investing heavily in California 
state politics. His coalition of contributors included his family -- son 
Charles Keating III and three sons-in-law -- and his corporations, including 
American Continental, Lincoln Savings and three other subsidiaries. 


The group also included eight employees and executives, such as American 
Continental Vice President Robert J. Kielty and consultant Taggart, as well as 
Phoenix business associate Conley Wolfs-winkel, who bought 6,150 acres in 
Tucson with American Continental in 1985. 


While Keating himself gave only $7,000 -- all of it to Deukmejian -- the 
coalition of his relatives, business interests and associates brought total 
donations to $349,500 in 1985 and 1986. Reports show: 


* Deukmejian received $173,000 from the Arizona businessman and his associates. 
The governor received $80,000 directly from American Continental and Lincoln 
Savings; $19,000 from Keating and his family members; $51,000 from other 
American Continental subsidiaries and executives; and $23,000 from Keating 
business associates. 


The governor has said that he met Keating only once and never knew of Lincoln's 
financial woes until he read about them in newspaper reports this year. 


* Keating and associates gave $176,500 to other state political organizations 
and politicians. They gave $7,500 to the California Republican Party, $50,000 
to the League of Conservative Voters, $17,000 to then-Assemblyman Davis' 
campaign for state controller, and $85,000 to the state Democratic Party. 


They also gave $17,000 to four legislators -- Nolan, who authored the law 
deregulating the savings and loan industry in 1982; Assembly Rules Committee 
Chairman Tom Bane (D-Van Nuys); Assemblyman Bruce Bronzan (D-Fresno), and 
Assemblyman Dennis Brown (R-Los Alamitos). 


* Stickel and TCS contributed $50,666 in money, staff time and office space to 
Deukmejian and the Republican Party. Samuelian and his law partners gave 
$32,700. 


EARLY WARNING -- A key federal regulator told top government officials nearly a 
year before the collapse of Lincoln S&amp;L that their efforts to control the 
Irvine thrift would be unsuccessful. D1 

",13,"[ 0.         0.         0.0145225 ...,  0.         0.         0.       ]"
131,"

Lincoln Savings &amp; Loan owner Charles H. Keating Jr. was a ""con man"" who 
relied on lies and political influence -- ""juice"" -- to fool and bully 
regulators in charge of his ill-fated Irvine-based thrift, California Savings 
and Loan Commissioner William J. Crawford told an Assembly committee Wednesday. 


The committee also heard Gov. George Deukmejian's top campaign fund-raiser, Los 
Angeles attorney Karl M. Samuelian, defend his actions as one of Keating's 
attorneys, hired to represent the Arizona businessman's interests before state 
regulators. Samuelian said he recommended the appointment of two successive 
state corporations commissioners -- both of whom subsequently approved the 
sales of high-risk junk bonds by Lincoln's parent corporation. 


Samuelian, Deukmejian's campaign finance chairman since 1982, also said that he 
represented Keating at several meetings with state regulators. After the 
hearing, Samuelian told reporters that he helped set up meetings between 
Keating and the regulators' boss, Business, Transportation and Housing 
Secretary John K. Geoghegan. 


But it was Crawford's blunt remarks about Keating's tactics and demeanor that 
provided the most provocative testimony Wednesday before the Assembly's Finance 
and Insurance Committee. 


Asked for a simple explanation of why Lincoln Savings failed, prompting a 
federal takeover in April that could cost taxpayers more than $2 billion, 
Crawford said: ""If I had to pick one reason, I would have to say that probably 
the owner was a con man. 


""He was a dominant person who believed that he was above the law and 
regulations, that he was powerful and he had the juice and he could win. He 
could fight the regulators, and he did a very good job of it."" 


When Keating first took over Lincoln in February, 1984, he told state 
regulators one thing but all along planned to do another, Crawford said. 


""They said they were going to run a traditional savings and loan. They lied to 
us,"" Crawford said. 


Instead, Crawford said, Keating used Lincoln's citizen deposits and sales of 
high-risk bonds as sources of cash for marginal land acquisitions in Arizona, 
Colorado, Texas and Louisiana. Crawford said that when he took over the 
department in 1985, he found that his predecessor had allowed Keating to keep 
the original records of Lincoln Savings in Phoenix, leaving only incomplete 
copies of documents for California regulators in the Lincoln offices in Irvine. 


Crawford said he ordered Lincoln's files to be brought back to California after 
he discovered Keating had contributed $50,000 to Arizona's attorney general in 
an uncontested race -- a move that persuaded him that any action by California 
regulators would be resisted by their counterparts in Arizona. He also said 
regulators needed the centralized files to help keep up with Keating's 
financial empire, which expanded from 32 corporations in 1984 to 54 entities by 
the end of 1987. 


""That was 54 places to hide the smoking gun,"" said Crawford, who added: ""We 
were never on top of the problems of Lincoln Savings. . . . They could write up 
(the value of) their assets faster than you could write them down."" 


He said the task was made even more difficult by the phalanx of Keating 
employees and attorneys, who overwhelmed understaffed regulators. Crawford said 
he tried to keep tabs of Lincoln with only one experienced examiner and two 
trainees. 


""They (Lincoln and American Continental) had a battery of people. They had 48 
CPAs, they had 15 attorneys on staff. I just lately learned they employed 77 
outside law firms,"" Crawford said. 


Referring to a Home Loan Bank Board memo that said Keating had attempted to 
have him fired, Crawford said he did not know of any such effort but added that 
he, like federal regulators, felt ""beat up"" by the Arizona businessman. 


'Proof of the Pudding' 


But he insisted that no one from Deukmejian's office tried to influence his 
handling of Lincoln. 


""He had the juice (but) he didn't have it on a direct line from the governor to 
me. I'm still here, and that's proof of the pudding, I think,"" Crawford said. 


The committee's chairman, Assemblyman Patrick Johnston (D-Stockton), expressed 
concern about allegations that Keating and his associates used political 
connections to influence state regulators. 


Keating was invited to attend the committee hearing but did not respond, 
Johnston said. 


Deukmejian fund-raiser Samuelian, however, said he has never contacted the 
governor on behalf of any client. 


""As far as the governor is concerned, I have religiously for 10 years separated 
my business matters from my (campaign) assistance to the governor,"" he said. 


Samuelian outlined 1986 and 1987 contributions to Deukmejian's campaign 
committee from Keating's companies, relatives and business associates totaling 
$150,000, plus an additional $100,000 to Republican fund-raising efforts in 
California that Samuelian collected. 


However, he denied ever ""lobbying"" for Keating or his companies. 


""We were representing a client as a lawyer, not doing any lobbying work,"" 
Samuelian said. 


After the hearing, Samuelian said he helped set up Keating's meetings in 
February and March, 1988, with Transportation and Housing Secretary Geoghegan, 
a Deukmejian appointee whose agency oversees the state's savings and loan and 
corporations regulators. 


Samuelian also revealed to the committee Wednesday that he had recommended that 
Deukmejian appoint two former law associates, Franklin Tom and Christine W. 
Bender, as corporation commissioners. The governor named Tom first, and then 
Bender succeeded him. 


Both Tom and Bender approved the sale of controversial high-risk bonds issued 
by American Continental and sold through Lincoln's branches. 


After Tom left his post as commissioner, he rejoined Samuelian's law firm and 
represented Keating's position in meetings with Bender, his successor and 
former deputy. 


Wording Deleted 


Also during the hearing, state savings and loan examiner Richard Newsom said 
the state attorney general's office deleted wording in a December, 1988, 
cease-and-desist order against American Continental that could have warned 
investors not to buy the company's high-risk junk bonds. 


Newsom said the wording would have been the ""atomic bomb"" to end the junk bond 
sales, which continued through early 1989. But, he added, the attorney general 
balked at including the language because his office lacked the expertise to 
defend the state on a court challenge over securities matters. 


However, Newsom's testimony was immediately refuted by both Atty. Gen. John K. 
Van de Kamp and an attorney for the Savings and Loan Department. The attorney, 
Shirley Thayer, said she and others in the department made the decision to drop 
the language, not Van de Kamp. 


In Washington, meanwhile, White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said President 
Bush had no immediate plans to oust M. Danny Wall, the embattled chairman of 
the office of thrift supervision. 


Wall, who previously headed the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, is under fire for 
not acting on a recommendation by regional regulators to seize Lincoln in 1987. 
The government did not take control of the thrift until last April, and critics 
contend that the delay greatly increased the eventual cost to taxpayers. 


Asked at a press briefing if the White House planned to fire Wall, Fitzwater 
replied: ""No, there's been no consideration of Mr. Wall's tenure. He's serving 
on the (office of thrift supervision) board, and there's been no change."" 


Calls for Wall's resignation have increased in recent days. On Wednesday, three 
nonprofit organizations -- the National Taxpayers Union, Public Citizen and 
Citizens Against Government -- sent a letter to Bush urging him to oust Wall. 

",13,"[ 0.          0.          0.01179156 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
132,"

A lobbyist for former Lincoln Savings &amp; Loan owner Charles H. Keating Jr. 
said Friday that moments after he first met Sen. Alan Cranston (D-Calif.) at a 
political event in 1984, the senator suggested Keating should contribute to his 
campaign. 


James Grogan also told the Senate Ethics Committee he remembers more than one 
occasion on which Cranston or his aides sought contributions from Keating while 
at the same time promising to assist Lincoln in its battle against federal 
regulators. 


Cranston has acknowledged only one such conversation. 


Grogan, a surprise witness who testified under a limited grant of immunity from 
prosecution, said there was never a trade-off between Keating's contributions 
and his request for assistance. But he appeared to strengthen the committee's 
case against both Cranston and Sen. Donald W. Riegle Jr. (D-Mich.). He provided 
important new details of Cranston's close alliance with Keating and 
contradicted earlier testimony by Cranston aides Joy Jacobson and Carolyn D. 
Jordan. 


The panel is investigating charges that Cranston, Riegle and three others -- 
Sens. Dennis DeConcini (D-Ariz.), John McCain (R-Ariz.) and John Glenn (D-Ohio) 
-- improperly assisted Keating in exchange for contributions. Their 
intervention with federal regulators allegedly delayed the government takeover 
of Lincoln, contributing to losses of $2 billion by the federally insured 
thrift. 


Grogan, 36, who was paid $300,000 a year to lobby for Lincoln, recalled that he 
introduced himself to Cranston at an event in 1984, explaining that he worked 
for an Arizona builder who had just purchased a savings and loan in California. 


He said Cranston promptly pulled a 3x5 card from his pocket, saying: ""I've been 
very good to the savings and loans. I've worked hard for California savings and 
loans. You all should really support me."" 


Cranston then wrote Grogan's name and telephone number on the card, he said. 


A short time later, according to Grogan, he received a telephone call from 
Jacobson, the senator's fund-raiser. He said she repeated Cranston's contention 
that he had been ""very supportive"" of California thrifts and asked him if 
Keating would raise money for the senator. 


Grogan indicated he was surprised by this aggressive appeal for money because 
Keating is a conservative Republican who opposes abortion, and Cranston is a 
liberal Democrat who is an abortion rights advocate. As a result, he said, he 
did not immediately commit Keating to anything during his first conversation 
with Jacobson. 


He said he later persuaded Keating to assist Cranston by telling him that the 
senator shared his negative opinion of then-Federal Home Loan Bank Board 
Chairman Edwin J. Gray. Keating disagreed with Gray's policies and later 
accused the bank board chairman of carrying on a ""vendetta"" against Lincoln. 


In April, 1985, as a result of Cranston's appeal for funds, Keating collected 
$15,000 in checks from his employees for the California senator. It was the 
first of nearly $1 million that Cranston solicited from Keating -- $60,000 for 
his campaigns, $85,000 for the California Democratic Party and $850,000 for 
voter registration groups founded by the senator. 


At the same time, Grogan emphasized that Keating did not always have Cranston's 
support for his proposals. He said contributions could buy him access to a 
senator, but the money provided no guarantee that the senator would do the 
bidding of a contributor. 


""For example,"" he told the committee, ""Sen. Cranston, whom I believe we gave 
the most money to, there were several times specifically when I went to his 
office and asked him, on behalf of Mr. Keating, to take action. And he said, 
'No, I can't do it.' And this was after tremendous amounts of money had been 
raised for him."" 


Grogan contradicted earlier testimony by Jacobson, who said that she -- not 
Cranston -- was approached at the 1984 Democratic National Convention by 
Grogan, who ""offered to be helpful to the reelection campaign."" 


He said that Keating, who eventually developed a warm friendship with Cranston, 
usually waited until the end of his meetings with the senator to discuss 
contributions. 


As Grogan explained it: ""Normally as we were leaving, either Mr. Keating would 
say, 'Is there any way I can help you, senator? I appreciate our relationship.' 
Or at times, Sen. Cranston would say, 'Could you help in this area, could you 
help raise money here, could you do that?' "" 


He added: ""There was never an occasion where Mr. Keating asked Sen. Cranston to 
do something, and Sen. Cranston said, 'Only if you raise funds for me.' There 
was never an occasion where Mr. Keating said, 'If you do this for me, I will 
raise X-amount of dollars for you.' "" 


Under questioning by special counsel Robert S. Bennett, Grogan detailed the 
following occasions on which he said Cranston or his aides allegedly sought 
contributions while at the same time pledging to assist Keating with 
regulators: 


 -- In late 1986, when the Senate was considering legislation that would have 
imposed restraints on Keating's management of Lincoln, Grogan tried to contact 
Jordan, Cranston's aide on the Banking Committee, for assistance in battling 
the proposal. Unable to reach Jordan, he instead talked to Jacobson. 


When Jacobson called back an hour later to report that she had told Jordan of 
Keating's opposition, she then said she wanted to ""switch gears"" and discuss 
something ""totally unrelated."" She asked him whether Cranston could get a 
personal loan for his reelection campaign from Lincoln. 


As a result, Cranston's campaign subsequently received a $300,000 line of 
credit from Lincoln that he never used. 


 -- In September, 1987, Grogan personally delivered two checks totaling 
$250,000 for voter registration to Cranston in his office in the Capitol. ""Mr. 
Keating wanted me to give you those checks,"" he told the senator. 


Grogan and Cranston then discussed Lincoln's problems, with Keating joining the 
conversation over the office speaker phone. Keating asked Cranston to contact 
then-bank board Chairman M. Danny Wall on Lincoln's behalf, and the senator 
agreed. 


 -- In January, 1988, Grogan, Keating, Cranston, Cranston's son, Kim, and Kim's 
then-girlfriend, actress Shelley Duvall, had dinner together at Jimmy's 
restaurant in Los Angeles. Kim explained the work of Cranston's voter 
registration groups, one of which he headed, and Cranston offered to make two 
telephone calls suggested by Keating. In one call, Cranston arranged a meeting 
for Keating with Wall. 


Cranston has previously acknowledged that both contributions and assistance for 
Lincoln were discussed at the dinner. Grogan could not remember any discussion 
of specific amounts of money that Keating would contribute to the voter 
registration effort. 


Grogan contradicted testimony by Jordan concerning a written statement she 
inserted into the Congressional Record on Cranston's behalf in 1987 that 
assisted Lincoln in a pending court suit against the bank board. Jordan told 
the committee she acted entirely on her own initiative, but Grogan said she was 
acting on his request. 


Grogan also contradicted Riegle's statement that he did not arrange meetings 
between the five senators and federal regulators in early April, 1987. These 
meetings have been a central focus of the so-called Keating Five case because 
the regulators alleged that they were asked improperly by the senators to go 
easy on Lincoln. 


He said it was during Riegle's visit to Keating's headquarters in Phoenix in 
March, 1987, that the senator first proposed the idea of such meetings. He said 
he later learned that Riegle had contacted Gray, who consented to meet with the 
senators. 


Grogan said Riegle, who was in line to become chairman of the Senate Banking 
Committee, had also insisted he himself could not attend such a meeting with 
the regulators unless he was invited by McCain and DeConcini, who represented 
the state where Keating lived. 


""It was apparent to me . . . Sen. Riegle knew as a true politician that this 
was a potential politically explosive situation because there was so much media 
at the time about Mr. Keating and Mr. Gray fighting,"" he said. 

",13,"[ 0.          0.          0.00965318 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
133,"     Keating's four-month Superior Court trial ended in guilty verdicts on
Wednesday, his 68th birthday. The jury found him guilty on 17 of 18 counts of
duping investors about the safety of junk bonds sold through Lincoln
branches.;   The land developer and financier, who donated $1.3 million to the
""Keating Five"" senators and paid colossal salaries to relatives, never
flinched as the verdicts were read.;   Keating contends vindictive regulators
hounded him out of business. His lawyer said he would appeal the conviction.; 
 The victims were among thousands of bondholders who lost $250 million when
Irvine-based Lincoln collapsed, the costliest thrift failure in history with a
bailout tab to taxpayers of $2.6 billion.;   Many elderly investors said they
were told Keating's bonds were safe, like insured certificates of deposit.;  
""We couldn't bring their money back, but we brought them a measure of
justice,"" said lead prosecutor William Hodgman.;   Jeri Mellon, the leader of
a bondholders support group, shouted ""Justice! Justice!"" after the verdict was
read.;   She said the group would now turn its efforts to a seemingly odd
goal: delaying the federal criminal case against Keating.;   Mellon said the
bondholders want a civil lawsuit in Tucson federal court heard before a
federal criminal case. The reason is simple: The civil action holds the
promise of recovering their losses from lawyers and accountants accused of
propping up Keating's crumbling empire.;   ""A lot of our members are in their
80s and 90s,"" Mellon said. ""We're talking to legislators, anybody who'll
listen, insisting that the (criminal) case be postponed.;   ""We can't wait
another 2 1/2 years until they get to our trial."";   Several lawyers involved
in the Keating legal wars told the Associated Press that a federal indictment,
of Keating and probably four others, would be returned this month. Attorneys,
speaking on condition of anonymity, said the indictment could come as early as
Dec. 12.;   A Los Angeles federal grand jury has spent more than two years
investigating Keating, his family and officers and directors of Lincoln and
its parent company, Phoenix's American Continental Corp. Keating was American
Continental's chairman and chief executive.;   Four former associates have
pleaded guilty to federal crimes and are cooperating with prosecutors in hopes
of light sentences.;   The federal prosecutors in Los Angeles, Alice Hill and
David Sklansky, declined to comment on when an indictment might come, as did
Justice Department spokesman Doug Tillett in Washington.;   However, the topic
surfaced publicly Wednesday as prosecutor Hodgman and defense attorney Stephen
C. Neal addressed Superior Court Judge Lance A. Ito, who set sentencing for
Feb. 7 and rejected a Hodgman request to raise Keating's bail from $100,000 to
$1 million.;   ""As Mr. Neal has indicated, there is the possibility of some
imminent action on the federal front,"" Hodgman said in arguing that Keating
was now an increased flight risk.;   Emotions ran high during the trial, which
became a national window into the extravagances and duplicity that contributed
to the collapse of the savings and loan industry during the freewheeling
1980s.;   Civil lawsuits contend that after buying Lincoln in 1984, American
Continental quickly and illegally began siphoning off federally insured
deposits to fund a playground of lofty salaries and company-paid jet-setting
for Keating, his family and top officers.;   During the trial, bondholders
jeered Keating as he passed them in court hallways. An elderly woman who lost
$4,900 on a junk bond gave him a shaking, demanding repayment. A comic swatted
him with a powdered wig, shouting, ""This is for America."";   In addition to
the action to recover bondholder losses, the Tucson suit includes a $2.7
billion racketeering suit by the Resolution Trust Corp., the federal agency
that inherits failed thrifts.;   Other actions include an effort by the Office
of Thrift Supervision to recover $131 million allegedly looted from Lincoln by
Keating and his cronies, and an investigation by the Securities and Exchange
Commission.;   At the trial, defense attorney Neal gambled by calling no
defense witnesses, saying prosecutors never showed Keating took part in or
even knew about any deceptions of bond buyers at Lincoln's Southern California
branches.;   Neal told jurors an innocent verdict would rebuke the regulators
Keating accuses of driving him into insolvency.;   But Joseph Cotchett, the
attorney for the bondholders in the civil suit, said the jurors sent another
message instead.;   ""It's a tribute to the system, because the Keatings of the
world can buy a lot of people, including politicians. But they can't buy a
jury,"" Cotchett said.; WHO'S DOING TIME IN THE S&amp;L DEBACLE; Here are the
sentences handed out to other savings and loan-scandal figures:;   (box)
THOMAS D. DUNN JR. -- The former chairman of Peoples Heritage Federal Savings
and Loan of Salina was sentenced Aug. 2 to eight years in prison, ordered to
pay $5.4 million restitution and fined $20,000 for his part in a $105 million
fraud scheme. James R. Cruce, the thrift's former president, was sentenced to
14 years for fraud and ordered to pay $8 million to regulators. Thomas A.
Burger, its former chief lending officer, received 12 years and was ordered to
pay $6 million in restitution.;   (box) ERNEST J. BADARACCO JR. -- The former
president of the failed Elysian Federal Savings in Hoboken, N.J., was
sentenced June 11 to 21 months in prison for fraud and ordered to pay $293,000
restitution.;    (box) ROY WAYNE DAILEY -- The former owner of Conroe-based
First Savings Association of East Texas was sentenced April 8 to 12 years in
prison and ordered to pay $5 million in restitution. Dailey was convicted in
December of misappropriation of funds, bank fraud and bank bribery.;   (box)
DONALD DIXON -- The former owner of Vernon Savings &amp; Loan Association in Texas
was sentenced April 2 to five years in prison and ordered to repay $577,000 to
the FDIC for bank fraud. Dixon was convicted in December of illegally using
depositors' money to pay for a California beach house and prostitutes.;  
(box) WOODY F. LEMONS -- The former chairman of Vernon Savings &amp; Loan was
sentenced April 5, 1990, to 30 years on charges including misapplication of
funds, conspiracy and bank fraud, for soliciting a $9,000 kickback from a loan
broker and receiving $212,000 in kickbacks from the broker, both in 1986.;  
(box) JANET FAYE McKINZIE -- An executive of the North American Savings and
Loan of Santa Ana, Calif., she was sentenced July 20, 1990, to 20 years in
prison. She was convicted of racketeering, conspiracy, bank fraud, wire fraud
and interstate transportation of stolen property. McKinzie was also ordered
make restitution of almost $14 million looted from the collapsed thrift.;  
(box) BURTON BONGARD -- The former president of Home State Savings Bank of
Ohio was sentenced on July 22, 1987, to 10 years for conspiracy and fraud.;  
(box) JEROME S. CARDIN -- A former part-owner of the now-defunct Old Court
Savings and Loan Association of Baltimore, he was sentenced Jan. 21, 1987, to
15 years in prison for stealing $385,000 from the thrift. He was also fined
$5,000.;   (box) JEFFREY A. LEVITT -- The former president of Old Court
Savings and Loan Association was sentenced July 2, 1986, to 30 years in prison
for theft of $14.69 million from the thrift. Levitt also was fined $12,000 and
turned over all of his personal property as restitution.  ",13,"[ 0.40030935  0.00668419  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
134,"
   The takeover was ""the most chaotic, incredible situation
I've been involved in,"" said regulator Keith Seibold. Mr.
Seibold, a 20-year veteran of the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corp., has been in the first wave of regulators in many a
bank seizure.
   Testifying in Mr. Keating's court challenge to the
takeover, Mr. Seibold said ""lots of documents -- loan and
credit files -- were missing"" when an FDIC team swept through
Lincoln's offices in Phoenix, Ariz., April 14, 1989. He said
that over the next several days, the FDIC managed to retrieve
the documents from Lincoln officials -- in exchange for
giving the officials some of the art that decorated Lincoln's
offices.
   Federal District Judge Stanley Sporkin seemed incredulous.
""You don't actually mean pictures on the wall?"" he asked.
""Yes, your honor, pictures on the wall,"" Mr. Seibold replied.
   But during a break in the trial, Mr. Keating said the
suggestion that there was any bartering to get documents back
was ""ridiculous."" He explained that Lincoln's files were
spread among two buildings used by Lincoln and by American
Continental Corp., the parent company.
   In sorting out what belonged where after the takeover,
Lincoln's files were returned to Lincoln's building.
Meanwhile, Mr. Keating asked the regulators to return to him
a painting, which hung in Lincoln's offices and was given to
him by his nephew. Mr. Keating also said that Lincoln was
required to keep all original loan files at its headquarters
in Irvine, Calif.
   Mr. Seibold wouldn't speak to reporters about Mr.
Keating's version of the events.
   A few blocks away on Capitol Hill, Rep. Henry Gonzalez,
who made Mr. Keating something of a celebrity with his
hearings on Lincoln last year, called for the Justice
Department to freeze the assets of Mr. Keating and other
""highflyers who have defrauded savings and loans.""
   Mr. Keating said Mr. Gonzalez was ignoring the ""truth"" of
regulatory iniquity that was evident from the trial. ""He
prefers his kangaroo court,"" Mr. Keating said.
",13,"[ 0.21428073  0.01542997  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
135,"
",13,"[ 0.  1.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
136,"
   President Quett Masire of Botswana said
Thursday that industrial nations can help relieve drought and hunger
in Africa by reducing global warming caused by the greenhouse effect.
   Masire and Dr. Bernard Ledea Ouedraogo, an anti-hunger organizer
in Burkina Faso, were honored as co-winners of the 1988 Africa Prize
for Leadership for their efforts in averting hunger.
   A severe drought gripped much of Africa from 1981 to 1987,
killing millions. Experts believe that due to the organizing efforts
of Masire's government, not one person died of drought-induced
famine in Botswana.
   Through early planning, Botswana organized a nutritional
surveillance and warning system and distributed food nationwide.
   By the time the drought ended, malnutrition had actually
declined. Before the drought, 25 percent of Botswana's children were
underweight. By 1987, that fell to 15 percent.
   In his acceptance speech, Masire thanked Western donor
governments and private agencies for their help during the drought,
but suggested drought and hunger will get worse in Africa if the
Earth's climate keeps warming.
   ``The semi-arid tropics will have even greater climatic
variability as the warming continues,'' he said.
   ``The industrialized countries may do more for Africa in the long
run by helping to reduce global warming than by supplying short-term
aid, however welcome that is at the time.
   ``We would prefer to prevent droughts altogether rather than have
to learn to deal with them well.''
   The warming of the Earth and its lower atmosphere is caused by
trapped solar radiation.
   The other Africa Prize-winner, Ouedraogo, has organized about
500,000 peasants in nine countries in Africa to develop their
villages based on traditional cooperative village leadership.
   The villagers in Burkina Faso, Chad, Gambia, Guinea-Bissau, Mali,
Mauritania, Niger, Senegal and Togo raise vegetables, learn new
farming techniques, improve literacy, fight erosion, replant
forests, build roads and improve health care.
   The Africa Prize consists of $100,000 and a statue, awarded by
the New York-based Hunger Project.
   Ouedraogo said he will ask the peasant farmers he has organized
how they would like to use his share of the prize.
   Masire also said he would distribute his share of the award to
grass-roots organizers and villagers who made Botswana's victory
over famine possible.
",14,"[ 0.35851638  0.01376859  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
137,"
BFN 

  [Text] Lilongwe June 6 SAPA -- Three million people will 
need emergency food aid in 1994/95 following widespread crop 
failure in central and southern Malawi, the United Nations Food 
Aid Organisation [FAO] said on Monday [6 June]. A recent 
FAO/World Food Programme crop assessment mission blamed the crop 
failure on erratic and insufficient rainfall. 
  This year's cereal production among smallholders is 
estimated 
to be 60 per cent less than last year's bumper harvest, and only 
28 per cent higher than in 1991/92, when drought devasted 
southern Africa. The mission estimated about 493,000 tons of 
cereals would have to be imported. 
  Of the cereal food aid requirement, about 175,000 tons would 
be needed as emergency assistance for some three million people. 
Another 270,000 tons would be required to be sold in the market 
to stabilise food supply and prices. 
  ""Food scarcity in the markets leads to riots, hoarding and 
skyrocketing prices. That happened during the big drought of 
1992. We attach equal importance to keeping the commercial 
sector well-supplied,"" said WFP Director Phillip Ostenso. 
  Despite a bumper harvest last year, Malawi has not recovered 
from the massive 1991/92 drought. The sharp decline in the 
production of major crops such as tobacco and cotton due to 
drought means reduced incomes for many rural households. 
  Malnutrition rates have always been very high in Malawi, 
even 
with good harvests. Studies suggest more than half of rural 
pre-school children suffer from chronic malnutrition. Thus food 
shortages and high prices can quickly aggravate an already 
critical situation. 
  Although landlocked, Malawi proved in the 1991/92 drought it 
was adequately equipped to handle the transportation, storage 
and internal distribution of large volumes of food imported 
through South Africa, Mozambican or, possibly, Tanzanian ports 
[words indistinct]. 

",14,"[ 0.10144383  0.10017992  0.0558501  ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
138,"
LAST FRIDAY was the day of the annual agricultural show at Prieska in the
northern part of South Africa's Cape Province. A few score farmers and their
families from a radius of a about 100 km (62 miles) had gathered to wander
around about a dozen trade and craft stands, have a braai (barbecue) lunch
and to see which of them would be awarded the prize for the best Fat-Tailed
Persian sheep. The temperature was in the mid-40s centigrade (about 120 deg
F).
This is virtually desert country where a farmer needs several thousand
hectares and a drought- and heat-resistant breed of sheep to make a
reasonable living. It lies between the Great Karoo in the south and the
Kalahari in the north and the town owes its existence and past wealth to the
mining of blue asbestos and copper from the nearby hills.
Now the copper mine is worked out and the lung disease asbestosis has killed
the demand for the asbestos the area once produced. Today Prieska relies
almost entirely on agriculture and in both prosperity and population it is
only half the town it once was.
But the mood at the show was jovial and relaxed. The quality of the sheep
entered for the competition was excellent, the food was good and the local
MP was among the small crowd. They know him well; for not only is he a
neighbouring farmer (his farm is just 170 km away by dirt road and that
qualifies as 'neighbour' in this vast hot countryside) but he is also South
Africa's minister of agriculture.
Mr Kraai van Niekerk would probably have attended the show as a farmer in
any case but last week he was campaigning for today's referendum on
continued political reform in South Africa, and Prieska is the centre of his
constituency. He had delivered a speech at another town that morning; now he
was pressing the flesh of his fellow farmers before addressing a house
meeting in the late afternoon and another in the local town hall in the
evening. In the sweltering heat it was a punishing schedule.
If the voters reject continued reform Mr van Niekerk, along with the rest of
the cabinet, will begin preparations to resign. But if the majority of South
Africa's white electorate votes against calls by the Conservative Party and
the AWB for a return to old ways, the minister will be able to return to
other pressing problems in his department.
Chief among these is the extended drought which has affected a significant
proportion of the Republic. Indeed, I had expected that the arid area in
which the minister's own farm is situated would be suffering most. But I was
wrong.
When I went with him to his 13,000-hectare holding, which has an annual
rainfall of just 6 inches and where temperatures in the high 30s and low 40s
centigrade are normal throughout the long summer, he explained that the
secret of success on such dry bush veldt was to restrict stocking rates (he
runs only one Merino wool sheep per 10 hectares) and to conserve what little
moisture was available.
This meant moving each 300-head flock on a regular basis from one
100-hectare camp (pasture) to another so as not to destroy the indigenous
grasses and bushes sprouting from the sandy, rocky terrain and which,
incredibly to my unaccustomed eye, sustained the animals in good condition.
He talked with enthusiasm and detailed knowledge about the balance of
nature. And he claimed that it was not farmers like him, who were used to
managing in dry weather, who were in financial trouble.
It is, in fact, the arable farmers further east who are suffering most, as I
had seen and heard for myself a few days earlier, and Mr van Niekerk has
already set up committees of bankers, extension officers and local farmers'
representatives, to try to find ways to avoid many of them going bankrupt.
Aid schemes are being worked out, wherever possible, to write off some debt
and to re-schedule the rest, often at subsidised interest rates. But in many
cases the financial position is such that the farmer is beyond help.
Critics of the rescue attempts allege that most of the farmers who are in
trouble are financially illiterate and that they are reaping the results of
unbridled expenditure and expansion in the boom years of the 1970s and
1980s. Mr van Niekerk concedes that such suggestions contain an element of
truth But the drought is also an established fact and there are
socio-economic as well as agricultural reasons why as many farmers as
possible should be saved.
To allow vast numbers of farms to go out of business at a time when there is
little enthusiasm, even among successful farmers for expansion, would put
tens of thousands of black farm labourers out of work. Since the repeal of
the Group Areas Act two years ago there has already been enormous growth in
the squatter camps around big towns. Hordes of unemployed farm workers would
add to an already serious problem.
There is also the immediate problem of ensuring the availability of
sufficient food. South Africa consumes between 6m and 7m tonnes of maize
each year. Production from this year's drought stricken crops is forecast at
less than 3m tonnes. In addition, the republic has long term commitments to
supply maize to other southern African countries.
It appears likely, therefore, that it will be necessary for South Africa to
import up to 5m tonnes of maize during the coming months. Some commentators
have suggested that the port facilities are inadequate to handle such
volumes within the time available but Mr van Niekerk assured me that his
department had done the calculations and confirmed that they can and that
imports have already begun to arrive. He also denied that there was any
possibility of rationing over coming months.
Some of his optimism was based, however, on the possibility that South
African-grown wheat could be substituted for maize when it was harvested in
November. But back in the Orange Free State, last week, farmers were
worrying about the continued absence of any rain to provide moisture to
germinate wheat seeds when they were due to be planted in a few weeks time.
Theirs is a summer rainfall area and that season is almost over. If they get
no rain, there will be no point sowing the seed and they will have no crops
to harvest next November.
As the minister said, that is a long way ahead and there will be time to
make arrangements to deal with that problem should it occur. But in the
meantime there is little doubt that the drought, the cost of aid to farmers
and the planned expenditure on food imports will have figured in the South
African budget calculations due to be announced tomorrow. Whichever way you
look at it this is a crucial time for South Africa.
",14,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
139,"
TEAMS OF US and inter-national experts are being sent to southern Africa to
assess the impact on food supplies of what in some areas is the worst
drought of the century. Officials said millions of people will be affected,
AP reports from Washington.
Among the hardest hit of the 10 drought-stricken countries are Zimbabwe and
South Africa, traditional food exporters which this year will have to import
substantial quantities of grain. As the drought persists, estimates of the
grain harvest throughout the region have been falling precipitously.
The deteriorating situation in southern Africa adds a new dimension to the
continent's overall food crisis. The north-east is the most deprived area in
Africa, encompassing Sudan, Ethiopia, Somalia and Djibouti. The lives of 15m
people are thought to be at risk.
Officials in Zimbabwe said last week 60,000 cattle died from starvation
during February alone and thousands more will die unless heavy rains come
soon.
The Rome-based Food and Agriculture Organisation warned late last month that
the drought could lead to widespread famine. About 98m people live in the
affected regions in southern Africa.
'Considerable donor assistance will be needed to avert a major humanitarian
crisis in the region,' the US State Department said last week.
",14,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
140,"
THE effects of widespread drought on grain production in South Africa could
negate the expected recovery in economic growth in the second half of the
year, Mr Kraai van Niekerk, the country's agriculture minister, said
yesterday.
Mr Barend du Plessis, the finance minister, had been expecting the
recession-hit economy to expand by 1.5 per cent this year. However, Mr van
Niekerk said: ' As a result of agriculture's low production in summer
rainfall areas, there is a great possibility the expected growth rate could
be practically obliterated in the second half of 1992.'
His predictions followed warnings on Wednesday that drought in southern
Africa could cause famine in much of the region.
The United Nations Food and Agriculture organisation said hot and dry
conditions in January and February were expected to reduce the total cereal
harvest in 11 southern African countries to 16m tonnes, 25 per cent down on
the average.
It said Zimbabwe and South Africa, which normally offset shortages in the
area with their own surpluses, would themselves have to import food.
Other than these two countries, Mozambique and Zambia were likely to be most
seriously affected.
The FAO said that as much as 2m tonnes of food aid could be needed for
southern Africa this year. Total food imports for the region could be as
high as 6m tonnes, three times more than in a normal year.
Logistical constraints could further exacerbate the problem, the FAO said,
with port handling capacities stretched by unprecedentedly large cereal
imports and neighbouring countries sometimes competing for limited rail
wagons.
It said meeting food aid needs could be difficult as international attention
was focused on emergencies in the former Soviet Union, eastern Europe, Iraq
and the Horn of Africa.
",14,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
141,"
'Only God can help us through this crisis,' said the Afrikaner preacher
called to provide spiritual guidance to South Africa's farmers, who have
been hit by one of the worst droughts in living memory.
Indeed, in the eastern Transvaal town of Bethal, where Dominee Nel was
delivering his sermon at a farmers' meeting earlier this week, elderly
residents say this drought is the worst since 1933. Mr JG Wilson of the
local agricultural co-operative says maize farmers in the area - one of the
largest maize producing regions - have already lost 80 to 100 per cent of
their crops.
Agricultural economists point out that drought years are more the norm in
South Africa than the exception. But Mr Koos du Toit, chief economist of the
South African Agricultural Union, says it is the worst drought he has ever
seen, and the most widespread. Farmers who produce maize, South Africa's
staple food, will be the hardest hit, with stock farmers also at risk. Mr du
Toit endorses comparisons with 1933, a highly emotive year for Afrikaners
because of the numbers forced off the land by drought.
The Maize Board, the state marketing board, expects a crop of 4m tonnes,
though Mr du Toit believes it could be closer to 3m or 3.5m, which would
make it the worst harvest in 50 years. The board expects to import 2m to 3m
tonnes of maize for local consumption, at a cost of R1.5bn. Mr du Toit
believes imports could hit 3.5m.
Government, for its part, has said that it will act to prevent farmers
leaving the land this time - although it has little room for manoeuvre,
given the fragility of the country's political transition, the depressed
economy and the demands of blacks for a fairer share of government spending.
None the less, Pretoria is understood to be contemplating substantial
drought aid for farmers: several hundred million rands, or perhaps as much
as R1bn (Pounds 200m) over two to three years. Without such aid, the Maize
Board estimates that some 2,000 to 3,000 of the 17,000 maize farmers could
be forced off the land this year, victims of high interest rates, high input
costs, and excessive debt, with drought just administering the coup de
grace.
Given the ruling National Party's current unpopularity among whites -
especially farmers, who are traditionally ultra-conservative - this could
prove a serious political blow to the reform process.
But the alternative - numerous bankruptcies - could have a serious knock-on
effect in several areas. Farm labourers, most of them black, could lose
their jobs; with about 1m employed in farming overall, this could be a
severe problem. Businesses in rural towns are already suffering and more
could fold because of drought.
Millions of black subsistence farmers will also be victims of drought, with
the charity Operation Hunger warning that hunger could turn to starvation
soon in many rural areas.
Farmers say abnormally low rainfall and unusually high daytime temperatures
have just compounded the already precarious financial situation of many.
They complain of deteriorating terms of trade, noting that an imported
tractor which cost the equivalent of 191 tonnes of maize in 1985, had risen
to cost the equivalent of 347 tonnes by 1989-90.
Farm debt is another serious problem, with farmers struggling to repay debts
of nearly R16bn at interest rates of over 20 per cent. Low agricultural
output will depress overall economic activity, slowing South Africa's
recovery from a three-year recession. Real gross domestic product has been
forecast to rise by 1.5 per cent this year, though that figure could prove
much too optimistic if the worst drought predictions are borne out.
",14,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
142,"
As the summer draws to its close, Zimbabwe's farmers are counting the cost
of what for most of them is the worst drought they have ever experienced.
Over the country as a whole, rainfall has been less than half the seasonal
average; in many southern and eastern areas, it has been between a tenth and
a third of normal levels.
Crop production has been devastated, with the exception of drought-resistant
tobacco, where output has risen 6 per cent to 180m kg. Maize deliveries to
the state-owned grain marketing board will fall by 90 per cent this year to
60,000 tonnes, from more than 600,000 tonnes last year and an annual average
of more than 1m tonnes in the late 1980s.
Cotton deliveries are forecast at less than 90,000 tonnes, down from 205,000
tonnes in 1991, soyabeans at 30,000 tonnes (133,000 tonnes last year), while
winter wheat production is expected to fall to less than a third of normal
levels. In the low veld, where rains have been below normal since 1989,
sugar production has come to a halt, turning Zimbabwe from a substantial
exporter into a net importer.
At ZDollars 3.7bn (Pounds 410m) last year, agriculture accounted for almost
20 per cent of gross domestic product, though in real terms, it was 8 per
cent below the mid-1980s peak. Flue-cured tobacco accounts for just over
half of this, and while there is likely to be some modest growth in the
value of its output this year, the rest, with the exceptions of beef and
horticulture will fall catastrophically; so much so that, in real terms,
farm output in 1992 is projected to slump to its lowest levels for 30 years.
The impact on the economy will be devastating. Growth is forecast to decline
from 3.6 per cent last year to between minus 4 and minus 5 per cent in 1992.
Following last year's 45 per cent devaluation of the Zimbabwean dollar,
exports of farm produce in US dollar terms will be sharply lower, with
tobacco earnings of less than USDollars 500m, compared with Dollars 520m in
1991 (28 per cent of total exports). The collapse of sugar, cotton, and
maize exports and reduced foreign earnings from coffee and tea will cost the
country at least Dollars 150m (10 per cent of exports) over the next 12
months.
At the same time, the country will need to import at least Dollars 350m
worth of maize, wheat, sugar and possibly, later in the year, dairy
products.
After allowing for some reduction in other imports and higher exports of
manufactures and some minerals, the balance of payments impact will exceed
Dollars 300m  - at the very least  - pushing the current account deficit
above Dollars 1bn, or 20 per cent of GDP.
Financing this will be difficult given similar emergency food aid demands in
the region from Angola, Malawi, Mozambique and Zambia. The traditional
suppliers of maize to these countries  - South Africa and Zimbabwe  - will
be importing up to 7m tonnes themselves this year (5m tonnes for South
Africa and 2m tonnes for Zimbabwe).
Compensatory funding will be available from the International Monetary Fund,
but when this and other aid commitments are taken into account there is
certain to be an unfilled gap in the region, which for Zimbabwe will mean
diverting other aid funds and export earnings to pay for food.
Transport poses an even more formidable challenge than financing. The entire
southern African region will need an estimated 10m tonnes of food imports
this year. Zimbabwe's needs are put at about 2m tonnes of maize and 500,000
tonnes of wheat, sugar and other products, while Malawi will need at least
1m tonnes and Zambia more than 800,000 tonnes. The port of Beira in
Mozambique is expected to handle a minimum of 600,000 tonnes of this
traffic, while the Zambians expect to bring in some of their requirements
from the Tanzanian port of Dar es Salaam.
But the main burden will fall on South Africa, which has dedicated the ports
of Cape Town, Port Elizabeth and East London to regional food imports.
Initially, Spoornet, the South African railways, will run two liner trains
daily, each carrying 700 tonnes of food, though the frequency will increase
later. Zimbabwe's authorities will have to grapple with the problems either
of running the trains through to the main distribution centres, such as
Harare and Bulawayo, or transferring the maize to the Zimbabwe rail and road
systems at the Beit Bridge border.
While transport industry officials expect Spoornet to cope, there are doubts
as to the capacity of the regional systems in Malawi, Mozambique, Zambia
and, to a lesser degree, Zimbabwe.
In addition to its direct impact on agriculture, the drought will have
far-reaching consequences for the Zimbabwean economy. The reduced water flow
through the Kafue Gorge in neighbouring Zambia has forced Lusaka to suspend
electricity exports to Zimbabwe, which next month will impose a 20 per cent
electric power cut. This will have serious repercussions on mining and
manufacturing, with mining sources warning that output and exports could
fall by as a much as a fifth.
Some mines are also in difficulty because of the water situation, while
mineral exports could be jeopardised by transport congestion.
The country's textile and clothing industry  - the main exporter of
manufactured goods  - has warned of production cutbacks and lay-offs unless
it is allowed to import cotton this year. The banks, already under pressure
to contain lending as part of the government's on-off credit squeeze, will
be forced to carry farmers' overdrafts through until the 1993 harvest. Next
year's crop and livestock production will remain below average  - even if
good rains fall  - as early plantings will be reduced because of a lack of
irrigation. After a drought-induced surge this year caused by destocking,
beef production will fall sharply as cattlemen rebuild their herds. The
dairy sector, like maize, was in crisis before the drought, because of the
government's producer price policy, which has pushed farmers into export
crops (such as tobacco), horticulture and even game farming.
At best, it will take the industry until 1994-95 to regain average
production levels of the late 1980s, while the economy as a whole is
unlikely to recover fully from the drought of 1992 for at least two years.
",14,"[ 0.05147646  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
143,"     ""They're going to begin dying like bloody flies,"" said Ed Rist, head of
CARE's East Africa unit. ""I don't think we've seen anything quite like this."";
   Even as Africa slips into what could become the worst human disaster in its
history, there is debate about whether the United States should aggressively
intervene or offer assistance with political conditions attached.;    And a
spate of disasters worldwide is sending attention and humanitarian aid
elsewhere.;    In Latin America, more than 160,000 cholera cases have been
reported, including 1,203 deaths. On the Turkey-Iraq border, thousands of
Kurdish families still bury their dead and struggle to survive.;    In
Bangladesh, rescue workers continue to find drowned babies lashed to uprooted
trees, tied on by parents who wanted to protect their young from the cyclone
that devastated the country.;    ""Interest in a disaster is contingent on
media coverage,"" said Alex deWaal, associate director of London-based Africa
Watch. ""It's become a bit of a circus. When there is coverage, politicians
take an active interest and it becomes a policy issue. You're not seeing that
coverage in Africa yet."";    Other famines there, most recently in the mid-
and late 1980s, focused the attention of Westerners with the media's shocking
images of the crisis, including skeletal children suckling at their mothers'
dry breasts.;    Such photos of the current crisis are hard to come by because
of the lack of media coverage.;    ""By the time we see the kind of pictures
that would motivate people to act, it will be too late,"" said Peter Laugharn,
coordinator for Save the Children's Horn of Africa program.;    Already,
however, hundreds of Africans in Sudan, Somalia and Ethiopia may be on the
verge of death by starvation, relief workers say. Because of internal
government opposition, civil war and an undeveloped infrastructure, delivering
food supplies and obtaining accurate numbers are difficult and sometimes
impossible, they say.;    ""We know there are places almost out of food,"" said
Rist.;    Just as the need is exploding, however, resources of relief programs
such as CARE are decreasing, according to reports from the General Accounting
Office and the Committee on Refugees.;    The United States remains the
world's biggest aid donor, contributing more than $250 million last year. And
some in Congress are trying to guarantee that money and the supplies it buys
get to their proper destination.;    A comprehensive hunger bill, for example,
was introduced by Rep. Tony Hall, D-Ohio, chairman of the Select Committee on
Hunger. The bill would make it a human rights violation to use food as a
weapon, said a staff member. It would authorize U.N. intervention if a country
blocked aid from its population. Several African governments, including Sudan,
have been accused in the past of doing just that.;    Human rights violations
outlined in reports by Africa Watch and Amnesty International have led some
people to suggest that the United States and United Nations should attach
conditions to humanitarian aid. Otherwise, they say, food often is given to
soldiers, who in turn keep oppressive governments in power.;    Although
officials at the Agency for International Development won't confirm it, relief
workers say the agency diverted a shipment of food from Mozambique until the
country promised the food would be delivered to its hungry population instead
of to the army.  ",14,"[ 0.52557379  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
144,"     Rand said that Americans who live on or near the base would drive or be
bused to the U.S-operated Subic Bay Naval Base, about an hour's drive to the
southwest. The evacuation was to take four hours, he said.;    There was no
indication how long the Americans would stay, but they were ordered to take
along important papers and three days worth of food, water and clothing.;   
Philippines officials earlier had ordered the evacuation of more than 11,000
people from about 20 villages near the volcano, about 60 miles northwest of
Manila, after a series of small eruptions began Friday. No injuries were
reported over the weekend.;    Raymundo Punongbayan, director of the
Philippine Institute of Volcanology and Seismology, said, however, that two
moderate eruptions shortly before 3 p.m. Sunday appeared to signal a larger
explosion.;    ""We're expecting a major eruption,"" he said in a telephone
interview early today. ""We're just at the beginning stage of eruptions. We're
expecting many, many more."";    Punongbayan said that the 4,795-foot-high
volcano was spewing gases up to 1,800 degrees, thick black ash, boulders and
rock fragments in two fast-moving streams from two vents on the western side
of the lower summit.;    ""It's very dangerous,"" he said. ""Anything along its
path will be destroyed."";    Clouds and ashes;  Sunday's eruptions sent a
dense cloud of steam and ash billowing thousands of feet above rice paddies
that are lush green from an impending harvest. Heavy black clouds shrouded the
mountain, and a blanket of gray ash covered nearby fields. Debris reportedly
was sprayed as far as the South China Sea, 20 miles to the west.;    Villagers
from a 12-mile radius of the mountain fled the area on foot and water buffalo,
and aboard crowded trucks and jitneys. The Philippines Red Cross said 11,024
people, including local Aeta aborigines, were evacuated to 18 disaster relief
centers set up at area schools, but officials said that many villagers stayed
behind to protect their animals and farms from looters.;    Rand said the
evacuation of Clark was ordered ""due to a slight increase of volcanic
activity"" overnight. All U.S. Air Force planes had moved from the base to Cubi
Point Naval Air Station near Subic on Sunday, and infants in the base's
neo-natal hospital and other patients had been flown out.;    Evacuation
rehearsal;  All military personnel at Clark, home of the 13th Air Force, were
recalled to the base Sunday afternoon, and U.S. officials ordered local
Americans to pack bags and rehearse evacuation procedures.;    ""People are
pretty calm,"" said one American woman who lives on the base. ""People are
prepared."";    Rand said that a minimal number of troops would remain at Clark
to guard the facility and maintain essential services. Marines from Subic as
well as Philippines and U.S. military police were deployed along the road to
provide security.;    The volcano began showing signs of activity in April for
the first time in 600 years, and last week it began belching small amounts of
steam and smoke. Seismologists reported a marked increase in volcanic tremors
last week, with intense seismic quakes on the mountain Friday.;     Last
eruption;  Mount Pinatubo last erupted in 1380, 141 years before Ferdinand
Magellan, a Portuguese explorer flying the flag of Spain, first reached the
islands in search of spices.;    There are about 21 active and 200 dormant
volcanoes in the Philippines, which sits on the ""Ring of Fire"" that circles
the Pacific Ocean. Scientists said there was no connection, however, to the
eruption last Monday of Japan's Mount Unzen, which killed at least 37 people
on Kyushu Island. A fresh flow of lava, gas and debris erupted there Saturday,
setting 73 homes on fire.;    Nearly 10,000 people have left their homes at
the foot of Mount Unzen, and two naval ships stood by to take residents
farther away in case a new eruption sent lava, hot rocks and ash over a yet
wider area.  ",15,"[ 0.52649099  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
145,"     If it does erupt, the deadly hot ash produced by the volcano could sweep
across adjoining Clark Air Base, he said. Also in peril are the 350,000
residents of Angeles City, where the air base is located, about 50 miles north
of Manila.;    Even if the volcano does not erupt, the threat of eruption is
likely to keep the base closed for weeks at least, Lipman said.;    Scientists
doubt it's more than coincidence that the eruption is occurring at the same
time as the Mount Unzen volcano in Japan, he said.;    The five USGS
scientists are among the few remaining people at Clark Air Base, which was
evacuated along with thousands of Filipinos living near the volcano.;    The
researchers, along with 10 Filipino scientists and their equipment, today 
moved to a bunker on the east edge of the air base, 12 miles from the volcano,
where they should be safe from ash avalanches.;    Mount Pinatubo is typical
of hundreds of volcanoes that make up the ""Ring of Fire"" on the Pacific coasts
of Asia and the Americas. (These volcanoes -- including Mount Lassen in the
Sierra Nevada, and Mount Rainier and Mount St. Helens in the Cascade Range --
arise where one of the earth's immense crust plates is slowly diving beneath
another.);    Pinatubo's last eruption, 600 years ago, is thought to have
yielded at least as much molten rock -- half a cubic kilometer -- as Mount St.
Helens did when it erupted in 1980. Until volcanologists' attention was drawn
to it by a cluster of earthquakes beneath the volcano this spring, it had not
been studied well.;    Waves of hot ash;  Other recent volcanoes that erupted
on the same scale were El Chichon in Mexico in 1983 and Nevado del Ruiz in
Colombia in 1985.;    If it does have a massive eruption, Pinatubo's primary
means of causing death and destruction would be hellish avalanches of hot ash
-- 1,000 degrees or more, flowing and billowing at up to 100 mph, engulfing
and searing all in their path.;    ""In the worst case, a really big eruption,
all of Clark Air Force Base could be covered"" with glowing ash, Lipman said.; 
  Just being caught in a cloud of ash blowing off the avalanche is fatal. That
is what killed 38 people in Japan last week.;    Risk to planes;  Such ash
also would wreak havoc with the engines of planes at the air base, Lipman
said.;    Planes flying through clouds of volcanic ash -- indistinguishable on
radar from rain clouds -- run the risk of having their engines stalled by the
grit.;    So far, the winds have blown ash away from the base. But winds of
the summer monsoon weather pattern, expected to begin any day, would send ash
directly toward the base.;    The volcano's activity -- measured by
seismometers detecting slight earthquakes in its molten rock plumbing system
-- is increasing in a way that suggests a large eruption is imminent, Lipman
said.;    The scientists also are monitoring tiltmeters on the volcano's
slopes, to watch it swell as magma builds inside. On clear days they fly above
the crater to measure sulfur emissions.;    No link to Japan;  Their
predictions might be a false alarm -- the volcano may have done its worst
already. But it would take several weeks of declining quakes and sulfur
emissions before scientists would be reasonably confident that the military
could return to the base.;    Volcanologists know of no reason the volcano's
activity could be linked to the volcano in Japan, which is of comparable
size.;    ""No reputable scientist I know of"" is drawing a connection between
the two, Lipman said.;    More than 500 volcanoes have erupted in historical
time, he noted. ""Two out of 500 is no big deal.""  ",15,"[ 0.55637651  0.00986183  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
146,"     A huge cloud of ash-laden steam rose up to 11,500 feet above the volcano
today, spreading ash over a six-mile radius, the Philippine Institute of
Vulcanology and Seismology said.;    If it does erupt, the deadly hot ash
produced by the volcano could sweep across adjoining Clark Air Base, he said.
Also in peril are the 350,000 residents of Angeles City, where the air base is
located, about 50 miles north of Manila.;    Even if the volcano does not
erupt, the threat of eruption is likely to keep the base closed for weeks at
least, Lipman said.;    Scientists doubt it's more than coincidence that the
eruption is occurring at the same time as the Mount Unzen volcano in Japan, he
said.;    The five USGS scientists are among the few remaining people at Clark
Air Base, which was evacuated along with thousands of Filipinos living near
the volcano.;    The researchers, along with 10 Filipino scientists and their
equipment, today  moved to a bunker on the east edge of the air base, 12 miles
from the volcano, where they should be safe from ash avalanches.;    Mount
Pinatubo is typical of hundreds of volcanoes that make up the ""Ring of Fire""
on the Pacific coasts of Asia and the Americas. (These volcanoes -- including
Mount Lassen in Shasta County, and Mount Rainier and Mount St. Helens in
Washington, all in the Cascade Range -- arise where one of the earth's immense
crust plates is slowly diving beneath another.);    Pinatubo's last eruption,
600 years ago, is thought to have yielded at least as much molten rock -- half
a cubic kilometer -- as Mount St. Helens did when it erupted in 1980. Until
volcanologists' attention was drawn to it by a cluster of earthquakes beneath
the volcano this spring, it had not been studied well.;    Other recent
volcanoes that erupted on the same scale were El Chichon in Mexico in 1983 and
Nevado del Ruiz in Colombia in 1985.;    If it does have a massive eruption,
Pinatubo's primary means of causing death and destruction would be hellish
avalanches of hot ash -- 1,000 degrees or more, flowing and billowing at up to
100 mph, engulfing and searing all in their path.;    ""In the worst case, a
really big eruption, all of Clark Air Force Base could be covered"" with
glowing ash, Lipman said.;    Just being caught in a cloud of ash blowing off
the avalanche is fatal. That is what killed 38 people in Japan last week.;   
Such ash also would wreak havoc with the engines of planes at the air base,
Lipman said.;    Planes flying through clouds of volcanic ash --
indistinguishable on radar from rain clouds -- run the risk of having their
engines stalled by the grit.;    So far, the winds have blown ash away from
the base. But winds of the summer monsoon weather pattern, expected to begin
any day, would send ash directly toward the base.;    The volcano's activity
-- measured by seismometers detecting slight earthquakes in its molten rock
plumbing system -- is increasing in a way that suggests a large eruption is
imminent, Lipman said.;    The scientists also are monitoring tiltmeters on
the volcano's slopes, to watch it swell as magma builds inside. On clear days
they fly above the crater to measure sulfur emissions.;    Their predictions
might be a false alarm -- the volcano may have done its worst already. But it
would take several weeks of declining quakes and sulfur emissions before
scientists would be reasonably confident that the military could return to the
base.;    Volcanologists know of no reason the volcano's activity could be
linked to the volcano in Japan, which is of comparable size.;    ""No reputable
scientist I know of"" is drawing a connection between the two, Lipman said.;   
More than 500 volcanoes have erupted in historical time, he noted. ""Two out of
500 is no big deal.""  ",15,"[ 0.55093721  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
147,"     Roads nearby were clogged with cars, jeeps and buses as thousands of
terrified residents fled. Church bells pealed in the city of Angeles, adjacent
to the air base, warning the more than 300,000 residents to seek shelter.;   
Reporters at the scene said the blast created a greenish-gray mushroom cloud
""like an atomic bomb."" They said they heard three blasts, and then a huge
gray-greenish cloud burst from the crater, blocking out the sun.;    There
were no immediate reports of injuries. Philippine officials had evacuated
about 19,000 villagers in recent days, but others stayed in scattered hamlets
to tend to their animals and farms.;    All telephone lines to Clark were
down, and Armed Forces Television was unable to broadcast after at least three
eruptions began at 8:51 a.m. (5:51 p.m. PDT), following two smaller emissions
before dawn. Another eruption occured shortly before noon.;    Scientists said
the volcano had plenty of built-up magma and even more severe eruptions could
come later.;    ""Most probably there will be more eruptions,"" said
seismologist Julio Sabit.;    Raymundo Punongbayan, director of the Philippine
Institute of Vulcanology and Seismology, said everyone within a 12-mile radius
should evacuate, or even within 18 miles, ""to be safe."";    'Dark mushroom'; 
""The smoke is very thick, like a dark mushroom in the sky,"" Gus Abelgas, a
reporter for ABS-CBN television, said in a broadcast from Botolan, near the
volcano's western slopes. ""It's just like what we saw in Hiroshima."";    Other
reporters described panic as people scampered for safety with their belongings
and livestock.;    Most of the Americans stationed at Clark were transferred
to the Subic Bay Naval Base and were expected to remain there until the danger
from the volcano was past.;    In volcano's path;    Punongbayan said the site
where Clark is located was in the path of the volcanic flow from Mount
Pinatubo during its last major eruption, in the 14th century.;    Rollie
Rimando, another volcanologist, said a major eruption could hurl debris and
poisonous gases in a 12-mile radius, affecting both the base and parts of
Angeles.;    On Tuesday, a cloud of ash-laden steam rose up to 11,500 feet
above the volcano but suddenly dissipated in the afternoon, only to revive
again 20 minutes later. The area on the western slope of the mountain was
covered in a thin layer of ash.;    Ash began falling Monday on villages west
of Angeles near the slopes of Mount Pinatubo, prompting authorities to close
roads there. But Angeles police said Tuesday that no one was evacuating the
area.;    Some refused to go;    A Philippine police major identified only as
Major Reyes said he visited a remote settlement near the volcano after the
blast and tried to talk a handful of residents into leaving. But they refused
to abandon their livestock and water buffaloes, known as carabaos.;    ""If our
carabaos die, we'll die with them,"" the officer quoted them as saying.;   
Col. Jose Balajadia, chief of the Philippine military's Clark Air Base
Command, said Tuesday that troops remaining at the base had been issued gas
masks in case ash falls over the installation.;    At the Subic station,
newcomers from Clark tried to sort out their finances, adjust to cramped
living and otherwise cope with dislocation. Finance officers issued partial
pay to personnel who had to leave before having a chance to go to the bank.;  
 Smaller than anticipated;  The eruption appeared to be smaller than that
anticipated by Peter Lipman, a U.S. Geological Survey scientist in Menlo Park,
who on Monday had said an eruption as massive as that of Mount St. Helens
could occur any day.;    After the eruption, Lipman tried unsuccessfully to
telephone five USGS researchers monitoring the volcano from Clark Air Base.;  
 In a conversation with Lipman half an hour before the eruption, the
researchers said the volcano had had small eruptions earlier in the day. At
the time of the phone call, they were planning a helicopter ride above the
volcano to survey the size of the lava dome inside its crater.;    There are
about 21 active and 200 dormant volcanoes in the Philippines. The last major
eruption was the Taal volcano, about 50 miles south of Manila, in 1965. That
explosion killed about 200 people.; IFYOU'RE INTERESTED; The Filipino American
Chamber of Commerce of Santa Clara County is raising funds for evacuating
residents who live near the erupting volcano. Donations of any kind may be
sent to the Filipino American Chamber of Commerce, Santa Clara County, 72 N.
Fifth St., Suite 12, San Jose, Calif. 95112. Phone: 283-0833.  ",15,"[ 0.55371469  0.01797047  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
148,"     Residents of nearby Angeles panicked at the roar of the initial blast, and
thousands of people packed roads after a huge gray-greenish mushroom cloud
burst from the volcano and turned day to night.;    At a refugee center in
Olongapo, 35 miles southwest of the volcano, survivors told of the sky growing
dark, then of hearing a tremendous explosion followed by a rain of ash.;   
""Stones as big as my head were falling down from the mountains,"" said Rolly
Soria, 18.;    ""There was panic everywhere,"" said Manuel Romualdo, who fled
with his wife, five children, a cat and a dog. ""Children were crying. We had
to grab whatever we could."";    Scientists warned of more, possibly larger
eruptions from the 4,795-foot volcano, which was dormant for six centuries
until it began spewing steam in April.;    ""This could only be the beginning,""
said Raymundo Punongbayan, director of the Philippine Institute of Volcanology
and Seismology.;    Tens miles to the east, hundreds of Americans fled Clark
Air Base, home to 15,000 American military personnel and their families. Most
of the base's residents had been evacuated Monday.;    Clark did not appear
threatened by volcanic flow, and there were no immediate reports of
casualties.;    Seismologists said searing gas, ash and molten rock raced at
great speed down the mountain's western and northern slopes and into the
Marella, Maraunot and O'Donnell rivers.;    About 3,000 Aeta tribesman,
descendants of the original inhabitants of the Philippines, fled the slopes of
Mount Pinatubo.;    People scampered for safety with their belongings and
livestock over roads slippery with ash fall. Refugees wore cardboard boxes to
protect themselves from the ash.;    ""They were stunned by the eruption,""
reporter Bert Basa said by telephone from Angeles. ""Their faces turned ashen,
and it looked like their hair was standing on end."";    Ash was so thick in
the air that at noon, motorists were driving with their headlights on and
wipers operating to clear the windshields of volcanic debris. Bits of ash
wafted across the roads as if along a windy beach.;    A photographer who
circled the volcano in an airplane said an aerial gunnery range at Clark was
covered with ash, as were mountains in the Zambales range, normally lush,
green tropical peaks that now looked like the Alps in winter.;    Today's
eruptions began at 8:40 a.m. with a tremendous blast that sent forth a
mushroom cloud. It was followed by a second explosion a few minutes later and
a third, smaller blast at 11:49 a.m.;    The huge plume 12 1/2 miles high
could be seen in Manila, 60 miles to the south, and reporters at the scene
said it blocked out the sun. The cloud drifted westward into the South China
Sea.;    Seismologists said the volcano had plenty of built-up magma and even
more severe eruptions could come later.;    ""The crisis has not ended,"" said
Punongbayan, of the Philippine Institute of Vulcanology and Seismology. ""We
have signs that the volcano is preparing for another one."";    Punongbayan
warned people within a 12-mile radius of Pinatubo to flee.;    ""The smoke is
very thick like a dark mushroom in the sky,"" television reporter Gus Abelgas
said in a broadcast from Botolan, near the volcano's western slopes. ""It's
just like what we saw in Hiroshima."";    President Corazon Aquino visited
refugee centers near Angeles briefly before returning to Manila for
independence day celebrations.;    Moments after the first explosion, sirens
wailed at Clark Air Base, and 600 of the 1,500 Americans remaining there fled
eastward to safety. Air Force spokesman Lt. Col. Ron Rand said 900 Americans,
mostly security personnel, remained at the 130,000-acre base.;    Clark is one
of the biggest U.S. bases overseas. Punongbayan said Tuesday that the site was
in the path of the volcanic flow from Mount Pinatubo during its last major
eruption, in 1380.;    The Pentagon, which is trying to negotiate a new
contract with Manila for the base, said it can work around the temporary loss
of Clark.;    The Americans who fled Clark with a few belongings on Monday
moved in with sailors and their families at Subic Bay naval base, 50 miles to
the southwest.;    Although the Air Force left Clark, Philippine authorities
have not ordered a general evacuation of Angeles, a city of more than 300,000
people adjacent to the base.;    When Mount Pinatubo erupted today, church
bells pealed to sound the alarm and many people froze in their tracks with
fear. Many scampered for safety indoors.;    About 19,000 Filipinos had
earlier been evacuated from three provinces near the volcano's slopes and were
housed in about 25 makeshift evacuation centers outside the projected danger
zone.;    Officials said more were evacuated after today's eruption but they
could provide no new figures.;    In the Sapang Bato area of Angeles, the city
district nearest the volcano, just 2,000 of 13,000 residents had been
evacuated as of Monday, officials said.;    Reporters visiting the village
today found it abandoned except for a few chickens and cattle. Houses were
padlocked, but the explosion had shattered some windows.;    Private jeep and
bus companies were ordered to the area today to pick up stragglers. About 10
people in Moraza, a village on the western slope, were refusing to leave,
relief officials said. They told rescuers that they would not leave their
livestock and if the animals die, ""we will die with them."";    On April 2,
Pinatubo produced a small hydrothermal explosion caused by underground water
meeting hot rocks deep inside.;    On June 3, the volcano spewed ash in a mild
eruption. That same day, 4,452-foot Mount Unzen in Japan erupted with an
explosion of superheated gas, ashes and rocks that killed 38 people.;    A
larger flow days later razed dozens of houses.;    Experts say there is
apparently no connection between Unzen and Pinatubo.;    There are about 21
active and 200 dormant volcanoes in the Philippines. The last major eruption
was the Taal volcano, about 50 miles south of Manila, in 1965. That explosion
killed about 200 people.  ",15,"[ 0.66389023  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
149,"     Residents of nearby Angeles panicked when a huge, gray-greenish mushroom
cloud burst from the volcano and turned day to night. Thousands of fleeing
people packed roads.;    ""Stones as big as my head were falling down from the
mountains,"" said Rolly Soria, 18.;    ""There was panic everywhere,"" said
Manuel Romualdo. ""Children were crying. We had to grab whatever we could."";   
Scientists warned of more, possibly larger eruptions from the 4,795-foot
volcano, which was dormant for six centuries until it began spewing steam in
April.;    ""This could be only the beginning,"" said Raymundo Punongbayan,
director of the Philippine Institute of Vulcanology and Seismology.;   
Angeles, a city of 300,000, is adjacent to Clark Air Base, but authorities had
not ordered a general evacuation there.;    Hundreds of Americans fled Clark,
home to 15,000 American military personnel and their families. Most of the
base's residents had been evacuated Monday. The base did not appear
immediately threatened by volcanic flow.;    Seismologists said searing gas,
ash and molten rock raced at great speed down the mountain's western and
northern slopes. They said most of the debris flowed into the Marella,
Maraunot and O'Donnell rivers and that there had been no reports that property
or homes had been damaged.;    About 3,000 Aeta tribesman, descendants of the
original inhabitants of the Philippines, fled the slopes of Mount Pinatubo.;  
 At a refugee center in Olongapo, 35 miles southwest of the volcano, survivors
told of the sky growing dark, then of hearing a tremendous explosion followed
by a rain of ash.;    They said they scampered for safety with their
belongings and livestock over roads slippery with ashfall, many wearing
cardboard boxes to protect themselves from the ash.;    ""They were stunned by
the eruption,"" television reporter Bert Basa said. ""Their faces turned ashen,
and it looked like their hair was standing on end."";    Ash was so thick in
the air that at noon, motorists were driving with their headlights and
windshield wipers on.;    A photographer who circled the volcano in an
airplane said an aerial gunnery range at Clark was covered with ash, as were
mountains in the Zambales range, normally lush, green tropical peaks.;   
Today's first eruption began at 8:40 a.m. with a tremendous blast that sent
forth a mushroom cloud. It was followed by a second explosion a few minutes
later and a third, smaller blast at 11:49 a.m.;    The huge plume could be
seen in Manila, 60 miles to the south, and reporters at the scene said it
blocked out the sun. The cloud drifted westward into the South China Sea.;   
Two more thundering explosions rocked Mount Pinatubo late today.;    The
Philippine Institute of Vulcanology and Seismology said the explosions
occurred at 10:52 p.m. and 11:05 p.m. The second explosion sent a plume of ash
and steam 80,000 feet into the sky.;    Shortly after midnight, a sixth
explosion was reported.;    Seismologists said the volcano had plenty of
built-up magma and even more severe eruptions could come later.;    ""The
crisis has not ended yet,"" said Punongbayan, of the Philippine Institute of
Vulcanology and Seismology. ""We have signs that the volcano is preparing for
another one."";    Punongbayan warned people within a 15-mile radius of
Pinatubo to flee.;    ""The smoke is very thick like a dark mushroom in the
sky,"" television reporter Gus Abelgas said in a broadcast from Botolan, near
the volcano's western slopes. He said strong tremors preceded the nighttime
eruptions and continued afterward.;    President Corazon Aquino visited
refugee centers near Angeles briefly before returning to Manila for
independence day celebrations.;    The Americans who fled Clark with a few
belongings Monday moved in with sailors and their families at Subic Bay naval
base, 50 miles to the southwest.;    Clark is one of the biggest U.S. bases
overseas. Punongbayan said Tuesday that the site was in the path of the
volcanic flow from Mount Pinatubo during its last major eruption, in 1380.;   
About 19,000 Filipinos earlier had been evacuated from three provinces near
the volcano's slopes and were housed in 25 makeshift evacuation centers
outside the projected danger zone.;    Officials said more were evacuated
after today's eruption.;    About 10 people in Moraza, a village on the
western slope of the mountain, were refusing to leave, relief officials said.
They told rescuers that they would not leave their livestock and if the
animals die, ""we will die with them."";    On April 2, Pinatubo produced a
small hydrothermal explosion caused by underground water meeting hot rocks
deep inside. On June 3, the volcano spewed ash in a mild eruption.;    That
same day, 4,452-foot Mount Unzen in Japan erupted with an explosion of
superheated gas, ashes and rocks that killed 38 people.;    Experts say there
is apparently no connection between Unzen and Pinatubo.;    There are about 21
active and 200 dormant volcanoes in the Philippines. The last major eruption
was the Taal volcano, about 50 miles south of Manila, in 1965. That explosion
killed about 200 people.  ",15,"[ 0.65596235  0.00787244  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
150,"     ""He's someone who eats it up,"" said Randy White, Harlow's friend and
colleague at the U.S. Geological Survey in Menlo Park. ""He's able to totally
concentrate in those sorts of situations."";    The eruptions at Mount Pinatubo
finally gave Harlow the chance to put his skills and experience to work saving
lives. When Harlow went to Mount St. Helens in Washington state in 1980,
geologists were still learning how to read the telltale earthquakes.
Bureaucratic delays kept Harlow from arriving at Nevado de Ruiz in Colombia
until a day after its 1985 eruption. Harlow and his team predicted the 1989
eruption of Redoubt Volcano in Alaska, but few lives were threatened in the
remote area.;    Three weeks ago, Harlow joined a team of five U.S. Geological
Survey scientists who worked with 10 Filipino scientists to try to forecast
the eruption of the volcano, which had been dormant for about 600 years. One
crew gathered evidence of Pinatubo's earlier eruptions as clues to its
potential power.;    Harlow's team set up a ring of a half-dozen seismographs
around the volcano to measure the deep tremors caused by molten lava slowly
pushing to the surface and the shallower tremors that follow when the eruption
is imminent.;    Pinatubo followed an almost textbook pattern over the past
six weeks. Gradually building earthquakes were followed by the release of gas,
the buildup of magma and finally the huge explosions that sent ash clouds more
than 75,000 feet into the sky and sent avalanches of hot ash pouring down the
narrow valleys west of the volcano.;    Philippine and U.S. Air Force
officials ordered evacuations Monday.;    Since late Tuesday, Harlow's
colleagues have not been able to get through on the single phone line into the
bunker at Clark Air Base, but do not believe the team is in danger. The
eruption is on the west side of the mountain, with the summit shielding Clark.
Prevailing winds are also away from the base.;    ""I'm not so concerned,"" said
Pauline Lord, Harlow's wife. ""My husband is not unaccustomed to danger."";   
Lord said Harlow's love affair with volcanoes began when he was an
undergraduate student at Dartmouth College and his professor took the entire
class to observe an eruption in Guatemala.;    ""He's somebody who's fascinated
by that kind of energy,"" said Lord, a psychotherapist who has accompanied
Harlow to several volcanoes. ""It's wonderful to see that lava sloshing
around."";    Harlow's 5-year-old daughter, Megan, is not worried about her
father.;    ""She knows Daddy is in the Philippines and that he's fixing a
volcano,"" Lord said.  ",15,"[ 0.44657715  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
151,"     Typhoon Yunya, packing 80 mph winds, slammed into the eastern coast of
Luzon island, which includes Mount Pinatubo, early in the day. But it quickly
weakened to a tropical storm with 60 mph winds by the time it was centered
about 70 miles east of the volcano.;    Still, heavy rains churned up by the
typhoon drenched Manila and the provinces near the volcano, raising fears of
mudflows that could bury whole towns up to 25 miles away.;    Meanwhile,
President Corazon Aquino dismissed a British newspaper report that Americans
had warned her of possible radioactive contamination if the volcano damages
nuclear storage sites at Clark Air Base, abandoned Monday by nearly 15,000
Americans.;    The U.S. military began flying home hundreds of the 28,000
Americans who crowded onto Subic Bay Naval Base as a bizarre tropical blizzard
of thick volcanic ash caused power failures across the base Friday during a
third day of increasingly violent eruptions of Mount Pinatubo.;    Showers of
'mud drops';  ""It looks like it's snowing outside,"" said military spokeswoman
Capt. Kim Urie. Headlights and street lamps were turned on at midafternoon as
a ""dark, black cloud"" passed over the giant Navy base and dropped a gritty
rain of ""mud drops,"" she said.;    At least four people have died, 24 have
been hurt and four have been listed as missing since Pinatubo began erupting
Sunday, after lying dormant for six centuries, officials said. About 84,000
people, including Americans, have been evacuated.;    Police said 12 people
had been arrested for looting at Clark.;    Five explosions shook the mountain
early today, showering ash over a wide area and providing a spectacular
pre-dawn display of nature's fireworks against a backdrop of lightning and
rain.;    Friday, eight thunderous explosions shot a cloud of ash and steam
nearly 19 miles high.;    Friday's eruptions hurled ash over Clark, 10 miles
east of the volcano, and Subic, 25 miles southwest, where the Clark personnel
had been temporarily housed. Gray ash also fell in Manila, 60 miles south.;   
At Subic, base spokesman Robert Coble said generators had to be shut down from
time to time to clean out volcanic ash, plunging the base into darkness.;   
River temperatures rising;  Temperatures in local rivers were rising because
of the volcanic debris, officials said.;    After sunset, the volcano spewed
two streams of orange, glowing material from its crater in what scientists
thought was the first appearance of lava during the weeklong eruptions.;   
Raymundo Punongbayan, director of the Philippine Institute of Vulcanology and
Seismology, said Friday's blasts were part of a single eruption, the largest
since Mount Pinatubo awoke Sunday from its 600-year slumber.;    A British
newspaper, the Guardian, reported Thursday that the Americans declared a
nuclear alert at Clark late Wednesday and informed governments in Manila and
Hong Kong that ""a nuclear accident in the region was possible."" But Aquino
told reporters the story was ""baseless and purely fabricated."";    The United
States refuses to confirm or deny that it stores nuclear weapons in the
Philippines.;    Foreign Secretary Raul Manglapus also said the eruption
should have no effect on talks on the future of Clark and Subic, where leases
expire Sept. 16. The talks are deadlocked over compensation and the duration
of a new agreement.;    Punongbayan said Mount Pinatubo could remain active
for years if it follows the pattern of similar Philippine volcanoes. That
would leave Clark unusable.  ",15,"[ 0.53653728  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
152,"     The Mount Pinatubo volcano was slowly rousing from 600 years of sleep.;   
Two months ago, when the drama began, scientists knew almost nothing about
this drowsy Philippine giant, swaddled in thick jungle and ignored by the
hundreds of thousands of people living around its flanks.;    They didn't know
it had a habit of exploding with a force twice as great as the 1980 eruption
of Mount St. Helens in Washington -- or that the debris from these eruptions
had covered much of what was now Clark Air Base.;    But with the first small
signs of trouble, researchers went on alert, throwing a network of instruments
around the restless mountain. And in a few frenzied weeks of investigation,
they learned enough to recommend evacuation of some 84,000 people.;    The
warning came just in time. A series of violent eruptions has rocked the
mountain since Wednesday, blowing ash and pumice 80,000 feet in the air and
sifting volcanic grit over villages 90 miles away. At least 101 people have
been killed, 150,000 Filipinos have crowded into refugee centers in Manila and
20,000 American military dependents and civilian workers are being evacuated
from the country. U.S. officials said the damage may lead them to permanently
close Clark Air Base.;    On Monday, scientists said much of the pressure
inside the volcano had dissipated and the worst may be over.;    Although
Pinatubo never erupted into the cataclysmic blow-up that some had feared, the
damage and death toll from related earthquakes, mudslides and falling ash and
pumice could have been far higher had scientists not recommended evacuation.
The successful forecast points up just how far the science of volcanoes has
come in the past decade.;    The basics are the same. Researchers still use
seismometers and other instruments to measure the trembling, quaking and
bulging of the ground that often spell danger.;    But the technology has
improved immensely:;    (check) Instruments are cheaper and more expendable,
so they can be deployed where they will do the most good -- right in the path
of the volcano's fury.;    (check) The instruments continually beam data to
scientists who are waiting a safe distance away. Before, they had to visit
their instruments and collect the data by hand.;    (check) Information is
routinely analyzed by computer, allowing researchers to assess a situation
quickly -- and to develop computer models for predicting the behavior of
volcanoes.;    Researchers have also made strides in interpreting what they
see. ""Our biggest improvement has been in our own heads,"" said Peter Lipman, a
volcanologist with the U.S. Geological Survey in Menlo Park.;    These skills
were honed in a series of volcanic disasters that rocked the world over the
past decade.;    ""The 1980s was a very interesting decade because of the
number of eruptions that have occurred for which we have good monitoring
information,"" said Steven Brantley, a geologist with the survey's Cascades
Volcano Observatory in Vancouver, Wash. ""It was a rather remarkable decade,
really."";    Scientists say the eruption of Mount St. Helens, which killed 57
people and caused $1 billion in property damage, triggered a renaissance in
volcano research.;    It alerted the American public to volcano hazards and
prompted a tenfold increase in government spending for volcano research and
monitoring, said geologist Robert Tilling of USGS in Menlo Park.;    As a
result, the survey opened two new volcano observatories. One, in Washington,
keeps track of active volcanoes in the Cascades Range of the Pacific Northwest
and Northern California, including Mount St. Helens, Mount Rainier, Mount
Hood, Mount Baker, Mount Shasta and Mount Lassen. The second is in Alaska,
where Redoubt Volcano put on a spectacular show in 1989 and 1990. A third
observatory has been operating in Hawaii since 1912.;    American scientists
have since responded to a number of volcanic awakenings throughout the world,
from Galunggung in Indonesia to Nevado del Ruiz in Colombia, improving their
ability to quickly evaluate volcano hazards. Such a quick response is crucial
because only a few dozen of the world's 500 active volcanoes have been
adequately investigated and monitored.;    ""Now,"" Tilling said, ""we can go in
there and literally overnight set up a seismic network, and start getting data
within a day or two."";    The blossoming research has in turn spurred
development of cheaper and more rugged instruments.;    Take tiltmeters.;   
Like glorified carpenters' levels, they are used to measure the bulging and
tilting of the ground as magma muscles its way toward the surface.;    A
decade ago they cost thousands of dollars each. But after Mount St. Helens
blew, scientists looked for cheaper models. One was developed by James
Westphal, a well-known astronomer and gadgeteer at the California Institute of
Technology, who patterned it after an idea used in missile guidance systems.
Now tiltmeters are inexpensive enough to place in areas likely to get wiped
out in eruptions.;    The humble seismometer has also grown more useful as
scientists learn to better interpret what it's saying.;    ""Volcanoes are
probably the most complex structures you can find on this planet,"" said
Bernard Chouet, a seismologist at the USGS in Menlo Park.;    It's not unusual
for them to produce thousands of small earthquakes -- but those quakes can
have a variety of causes. Most are innocuous, caused by the cracking of rock
above pools of magma that, for the moment, aren't going anywhere. But others
are ominous, reflecting the surge of magma toward the surface in preparation
for an eruption.;    In the past few years, Chouet said, seismologists have
learned to recognize distinctive tremors that mean an eruption is on its way.
These patterns were successfully used to forecast the 1989 eruption of Redoubt
Volcano in Alaska, as well as the current eruptions at Pinatubo.;    But even
though volcano warnings have proved far more accurate than earthquake
forecasts, they're far from foolproof.;    Some volcanoes give virtually no
warning. Even when they do, the decision to evacuate is difficult and
expensive. In the Philippines, for instance, vandals looted parts of Clark Air
Base that were left unguarded. Factories and businesses shut down; crops and
livestock were left unattended.;    This time the evacuation paid off,
possibly averting a number of deaths. But it won't always. In the end, every
volcano is a rugged individualist, with its own distinct patterns of activity.
Some wake up, make threatening noises for weeks or months, then drift back to
sleep.;    The burden of deciding whether to warn the public weighs heavily on
scientists.;    Randall White, another seismologist with the USGS in Menlo
Park, recalled how he felt while working near the freezing summit of
Colombia's Nevado del Ruiz six years ago.;    Struggling to hear their
instruments above the noise of nearby broadcast towers, he and his colleagues
warned local officials that an eruption was on its way. But their warnings
were vain. For reasons that are still unclear, the officials did not order an
evacuation, and 22,000 people died after lava spewed from the volcano, melting
glaciers and forming devastating mudslides.;    ""I found it nerve-racking,""
White said. ""We were literally afraid to go to sleep at night, thinking that
some technician would get the interpretation (of the incoming data) wrong, and
a lot of people would die."";  Tools give clues that can save lives;    The
basic tools of volcano monitoring are cheaper and more portable than they were
10 years ago. Scientists can move in fast and set up instruments that
continually broadcast readings, which are then analyzed by computer. This
allows quicker evaluation of volcano hazards -- and forecasts that can save
lives.; 1. Surveying: Researchers measure the volcano, with optical
instruments or high-tech laser tools, to see if it is bulging or stretching as
a result of magma rising inside. They also put tiltmeters near the volcano's
vent to record changes in the slope of the ground.; 2. Pick and shovel:
Geologists dig through layers of old ash and lava to determine how often a
volcano erupted in the past -- a clue to what it might do in the future. The
thicker and more extensive the deposit, the bigger the eruption.; 3.
Seismometer: Measures ground shaking. Volcanoes often produce swarms of small
earthquakes. Researchers are learning to distinguish ordinary earthquakes from
those caused by magma rising toward the surface -- a sign of impending
eruption.; 4. Spectrometer: First developed to measure pollutants from factory
smokestacks, it is now also used to measure sulfur dioxide in the smoke
belched by volcanoes. Increasing levels of the gas may signal an impending
eruption. The amount of gas reflects the amount of magma beneath the volcano,
and thus the potential size of the eruption.;    Sources: Robert Tilling and
Steven Brantley, U.S. Geological Survey: "" The Earth,"" by Peter J. Smith.;
Reporting by Glennda Chui, graphic by Jenny Anderson and Kevin Boyd - Mercury
News.; (3 Drawings showing Laser, Pick, Seismometer and Spectrometer)  ",15,"[ 0.55554015  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
153,"     Her neighborhood was leveled. The Tolentinos and 100 other poor families
along the Albacan River in Angeles, a once-bustling city of 280,000 people in
the shadow of Mount Pinatubo, lost their homes Saturday in mudslides and
floods brought on by the volcano's powerful eruption.;    One resident, an
elderly man, drowned in the torrent of thick volcanic ash and rainwater.;   
Because of impassable roads and downed telephone lines, it was still
impossible Monday to determine the extent of the damage.;    The death toll
from the eruptions of Mount Pinatubo, combined with a series of earthquakes
and torrential rains, increased to more than 200, according to Philippine
television. The Philippine Red Cross said at least 101 people had been
killed.;    The government estimated damage to property and crops at about
$200 million.;    Most of the deaths occurred when houses and other buildings
collapsed under the weight of as much as eight inches of ash and sand spewed
from the rumbling crater.;    Hundreds of people across the island of Luzon
were reported missing, while hundreds of thousands of others have been left
homeless.;    As many as 150,000 people fleeing the volcano were said to be
crowding into evacuation centers Monday night in Manila, the capital, about 50
miles south of the volcano.;    Volcano scientists continued to express a
careful optimism. Raymondo Punongbayan, director of the Philippine Institute
of Volcanology and Seismology, said in an interview that while the volcano
remained a threat, the eruptions were ""simmering down"" and ""significant,
critical eruptions are probably over."";    Manila's domestic and international
airports were scheduled to reopen today, three days after they were closed
because of concern that ash from the volcano would damage jet engines.;   
Despite the optimism from scientists, however, the exodus of families fleeing
the volcano area continued late Monday as buses and trucks caked with gray ash
jammed roads leading into Manila. The government has set up more than 100
makeshift shelters in churches, schools, army camps and gymnasiums in the
capital.;    In the wake of the eruptions, Filipinos are facing monumental
tasks. Food and clean drinking water were running low in the central and
southwestern portions of the main Luzon island, which bore the brunt of the
volcano's week of fury.;    Angeles was without electricity Monday and so many
stores and gasoline stations were closed that it was difficult to find food
and fuel.;    Dozens of angry residents stormed a row of food shops in the
city's market, forced open the doors with crowbars and carted away canned
goods and other items, police and witnesses said.;    ""We will die of hunger
if we don't do this,"" one of the looters said.;    Fifteen people were
arrested after more than 100 pigs were stolen from a farm near Angeles.;
Another U.S. Navy flotilla steamed toward Subic Bay today to help speed the
American exodus, and Filipinos complained that their government failed to
prepare them for the devastating fury of Mount Pinatubo.;    ""We were really
caught flat-footed. They had not expected anything of this magnitude,"" said
Gov. Bren Guiao of Pampanga province, where about 120,000 refugees were
seeking help.; ""It's about time we left,"" said Lisa Hedland, wife of an Air
Force sergeant, as she prepared to board the cruiser Long Beach with her
15-month-old daughter. ""It's been horrible this past week."";    For most
Filipinos fleeing the volcano, the journey to safety was less orderly and far
more difficult.;    ""We have nothing except the clothes we are wearing,"" said
Solidad Santiago, a 41-year-old laundry worker from Angeles, who fled to a
Manila evacuation center Sunday with most but not all of her family.;    ""Our
house collapsed because of the volcano,"" said Santiago, a widow, whose face
showed signs of the wrenching fear of the past week. ""My oldest son stayed
behind to try to guard our possessions.;    ""He should be here by now,"" she
said. ""I have gone on the public address system here and called his name, but
there is never any response. I am very concerned. I pray he is safe."";   
Santiago and her family were among nearly 5,000 refugees who crowded Monday
into the shaded bleachers of a Manila sports stadium that is being used as an
evacuation center.;    The evacuees were provided with food -- mostly
sausages, rice and crackers donated by local businesses.;    ""We have lost
everything, but still I am happy, happy to be here,"" said Romayo Garcia, a
29-year-old mason, whose house near the now-evacuated Clark Air Base, about 10
miles east of Mount Pinatubo, had collapsed from the weight of volcanic ash.; 
  ""The rocks were as big as this,"" he said, bringing together his thumbs and
index fingers to make a circle five inches wide. ""It was impossible to walk.
People panicked. We had to find a way to get out."";    Garcia said he and
several members of his family trudged nearly 20 miles through ankle-deep ash
until they found a truck driver willing to take them to Manila.  ",15,"[ 0.57078596  0.00854052  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
154,"
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [By XINHUA correspondent Feng Xiuju: ""Patten's Bill </F>
Passage, a Long Premeditated Action""] 
  [Text] Beijing, February 26 (XINHUA) -- The recent passage 
of Hong Kong Governor Chris Patten's partial electoral bill by 
its Legislative Council (Legco) was not accidental, but long 
premeditated. 
  The step was taken in disregard of repeated persuasion by 
China and the aspirations of all the social strata in Hong Kong 
for a settlement of the electoral arrangements through talks. 
  Over the past two days, the British side also published a 
white paper and unilaterally made public the contents of last 
year's 17 rounds of Sino-British talks on the arrangements for 
the 1994-1995 elections in Hong Kong. 
  In addition, the Hong Kong Government gazetted the remaining 
part of Patten's reform package on Friday [25 February]. 
  This string of actions is the inevitable result of the 
change 
of Britain's policies toward China and its stubborn perseverance 
in violating the Sino-British Joint Declaration, the principle 
of convergence with the Basic Law of the Hong Kong Special 
Administrative Region and the relevant agreements and 
understandings reached between the two countries. 
  These actions fully show that the British side has closed 
the 
door of negotiations between the two sides and is finally taking 
a road of confrontation with China on the issue of Hong Kong's 
political system. 
  None of the Chinese people, including the Hong Kong 
compatriots, can ever tolerate such kind of actions. 
  It is known to all that shortly after Patten became Hong 
Kong 
governor in 1992, he began to sell his political bill step by 
step under the pretence of increasing democracy in Hong Kong, in 
an attempt to change Hong Kong's present political structure and 
pull the pro-British elements and those who are opposed to China 
onto the political stage, so as to turn Hong Kong into an 
independent or semi-independent political entity which cannot be 
controlled by the central government of China after 1997. 
  The following facts clearly show his real intention. 
  First, Patten tabled his political reform bill in October, 
1992, in a sudden manner, without consulting with China, thus 
sabotaging the Sino-British consultations and cooperation of the 
past ten years since they negotiated and signed the joint 
declaration, and bringing about a half-year-long open argument 
between the two countries. 
  Then Britain, under all sorts of pressure, agreed to hold 
talks with China in April last year on the arrangements for 
elections for 1994/1995 in Hong Kong. 
  However, at the negotiating table the British side 
repeatedly 
adopted double-faced tactics. It spoke fine words while 
blocking the progress of talks by setting up various barriers. 
As a result, the talks could not be moved forward. 
  Later, when the two sides almost reached identical views on 
the arrangements for elections of municipal councils and the 
district boards, the British side intentionally confused these 
elections with that of the Legislative Council and unilaterally 
terminated the talks and then introduced the first part of the 
package to the Legislative Council last December. 
  Even so, China made it clear repeatedly that for the Chinese 
side the door for negotiations was open, with the prerequisite 
that the British side must withdraw the submitted partial bill 
from the Legco. 
  But the British side ignored this and was the first to walk 
away from the negotiating table, thus completely closing the 
door of negotiations. 
  The above-mentioned facts demonstrate that the British side 
has had no sincerity at all on cooperation with China in the 
three crucial periods, namely, prior to the talks, in the 
process of the talks and leading to the break-down of the talks. 
  On the contrary, it has walked far along the road of 
confrontation with China. 

    Recently, Patten made a special trip to Australia and tried 
his best to win support from outside Hong Kong for the passage 
and the implementation of his political bill. 
  Shortly after Patten returned to Hong Kong at the end of his 
trip to Australia on February 19, his partial electoral bill was 
passed by the Legislative Council. 
  Meanwhile, Britain also issued a white paper. 
  Over the past year or more, Patten has directed so many 
farces which converged so closely that it is clear that what he 
did was carefully arranged and long premeditated. 
  The British side time and again said that Patten's political 
bill was aimed at promoting Hong Kong's prosperity and stability 
and completely considered the aspirations of the Hong Kong 
residents. 
  It is known to all that to maintain Hong Kong's prosperity 
and stability and to ensure its smooth transition in 1997 are in 
the fundamental interests of the Hong Kong residents. 
  The Basic Law was formulated after more than four years' 
discussions and drafting, and fully absorbing opinions of the 
Hong Kong residents. Its most important principle is to 
maintain Hong Kong's prosperity and stability. 
  The preamble and the general principles of the Basic Law 
stipulate that the socialist system and policies shall not be 
practised in the Hong Kong Special Administrative Region, and 
the previous capitalist system and way of life shall remain 
unchanged for 50 years. 
  Article 45 and article 68 of the Basic Law also stipulate 
that Hong Kong's political system should be developed ""in the 
light of the actual situation"" and ""in accordance with the 
principle of gradual and orderly progress"". 
  These principles aim at precisely guaranteeing Hong Kong's 
stable development, stable transfer of its power, and steady 
establishment of the government of the Hong Kong Special 
Administrative Region and Legislative Council. 
  Therefore, the principles in the Basic Law accepted by the 
Hong Kong residents conform to the fundamental interests and 
opinions of the Hong Kong people. 
  However, Patten hurriedly put forward his political reform 
bill less than three months after he began to serve as Hong Kong 
governor, without absorbing opinions from the Hong Kong 
residents. More serious was that, despite strong appeals from 
Hong Kong residents for the settlement of the electoral 
arrangements through talks, the political reform bill submitted 
by Patten was passed. How can people say that it reflects the 
opinions and interests of the Hong Kong residents? 
  The Sino-British Joint Declaration and the Basic Law 
stipulate that the British administration of Hong Kong will 
terminate on June 30, 1997, and the Chinese Government will 
resume the exercise of sovereignty over Hong Kong as of July 1, 
1997. 
  In accordance with these provisions, the Chinese side has 
reiterated that as component parts of the British political body 
administering Hong Kong, the last British-Hong Kong district 
boards, the two municipal polls and the Legislative Council will 
definitely be terminated together with the end of the British 
administration of Hong Kong. 
  Before the Chinese and British sides reach an agreement on 
the arrangements for the 1994/1995 elections, the three-level 
bodies produced on the basis of the partial electoral bill 
passed by the British-Hong Kong Legco or any other electoral 
bill possibly yet to be passed by the Legco cannot remain beyond 
the year 1997. 
  It would be a vain fantasy to think that the passed bill 
will 
be fixed in the form of law and the three-level bodies produced 
from the bill can be automatically extended beyond the year 1997. 
  Time is advancing and the destiny of Hong Kong in future 
will 
be in the hands of the Chinese people, including the Hong Kong 
compatriots. 
  No matter how far the British side will walk along the road 
of confrontation with China on the issue of Hong Kong's 
political system, it absolutely cannot prevent the progress of 
history. 
  China holds that as long as the Hong Kong compatriots and 
the 
mainland people closely cooperate and completely implement the 
principle of ""one country, two systems"", the future of Hong Kong 
will be bright. 

",16,"[ 0.14878421  0.15788584  0.01508932 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
155,"
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [""Special commentary"" by Yu Yen (0205 6056): ""Playing the </F>
`International Card' Is of No Avail--Commenting on Chris 
Patten's `International Asset' Theory""] 
  [Text] Hong Kong Governor Chris Patten returned to Hong 
Kong in a huff after spending his holidays and making several 
visits in Australia. In an interview with the media on the last 
day of his stay in Australia, he went so far as to say that 
Chinese officials do not understand the international status and 
importance of Hong Kong so their criticism of him does not 
conform to reality, adding that Hong Kong is an ""international 
asset"" as well as China's asset. 
  What is the purpose of Chris Patten's trip to Australia? 
Though he repeatedly argued in his defense that he did not go 
to Australia in search of support for his constitutional 
package, the fact he talked a great deal about his 
constitutional package and requested Australia to pass on 
""genuine democracy"" to Hong Kong reveals that he visited 
Australia to seek international support for this constitutional 
package, of which the first part will be put to the vote, after 
his constitutional package had drawn sharp criticism and came in 
for questioning at the British Parliamentary Foreign Affairs 
Committee hearings. The Australian Government and public, 
however, gave him and his constitutional package the cold 
shoulder and many media units and Chinese organizations even 
severely criticized him. Only one or two government officers, 
who do not know anything about the Sino-British Joint 
Declaration and the Basic Law, supported him verbally. When 
commenting on this, a Chinese official pointed out: While Patten 
is playing the international card, it is extremely inappropriate 
for Australian Government officials to make irresponsible 
remarks. This criticism hit the vital spot. In reponse, Patten 
showed his ignorance and arrogance, once again proving that the 
British Government is bent on making the Hong Kong issue an 
international one before evacuating Hong Kong and changing Hong 
Kong into an independent or semi-independent political entity, 
to extend the influence of its colonial rule. 
<H5>  Sovereignty Over Hong Kong Cannot Be Evaded </H5>
  Ostensibly, some people feel Governor Patten's remarks, 
quoted at the beginning of this article, were made in praise of 
Hong Kong and in defense of Hong Kong's international status and 
its importance. However, a rough analysis shows the matter is 
not so simple. In saying Hong Kong is an international asset, 
Patten intentionally evaded the problem of to whom Hong Kong 
belongs. According to Patten, since Hong Kong is an 
""international asset,"" it belongs to the international 
community, namely, it is shared by every country in the world or 
at least it is an independent or semi-independent political 
entity, over which China cannot exercise sovereignty. Does this 
not clearly show that China's sovereignty over Hong Kong was 
evaded or even denied? 
  How can China's sovereignty over Hong Kong be evaded! Since 
ancient times Hong Kong has been an inseparable part of Chinese 
territory. This is a fact known to all. Hong Kong was ""ceded"" 
and ""leased"" by the corrupt Qing Government to the ""Great 
British Empire"" when the latter sent in overpowering warships 
and cannons in its invasion of China, so it was in fact ""stolen"" 
or forcibly ""occupied"" by Britain. 
  Though Britain has ruled over Hong Kong for one and a half 
centuries, the fact that Hong Kong is China's sacred territory 
will never change. The Chinese nation has gone through a good 
deal, so the Chinese people value the country's sovereignty all 
the more. The Chinese Government and people have never 
acknowledged the unequal treaty signed at the point of a 
bayonet. It is for this reason that Deng Xiaoping has said on 
many occasions: ""China refuses to yield an inch on the 
territory problem. To put it bluntly, sovereignty is not a 
problem for discussion."" These sonorous and forceful remarks 
most vividly highlight and express the common desire of the 
Chinese people, including Hong Kong compatriots. 
<H5>  Attempt To Turn Hong Kong into International Wrestling Ring </H5>
  Before the Chinese people, who refuse to be bullied again, 
Patten's attempt to evade and deny the fact that Hong Kong 
belongs to China by saying Hong Kong is an ""international asset"" 
is of no avail. 
  What merits attention is that this was not the first time 
Patten has referred to Hong Kong as an ""international asset."" 
In early May last year, he openly alleged that Hong Kong was an 
""international asset"" in a speech in Washington. To echo this 
assertion, British Foreign Secretary Douglas Hurd said in both 
Singapore and Jakarta last July that Hong Kong had become a 
""political city."" The two used different terms but they meant 
the same thing. They tried to change Hong Kong into an 
international political wrestling ring in a bid to throw Hong 
Kong into confusion, cripple Hong Kong's superiority as an 
international financial center, and rely on international forces 
to prevent China regaining sovereignty over Hong Kong. 
  Patten's allegation that the Chinese side does not 
understand Hong Kong's ""international status"" is entirely 
nonsense. How can Patten be compared with the Chinese Government 
where the understanding of Hong Kong's international status and 
its importance are concerned. It is because the Chinese 
Government has a profound and accurate understanding of Hong 
Kong's past and present state, and its international status, 
that it was able to advance a series of principles and policies 
including ""one country, two systems,"" ""allowing Hong Kong people 
to administer Hong Kong and enjoy a high degree of autonomy,"" 
and so on to solve Hong Kong problems. The fact that the 
Chinese Government included the series of principles and 
policies into the Sino-British Joint Declaration, which was made 
known to the world, giving them concrete form and putting them 
on a legal basis in the Basic Law, vividly indicates that the 
Chinese Government has a penetrating understanding of Hong 
Kong's ""international status."" Undoubtedly, a city's 
international status and functions are entirely different from 
the issue of to which country it belongs. They are different 
concepts and cannot be lumped together. Hong Kong is ranked 
among the biggest international cities and has become one of the 
international economic, trade, financial, and shipping centers 
but this will never change the fact that it is part of Chinese 
territory. The same is ture of New York, Paris, and Tokyo: 
They are international big cities but nobody can deny that they 
belong to the United States, France, and Japan respectively. 
  Clearly Patten has an axe to grind in preaching the 
""international asset"" theory. By falsely alleging that the 
Chinese side does not understand Hong Kong's international 
status, he obviously was trying to shift public attention, cheat 
the media, and lure the international community into meddling in 
Hong Kong affairs, thus finally attaining the goal of 
internationalizing the Hong Kong issue. 
<H3>  The British Side Has Attempted To Prolong Colonial Rule for 
a Long Time </H3>
  Internationalizing the Hong Kong issue is one of the British 
Government's important plans to continue its colonial rule over 
Hong Kong after 1997 and is also one of its concentrated 
examples of going back on its word after signing the 
Sino-British Joint Declaration. 
  Britain has been unhappy, unconscious, and even unwilling to 
return Hong Kong to China. At the beginning they said ""the 
three treaties remain effective,"" later they suggested 
""exchanging sovereignty for administrative power,"" and then they 
proposed ""Sino- British joint administration."" All these showed 
their reluctance to give up colonial rule and return Hong Kong 
to China. 
  Former British Prime Minister Mrs Thatcher laid bare in her 
memoirs Britain's three-step strategy for handling the Hong Kong 
issue. First, insisting that Britain enjoy sovereignty over a 
part of Hong Kong; second, exchanging sovereignty over Hong Kong 
for long-term administrative power; and third, developing a 
democratic structure with the aim of granting Hong Kong 
independence or autonomy in a short period in the same way they 
treated Singapore, if the above two steps proved unworkable. 
  Before the Chinese people, who had risen to their feet, the 
first two steps have gone to the wall, so they are now stepping 
up implementation of the third step by taking advantage of their 
administrative power. People are now clear that everything, 
including the ""representative government system,"" ""the right of 
abode in the United Kingdom,"" the ""formation of the court of 
final appeal,"" and ""introducing the committee system into the 
Legislative Council"" was closely related with to the third step. 
What Patten has said and done since he arrived in Hong Kong, 
including the ""international card,"" has been designed to 
meticulously carry through the third step laid down by the 
British Government. This is exactly what is meant by the 
Chinese saying: He who has come, has come with ill intent, 
certainly not on virtue bent. This is the soft tactic Britain, 
which was a great empire over 100 years ago but is now on the 
wane, is forced to apply when it can no longer be insufferably 
arrogant before the giant in the east--the powerful People's 
Republic of China. According to Percy Cradock's memoirs, Mrs 
Thatcher once spoke of the need to appoint a politician as the 
last Hong Kong governor. This was because only a politician can 
achieve a certain political objective; can be impudent and break 
his promises; can contradict himself and chop and change; and 
can stop at nothing and risk danger in his desperation to carry 
out his plan. Patten has acted this way since he came to Hong 
Kong. Therefore, Patten's behavior is not personal but reflects 
a change in Britain's policy toward Hong Kong. 
  If anyone says Mr Patten has loafed around and wandered 
about 
doing nothing since he arrived in Hong Kong, this is unfair. 
Over the last two years, making nothing of the hardships, he 
has traveled to many countries to enlist support for his 
constitutional package in a move to internationalize the Hong 
Kong issue. During his recent trip to Australia, apart from 
saying that Hong Kong was an ""international asset,"" he claimed 
that for various countries to support Hong Kong in expanding 
democracy is not equivalent to interfering in China's internal 
affairs. He also called on the international community to see 
to it that China honor its commitment after 1997 and alleged 
that Britain bears a ""moral responsibility"" for Hong Kong, and 
so on. All this thoroughly exposes Britain's plan to 
internationalize the Hong Kong issue. 
  Nevertheless, it is internationally accepted that while the 
Hong Kong issue is a matter for both China and Britain before 
1997, it is purely a Chinese internal affair after 1997. So any 
attempts by Patten and Britain to make the Hong Kong issue an 
international one are doomed to failure. 

",16,"[ 0.05502104  0.04226096  0.0058901  ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
156,"
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [""Random Notes on Hong Kong"" by Zhong Yan (6988 1693): </F>
""Confession by the Last Governor of Hong Kong""] 
  [Text] Recently, Hong Kong Governor Chris Patten published 
an article entitled ""Go Against the North Wind."" The meaning is 
quite clear: To go against China through to the end on the Hong 
Kong issue. 
  Why has Chris Patten no scruples about declaring his stand 
of 
going against China through to the end? Just as he said in his 
article, the reason is that what he has done since he became 
governor of Hong Kong has been criticized and condemned not only 
by China and people of Hong Kong, but also by people in Britain. 
He said: ""Some criticisms have appeared in both Britain and 
Hong Kong."" But he also found excuses to console himself: ""In 
an open and free society, such criticisms may appear."" As a 
mater of fact, if there had only been ""some"" criticisms, there 
was no need for the governor to personally write such a long 
article to explain himself over such trifles. 
  The most important point of the article is that Chris Patten 
was trying hard to explain that all he had done was in the 
interests of the Hong Kong people. He wrote: ""Our 
responsibility toward the citizens of Hong Kong should be put 
first."" This British Hong Kong governor is really more 
concerned about Hong Kong than the Hong Kong people. For this 
reason, he feels it unfair that the Hong Kong people are 
criticizing and condemning him instead of saying thank you to 
him. But for the Hong Kong people, of course the Hong Kong 
Chinese, what should be put first is certainly that they should 
be treated as real Chinese people of China rather than a 
conquered people in a colony, and the first responsibility of 
Britain is to ensure a smooth return of Hong Kong to China in 
accordance with the Sino-British Joint Declaration. 
  In fact, responsibility toward the citizens of Hong Kong 
advocated by Chris Patten is actually for the colonialist 
interests of the British Empire. Some people criticized what he 
had done as ""jeopardizing more extensive Sino-British 
relations."" To refute this criticism he said: ""Hong Kong is 
the biggest and most important component part of these 
relations."" What is more, ""judging from a long-term point of 
view, our position in China and Asia may, to a great extent, be 
decided by how we discharge our responsibility in Hong Kong in a 
dignified manner."" 
  People cannot but ask: Why is Hong Kong the biggest and most 
important part of Sino-British relations? To the Chinese 
people, the following is understandable: Hong Kong was 
plundered after the Opium War, a war of aggression launched by 
Britain against China. The Chinese people will never forget this 
national humiliation. If this humiliation is not wiped out, 
there can be no harmonious Sino- British relations. 
  However, this is obviously not what Chris Patten meant. Then 
what did he mean by saying Hong Kong is the ""biggest and most 
important"" part of Sino-British relations? Did he mean that the 
British Empire will not resign itself to the return of its 
richest colony to China, the rightful owner? 
  People will also ask: Why will the position of Britain in 
China and Asia be decided by how Britain discharges its 
responsibility in Hong Kong in a dignified manner? What 
position does Britain want to have in China and in Asia? What 
is the meaning of a ""dignified manner""? If Britain ensures a 
smooth return of Hong Kong to China in accordance with the 
Sino-British Joint Declaration, is it not a practice in a 
""dignified manner?"" Can it not help improve the image of 
Britain and increase its position in China and Asia? Does 
Britain really want to return Hong Kong to China only in name 
while preserving its position as the ""governor"" to show the 
power and prestige of the British Empire and go on playing the 
tyrant in China and Asia as a colonialist? In this respect, 
what Chris Patten meant is quite clear. 
  In his article, Chris Patten brutally attacked China as a 
""villain."" In fact, this is the right word for Mr. Patten 
himself. He threatened that if China did not obey the 
""governor's"" arrangement, it should not expect Britain would 
agree to its return to GATT. 
  Although Chris Patten has taken great pains to protect the 
interests of the British Empire, he is not admired by some 
domestic opinion. Instead, he has been criticized and 
condemned. That is why he feels somewhat wronged. 
  Chris Patten, the last governor of Hong Kong, has been 
trying 
hard to preserve an actual colonial position in Hong Kong and 
revitalize the colonialist power and prestige of the old British 
Empire. Unfortunately, all this is but a day dream. 
  This article is actually a confession by Chris Patten, who 
has been driven to the wall, to prove his loyalty to British 
colonialism. 

",16,"[ 0.06295607  0.07253364  0.01102837 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
157,"
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Hong Qingtian (3163 3237 3944): ""China, Britain, </F>
Hong Kong At Crossroads of History""] 
  [Excerpts] Patten Poses Seven Challenges to China in 
Second Annual Report--Patten's New Tactics and Challenges to 
China 
  [passage omitted] 
  1. Abandoning his ""from politics to politics"" stance, which 
is that politics is self-justifying and self-sufficient, Patten 
has now woven politics into the lives of the people of Hong 
Kong, making it part and parcel of the local way of life and 
inseparable from the war on corruption, the rule of law, 
freedom, education, and the quality of governance -- all 
""perennial concerns"" in Chinese society. [passage omitted] 
  The way Christopher Patten talked last year, you would have 
thought he were in Britain. Now Patten takes life in Hong Kong 
as his point of departure, arguing that democratic politics of a 
high quality are what the people of Hong Kong need to maintain 
the ""Hong Kong system."" How can the Chinese authorities be 
persuasive if they reject his argument? What alternative can the 
Chinese offer? If the Chinese come up with their own agenda, 
what must it contain that would invalidate the British position? 
How to sever the linkage between ""politics"" and the ""Hong Kong 
way of life?"" When Hong Kong fought for democracy in the 1980's, 
Xu Jiatun [6079 1367 1470] tried countering Hong Kong's 
capitalist primary democracy with advanced socialist democracy. 
Subsequently China rejected Hong Kong's political demands by 
questioning their timetable. After Patten came to Hong Kong, the 
Chinese could no longer keep acting anti-democratic. All they 
could do was to declare that they too were for democracy but 
that the dispute between China and Britain is not one over the 
extent of democracy but one involving trust between two nations. 
Now that Patten has made politics an integral part of the life 
of the Hong Kong people and their institutions, can the Chinese 
continue to counter it with the argument that it is all a matter 
of trust between nations? 
  2. In contrast to his past arrogance and wilfulness, Patten 
now says, ""I have grown to like Hong Kong more and more. I have 
deep feelings for this place."" He hopes that ""as it advances 
with big strides into the 21st century, Hong Kong will be like a 
beacon, shining brightly as if to announce its glorious 
achievements. It will also set an excellent example 
demonstrating that in a system of freedom, people can 
successfully overcome all sorts of adversity and difficulties 
and, hand in hand, create a wonderful future."" (Section 190) 
  After the governor presented his first annual report to the 
Legislative Council last year, the Chinese authorities initially 
took a heavy-handed approach. It was so severe and threatening 
that it gave the impression China was prepared for mutual 
destruction, with Britain, Hong Kong, and itself all going down 
the tube. In doing so, the Chinese only succeeded in turning 
public opinion strongly against them. Even as public approval of 
Patten slipped and opposition rose, anti-Chinese feelings in 
Hong Kong also gained ground. Politically speaking, the Chinese 
paid dearly for opposing Patten. At the time the Chinese could 
convincingly attack Patten for his overbearing ways, arrogant, 
domineering, stubborn, and intractable. Now Patten has changed 
his attitudes. He may still be impenetrably thick-headed, but he 
has mellowed considerably and become more practical. What should 
be China's attitude now? If the Chinese try to be as mellow and 
practical as Patten, that may be interpreted as a compromise. 
Yet if they persist in their shrill ways, they may lose points. 
  3. Patten's second annual report to the Legislative Council 
is replete with praises for the people of Hong Kong, for their 
accomplishments, and for the superiority of the Hong Kong 
system, calling it a miracle of human society. The report also 
contains endless comparisons with Britain, Australia, and the 
Netherlands, countries which the local people are familiar with. 
Of course this is the stock in trade of politicians in every 
democratic country, but it also shows that the relationship 
between the ruler and the ruled under a democratic system is 
just what the people of Hong Kong need psychologically at this 
point in time. 
  Having inherited the tradition of the Qing Dynasty and the 
Republic of China, the Chinese Communists have always considered 
Hong Kong alien land. It is hard for the Chinese to sing the 
praises of the Hong Kong system, Hong Kong people, and Hong Kong 
society. During the anti-Patten campaign last year, the Chinese 
opposed everything that was associated with Patten. What Patten 
said about Hong Kong's values and its superiority were all 
satirized by the Chinese media, so much so that one could hardly 
tell right from wrong anymore. The ""anti-Patten"" campaign came 
perilously close to being an ""anti-Hong Kong"" movement. The 
objective of the Chinese was to launch an all-out attack on 
Patten, stopping at nothing. In so doing, however, they in 
effect repudiated many of the values of the system of Hong Kong. 
If China continues its negative attitude toward Hong Kong, what 
sort of price will it have to pay? If, on the other hand, it 
echoes Patten and begins heaping praises on Hong Kong and 
emulating the Hong Kong system, can the Chinese Government bring 
itself to do that? Would praising Hong Kong send a wrong message 
to the local people, misleading them into thinking that China 
would compromise with Patten and go along with him? Would that 
encourage ""Hong Kong chauvinism?"" 
  4. Patten has modified his political reform proposals in two 
major ways. First, he has replaced functional groups with 
statutory bodies even as he insists that voting be based on the 
individual and reduces the overall number of voters from the 
2.70 million called for last year to 1 million. The second 
concession is that the electoral committee would be composed of 
four groups following the organizational model of the second 
legislative council after 1997 as spelled out in the Basic Law. 
Under Patten's original proposal, the committee was to be made 
up of popularly elected district representatives (in its 
entirety or to a large extent). Nevertheless, Patten sticks by 
his original plan to have the 400 members of the electoral 
committee be chosen through election. Moreover, this concession 
comes with strings attached; the proposal that elected 
representatives be allowed to serve out their terms beyond 1997 
(the ""through train"" concept) is part and parcel of his overall 
plan. 
  Britain and China reopened negotiations in April mainly 
because public opinion forced them back to the conference table. 
Both sides knew full well the price of defying public wishes. 
They may not reach an agreement if they negotiate, but they are 
bound to lose if they don't even talk. Hong Kong people hope 
that something will come out of their talks. A dozen or so 
public opinion surveys by the Hong Kong Statistical and Business 
Research Council invariably came up with one finding: The people 
of Hong Kong want both sides to make concessions and reach an 
accord. Now that Patten has made the first move by taking the 
initiative to give way, naturally the public wants the Chinese 
side to make corresponding concessions in order to narrow the 
difference between the two sides. How should the Chinese 
Government respond? If they continue to insist that Patten is 
guilty of the ""three violations"" and refuse to make adjustments 
and concessions, they would have a lot of ideological work to do 
on the Hong Kong people, besides giving Patten a reason to 
withdraw from the talks. However, if they give way, they would 
be handing a victory to Patten. Patten's initial demand was an 
electorate of 2.7 million people. It has now been scaled back to 
1 million, still significantly more than the 200,000-300,000 
people who would have been eligible to cast votes for the 
original 21 functional seats. How extensive a concession should 
the Chinese make? What about the ""through train"" proposal? As 
the seven letters between the foreign ministers indicate, both 
sides agreed that the same electoral arrangements should remain 
in place from 1995 through 1999, allowing legislators elected in 
1995 to serve out their terms through 1999. Then came the 4 June 
tragedy of 1989 and the big victories scored by democratic 
groups in direct Legislative Council elections in 1991. The 
Chinese wavered on the ""through train"" idea and the British came 
up with their own set of arrangements for the 1995 elections. 
Since the controversy was triggered off by China's plan to scrap 
the ""through train"" proposal, would it make concessions on this 
very issue? 
  5. Patten's second annual report to the Legislative Council 
was an honest self-examination of his past commitments regarding 
the people's livelihood and the work that had been done. He 
talked about things he had accomplished and things he had not, 
laying it all out in an honest, earnest, and realistic way. One 
year after arriving in Hong Kong, Patten has certainly commanded 
much authority with his solid political ideas. More than that, 
his skills, language, and operating method as a politician as 
well as the closeness between him and the public have also set a 
standard that the leader of the post-1997 special administrative 
region [SAR] must meet. During the subsequent question period, 
Legislative Council members lined up to point out the errors in 
his report. Their exchange, complete with questions, answers, 
charges, and explanations, was democracy in action, live. 
  Public statements by Chinese officials to this date still 
contain a lot of empty bureaucratic gobbledygook, devoid of a 
spirit of seeking truth from facts. They always lecture the 
masses on the omnipotence, all-knowingness, invincibility, 
infallibility, and greatness of government, instead of talking 
about self-restraint, self-discipline, and self-control. The 
real issues are never aired in the open. Patten demonstrates the 
modern Western political approach while the Chinese remain 
wedded to propagating the superiority of ""big, complete, and 
all-powerful government"" going back thousands of years. How 
should the Chinese respond to Patten's new methods indicative of 
a modern open society? Should they throw a tantrum and pick a 
fight with Patten over this? Or should they take a leaf from 
Patten's book and try to communicate with the masses using 
similar methods? Would the SAR chief after 1997 measure up to 
Patten's standard? After the June 4 incident, Deng Xiaoping 
raised a lot of expectations when he said that he would ""get 
several practical things done."" Yet no documents have ever been 
issued regarding the ""practical issue."" Have they really 
materialized? Patten makes endless allusions to what is good 
about the Hong Kong system and what is bad about the Chinese 
system, one obvious example being the way the two governments 
level with the people. Even more striking is the open dialogue 
and debate that took place in an atmosphere of freedom between 
Patten and the people of Hong Kong on an equal plane after the 
governor presented his second annual report (in which the 
Chinese authorities also played an active part). 
  6. For the first time, Patten devoted an entire chapter to 
Sino-British relations. He spent a lot of time emphasizing the 
close ties between China and Hong Kong and the numerous 
connections between the two, including cooperation in 
administrative matters and environmental protection. In the 
future, bridges of the concrete and steel variety will be built 
to link the two together. Even more important will be bridges of 
the invisible type. Sino-Hong Kong relations mean China learning 
from Hong Kong's value system and success story and Hong Kong 
drawing support form China's strengths. Patten said, ""When many 
places in the world identify with Hong Kong's value system and 
seek to duplicate its success story, would the world become a 
better place, a more prosperous place? Or will it become less 
prosperous? We all know the answers to these questions."" 
(Section 182) Patten took the initiative to define the relations 
between China and Hong Kong, giving substance to their contacts 
as well as clarifying the nature of such relations. Hong Kong 
represents progress and as such should be imitated; China 
represents power and should therefore be a source of support for 
Hong Kong to tap into. Together they can take bold strides into 
the next century. 
  China has always looked at Hong Kong unilaterally from top 
to 
bottom, demanding that it fall in line with China and not the 
other way round. The kind of Sino-Hong Kong relations China 
wants is one in which Hong Kong complies with all China's orders 
and satisfies every Chinese demand. Whatever the merits of the 
case, no matter who represents progress and who represents 
backwardness, the Chinese want Hong Kong to simply blend itself 
into the entity known as China. As for making the Hong Kong 
system ""living, automatic, and autonomous,"" the relations 
between China and the special entity of Hong Kong, how the two 
should be integrated and to what extent, as well as the costs 
and benefits of such integration... none of that has been 
considered at length. Nor do the Chinese allow such 
consideration; mention differences between the two systems and 
they cry ""abetting,"" ""sowing discord,"" ""setting one party 
against another."" A major incompatibility in Sino-Hong Kong 
relations is that the sovereign body, namely China, is large but 
backward, whereas Hong Kong, which has no sovereignty, is small 
but advanced. A unilateral emphasis on China's sovereignty would 
result in integration of a regressive type, meaning that an 
advanced Hong Kong would have to reach down to accommodate a 
backward China. A one-sided emphasis on Hong Kong's 
non-sovereign status is both impossible and disastrous. How to 
define Sino-Hong Kong relations down to the details is a major 
challenge facing Hong Kong in the future. The success or failure 
of this relationship will impact the relations between the 
mainland and Taiwan and those between the central government on 
the mainland and the localities (a perennial problem in Chinese 
politics going back thousands of years). 
  7. In his annual report to the Legislative Council, Patten 
noted subtly and not so subtly that where Hong Kong was free to 
make up its mind, things had gone well in the past year, but 
where consultation with China was necessary, nothing seemed to 
have worked well. In Section 172, he said. ""...outstanding 
achievements have been scored on all fronts during the past 
year...with one lone exception,"" which was Hong Kong's effort to 
""further its understanding with China"" and ""replace unproductive 
speculation with sincere trust."" (Section 173) Why? ""Not because 
of a lack of effort, a lack of determination to improve 
bilateral relations on Hong Kong's part."" (Section 174) ""The 
reason is that we still have not been able to convince Chinese 
officials that Hong Kong citizens' expectations about the 
development of their political system are in no way excessive 
but are reasonable and should be met, that they form part of the 
natural evolution of a society as it matures and becomes more 
sophisticated. In a certain sense, political development is also 
a prerequisite for Hong Kong's remaining a leading player in 
international trade. These expectations do not constitute a 
threat to China now and will not do so in the future. The fact 
of the matter is that these expectations can be met within the 
framework of ""one nation, two systems."" (Section 175) Instead of 
saying the Chinese refused to go along or disagreed, Patten said 
euphemistically that they (meaning himself and his associates) 
had failed to convince Chinese officials. In fact his meaning is 
very clear. We all know what the problem is: The failure by the 
Chinese authorities to see what Patten and others have been able 
to see. Cases in point: Pier No. 9, the airport, the harbor, the 
Sino-British liaison group. Patten covered all these problems at 
great length and, in so doing, seemed to have put the ball back 
in China's court. 
  Last year the Chinese tried to shoot down Patten's political 
reform plan in an overbearing way by resorting to economic 
pressure, ready and willing to destroy all three parties. What 
the Chinese wanted to prove was that Patten would not be able to 
accomplish a thing without China's cooperation, that he would 
end up with not just one broken leg, but two broken legs. 
Basically the Chinese have achieved this goal. On the other 
hand, the Chinese were also taking a risk. The people of Hong 
Kong might blame the Chinese Government for the delay in solving 
all those problems that need to be tackled urgently. What are 
the Chinese going to do about these feelings? How to point the 
accusing finger back at the British? How to undo the damage the 
delay has caused Hong Kong and China (particularly Guangdong)? 
Who should be held politically accountable? In the second half 
of the year, will the Chinese continue to relax their economic 
austerity drive or will they tighten the belt again? [passage 
omitted] 

",16,"[ 0.03877697  0.04467614  0.00467004 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
158,"
BFN 

<F P=106> [""Separate exclusive interviews"" with Lu Ping, director of </F>
the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office of the State Council of 
the PRC, by unidentified Television Broadcasts Limited reporter 
and with Hong Kong Governor Chris Patten by Television 
Broadcasts Limited reporter Jenny Lam; places and dates not 
given; from the ""Lu Ping and Chris Patten"" special program--Lu 
Ping and unidentified reporter speak in Mandarin; Chris Patten 
and Lam speak in English] 
  [Text] [Begin recording] [Lu] We feel that the British 
Hong Kong Government has closed the door on contact with the 
Preliminary Work Committee [PWC] too tight. We feel there is no 
need to do so. Therefore, under such circumstances, I, as vice 
chairman of the PWC, and the Governor of Hong Kong, who should 
be considered the head of Hong Kong's civil service, since he 
does not allow contacts between civil servants and the PWC, what 
is the basis for me, a member of the PWC, to have contacts with 
him? [sentence as heard] 
  [Patten] I must say that like the overwhelming majority of 
people in Hong Kong, like a number of members of the PWC, I 
think it is a great pity that we are, as it were, communicating 
through television, rather than sitting down at the table 
talking to one another. [end recording] 
  [Anchorman Yuan Chi-wei] Good evening. Lu Ping, director of 
the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office of the Chinese State 
Council, has been visiting Hong Kong in the capacity of 
secretary general and vice chairman of the PWC. Though Hong 
Kong Governor Chris Patten said time and again that he is 
willing to meet Lu Ping at any time, Lu Ping has consistently 
refused to meet him. However, Director Lu Ping and Hong Kong 
Governor Chris Patten granted separate exclusive interviews to 
the Information Department of Hong Kong Television Broadcasts 
Limited and expressed their opinions on some issues in dispute 
between China and Britain. Lu Ping reiterated that one of the 
main reasons why he refused to meet Chris Patten is that the 
British side barred civil servants from meeting the PWC. But 
Patten responded by saying: 
  [Begin recording] [Patten] I repeat we are not against 
giving information to the PWC. But the PWC is China's creation, 
China's appointment. The Joint Liaison Group is the result of 
an agreement enshrined in a treaty between Britain and China, 
which is supposed to be working in the interests of Hong Kong. 
Why seek to replicate that if that is the purpose? What we 
want to do is to ensure that China and Britain work in that 
cooperative spirit which the Joint Declaration commits us to. 
  [Lu] We have an old saying in China, which goes: ""Listen to 
his words and watch his deeds."" You should take some action to 
prove that you are truly willing to cooperate with the Chinese 
side in solving these problems. Only when this happens can we 
have a basis for talks. That is why we now suggest establishing 
some contacts through various other channels. 
  [Patten] Here we are in a position in which we have got 
agreed channels between Hong Kong and China and Britain, agreed 
channels which, alas, have not been working terribly well. 
People in Hong Kong, I think, scratch their heads about why it 
is that after all these months, years we have not got an airport 
agreement, why we are not making more progress on things like 
the localization and adaptation of laws, why we have not got an 
agreement on the container terminal, and so on. And I think it 
is imperative that we get the existing channels to work. I am 
not against giving information to the PWC. We give information 
to all sorts of groups. 
  [Lu] Initially, our economic subgroup made an appointment 
with the president of the Kowloon-Canton Railway [KCR] to tell 
us something about the company's development strategy. The main 
reason we wanted to know its development strategy is to find out 
how it can dovetail with the mainland railway development 
strategy. 
  As far as we know, the existing railway planning in Hong 
Kong 
does not reflect consideration on how to connect with the 
mainland railway system. They have a plan for stretching into 
the territory of Shenzhen via Huanggang; but this will not work, 
because according to Shenzhen's plan, Huanggang will become an 
urban center of Shenzhen, which cannot possibly have a railway 
cutting across it. In such a situation, the two sides should 
coordinate and cooperate with each other. This is the very 
reason we invited the KCR president to explain this matter. 
  First, he agreed to come and the time and place were also 
fixed. But just now we were told he was not coming. The KCR 
president is not a civil servant; he cannot be counted as a 
civil servant. If someone in the capacity of the Kowloon-Canton 
Railway Corporation president is unwilling to have contacts with 
us, how can you convince us that the British side is willing to 
cooperate with the Chinese side in other fields? 
  [Patten] If Director Lu Ping had wanted to talk about 
infrastructure, I would have been delighted to do so. We will 
shortly want to talk to the Chinese authorities about the 
outcome of our railway development strategy, which is absolutely 
vital to the communication links of Hong Kong in the future. I 
am bound to say that the first I heard about a meeting with the 
head of the KCR was when I heard what Director Lu Ping had said, 
but I do not know any more details about the alleged KCR meeting. 
  [Lu] As I said, the Hong Kong Government's attitude toward 
the PWC is not exactly one of friendliness. We once invited 
officials of the Hong Kong Government to the PWC to explain to 
us the draft regulations of the Airport Authority that they had 
put forward. The main purpose of our invitation was that the 
PWC wished to help bring the airport talks to an early start and 
to an early agreement by discussing the draft regulations of the 
Airport Authority. But after we read the regulations, we were 
not quite clear about some of them, about why they were written 
in certain ways, so we wished that the Hong Kong side could 
explain to us. The main purpose was to promote the airport 
talks. Very unfortunately, however, the Hong Kong side barred 
its civil servants from having contacts with us at the PWC. 
  [Patten] Because at the moment, we put enough burdens on 
the civil service, trying to get, for example, the existing 
channels to work better. Civil servants also have to report to 
Legco [Legislative Council], which is the body that represents 
the people of Hong Kong. 
  [Lu] As you know, to reach an agreement on any issue, the 
mutual understanding and accommodation that you mentioned is 
necessary. Mutual understanding and accommodation means both of 
us give in a bit, after which our two sides can reach an 
agreement. It will not work if only one side, one-way traffic 
[preceding three words in English] is relied on. We have made 
concessions on many issues. For example, on the financing 
arrangements for the airport, we have made big concessions. 
[end recording] 
  [Yuan] Lu Ping kept saying that because the present 
atmosphere is not good, it is not the right time to meet Chris 
Patten. But Patten said that if the atmosphere is not good, the 
best thing to do is to sit down and talk, so as to improve the 
atmosphere. But Lu Ping said one should be more realistic. 
  [Begin recording] [Lu] If we talk, we should talk in a 
cooperative atmosphere in accordance with the Memorandum of 
Understanding on the New Airport. The purpose of my meeting 
with the Governor of Hong Kong would mainly be to talk about how 
to achieve a smooth transition. This requires a cooperative 
atmosphere and a basis on which our talks can yield some 
results. If our talks cannot bring any results, I do not think 
we should waste our time. If the two of us talk for a long time 
and then meet you when we come out, you will ask us if we got 
anywhere after the long talk, and we will say we got nowhere. 
This will be a big disappointment for the people of Hong Kong. 
  [Patten] He talked to you in the week about the atmosphere 
not being conducive to a meeting. If you do not have a good 
atmosphere, the best thing to do is to have a meeting to try to 
make the atmosphere better. I am absolutely sure that the 
overwhelming majority of people in Hong Kong who want us to meet 
and want us to talk these things through in a sensible and 
reasonable way will in due course have their ambitions met, 
because if we are serious about cooperation and the interests of 
Hong Kong, then we have got at some stage to sit round the table 
and then work things out together. 
  [Lu] I think we should be more realistic and the two sides 
should create a better atmosphere. As far as we are concerned, 
the invitations we extended to the Hong Kong Government still 
stand. The PWC's door is always open. The question now is 
whether or not the Hong Kong Government is willing to open this 
door. 
  [Patten] It is a body appointed by Chinese officials to 
advise Chinese officials. Unlike the Joint Liaison Group, it is 
not a result of an agreement between two sovereign powers, 
similarly the Land Commission, similarly the Airport Committee. 
And unlike the Legislative Council, it is not a body which 
represents public opinion right across the board in Hong Kong. 
[end recording] 
  [Yuan] Coming up next is the second part of this program on 
how Lu Ping and Chris Patten look at the Xi Yang incident and 
whether or not the two of them will have a chance to meet each 
other in the future. Stay with us. [at this point program goes 
to commercial break] 
  During our interviews with them, both Lu Ping and Chris 
Patten were asked about the Xi Yang incident. Our reporter 
asked Lu Ping a question about the Xi Yang incident causing the 
people of Hong Kong to worry about the freedom of the press. 
  [Begin recording] [Lu] This is not the case. It has 
nothing to do with Hong Kong's freedom of the press whatsoever, 
because Xi Yang committed the crime within the territory of 
China. Since his crime was committed within China's territory, 
it of course was handled according to China's law. China's law 
is of course not entirely the same as Hong Kong's law. Perhaps, 
if he had committed the crime in Hong Kong, it could have been 
handled differently. But he committed the crime in China's 
territory. No matter who you are, you must observe China's law 
when you are on the land of China. It does not apply to Hong 
Kong people only. If a U.S. citizen commits a crime in China's 
territory, it will also be handled according to China's law. 
This is perfectly justified. So it has nothing to do with Hong 
Kong's freedom of the press at all. It would have been the same 
problem if it had been a U.S. reporter or a British reporter. 
  [Patten] We are not seeking to interfere with somebody 
else's judicial system, not a bit of it. But there was genuine 
surprise in Hong Kong at a sentence handed out to somebody who 
worked for a Hong Kong newspaper for a story which apparently 
appeared on the front page of another Peking-supported newspaper 
in Hong Kong on the same day. And there was great surprise at 
the severity of the sentence for disclosing economic 
information, exactly the sort of thing which helps the Hong Kong 
stock market to spin round day after day. But what we have 
concentrated on is not any of that. What we concentrated on is 
a simple issue: It is very important that journalists in Hong 
Kong know precisely the rules and regulations which they have to 
keep to if they are going to operate reasonably in China; and 
what we do not want is the impression to be created that in 
order, perhaps, to get Hong Kong journalists to write things 
that they perhaps do not really feel or to censor themselves, 
exemplary sentences are going to be handed out, for reasons 
which people cannot understand. 
  [Unidentified reporter] Today, many people in Hong Kong are 
requesting a special amnesty from the Chinese Government for Xi 
Yang. Is such an amnesty possible? 
  [Lu] This is not within my authority. As far as I know, 
there is no provision on special amnesty in China's 
Constitution. No, there is none. 
  [Patten] I am surprised that senior Chinese officials do not 
understand why this case has caused so much concern in Hong 
Kong. Not just a minority that have been worried about it, nor 
just a minority who have been worried about other things that 
have happened in China. It goes across the community. 
  [Lam] Governor, what is your government willing to do to 
safeguard press freedom; for example, the freedom to 
information. And the demand from legislators like Christine Loh, 
do you go for that? 
  [Patten] Well, what we are doing at the moment is looking at 
the suggestions in Christine Loh's bill. We will be responding 
to that very soon and we are also committed to reviewing our 
existing legislation to remove from it provisions which may be 
used by others to abuse press freedom. 
  [Reporter] Some Hong Kong reporters cannot go to Qiandao Hu 
to cover the incident. Is there any explanation? 
  [Lu] As to this issue, I personally feel that it does not 
seem necessary for Hong Kong reporters to boycott news gathering 
in China. I do not see it as necessary. What is the point? 
They are two different things. Why do you have to boycott news 
gathering in China? 
  [Reporter] China rejected their request to cover news in 
China. Was it a retaliatory gesture? 
  [Lu] It is not an issue of retaliation. It is common sense 
that since you have boycotted gathering news in China, why do 
you still want to come? It is okay if you send other reporters 
in. You boycotted, so let someone else take your place. We 
still welcome them to cover news. 
  [Reporter] In that case.... 
  [Lu] You do not have to come yourself, do you? 
  [Reporter] Does it mean that those who once said they would 
boycott news gathering in China will be permanently barred from 
entering the mainland to cover news? 
  [Lu] No, no. Doesn't your boycott also have a timetable? 
To the end of May, I heard? I do not know. I am not quite 
sure. Is it true that the boycott will continue to the end of 
May? Isn't there a deadline, reporters? [end recording] 
  [Yuan] The biggest issue in dispute between China and 
Britain now is Hong Kong Governor Chris Patten's constitutional 
reform proposals. Our reporter asked Lu Ping if the Legislative 
Council amends the proposals so that they are in line with the 
Basic Law, will they be acceptable? 
  [Begin recording] [Lu] This is absolutely impossible, 
because there is already an understanding between the two sides 
on how the first government should be formed, that is, the 
Chinese side and the British side should reach an agreement 
through diplomatic channels. No agreement can be reached 
between China and Britain unless it is through diplomatic 
channels. This is not for the Legislative Council to decide. 
It is not for the Legislative Council to lead the Chinese side 
and the British side by the nose. To say the least, the Chinese 
side will not accept being led by the nose by the Hong Kong 
Legislative Council. Therefore, the Chinese side will not 
acknowledge any decision adopted by the Legislative Council. 
This is certain. 
  [Reporter] These days, we in Hong Kong are getting a clear 
message that the three-tier councils must be disbanded and 
reorganized in 1997. But why is the Chinese side so firm on 
this issue and why is this attitude made known even before the 
Hong Kong Legislative Council passes any election proposal? 
  [Lu] We did not make known this attitude just now. 
  [Reporter] But now.... 
  [Lu] After the British side shut the door tight on the 
arrangements for 1994-95 elections and refused carry on with the 
talks with us, we declared our attitude then. This is not a new 
issue. As you should know, in 1997, the kind of change that 
will take place here is not like what happens when the British 
Conservative Party steps down and the Labor Party goes into 
power. It will be a shift from one government to another. 
Normally, under such circumstances, it stands to reason that a 
new government, new legislature, and new judicial body will be 
formed. This is only normal. We adopted the ""through train"" 
arrangement because it is a special measure. Strictly speaking, 
everything should start anew and setting up a separate kitchen 
should apply to everything. But for the sake of smooth 
transition, we adopted this special measure, namely, the 
""through train"" option. Yet this requires a basis, which is the 
British side's cooperation with us and convergence of the 
composition of the last Legislative Council with the provisions 
of the Basic Law. 
  [Patten] Well, there are some things which are in their 
sovereign power which I do not deny at all, though of course I 
would hope they would operate within the terms of their 
international treaty obligations as well: In this case, the 
Joint Declaration. But they can do all sorts of things after 
1997 if they want. What they have to ask themselves is whether 
those things are in the interests of Hong Kong and whether those 
things will help to secure the hearts and minds of the people of 
Hong Kong. 
  [Reporter] Recently, a number of recommendations raised at 
the discussions of the PWC have caused much controversy among 
the people of Hong Kong. The first recommendation is that civil 
servants should make it clear whether or not they want to stay 
in their positions beyond 1997. The more recent one is the 
extension of the operation of the land fund. Do these two 
recommendations indicate that those at the PWC or its members do 
not have a good idea of Hong Kong's reality or the agreements 
previously reached between China and Britain? 
  [Lu] No. This is a sheer misunderstanding. It does not 
mean that the PWC members do not have a good idea of Hong Kong's 
conditions. As far as I know, they did not put it that way and 
the PWC did not discuss it like that. But how did the question 
come up? Well, Cheng Yu-sho conducted a survey, a poll, didn't 
he? The results claimed that by 1997, many civil servants, 
especially senior civil servants and administrative officers, 
will resign. So we said if it is true that so many 
administrative officers will quit, there will be many things 
unattended to. What should we do? 
  In fact, Cheng Yu-sho's survey was not comprehensive and his 
results were impossible. 
  At that point, it was suggested that if a civil servant is 
not willing to go on to work in the Special Administrative 
Region [SAR] Government in 1997, he should notify the 
Preparatory Committee or other authorities beforehand. He 
should do it himself, making it clear that he is not going to 
carry on beyond 1997. This way, the chief executive or other 
chief officials can look for someone at an early stage to 
succeed him, so that the government's operation will not be 
affected or come to a stop. This is how we put it and how we 
discussed it. I do not know why stories came out in the 
newspapers later, claiming that they were asked to declare their 
so-called political stand. I feel this is a pure 
misunderstanding. We did not mean it at all. 
  If you.... [Lu pauses] I believe by 1997, the overwhelming 
majority, 90 percent, of the civil servants will be happy to 
carry on in the Special Administrative Region Government. Only 
a small proportion of them may, when the time comes, wish to 
leave the government. We hope these people will notify us two 
or three months in advance, as required by regulations. 
  As to the issue of the land fund, I feel this is also a pure 
misunderstanding. At the subgroup discussion of the PWC, we 
made it very clear that the reason we discussed the issue of the 
land fund is that we hope on 1 July 1997, without a day's delay, 
we can hand the land fund of over 100 billion [no currency 
specified as heard], or something like that, to the SAR 
Government in one lump sum without retaining a cent. But the 
question is which organization the land fund should go to. We 
discussed whether it should be the Foreign Exchange Fund or the 
Hong Kong Government's Financial Department. No matter what, 
the land fund will certainly be handed to the Special 
Administrative Region Government. If the Special Administrative 
Region Government, for a time, cannot decide how to take care of 
this fund, it may temporarily retain the structure of the 
existing commission for managing the land fund. This is why I 
said it was a pure misunderstanding. [end recording] 
  [Yuan] The Sino-British row has continued to this day 
without showing any signs of improvement. When will Lu Ping 
come again? Has Chris Patten considered the possibility of the 
British side extending a formal invitation to Lu Ping? 
  [Begin recording] [Patten] Well, that is something we will 
have to look at, whether or not it is sensible to make another 
formal suggestion to Director Lu. I think he knows perfectly 
well that as far as we are concerned, whenever he would like a 
meeting, we would be very happy to have one. 
  [Lu] Now we do not have the basis. First, you must go 
through these channels, including the channel of the PWC, and 
the two sides start communication and create some prospect of a 
solution through negotiation. Then the two of us can have a 
talk on the basis of this and this is the only way we can 
possibly work out some solution. If we go ahead and meet each 
other while nothing has settled into shape, it will be all 
empty. The two of us cannot possibly discuss many detailed 
issues. Only when the detailed issues have been solved at the 
more preliminary levels can we expect some solution from our 
meeting. 
  [Patten] I very much hope that Director Lu will have had a 
very good week in Hong Kong, will have seen what progress we 
have made in the last couple of years since he has been able to 
be here, will have seen that despite what was said at the recent 
PWC meeting, there is not much sign of social turmoil here in 
Hong Kong. I hope he will have had an enjoyable stay and I hope 
it will have encouraged him to come back many times before 30 
June 1997. We would very much like to see him and I hope that 
each time he comes, he will be able to broaden the number of 
people that he actually sees and communicates with. 

",16,"[ 0.10299939  0.11866879  0.00381678 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
159,"
WHEN Mr Chris Patten, Hong Kong's newly-appointed governor, arrives in the
colony in July he will find that, five years away from its reversion to
Chinese sovereignty, Hong Kong is thriving. Just a year ago the colony was
in the doldrums: a bitter fight with China over colonial government's plans
to build a huge airport was under way; the Gulf War had depressed tourist
arrivals; and the colony's first partially democratic elections were
looming.
Yet, in a way which underlines the skittish, manic depressive nature of the
place, business confidence is now at it highest level for three years. The
'airport problem' was solved with Mr John Major, Britain's prime minister,
going to Beijing last September to sign the deal; tourism has picked up;
and, more importantly, southern China's economic expansion, which continues
at an exceptional pace, has come to dominate local business sentiment.
In one year share prices on the Hong Kong stock exchange have risen by
nearly 40 per cent; so, too, have property prices. These singular rises in
asset prices - aided, to be sure, by a lax monetary policy  - underline the
brimming optimism of Hong Kong. The colony expects to grow by more than 5
per cent in real terms this year, after a 4 per cent real expansion in 1991,
and nearly 3 per cent in 1990.
To judge by the stock market, property prices, and bilateral trade with and
investment in China, Hong Kong appears to have come to terms with its future
ruler. The economic integration of Hong Kong with China is, considering that
it has occurred just over the past 10 years, nothing short of astonishing.
This integration is most visible in the way Hong Kong's trade has changed
over the past six years. During that time Hong Kong has reverted to a role
it occupied before the Second World War: that of entrepot for China's trade
with the outside world.
Last year, Hong Kong exported goods with a value of HKDollars 765.8bn; of
these HKDollars 534.8 were 're-exports', more than 80 per cent of which
related to trade with China. But for the re-export trade, Hong Kong would
have a visible trade deficit with the rest of the world because it is
becoming more of a service area and transferring some of its manufacturing
to south China.
The change in trade flows has had a corresponding impact on the colony's
economy. Manufacturing's share of gross domestic product and employment has
fallen, while the service sector - trade processing, communications,
shipping - has grown.
This change in Hong Kong's economy could not have happened without the
historic change of course China embarked upon in 1979. Deng Xiaoping,
China's paramount leader, opened the country's door and Hong Kong's
entrepreneurs rushed in.
Today, Hong Kong's factory owners in Guangdong - the Chinese province
bordering the colony - employ between 2m and 3m workers; Hong Kong supplies
China with an estimated 40 per cent of its foreign exchange earnings by
virtue of Chinese goods flowing through the colony, earnings of mainland
companies in the colony and remittances by local people to families still in
China; and, Hong Kong is the source of 60 per cent of foreign investment in
China.
Yet, in spite of the extraordinary economic integration that has taken place
over the past decade, China, at a political level, divides Hong Kong society
and politics. Come June 30, 1997, Hong Kong will be welcomed back into the
bosom of a country which, at best, nurtures ancient attitudes to civil and
political rights, and which for millennia has been ruled by an iron fist.
Although the Joint Declaration on Hong Kong's future which Britain and China
signed in September 1984 and the Basic Law which the Chinese parliament
passed in April 1991 provide for the maintenance of Hong Kong's way of life
and a 'high degree of autonomy', the colony's citizens have continued to
vote with their feet, seeking the protection of foreign lands and the
passports they offer.
There have been cases of Hong Kong Chinese returning to the colony but this
is hardly surprising given that their most popular destinations - Canada,
the US and Australia - have all been suffering economic downturns. Bored and
under-employed they have returned with their insurance policy - their
passport  - tightly gripped.
They have come back to a growing economy and to a place where last
September's elections for the Legislative Council have changed the political
landscape. Politics is no longer conducted in clubs but now in full public
view. The government, in the past rarely held accountable for its decisions,
now finds it has to make a case for its policies, from bus fares to
taxation. It faces a continual barrage of complaints from elected
representatives and pressure groups.
The government finds itself caught between forces pulling in opposite
directions. On the one hand there is a group of local,
democratically-elected politicians who implicitly challenge the colonial
government's legitimacy. They, having been elected, claim a right to have
their policies taken seriously and adopted.
On the other, in a curious reversal of fortune, is Beijing. It is keen that
the government retains its position of dominance - because it wants the
post-1997 government to inherit that dominance - and snarls each time the
colonial regime appears to accede to local demands.
Somewhere in the middle is a group of largely appointed politicians,
generally of the conservative stripe, some of whom sit in the legislature
and on the governor's Executive Council, or cabinet. They wish to retain
Hong Kong's free-wheeling capitalist system, are suspicious of their elected
brethren whom, they claim with some justice, wish to spend the colony's
wealth before it is earned. This group also seeks a non-confrontational
policy towards China, believing that it is better to work with the future
ruler than to antagonise it.
Mr Patten will have to chart his course carefully. Broadening political
representation in his cabinet is one not entirely risk-free way, but is an
option which if skilfully handled could repay handsome domestic dividends.
If successful it could take a lot of the rancour out of domestic politics.
In drawing the sting, however, from the domestic body politic he risks
inserting it into the tender hide of China. Beijing has already begun to
agitate on electoral reform; Mr Patten can expect more.
Beijing wants an extra seat in the 1995 legislature for its Hong Kong
business association, via one of the nine new 'functional constituencies' -
'rotten boroughs' by another name. This may prove a useful bargaining chip
for him to cash in, in the ensuing contest over electoral reform.
Yet Mr Patten's main task is to preside over the peaceful transfer of Hong
Kong to China in 1997. His key point of contact on the Chinese side will be
Mr Zhou Nan, the head of Beijing's unofficial embassy in the colony. A man
neither popular with his staff nor with the people of Hong Kong, Mr Zhou has
proved difficult for the British to deal with since his appointment after
the Tiananmen massacre of June 1989.
In the absence, however, of a replacement to match the new governor's
seniority, Mr Patten will have to deal with him as best he can. He will also
have to deal with Mr Lu Ping, head of the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office
of the State Council, and China's most senior official in charge of
day-to-day Hong Kong Affairs.
Mr Patten, with help from London, will have to give a kick-start to
proceedings within the Joint Liaison Group - the Anglo-Chinese forum in
which issues regarding the transition are decided. Although much was
achieved by the outgoing governor Lord Wilson, the list of what needs to be
done is daunting. Mr Patten will have to marshal all his considerable
political skills to achieve a breakthrough.
",16,"[ 0.01085569  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
160,"
THE SHARP deterioration in relations between Britain and China over Hong
Kong's political future has cast a pall over the colony's financial markets.
The territory's stock market opened this morning sharply lower. After half
an hour of trading the Hang Seng index was hovering just above 6,000, down
more than 245 points, continuing Friday's weaker trend. Analysts had
expected a decline in the market, which had recently risen strongly in
response to the economic policies announced by China's communist leaders.
Relations between the UK and China have deteriorated markedly since Mr
Patten, with the general support of the Hong Kong people, announced
proposals on October 7 for elections in 1994 and 1995 which would allow for
greater, though still limited, democracy in choosing local leaders.
Since then, the governor has repeatedly held out the possibility that he
will proceed with his plans even in the face of opposition from China -
marking a change in British policy towards Hong Kong and China. In the past
London has placed a priority on reaching agreement with Beijing.
Such a head-to-head contest between Beijing and Britain's governor in Hong
Kong would be without precedent in the colony. It would require from the
people of Hong Kong a defiance of Beijing which many of their business and
political leaders have been reluctant to make for fear of damaging their
interests.
Mr Patten presented his plans to officials in Beijing on a three-day visit
last week and told them he needed a decision by the end of the year. His
proposals were flatly rejected.
On Friday, Lu Ping, China's top official on Hong Kong affairs, said Beijing
would challenge the validity of future elections and abrogate agreements to
build the colony's multi-billion dollar airport if Mr Patten proceeded
without China's agreement.
The airport and its associated infrastructure projects have been a running
sore in Anglo-Chinese relations since the project was announced, in the
aftermath of the June 1989 uprising in Beijing, as a confidence boosting
measure for the colony. Agreement to proceed with the HKDollars 163.5bn
project was only reached a year ago when Mr John Major, Britain's prime
minister, visited Beijing.
Since then China has found fault with two alternative financing proposals
put to it by the Hong Kong government. It claims that both are not
cost-effective and would put an onerous financial burden on the post-1997
government in Hong Kong - charges which find little support in Hong Kong's
financial community.
The government had already let 17 contracts worth HKDollars 19bn - HKDollars
3bn under budget. Mr Patten has said the government would do its best to
complete the project in the absence of the Chinese government's approval.
But Lu's threat, calculated to scare the international financial community,
could make it difficult for the government to raise external finance to fund
the project.
Lu held out little hope of agreement on either constitutional or airport
related matters. He claimed the governor's plans violated the 1984
Anglo-British Joint Declaration on Hong Kong and the Basic Law, which will
act as Hong Kong's post-1997 constitution. He also asserted Mr Patten's
plans ignored assurances given by Mr Douglas Hurd, Britain's foreign
secretary, to Qian Qichen, his Chinese counterpart, on the conduct of the
1995 polls.
In a robust performance before a special session of the Legislative Council
(LegCo) on Saturday, Mr Patten reissued his challenge to Beijing to respond
with constructive alternatives to proposals he made on October 7 for the
colony's political development.
The governor said he was prepared to discuss these alternatives with China
but reminded legislators that any alternatives had to be fair, open and
command the support of the people of Hong Kong. They also had to be agreed
soon as legislation would have to be placed before LegCo early in the New
Year.
During the special sitting of LegCo, Mr Patten proposals were endorsed by
liberal politicians and some independents. Conservative politicians did not
declare their position. Some of the colony's newspapers also expressed
concern about China's reaction to the governor's proposals.
With an eye on these legislators, the governor reminded all members of LegCo
that it is they who will have to pass any legislation drawn up to provide
for the forthcoming elections. 'We should all be clear on where we stand,'
he said. 'Nothing can absolve members of this council from taking a view on
the future political development of Hong Kong.'
The proposals, which Mr Patten believes are consistent with Anglo-Chinese
agreements and Chinese law, provide for a greater, though still restricted,
application of democracy in the conduct of future elections.
Mr Patten denied that the UK had given China the undertakings Lu claimed. He
said he had no objection to letters from Mr Hurd and Qian being made public.
That decision, however, is not his.
The government is bracing itself for a further onslaught on Mr Patten's
plans from the colony's pro-Beijing press. Designed to undermine his public
support, these newspapers published more than 70 attacks on him and his
plans in the lead up to his visit to Beijing.
As China's attitude to the airport shows, it is prepared to sacrifice the
economic well-being of its people in response to a perceived threat to its
political authority.
Mr Patten, says his aides, knows this and does not plan to stand still.
According to aides, the governor believes he can carry the legislature; in
the event of failure to find agreement with China, they promise a publicity
campaign of the sort which prepared the colony for his policy speech. 'We
will not be neutral,' said one.
Mr Patten has said, however, that what he finally proposes has to be
'acceptable to the people of Hong Kong'. This condition allows him to change
his policies in line with his reading of public opinion and the reality in
LegCo. As another of his aides, speaking of the choices the Hong Kong people
now face, noted: 'It is their community after all.'
",16,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
161,"
MR Chris Patten, Hong Kong's governor, yesterday gave China until the end of
the year to accept his proposals for the colony's political development or
to present alternatives that would be acceptable to the people of Hong Kong.
After more than six hours of discussions with Lu Ping, director of the
Chinese cabinet's office of Hong Kong and Macao affairs, Mr Patten said: 'I
cannot say we reached a meeting of minds on what I put forward.'
He also indicated that they achieved little progress in settling the impasse
over the financing of Hong Kong's new airport project. Mr Patten said that
they had agreed the best forum for settlement was the Airport Committee of
the Anglo-Chinese Joint Liaison Group - a place where consensus has been
stalled for months.
This is Mr Patten's first visit to China as governor of Hong Kong. He leaves
for the colony tomorrow after discussions today with Chinese trade
officials.
It emerged last night that Li Peng, China's prime minister, had refused to
see him. Instead he will meet Qian Qichen, China's foreign minister.
On October 7, Mr Patten presented plans for the conduct of the colony's 1994
local and 1995 legislative elections which provide for much greater
democracy than has previously been the case in Hong Kong.
In considering alternatives to these plans, the governor said he was guided
by three principles. They should be 'fair', 'open and honest', and
'acceptable to the people of Hong Kong', he said.
Mr Patten said that he was prepared to meet Lu 'at any time and in any
place' to reach agreement but had reminded the Chinese they had only until
the end of the year.
He said the legislative timetable demanded that bills be put before the
Legislative Council (LegCo), the colony's unicameral legislature, early in
the new year to give effect to the planned changes for the 1994 and 1995
elections.
Although Mr Patten did not say so yesterday, he has suggested in the past
that he would be prepared to introduce his proposals for a slightly faster
pace of democratic development in Hong Kong without China's approval.
He went out of his way, however, to praise Lu - the man who holds day-to-day
responsibility for ensuring a smooth transfer of sovereignty over Hong Kong
in 1997. He lauded the manner in which Lu put forward China's position but
was less than pleased with what he had to say.
Mr Patten would give only few details of Lu's response to his proposals. He
said that Lu pointed out the existence of the Basic Law - the
Beijing-drafted constitution for Hong Kong post-1997. (This has become
Chinese code for 'no change'.)
'I am bound to say I don't think this answers some of the problems I have to
disentangle before the end of this year,' the governor said.
His visit has been preceded by a barrage of criticism of himself and his
proposals, in the pro-Beijing Hong Kong press, not seen since the Cultural
Revolution of the 1960s and early 1970s.
Mr Patten's defeat in the British parliamentary election earlier this year
has been used to suggest he is a failed politician.
",16,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
162,"
CHINA yesterday delivered an open challenge to Britain's continued
administration of Hong Kong when it said it would repudiate all commercial
agreements made by the colonial government that were not first agreed with
Beijing.
The challenge was immediately rejected by the Hong Kong government, which
accused China of violating Anglo-Chinese agreements and its own law for Hong
Kong which comes into force after the colony reverts to Chinese sovereignty
in June 1997.
The statement by the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office was seen in the
colony as an attempt by China to undermine confidence in Hong Kong's economy
and to defeat proposals by Mr Chris Patten, the governor, for more
democratic elections due in 1995. It represents a serious escalation in the
row which Beijing has linked to London's change in policy towards Hong
Kong's democratic development. Analysts in Hong Kong said it also amounted
to a bid by China for greater involvement in the colony's administration.
'They want to bring the government to its knees, if they can,' a senior Hong
Kong government official said last night.
The Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office of the Chinese government, in a
dispatch released through the Xinhua News Agency in Beijing, said that all
contracts, leases and agreements signed and ratified by the Hong Kong
government would be invalid after June 30 1997 unless they were first
approved by China.
It added, however, that China encouraged foreign investment in Hong Kong.
In London, the Foreign Office rejected Beijing's threat, saying it was
contrary to the 1990 Basic Law for Hong Kong.
In the absence of a British climbdown on democracy, or the defeat of Mr
Patten's proposals on the floor of the local legislature, China's escalating
attacks could undermine some large-scale business ventures in energy,
communications and trade which are planned for Hong Kong in addition to the
colony's HKDollars 175bn (Pounds 15bn) airport project.
Hong Kong's financial and business community was last night deeply concerned
about the growing rift between London and Beijing and is expected to voice
louder calls for Mr Patten to retreat. Liberal politicians said China's
behaviour underlined the need for democracy to protect Hong Kong from the
arbitrary exercise of power by Beijing.
British and US businesses with interests in Hong Kong were more sanguine
about prospects for the colony, indicating that Beijing's threat would have
no impact on investment decisions.
Share prices on the Hong Kong stock exchange fell nearly 3 per cent in
trading yesterday, although this was largely in response to comments by a
senior Chinese official late last week over the validity of the award of
land to a consortium to build a container terminal in Hong Kong. The warning
from Beijing yesterday came too late to affect the market.
The Hong Kong government responded to China's latest attack by declaring
that Beijing was in breach of both the 1984 Sino-British Joint Declaration
on Hong Kong's future and the 1990 Basic Law - the colony's post-1997
constitution - drafted by Beijing.
Both documents guarantee the safety of existing contracts after the colony
reverts to Chinese sovereignty.
Page 4
Beijing tries to pull mat out from under Patten
UK rejects Chinese veto
Lex, Page 18
",16,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
163,"
CHINA stepped up the war of words over the future of Hong Kong yesterday,
threatening to ignore the results of democratic elections proposed by Mr
Chris Patten, the colony's governor, once it assumes control in 1997.
It also accused him of slamming the door on further talks.
Mr Lu Ping, China's senior official for Hong Kong affairs, said that if Mr
Patten pressed ahead with his democratic reforms Beijing would start a 'new
kitchen' in 1997 - a Chinese expression which means making a fresh start.
Mr Lu also added his voice to personal criticism of the governor, saying
that he would be condemned by history over his handling of the Hong Kong
issue.
Speaking at a Beijing press conference, he left the door open, however, for
further contacts with Britain, saying that China 'always stands for
co-operation, and not confrontation'.
In London, the Foreign Office stressed that it was still offering 'talks at
any time'. An official added: 'The only sensible way forward is for the two
sides to sit down and discuss without preconditions the points of difference
between us.'
The remarks by Mr Lu, head of China's Hong Kong and Macao Affairs office,
were greeted with relief by the Hong Kong stock market, which had been
bracing itself for a more uncompromising stand.
The Hang Seng index was some 200 points down before Mr Lu's press
conference, but recovered most of its losses to close at 5,958.33, down 21.7
on the day.
Mr Lu said: 'We will construct a kitchen in accordance with the design in
the Basic Law. We have to do this because the kitchen started by Mr Chris
Patten before 1997 will not converge with the stipulations of the Basic Law
after 1997.'
The Basic Law is a mini-constitution for Hong Kong after 1997 which was
approved by China's parliament in 1990.
Mr Lu said China would have to make preparations ahead of 1997 for the
cancellation of Mr Patten's proposed democratic reforms; but he stopped
short of saying China would set up an alternative administration in Hong
Kong before the end of British rule.
He also refrained from repeating economic threats made by China last year,
although it seems unlikely that Britain will win China's agreement to
complete Hong Kong's Dollars 175bn (Pounds 123bn) airport project, or
further develop the colony's container port.
In Beijing, Sir Robin McLaren, Britain's ambassador, regretted the
continuing personal attacks on Mr Patten. He said that decisions over Hong
Kong were 'taken by the British government as a whole'.
In Hong Kong, Mr Patten reiterated his preparedness to hold talks with China
about his proposed 1994-95 elections. But in spite of the governor's
attempts to calm growing concerns over the row with Beijing, local
politicians were pessimistic about an early solution.
Page 4
Hong Kong greets Patten with a very Asian smile
Beijing's sound and fury
Hong Kong stocks, Page 39
",16,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
164,"
Mr Philip Tose, the maverick Hong Kong financier, once offered Britain's
Tory party Pounds 5m to remove Mr Chris Patten, Hong Kong's governor. Now,
he says, it is too late to make any difference.
With the battle over electoral reform ended, and less than 1,000 days to go
before the handover on June 30 1997, the die is cast. Hong Kong has embarked
on the final leg of its journey back to Chinese rule. And most people in the
colony believe there is little Britain can do by way of new initiatives.
As the sense of change becomes palpable - with China's Citic taking the
British trading company Jardine Matheson's seat on the board of the powerful
Jockey Club, and Mandarin beginning to displace Cantonese on the government
radio - it is now up to China to decide how smooth the handover will be, and
the shape of life beyond.
Optimists suggest that Chinese officials are beginning to realise that they
need British co-operation. 'Mr Patten is the governor and the representative
of the Hong Kong British government,' says one senior Chinese official in
Hong Kong. 'We have to deal with him. On many points we don't agree with him
but he is the governor.'
Some concrete evidence of this new realism is the agreement Beijing reached
last month with Britain on the funding for Hong Kong's HKDollars 160bn
(Pounds 13bn) airport development. This has freed funds for building a
railway connecting the airport to urban Hong Kong.
Encouragement is also taken from reports that Mr Qian Qichen, China's
foreign minister, is considering a visit to Britain next year. And Chinese
officials in Hong Kong indicate a desire to deal with the nitty-gritty of
the transfer at a meeting of the Joint Liaison Group, a bilateral body with
Britain, this month.
But Hong Kong's passage from British colony to a 'special administrative
region' of China still seems likely to be dogged by controversy.
'While we are totally sincere in wanting to be co-operative and
constructive, the nature of an enterprise as complicated as this makes it
very difficult to see circumstances in which there are not going to be any
more arguments,' says Mr Patten. 'What I hope is that we will make progress
in other areas which could avoid arguments becoming too poisonous and
seeping into everything.'
The chief obstacle to a smooth transition is the possibility of an exodus of
the senior civil servants, who have managed the colony with a light and
sophisticated touch. 'The biggest problem that Hong Kong faces is the
stability and continuity of the civil service,' says Mr Allen Lee, the
leader of the pro-business Liberal party.
Mr Lee says that, 'in general, Hong Kong people are still fearful of the
Communist party'. This is especially so among senior civil servants who will
have most day-to-day contact with representatives of the new sovereign power
after 1997. Many have come into close contact with mainland officials and
been subjected to humiliating treatment.
The importance of morale among the colony's 180,000 civil servants is
acknowledged by Chinese officials. Some, with a hint of desperation in their
voices, note that only the top 20 to 30 jobs will require vetting by
Beijing. 'The ones below . . . we hope these civil servants will stay,' says
one official. 'We need them; they have made a great contribution to Hong
Kong.'
It is hard to see how Beijing's desire to maintain a tight grip on the
levers of power can be meshed with the traditional independence and
professionalism of Hong Kong's civil service.
The transfer of sovereignty is full of seemingly innocuous details that turn
out to be traps for the unwary. Take school text books, which have recently
emerged as an issue because some pro-Beijing figures in Hong Kong do not
believe that the current texts used in schools are sufficiently 'patriotic'.
'We are not suggesting any change to the curriculum,' says Mr Tsang Yok
Sing, a leading Beijing adviser in Hong Kong who is himself a school
headmaster. 'We sent a selection of textbooks to Beijing and they were
shocked . . . by references to Taiwan as the Republic of China, the People's
Republic as a neighbour, and the glossing over of Britain's role in the
Opium War.'
Text books for the 1997/98 school year have to be ordered by the end of
1996. Already some publishers have said they may withdraw from the textbook
market. Given the high status accorded to education in Chinese society this
is a potentially explosive issue for Beijing if not handled sensitively.
Equally it is unclear quite what Britain can do to ease the situation.
But it is the absence of what is known as the through train that may prove
the most debilitating factor of all. The through train encapsulated the hope
that those elected in 1995 to the Legislative Council (LegCo), Hong Kong's
60-member law making body, would be able to serve their full four-year term,
regardless of the 1997 handover.
After the dispute on electoral reform, Beijing announced that it would
dismiss the 1995 LegCo once China resumed sovereignty of Hong Kong, and
replace it with a provisional legislature.
This decision is set to take Hong Kong into uncharted waters, and casts
doubt over the continuity of the colony's legal system.
The colonial government had planned to hand over by introducing a piece of
midnight legislation to eliminate all references in Hong Kong law to
institutions such as the governor and the Queen. But China says an
illegitimate 1995 LegCo cannot pass laws binding a future government.
However, the Basic Law - the China-drafted mini-constitution for post-1997
Hong Kong - does not provide for a provisional legislature as such, although
it does foresee a 'preparatory committee' to be formed in 1996 that will
determine who sits in this legislature.
Mr Tsang, a member of the Chinese government committee planning for the
handover, says the provisional legislature will have full powers to make
laws for an expected term of nine to 12 months.
'It's an extremely dangerous thing to have because they (Beijing) can clean,
with one sweep, any laws they don't like,' says Ms Anna Wu, an appointed
member of LegCo and a lawyer specialising in intellectual property law.
It seems likely that the committee to which Mr Tsang belongs, the
preliminary working committee, will become the 1996 preparatory committee.
That body may well elect from among itself the 60 members of the provisional
legislature.
Next year's elections will still matter, however. A strong showing by Hong
Kong's pro-democracy groups, led by Mr Martin Lee's Democratic party, will
be seen as a protest vote against Beijing. But a good showing by Beijing's
own supporters will create another problem: China would then have to decide
whether to accept an elected council favourable to its point of view.
Some take this prospect seriously. Mr Tsang says of the final
recommendations of the provisional legislature: 'I think it most likely that
any substantial conclusion will be deferred until after next year's
elections to see how things are.'
For Mr Patten, the cost of confronting China over the 1995 elections has
been high.
Even his supporters see him as a spent force. 'I think the governor has
become very stuck,' says Ms Wu, a Patten appointee. 'I can't see him
challenging the Chinese again over any other major issue. He will go for a
conciliatory, appeasement path,' she says, in the run up to the handover.
His critics go much further, suggesting that there is little chance of any
meaningful dialogue while Mr Patten occupies government house. 'At least one
senior Chinese official has said to me he believes there is no change of
restoring co-operation and trust unless and until we have a new governor,'
says Mr Tsang.
Mr Patten is adamant that he is not leaving Hong Kong until he has
discharged his duty. But it remains in China's gift to make Mr Patten a
player in the discussions on the transfer.
China's supporters in the colony claim that Mr Patten's policy is now to
make Hong Kong harder to govern by 'loosening the screws' before the British
leave. This is a reference to the repeal of some of the colony's more
repressive pieces of legislation, such as the power to censor films. Britain
used such ordinances to control Hong Kong but does not want to leave them on
the statute books for the incoming regime.
There is similar wariness among Chinese officials about the possibility that
Britain may lay down financial obligations which only have to be met after
1997.
Mr Zhou Nan, the most senior representative of the Chinese Communist party
and government in Hong Kong, recently attacked Mr Patten's plans for a
government-funded pension, saying: 'During the transition period, we should
not casually transplant a costly Euro-socialist pay-as-you-go concept to
Hong Kong without prudently taking into consideration similar western
programmes' long-standing track record of grossly under-estimating
liabilities and grossly over-estimating funding projections.'
Mr Patten claims that by 1997 public spending in Hong Kong as a percentage
of GDP will be lower than it was in 1982 - the year Britain began handover
negotiations with China. 'I don't think Hong Kong needs lectures on how to
run an economy or how to control public spending,' he says.
But this kind of debate is being increasingly overshadowed by the
realisation that the transition will be far from smooth.
One Chinese banker says: 'Hong Kong will become less free; more like
Singapore. There will be less freedom, but that's to be expected. The law
will become less important and personal contacts more important. There will
also be more corruption. These won't be immediate changes but will happen
over time. We will just have to get used to it.' In Mrs Wu's view: 'There is
no absolute guarantee for Hong Kong that the 1984 Sino-British joint
declaration will be met. The real issue is: how easy will it be (for China)
to break? 'One country two systems' is a political idea, not one that is
built on firm juridical foundations.'
",16,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
165,"
   The death rate from leukemia was nearly 60 percent
higher among smokers of more than 10 cigarettes a day than among
non-smokers, according to a study published Friday.
   While no direct link has been established between smoking and
leukemia, research published in the British Medical Journal showed
that the leukemia death rate among people who smoked fewer than 10
cigarettes a day was 34 percent higher than among non-smokers.
   For smokers of 10 to 20 cigarettes a day it was 57 percent, and
for smokers of 21 or more cigarettes 63 percent, the study showed.
   ``If the findings in our study represented a direct relationship
between smoking and leukemia, then it must follow that smoking is
responsible for more cases of leukemia than all the hitherto
established causes combined,'' said Dr. Leo Kinlen, director of the
Cancer Epidemiology Unit at the University of Edinburgh.
   Kinlen conducted the study of 248,000 U.S. military veterans
with E. Rogot, a statistician at the National Heart, Lung and Blood
Institute of the National Institutes of Health in Bethesda,
Maryland.
   They wrote that it was ``the largest study of leukemia and
smoking habits to date (and) represents additional evidence that
leukemia is a smoking-related disease.''
   In an editorial in the prestigious weekly, Professor Nicholas
Wald of St. Bartholemew's Hospital in London cautioned that no
cause-and-effect relationship had been established.
   But he added: ``Whatever the mechanism, the balance of evidence
suggests that smoking may cause leukemia.''
   It should therefore be added to the World Heath Organization's
list of tobacco-related causes of death, he wrote.
   The study was conducted on data collected from 248,000 veterans
between 1954 and 1969, the researchers wrote. During that period
723 died of leukemia. Of these 330 were cigarette smokers, 185 were
ex-smokers, 46 smoked cigars or and 162 were non-smokers.
   The study found that in some types of leukemia, the death rate
among smokers was sharply higher than the average.
   Thus for monocytic and myeloid leukemias, the rate among smokers
of more than 20 cigarettes a day was 93 percent higher, compared
with 48 percent for lymphatic leukemias.
   For smokers of 10 to 20 cigarettes a day the rate of death from
lymphatic leukemia was 76 percent higher, and for one to 10
cigarettes, 40 percent higher.
   When the data was broken down into smokers and ex-smokers, it
suggested that ex-smokers also are significantly more at risk. The
death rate among smokers was 53 percent higher, and among
ex-smokers 39 percent.
",17,"[ 0.29765461  0.01224775  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
166,"
   A form of blood cancer that strikes children
appears to be sometimes linked with genetic damage that hinders the
body's ability to make interferon, according to a study published
today.
   The researchers speculate that genes that oversee the body's
production of interferon, a disease-fighting substance, may play a
role in warding off the development of cancer.
   The researchers speculate that the interferon genes may act as
regulators that stop the body's cells from becoming cancerous.
   The researchers, based at the University of Chicago, found an
association between loss of the genes and development of acute
lymphoblastic leukemia, the most common form of childhood leukemia.
   They tested 62 patients with this kind of leukemia and found
that 29 percent of them were missing the interferon genes.
   Their work, directed by Dr. Manuel O. Diaz, was published in the
New England Journal of Medicine. It adds to the growing list of
cancers that have been associated with the presence or absence of
particular genes.
   Some genes, known oncogenes, are though to trigger cancer.
Cancer can also occur when other genes, known as anti-oncogenes,
are missing.
   Interferon plays a variety of roles in regulating the body's
immune defenses and controlling cell growth.
   The production of two forms of interferon, known as alpha and
beta-1, are controlled by two genes that are close together on
chromosome 9 in the body's library of genes.
   In the latest work, the researchers found that this section of
the chromosome was frequently missing in those with acute
lymphoblastic leukemia. However, they left open the possibility
that some other gene in this region besides those that make
interferon could also be the tumor-suppressing gene.
   Acute lymphoblastic leukemia accounts for about one-quarter of
all childhood cancers. It strikes one in every 30,000 children.
",17,"[ 0.31226256  0.01635306  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
167,"
   An experimental cancer drug that works after a
single round of treatment appears to be the most effective medicine
yet for a rare form of leukemia, according to a study.
   The drug _ called 2-chlorodeoxyadenosine, or 2-CdA _ has
produced complete remissions in almost all hairy cell leukemia
patients treated, and none has relapsed so far.
   Researchers who developed and tested the medicine report that it
``may well be the drug of choice in the treatment of hairy cell
leukemia.''
   The drug also has been used successfully against chronic
lymphocytic leukemia. It, like hairy cell leukemia, is a cancer of
the white blood cells, which produce disease-fighting antibodies.
   The latest study, published in Thursday's New England Journal of
Medicine, was directed by Dr. Lawrence D. Piro of the Scripps
Clinic and Research Foundation in La Jolla, Calif. Scripps recently
made an agreement with Johnson &amp; Johnson's Ortho Pharmaceuticals to
produce and distribute the drug once it's approved by the U.S. Food
and Drug Administration.
   In the published work, doctors gave the drug to 12 patients as
far back as four years ago. In 11, the disease disappeared and they
remain disease free.
   In all, the Scripps doctors have treated 24 patients with almost
complete success. However, they caution that longer follow up will
be necessary before they can be sure they have actually cured the
disease.
   Two other treatments for hairy cell leukemia have been developed
in recent years. They are interferon and deoxycoformycin, a drug
that is similar to 2-CdA. However, interferon is less effective,
and both of those treatments produce serious side effects.
   By contrast, the only unwanted effect of 2-CdA was a few days of
fever. Patients experienced no nausea, hair loss, rashes or other
symptoms typical of cancer therapy. Also unlike other treatments,
this one appears to work after a single seven-day course of therapy.
",17,"[ 0.26275471  0.01681821  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
168,"
   A single round of treatment with an experimental
new medicine appears to be highly effective against a rare form of
leukemia and may help fight other kinds of blood cancer as well,
says a study published today.
   The new drug was developed at Scripps Clinic and Research
Foundation in La Jolla, Calif., where doctors tested it on patients
with hairy cell leukemia. In almost every case, the medicine erased
all signs of the disease.
   Hairy cell leukemia affects the white blood cells that make
disease-fighting antibodies. Doctors are also testing the drug
against chronic lymphocytic leukemia, non-Hodgkins lymphoma and
cutaneous T cell lymphoma.
   The Scripps doctors concluded that the medicine, called
2-chlorodeoxyadenosine, or 2-CdA, ``may well be the drug of choice
in the treatment of hairy cell leukemia.''
   The study was directed by Dr. Lawrence D. Piro and published in
the New England Journal of Medicine.
   In their study, doctors gave the drug to 12 patients. Of these,
11 have remained completely free of all signs of the disease for
periods up to four years.
   The doctors cautioned that longer follow-up will be necessary
before they can be sure they have actually cured the disease.
   Two other treatments for hairy cell leukemia have been developed
in recent years. They are interferon and deoxycoformycin, a drug
that is similar to 2-CdA. However, interferon is less effective,
and both of those treatments produce serious side effects.
   By contrast, the only unwanted effect of 2-CdA was a few days of
fever. Patients experienced no nausea, hair loss, rashes or other
symptoms typical of cancer therapy. Also unlike other treatments,
this one appears to work after a single seven-day course of therapy.
   The Scripps Clinic reached an agreement recently with Johnson &amp;
Johnson's Ortho Pharmaceuticals to produce the drug, which is not
yet approved for routine use.
",17,"[ 0.27729465  0.01597399  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
169,"
   Men who smoke heavily are nearly twice as likely as nonsmokers to die from a common form of leukemia, concludes a report by the University of Edinburgh. 

   The analysis, based on a previous study of 248,046 U.S. veterans, offers the firmest link yet between cigarette consumption and the disease. 
The finding could add leukemia to the already lengthy list of suspected health risks from smoking. 

   The report in tomorrow's British Medical Journal ""may well have an emotional impact on some people who are vacillating"" about quitting smoking ""and for one reason or another have a fear of leukemia,"" suggested Nicholas Wald, an epidemiologist at the Medical College of St. Bartholomew's Hospital here. 

   ""The balance of evidence suggests that smoking may cause leukemia,"" Dr. Wald wrote in an accompanying commentary on the analysis, which was conducted by University of Edinburgh epidemiologist Leo Kinlen. 

   Dr. Kinlen, who directs the university's Cancer Epidemiology Unit, examined leukemia deaths from a U.S. study that had tracked veterans' smoking between 1954 and 1969. 
The earlier study tallied overall deaths from various causes, including 723 deaths due to leukemia. 
Dr. Kinlen found veterans who had smoked more than 21 cigarettes a day were the most likely to die from myeloid leukemia, the most common form of the disease in middle-aged people. 

   These heavy smokers had a 93% greater chance of developing fatal leukemia than the veterans who never had smoked. 
For those smoking between 10 and 20 cigarettes a day, the increased risk was 75%. 
And men using fewer than 10 cigarettes daily were 31% more likely to die from leukemia than nonsmokers, according to the report. 

   Previous studies have observed higher death rates from leukemia among smokers, but either involved fewer patients or didn't compare amounts smoked with incidence of the disease. 
For this reason, leukemia ""has in general not been regarded as a a malignancy related to smoking,"" Dr. Kinlen wrote. 

   The latest analysis doesn't prove a causal link, Dr. Kinlen noted in a phone interview. 
But ""it is the best evidence to date that the relationship is genuine."" 

   If the link is causal, an editorial in the medical journal said, ""then smoking is a more important cause of leukemia in adults than all other known causes combined."" 
Current known causes include radiation and exposure to the chemical benzene. 

   Leukemia is fairly rare. 
An estimated 18,100 Americans will die from it this year, making the disease the fifth-greatest cause of cancer deaths. 
But leukemia represents the third-leading cause of death in U.S. children, behind accidents and birth defects, according to the American Cancer Society. 

",17,"[ 0.21273419  0.01225488  0.20496214 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
170,"
   The results need to be replicated by other researchers
before definitive conclusions can be made, and the long-term
effect of the treatment remains unknown. But the initial
experience with the compound is especially promising, and an
apparent improvement over other therapy for the disease,
scientists said.
   ""There aren't many {drugs} where you can administer one
course of treatment and have the disease go away and stay
away for as long as four years,"" says Lawrence Piro, chief of
cancer research at Scripps Clinic &amp; Research Foundation, La
Jolla, Calif., where the drug was developed. ""The leukemia
hasn't come back in any of the patients we treated."" The
study is published in today's New England Journal of
Medicine.
   ""It is without doubt the most effective treatment for
hairy-cell leukemia, in terms of rapidity of response,"" adds
Elihu H. Estey, a cancer researcher at the University of
Texas-M.D. Anderson Cancer Center, Houston. Dr. Estey
recently began treating patients with 2-CdA and has had
similar results with five patients. ""It's a striking
finding,"" he says. ""It's very unlikely to be a fluke.""
   Hairy-cell leukemia, so-called because of the appearance
of the cancerous cells under the microscope, affects about
6,000 people in the U.S., with 600 new cases a year. As the
disease progresses, patients become anemic, are vulnerable to
infection and often need blood transfusions.
   Until the mid-1980s, treatments were ineffective, and
patients often died of blood problems and infections. Since
then, alpha interferon, a drug sold by Hoffmann-La Roche Inc.
and Schering-Plough Corp. and an experimental drug called
deoxycoformycin have significantly reduced death rates from
hairy-cell leukemia. Hoffmann-La Roche is the U.S. subsidiary
of F. Hoffmann-La Roche &amp; Co. of Switzerland.
   But neither drug is as effective as 2-CdA appears to be in
low doses and both can cause such side effects as nausea,
vomiting, skin rashes and nervous-system disorders,
researchers say. ""With the lack of toxicity and the ease with
which people go into remission {with 2-CdA}, I think there's
something really going on here,"" says Ellin Berman, a staff
leukemia doctor at Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center,
New York.
   Scripps said it negotiated an agreement with a subsidiary
of Johnson &amp; Johnson, New Brunswick, N.J., to produce and
distribute 2-CdA to other centers for broader clinical
trials. The researchers said the drug is easy to produce and
thus is likely to be less expensive than other cancer
treatments.
   In the 12-patient study, 2-CdA, short for
2-chlorodeoxyadenosine, was administered continuously for
seven days to patients aged 36 to 61. Within eight to 10
weeks, 11 of the patients had no trace of cancer in their
blood or bone marrow; the 12th had a small amount remaining
in the marrow, but he declined further bone marrow
monitoring, Dr. Piro said. His blood tests are normal, Dr.
Piro added. None of the patients have had a relapse; complete
remission has lasted from seven to 46 months after treatment,
according to the study.
   ""When you can make all the disease go away with a single
infusion of therapy, you have a disease which may be able to
be cured,"" Dr. Piro said. But because hairy-cell leukemia
proliferates slowly, a relapse could occur long after
treatment. Longer follow-up is necessary to determine whether
2-CdA actually cures the disease.
   The drug was first made about 10 years ago at Scripps by
Dennis A. Carson, who studied severe combined
immunodeficiency disease, made famous a few years ago by the
Texas boy that lived in a bubble. People with that disease
lack an enzyme that processes deoxyadenosine, a chemical
that, without the enzyme, builds up in infection-fighting
white blood cells and kills them. Since cancer patients have
the enzyme, Scripps scientists developed a compound that
mimics deoxyadenosine, but tricks the enzyme so it can't be
processed. The compound then kills the white blood cells,
including those that are cancerous. New, normal white cells
are then generated in the bone marrow.
   Because hairy-cell leukemia is rare, a 12-patient study
""is considered a pretty good series,"" says Sloan-Kettering's
Dr. Berman. ""It's ironic that we have three active drugs for
a disease that's fairly rare, but for some of the more common
forms of leukemia, we don't yet have good treatments.""
   Dr. Piro said 2-CdA has also been used effectively in
initial trials to treat more common cancers, including
chronic lymphocytic leukemia, non-Hodgkins lymphoma and
cutaneous T-cell lymphoma. About 50% to 60% of patients --
most of whom had failed other treatments -- responded to the
drug, some with complete remission, he said. ""Now, we will
use {2-CdA} as a first treatment to see if response and
remission are higher,"" he said. Meanwhile, researchers at
University of California at San Francisco are testing 2-CdA
on AIDS-related lymphoma.
",17,"[ 0.1983949   0.00952404  0.         ...,  0.          0.04145905  0.        ]"
171,"
   Because of the way the acne drug is thought to work, the
results support a new concept of cancer chemotherapy. In the
type of leukemia suffered by the patients, white blood cells
have turned malignant at an immature stage of cell
development. Their arrested development is what renders them
practically immortal and dangerous.
   The acne drug is believed to trigger these immature but
malignant cells to divide and mature and then die essentially
a natural death. This new concept of triggering cancer cells
to mature and die contrasts with the conventional concept of
chemotherapy, in which drugs simply poison malignant cells.
   The drug used in the experimental treatment is known as
tretinoin, which belongs to a class of chemicals called
retinoic acids that are related to vitamin A. Tretinoin is
sold in ointment form as Retin-A, the acne medication
produced by Johnson &amp; Johnson's Ortho Pharmaceutical
division. The tretinoin used in the leukemia patients,
however, is a pill that was prepared for the experiment by
chemists at Hoffmann-La Roche Inc., the U.S. arm of Roche
Holding Ltd. of Switzerland. Roche, which has a long history
of making retinoic acids, sells one of its acids as Accutane,
a pill for treating severe acne.
   The particular form of leukemia that appears to respond
readily to the acne-drug type of treatment is called acute
promyelocytic leukemia. It is an uncommon cancer, afflicting
about 1,000 Americans a year, in which certain cells in the
bone marrow become malignant before they have matured into
fully functioning white blood cells. The malignant, immature
white cells (known as myelocytes) flood the blood stream,
producing fatigue, fever, weight loss and bleeding.
   Until now, chemotherapy with standard anti-cancer drugs
has been the only effective treatment for acute
promyelocyltic leukemia, but it produces cures in only about
a third of patients.
   The tip-off that an tretinoin-like drug might be effective
in treating the leukemia came from a genetic finding, Dr.
Raymond P. Warrell Jr. of Memorial Sloan-Kettering and his
colleagues in New York and at M.D. Anderson Cancer Center in
Houston reported in this week's New England Journal of
Medicine.
   Most patients with promyleocytic leukemia apparently have
the same defect in two of their 23 chromosomes, the
structures in the cell that contain all the genes. A piece of
chromosome number 17 appears to have broken loose and become
a part of chromosome number 15.
   Last year, molecular geneticists identified one of the
genes in chromosome 17 that was damaged when the chunk of the
chromosome broke loose. The damaged gene, it turned out,
ordinarily made a protein -- a receptor -- that grabbed hold
of retinoic acid. This and other laboratory findings
suggested that the immaturity of the leukemic white blood
cells might somehow be related to a foul-up in the way the
cells handled or failed to handle retinoic acid.
   The nature of the genetic damage also hinted that doses of
retinoic acids might prod the immature malignant cells to
proceed to maturity and then die as normal white blood cells
do.
   ""We're now the third group to show remissions {with
tretinoin} in this leukemia,"" following Chinese and French
researchers, Dr. Warrell said. But, he added, the U.S. group
is the first to show that the drug works by triggering the
immature cancer cells to mature, or to ""differentiate,"" in
the biologists jargon. ""We've documented conclusively that
differentiation as a method of cancer therapy in humans is a
reality,"" he said.
",17,"[ 0.1917431   0.01104566  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.04808281]"
172,"
   President Bush today said he could suppport an
increased minimum wage but only if Congress also established a
sub-minimum training wage he said would prevent a loss of jobs.
   ``I've always said that my position on minimum wage is that I
would want it linked to a training wage, to a differential of sorts,
so that you don't throw people out of work by raising the minimum
wage,'' Bush said at a White House news conference.
   Bush said he had a ``certain flexibility'' on the question and
would await the recommendations of Labor Secretary Elizabeth Dole.
At no point did he say outright that he supported raising the
minumum wage, which has been $3.35 an hour since 1981.
   The president's comments came a day after Mrs. Dole told the
Senate Labor Committee that Bush's support of legislation to raise
the minimum wage would hinge on whether lawmakers included a
training wage in the legislation.
   Bush's stand puts him in opposition to the head of the Labor
Committee, Edward M. Kennedy, who said Thursday he remained opposed
to a training wage and was confident his bill to raise the minimum
hourly wage from $3.35 an hour to $4.55 would pass this year.
   Bush during the presidential campaign said in one interview that
he supported some increase in the minimum wage, provided it was
coupled with the training wage, although at other times his campaign
said Bush was against an increase.
   Mrs. Dole, sworn in to her Cabinet post four hours before the
hearing, was not specific as to how high Bush favors raising the
minimum wage or what kind of time limit to set on the training wage.
Employers would be limited as to the length of time they could pay
the training wage to a new worker.
   ``We have really not at this point had an opportunity to work
through the legislative agenda so I do want an opportunity to go
through this before I get into any great detail of what he is
willing to support,'' Mrs. Dole said.
   ``We're going to get it raised this year for sure,'' Kennedy,
D-Mass., said at the hearing, which he called to assess the impact
of projected labor shortages and the prospect of averting them by
training welfare recipients and lower-income workers for high-skills
jobs.
   Mrs. Dole said she could help erase the so-called ``skills gap''
in the American labor force by working to better coordinate the
numerous job-training programs of government agencies and placing an
emphasis on training the poor and unemployed.
   ``Minorities, the disadvantaged, persons with disabilities and
other groups traditionally left behind will be in demand by
employers as never before, but only if they are qualified,'' Mrs.
Dole said.
   In a brief interview after the hearing, Kennedy, who introduced
his minimum wage bill Wednesday, said ``my views haven't changed''
and that he would try to get the bill through the Senate without a
provision for a training wage.
   Organized labor supports the increased minimum wage but opposes
the training wage, in part because it believes some employers would
use the lower wage to cut their costs by hiring people at the
training wage and laying off higher-paid workers. Mrs. Dole said she
would support adding language to the legislation to prevent that.
   Kennedy's bill would raise the minimum wage from $3.35 an hour,
its level since 1981, to $4.55 in three annual increases of 40 cents
an hour. The wage then would be indexed to 50 percent of the hourly
average income for U.S. workers. A similar bill has been introduced
in the House.
",18,"[ 0.25700549  0.01057514  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
173,"
   Backers of House legislation to raise the
minimum wage lowered their target to $4.55 an hour on the eve of
debate as President Bush declared he had the votes to sustain a veto
should Congress go above $4.25.
   The Democratic sponsors of the bill, scheduled for floor debate
beginning today, also agreed Tuesday to include a sub-minimum
training wage in their measure, a 60-day proposal that falls far
short of the six-month period demanded by Bush.
   And the president, at a White House meeting with reporters,
insisted he had made his best and last offer to raise the wage,
which has been frozen for eight years.
   Bush appeared with Labor Secretary Elizabeth Dole, who was there
to deliver a letter from 35 Republican senators who promised to side
with Bush should he veto minimum-wage legislation that fails to meet
White House guidelines.
   The administration guidelines include raising the minimum wage,
now at $3.35 an hour, to $4.25 an hour by 1992, provided employers
can pay new hires a ``training wage'' of $3.35 an hour for six
months. The administration says the sub-minimum wage is needed for
employers to create and fill entry-level jobs.
   Mrs. Dole, appearing today on ``CBS This Morning,'' said, ``Many
more jobs and job opportunities are saved if you have a six-month
training wage.''
   The minimum wage ``is not the tool for lifting people out of
poverty. Most people on minimum wage are very young, they are
part-time workers ... they're living at home and they're not in
poverty,'' Mrs. Dole said. ``If we are trying to lift people out of
poverty, let's go to other means such as training and education and
literacy.''
   ``There's enough votes in our grasp here to see that we don't
bust the budget and increase the pressures on inflation by going
beyond that which the secretary and I have agreed on,'' Bush said
Tuesday. ``We've thought out a level of increase on the minimum wage
that would help people and yet would not add gasoline to any
inflation fires that are burning.''
   The 35 senators, if their support for Bush held, would leave
Democrats short of the two-thirds majority needed to override a veto.
   ``For eight years this same coalition of Republican senators has
blocked any increase in the minimum wage,'' said Sen. Edward M.
Kennedy, D-Mass., sponsor of a Senate bill to raise the minimum wage
to $4.65 by 1992. ``Every American who works for a living deserves a
living wage, not a sub-poverty wage.''
   Senate floor action is still pending on Kennedy's bill.
   The bill due for House debate today calls for raising the minimum
wage to $4.65 by 1992 and has no provision for a sub-minimum
training wage, an idea long opposed by the sponsors and organized
labor, which has been lobbying heavily against such proposals.
   But the sponsors, facing mounting pressure from the White House
and moderate Democrats, agreed to scale back the final level to
$4.55 and add a training wage in an amendment worked out Tuesday
that has the support of the House leadership.
   At the same time, however, they said they would move up the
effective date of the initial increase, to $3.85 an hour, to Oct. 1,
three months earlier than had been planned. The amendment, to be
offered Thursday, calls for then boosting the minimum wage to $4.25
on Oct. 1, 1990, and to $4.55 a year later.
   The 60-day training wage would apply only to new entrants in the
job market, exclude agricultural workers, and expire on Sept. 30,
1992, according to aides. The training wage would initially be $3.35
an hour but would increase to 85 percent of the subsequent increases
in the minimum wage.
   Workers hired to fill jobs that had been vacated by recent
layoffs could not be paid the training wage, a provision designed to
prevent abuse of the system in order to pay lower wages.
",18,"[ 0.30127171  0.01084701  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
174,"
   House passage of a plan to raise the minimum
wage shifts the partisan battle to the Senate, where the leading
proponent of an increase is urging President Bush to refrain from
further veto threats while Congress settles on a final bill.
   The House voted 248-171 Thursday in favor of legislation that
would raise the minimum wage from the current $3.35 an hour to $4.55
by October 1991, with the first increase taking effect later this
year.
   The House then joined the Senate on an Easter recess that ends
April 3.
   High on the Senate agenda when it returns is a bill sponsored by
Sen. Edward M. Kennedy, D-Mass., that would raise the minimum wage
to $4.65 by 1992.
   Kennedy has said he is open to amending his bill, and in a
statement issued after the House vote he asked Bush, who has
threatened to veto any attempt to raise the hourly minimum above
$4.25, to keep an open mind until the House and Senate agree on a
bill.
   ``This is an excellent opportunity for Congress and the
administration to demonstrate that they can work together and in
doing so achieve a fair increase in the minimum wage and an honest
training wage,'' Kennedy said.
   Bush has insisted that a six-month sub-minimum training wage
covering all newly hired employees be created in any legislation to
raise the minimum wage, a provision he said will help offset
potential job losses caused by raising the minimum.
   Sponsors of the House bill, while disputing GOP projections of
massive job losses, added a provision allowing a sub-minimum wage to
be paid to new hires for two months provided it was their first job.
   That falls far short of the White House demand and, with Kennedy
also opposed to Bush's training-wage proposal, that issue likely
will be a major sticking point in any attempts to reach a compromise.
   Several Republicans insisted that Democrats were going to have to
give in to Bush _ who appears to have the votes to sustain a veto _
or let a ninth year pass without any change in the minimum wage.
   ``The question is do you want a bill or do you want a political
issue?'' Rep. Steve Gunderson, R-Wis., said during an unsuccessful
GOP effort to substitute Bush's proposal for the House leadership's
measure. ``If you truly want to raise the minimum wage this is the
only game in town.''
   But Democrats argued they had given enough by cutting the final
increase from $4.65 an hour to $4.55 and by adding the new-hire wage.
   As amended, the House bill would boost the minimum wage to $3.85
an hour on Oct. 1, to $4.25 on Oct. 1, 1990, and to $4.55 a year
later. The provision for the new-hire wage, to be pegged at 85
percent of the minimum wage, would expire Sept. 30, 1992.
   It also would expand exemptions allowing small businesses to pay
wages lower than the minimum wage and would allow employers of
workers who earn tips to pay them 50 percent of the minimum wage,
down from the current 60 percent.
   Current law exempts service businesses with annual sales of less
than $362,000 from the minimum-wage law; the House bill increased
that level to $500,000. The provision is rarely used, however,
because of confusing regulations lawmakers say will be simplified in
conference committee if the Senate passes a minimum-wage bill.
",18,"[ 0.29775948  0.01143526  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
175,"
   President Bush today renewed his threat to
veto legislation raising the minimum wage beyond $4.25 an hour as
Senate Democrats moved to quickly pass a bill raising the wage
floor to $4.55.
   House Minority Leader Bob Michel, R-Ill., who met with Bush and
relayed his comments to reporters, said the president ``made it
abundantly clear there will be absolutely no flexibility, not one
penny, not one deviation'' from his position on the minimum wage.
   Bush met with Republican congressional leaders hours before the
Senate opened debate on the legislation.
   The Senate bill, sponsored by Sen. Edward M. Kennedy, D-Mass.,
would raise the hourly minimum from $3.35 to $4.65 by January 1992
and contains no provision allowing a lower wage for new workers.
   But Kennedy aides said he would offer an amendment making his
measure identical to the House bill passed two weeks ago, which has
a final wage of $4.55 and would allow employers to pay new entrants
in the job market a ``sub-minimum'' for two months.
   Bush has insisted that employers be allowed to pay any new
employees a sub-minimum ``training wage'' for six months. The GOP
leaders who met with Bush said he also reiterated his opposition to
shortening that time frame.
   Another of the Republicans with whom Bush met, Sen. Thad
Cochran, R-Miss., told reporters afterward that ``the message that
was given to the president by the Senate (GOP) leadership was that
we're going to stand with him on the minimum wage issue. And we
urged him not to back down from his commitment to $4.25 and the
six-month training wage.''
   Republicans could thwart the Democrats' quick-passage strategy
by staging a filibuster, but an aide to one leading GOP senator
said there were no plans to do that. The aide said it appeared the
Democrats had the votes to win passage of their plan by early next
week.
   Meanwhile, a new poll said there was overwhelming public support
for an increase in the minimum wage, which has been at $3.35 since
1981.
   The Washington Post@ABC News survey, conducted March 30 through
April 3, said 84 percent of respondents backed an increase while 14
percent did not. Eighty-two percent said they favored an increase
even if it would trigger higher consumer prices.
   But only about half of the 84 percent who initially favored a
higher minimum wage said they would hold to that opinion even if it
meant businesses would stop hiring, or would fire, workers because
of added payroll costs caused by a higher minimum wage. The poll
had a margin of error of plus or minus 3 percentage points.
   By agreeing to amend his bill, Kennedy, provided the amended
version wins passage, averts the need for a conference committee to
resolve differences between the House and Senate versions.
   A number of other amendments were also expected, including a GOP
attempt to substitute Bush's proposal.
   A lobbyist in favor of raising the minimum wage said Bush's
repeated veto threats had all but quashed any hopes by Democratic
sponsors of avoiding a showdown with the president.
   ``He says he won't compromise so I don't see a need for us to do
anything except send him our bill,'' said AFL-CIO lobbyist Robert
McGlotten.
   Bush has been adamant in saying he would veto the House-passed
bill and appears to have the votes to sustain a veto in both
chambers of Congress.
   While the House-passed bill cuts the final target of the hourly
minimum wage to $4.55, it moves up the effective dates of the three
increases from Jan. 1 to Oct. 1 _ meaning the first increase would
come this year and the last jump would occur Oct. 1, 1992.
   Bush has proposed three 30-cent increases in the minimum wage
beginning Jan. 1, 1990, and ending two years later with the hourly
minimum at $4.25.
   The president said his support for those increases hinges on a
provision allowing employers to pay new workers a sub-minimum wage
for six months regardless of any past experience with another
employer. The sub-minimum, under the Bush plan, would be $3.35 an
hour after the first increase in the minimum wage. It would rise to
$3.40 an hour by 1992.
   The House-passed bill sets the wage for new hires _ provided it
is their first job _ at $3.35 effective Oct. 1. When the subsequent
increases in the minimum wage took effect the sub-minimum would
rise as well, to 85 percent of the minimum. The provision allowing
the new-hire wage would expire on Sept. 30, 1992.
",18,"[ 0.33006592  0.00950698  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
176,"
   Here are key provisions of the legislation
Congress passed last year to increase the minimum wage to $4.25 an
hour and establish a subminimum training wage for certain teen-age
workers. The measure takes effect Sunday.
",18,"[ 0.11346628  0.06536401  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
177,"
A MINIMUM wage is a convenient and effortless way for a left-of-centre
government to appear to be doing something about the problems of poverty,
public sector pay and the growth of unskilled employment. It is also largely
ineffective at solving any of them. But Labour's proposed minimum wage would
only be positively harmful if, as the Tories claim, it will reduce
employment. The recent international evidence is surprisingly mixed.
There are many estimates of the potential employment cost of Labour's
minimum wage. Most of them are based on model simulations of the UK economy.
All of them are, at best, semi-educated guesses; and probably not worth the
effort. No-one knows whether, or how, introducing a statutory minimum wage
would affect unskilled wages and employment.
International evidence is a better source of clues on the likely effects of
a UK minimum wage. The US, in particular, also has a large and highly
competitive service sector employing many women and young people at
relatively low wages. The federal government has increased the statutory
minimum wage twice in the past two years, most recently in April 1991.
Most US studies of the effects of the minimum wage over the past few decades
have found a moderately negative impact on employment, mainly among young
people. A recent study of the effect of extending the mainland minimum wage
to Puerto Rico in 1974 found a more dramatic employment effect. By 1980 the
federal minimum wage was 75 per cent of the average wage in Puerto Rico's
manufacturing industry compared to 43 per cent on the mainland. Its
unemployment rate rose from 11.3 per cent to 23.4 per cent between 1974 and
1983, of which over one third is estimated to be a direct result of the rise
in the minimum wage.
Yet a number of recent empirical studies of the effect of last year's rise
in the US minimum wage fail to support this traditional view. One of the
most careful, directed by Mr Lawrence Katz and Mr Alan Krueger of Harvard
and Princeton Universities, surveyed the wage and employment practices of
314 Burger King, Wendy's and Kentucky Fried Chicken restaurants in Texas in
August 1991. A third of them had also been surveyed the previous December,
before the higher federal minimum wage came into effect in April. Over half
of the restaurants had to raise the lowest wage they paid by the full 45
cent increase in the minimum wage. Only 5 per cent of restaurants were
already paying more than the new minimum.
The survey directly contradicts the conventional view that raising the
minimum wage prices people out of jobs. On average, the restaurants that had
to increase their wages by more tended also to have a larger increase in
employment, as the right-hand chart shows. Each dot signifies one
restaurant's growth of wages and full-time employment. There are many
outliers; but the upward sloping 'best-fit' line between the dots indicates
a positive, and statistically significant, relationship between higher
mandated wage growth and higher employment. A 10 per cent wage increase is
predicted to raise relative full-time employment by 25 per cent.
The survey does not suggest that raising the minimum wage increases
unemployment, at least among hamburger-flippers. One explanation is that
fast-food restaurants can impose below-market wages on their existing
employees but have to raise them to market rates in order to attract new
employees. Only when the government mandates this general wage increase does
expansion become profitable. But the result is not more skilled employment,
as Labour would have us believe. Moreover, the same argument would not apply
to internationally competitive industries; a similar study of textile
companies could well give the more conventional result. But the US evidence
does counsel against confident empirical generalisations.
'The effect of the minimum wage on the fast food industry.' NBER working
paper 3997; 1050 Massachusetts Avenue, Cambridge MA 02138, USA.
",18,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
178,"
   On the day the 25-cent-an-hour minimum wage became the law of the land nearly 50 years ago, a wave of pecan-shelling and tobacco-stemming factories closed throughout the South and industries warned of economic mayhem. 

   Similar alarms are likely to be sounded today when Sen. Edward Kennedy (D., Mass.) and Rep. Augustus Hawkins (D., Calif.), who head the Senate and House Labor committees, are expected to introduce legislation to increase the minimum wage from its current rate of $3.35 an hour to about $4.65 hourly over three years, with future automatic annual adjustments. 

   If the wage is boosted, warns Anne Papa, a National Restaurant Association official, ""employers will be forced to cut back on their work forces."" 

   But pressure is building among Democrats in a Congress they now control to raise the wage, which was last increased six years ago. 
Says Rep. Hawkins: ""The cost of living has gone up tremendously since the minimum wage was last raised. 
The value has been eroded."" 
Adds Sen. Howard Metzenbaum (D., Ohio): ""We haven't adjusted it for inflation for a number of years and the issue needs our attention."" 
Prospects for passage look favorable. 
""It is going to happen,"" predicts a Democratic House strategist. 

   What's less certain is the shape the bill will finally take, and whether a veto is inevitable from a president who once said the minimum wage ""has caused more misery and unemployment than anything else since the Great Depression."" 
Republicans generally contend that the way to help the low-paid isn't by mandating higher pay and forcing some of them out of jobs but by expanding job training and education. 

   Conceived as part of the New Deal, the minimum wage was heralded at its birth as ""one of the most notable advances in our national effort to improve economic conditions in the United States."" 

   But inflation has taken a toll in recent years. 
Congress last voted in 1977 to increase the wage; the last of four step-ups occurred in January 1981 when it rose 25 cents to $3.35. 
But while the wage has remained the same, prices have climbed 28%, according to economist Sar Levitan. 
He asserts that the inflation-adjusted value of the minimum wage is now at the lowest level in 33 years. 

   The AFL-CIO calls minimum-wage workers ""the have-nots of America."" 
The labor federation has made the issue a legislative priority, arguing that an increase is long overdue. 
""The minimum wage simply has not kept up with rising living standards and rising median wages,"" adds Jeff Faux, president of the Economic Policy Institute, a liberal think tank. 

   Attention to the issue is heightened at a time of national focus on welfare overhaul. 
""If we want to support the work ethic, we have to give people a living wage,"" says Mr. Levitan, who directs George Washington University's Center for Social Policy Studies. 
He and others concede that increases in the minimum wage do result in some job losses. 
But they contend the extent is overstated, and partly offset by new jobs created by stimulated economic growth. 

   Moreover, an increase will ""eliminate a great deal of deprivation in the United States,"" he says. 
His research shows that income from the minimum wage was enough to raise a family of three out of poverty during most of the 1960s and 1970s. 
But not anymore. 
Now, someone working full-time at the minimum wage earns $6,968 a year, or $1,773 less than the 1986 poverty threshold of $8,741 for a family of three. 
Only a worker living alone can make enough money at the basic wage to lift himself above the poverty line. 

   But many business groups think the consequences of another increase will be dire. 
It would ""cost jobs . . . drive up prices and decrease services,"" asserts Mark de Bernardo, manager of labor law for the U.S. Chamber of Commerce. 
The chamber claims that 644,000 jobs were lost as a result of the last minimum-wage increase. 

   Employers say they'd have to raise wages for other workers, and costs would inevitably be passed on to the consumer. 
""There were 70,000 small-business failures last year,"" says Mr. de Bernardo. 
""If we see a minimum-wage increase, that number is going to increase dramatically."" 

   Small businesses in the restaurant and retail fields fear the worst damage. 
Jerry Goodwin, president of Reese Coffee Houses in Denver, sees nothing but ""harmful effects."" 
The last time the minimum was raised, he laid off the graveyard shift at one of his seven coffee shops to cut costs. 
""I let those four people go and those four jobs have been lost forever,"" he says. 

   Critics argue that ripple effects affect everyone. 
Higher labor costs force employers to cut corners, and service suffers. 
""You go in a parking lot in Denver, there's never an attendant,"" says Mr. Goodwin. 
""I haven't seen an usher in a theater in 10 years."" 

   Counters Rep. Hawkins: ""There's something wrong with a small business that needs this substandard wage to survive."" 

   About 61 million workers in a national work force of 120 million are covered by the minimum-wage law. 
They are generally those who are engaged in interstate commerce or produce goods for interstate commerce. 
Nearly 3.5 million hourly workers earn the minimum wage, according to the Labor Department, but it's expected that any increase would also benefit the nearly 1.5 million workers who are paid below the minimum and others who earn slightly above the minimum. 

   Who the minimum-wage earners are is a source of dispute. 
Mr. Levitan's research shows that nearly 30% are heads of households and about the same number are teenagers. 
But the Chamber of Commerce claims they are mostly teens entering the work force, students working part time, or adults supplementing primary family incomes. 
Thus the chamber's Mr. de Bernardo says arguments about family poverty are misleading. 
""It is not the head of the household who is earning minimum wage,"" he says. 

   The historical goal has been a minimum wage equal to half the average wage for non-supervisory private workers, which is currently $8.88 an hour. 
Reaching a consensus among the bill's backers has been difficult as strategists try to balance the concerns of labor and other interests with political expediency. 
Considerations include what, if anything, might be palatable to the White House and what would draw enough support to override a veto. 

   Republicans have warned they may counter the push to expand the minimum wage with a long-sought subminimum wage for teens, but an administration official says no decision has yet been made on its position on an increase. 

   ---
    Rise of the Minimum Wage
    1938        $0.25
    1939         0.30
    1945         0.40
    1950         0.75
    1956         1.00
    1961         1.15
    1963         1.25
    1967         1.40
    1968         1.60
    1974         2.00
    1975         2.10
    1976         2.30
    1978         2.65
    1979         2.90
    1980         3.10
    1981         3.35
    Source: Department of Labor
",18,"[ 0.79812638  0.00416084  0.13222067 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
179,"
   The Reagan administration may be willing to relax its opposition to an increase in the minimum wage if Congress agrees to dilute the legislation significantly, Labor Secretary William Brock indicated. 

   Mr. Brock said in an interview that exemptions from the minimum wage would be necessary for youths who lack entry-level job skills and for small businesses. 
He also said that Congress would have to drop plans to tie future rises in the minimum wage to the average wage for all non-supervisory private workers after 1990. 

   If Congress favors ""those positive components, we can sit down and talk about it,"" the secretary said. 
But the administration will remain opposed to any broad minimum-wage boost that results in ""massive disemployment"" of young people, he added. 

   This is the first indication that the administration would be willing to bend its staunch resistance to any increase in the minimum wage, which hasn't risen for six years. 

   Earlier this week, during the Senate Labor Committee's first hearing on a bill to boost the minimum wage to $4.65 an hour in 1990 from the current $3.35, Mr. Brock reiterated his opposition to an increase. 
He said boosting the level would worsen problems that many poorly educated, unskilled youths face in trying to find work in a more complex job market. 

   ""I am increasingly convinced that a number of people . . . are not only unemployed, but unemployable,"" Mr. Brock testified. 
""I don't want to take a chance that we add to that problem"" by boosting the minimum wage and thereby pricing young people out of the job market. 

   In yesterday's interview, the secretary suggested the administration might accept a higher minimum wage, though perhaps smaller than in the pending bill, if Congress makes certain changes in the measure. 
The administration has long supported a subminimum wage for youths, along with stressing the need for job-training and education programs. 

   Mr. Brock's suggestions for modifying the minimum-wage bill aren't likely to receive a warm welcome from congressional advocates for raising the minimum. 
They say the wage level has lagged far behind the increased cost of living since 1981, seriously eroding low-paid workers' purchasing power. 
Most House Labor Committee members oppose any youth subminimum wage, the small-business exemption has foundered in the past, and wage-indexing must stay in the bill, a staff official for the panel said. 

   Rep. Augustus Hawkins (D., Calif.), chairman of the House Labor panel and co-author of the minimum-wage bill with Sen. Edward Kennedy (D., Mass.), chairman of the Senate committee, said that if Mr. Brock will put his ideas into a bill, the House committee will give it a hearing. 
Currently, it's too early to talk compromise, Mr. Hawkins said. 

   But an aide to a Republican senator said: ""Everybody is aware of the possibility"" of a compromise. 
""Many people feel that some kind of increase in the minimum wage is inevitable,"" he said, so an effort is afoot to see how Congress can ""do as little harm . . . and as much good as possible,"" while boosting the wage level. 

   Some congressional labor experts said Mr. Brock personally would like to deal on Capitol Hill for a minimum-wage compromise. 
One congressional staffer concluded: ""Apparently he's making some progress"" within the Reagan administration. 

",18,"[ 0.21089951  0.01104472  0.20319449 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
180,"
   Since Congress stopped raising the federal minimum wage in 1981, the U.S. economy has generated nine million new jobs at all salary levels. 
We don't think that is a mere coincidence. 
Some of those new jobs wouldn't be there if Congress had continued to dictate a minimum level of wages. 

   Yet organized labor, which constantly asserts its interest in job creation, has made a strong pitch for the Kennedy-Hawkins ""Minimum Wage Restoration Act,"" a bill that would head the minimum wage upward once more. 
More witnesses will be heard at a House hearing today. 
Worst news of all, Labor Secretary William Brock appears ready to compromise away President Reagan's soundly based opposition to the minimum wage. 

   When politicians and unions promote laws such as Kennedy-Hawkins, they say they are legislating benefits for working people. 
Such arguments are based on either economic illiteracy or hypocrisy. 
In reality, a minimum wage prices the weakest members of the work force out of jobs. 
A more candid union argument holds that increases in the minimum raises wage scales generally, but the truth of that is doubtful too. 
At any rate, a study commission appointed by Jimmy Carter estimated in a 1981 report that every 10% increase in the minimum wage cost the economy 80,000 to 200,000 entry-level jobs. 

   Kennedy-Hawkins proposes raising the minimum wage to $4.65 by 1990 from today's $3.35, and, more damaging, tying the minimum wage in future to the average wage for all non-supervisory private employees. 
Secretary Brock in June suggested the administration might go along with this scheme if youths are exempted and the indexing plan is dropped. 
That's exactly the kind of wobbly position this administration should be avoiding. 
A few more such compromises and the economic credibility President Reagan has so vigorously established will have been wasted away. 

   Senator Dan Quayle, a Republican, has calculated that two Democratic projects, the minimum-wage increase proposed for 1989 and mandatory health coverage, would add $1.49 an hour more to wage costs at the bottom of the income scale. 
That's more than a 44% increase. 
Employers on the margin will simply do without workers whose value doesn't justify a 44% cost increase. 

   Senator Kennedy, of course, wants it known far and wide that he is helping the poor. 
He asserts that because the current minimum is so low it threatens new American poverty. 

   In fact, just the opposite is true. 
Only some 5% of American workers today earn the minimum, compared with 12% six years ago. 
By and large, these are ""secondary"" and ""tertiary"" earners in households, many of them teen-agers. 
The absence of the minimum-wage constraint on the ability of these extra earners to find jobs has relieved poverty, not increased it. 

   Secretary Brock has said he won't concede on anything in the Kennedy package that will create job loss. 
That's nice. 
But does that leave anyone in government who is concerned about future job gains? 

",18,"[ 0.17573875  0.01265463  0.1693183  ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
181,"
   Between 1978 and 1981, Congress raised the minimum wage four times. 
Over that period, total U.S. employment rose 9%. 

   From 1981 through 1986, the minimum wage wasn't raised at all. 
And over that period, total U.S. employment also rose by 9%. 

   On the face of it, those figures would seem to resolve the age-old debate over whether increases in the minimum wage cost the economy a significant number of lost jobs. 
Yet now, as Congress moves toward raising the $3.35-an-hour minimum wage for the first time since 1981, the battle rages just as hot and heavy as ever. 

   Conservatives and business groups argue, as they have since the first minimum-wage law took effect in 1938, that employers will seek to cut costs by hiring fewer people -- these days, especially the young and minorities. 
""Higher wages . . . for some will mean jobs lost for those workers who are trying hardest to break into the labor market,"" warns GOP Sen. Dan Quayle of Indiana. 
The U.S. Chamber of Commerce forecasts that the proposed wage rise, to $4.65 hourly over three years, with further increases later, would cause the loss of 1.9 million jobs by 1995. 

   Not so, counters University of Pennsylvania economist Gerard Adams. 
He says the increase would affect the unemployment rate by less than one-tenth of a percentage point, and adds: ""Estimates of dire consequences to the economy as a result of raising the minimum wage do not stand up to scrutiny."" 

   John Zalusky, an economist at the AFL-CIO, which is strongly pushing the minimum-wage increase, snaps: ""The whole issue of job loss comes up every time, and there's never been any jobs lost."" 
The labor federation notes that since World War II, employment actually increased each time the minimum wage was raised, except in the 1975 recession. 

   The advocates of a higher minimum wage say increases are necessary to offset lost ground. 
In 1968, the minimum wage was about 53% of the average hourly wage of a manufacturing employee. 
Now the minimum amounts to only 34% of the average manufacturing wage. 

   No longer does the minimum wage keep all those who earn it above the poverty level: A full-time minimum-wage worker earns less than $7,000 a year, only 80% of what the government considers sufficient to keep a family of three out of poverty, and only 60% of what's needed for a family of four. 
But for single workers, who comprise about two-thirds of all minimum-wage workers, the pay keeps them about 25% above the poverty level. 

   The debate over raising the wage used to focus on the effect on low-paid, male factory workers. 
But as the economy has changed, so has the group most affected. 
These days, most of those paid the minimum wage are minorities, women, and teen-agers or young adults just entering the work force, often in service jobs. 

   Opponents of boosting the wage floor argue that it is these jobs that are most at risk. 
With youth unemployment nearly three times the overall jobless rate and minority youth unemployment more than six times that rate, ""the worst thing we could do is to exacerbate this problem,"" says Labor Secretary William Brock. 
""That is exactly what raising the minimum wage will do."" 

   Ronald Sarasin, a lobbyist for the National Restaurant Association, acknowledges that ""we're going to survive"" even if the the wage is increased, but warns of the consequences for low-paid workers: ""This is less a business issue than a jobs issue."" 

   Yet such arguments are hard to prove, based on past evidence. 
For instance, a 1970 report ordered by then-Labor Secretary George Shultz found that general business conditions are the main influence on teen-age employment, with only ""hints"" of an adverse effect from the minimum wage showing up in the data. 

   In 1981, the staff of the Minimum Wage Study Commission, which was appointed by President Carter, estimated that a 10% increase in the minimum wage would trim teen-age employment demand by about 1%, and that rises in that wage have had little impact on overall unemployment. 

   Among adults, the commission found that if increases in the wage floor lowered employment at all -- which it said isn't clear -- the amount may be so small as to be undetectable with any precision. 
Studies about whether minimum-wage increases hurt, or help, black workers are ""all over the lot,"" says University of Michigan economist Charles Brown. 

   Opponents of raising the minimum wage insist that past increases have had a substantial effect in both layoffs and ""disemployment"" -- workers not hired who otherwise would have been. 
At the U.S. Chamber of Commerce's annual meeting last April, 29% of attendees said they'd trim their employment and 26% said they'd delay hiring if the minimum-wage bill becomes law. 
William Stone, president of Louisville Plate Glass Co., with 80 workers, says that if the floor is raised, ""we have made the decision to pay our current employees overtime during peak workload times rather than hire additional workers."" 
Valley Variety, an Ansonia, Conn., dime store that pays employees two cents above the minimum, would forgo its expansion plans for a second store, says owner Richard Armstrong. 

   In many areas, however, a growing shortage of new workers has resulted in more-generous wages for fast-food, retail and other jobs, making the minimum-wage question irrelevant. 
In recent months, Philip Litman, owner of Bradford Stephen Inc., a Worcester, Mass., company with two gift stores, has seen the wage he must pay to get and keep help climb to $6 an hour from $4. 
""The minimum wage has no bearing on what we do -- it's a forgotten issue,"" he says. 

   And while the National Association of Manufacturers is part of the coalition opposing the increase, it doesn't even include the bill among its half-dozen legislative priorities. 
Many association members already pay well above the wage floor, explains Randolph Hale, a vice president: ""It's an important issue, but it's not the end of the world."" 

   As a result of those conflicting pressures, Labor Secretary Brock is trying to forge a compromise between the White House and Congress, where the Senate Labor Committee plans to act on a minimum-wage bill this fall, while the House committee plans further hearings. 
In return for administration agreement to raising the wage, Mr. Brock says, Congress must also allow a ""youth differential"" wage that's lower than the minimum wage, so as not to discourage employers from hiring untrained new job entrants. 
He is also pushing to exempt small business from the wage-floor requirement, and wants legislators to drop a provision that after 1990 would tie the minimum wage to average manufacturing wages. 

   But one way or another, an increase is almost sure to become law. 
A survey of voters for the Service Employees International Union in June showed 71% backing the wage-floor bill; in a Personnel Journal poll, even 60% of corporate personnel officials backed a minimum-wage increase. 

   Besides, observes Iowa GOP Rep. Fred Grandy, a member of the House Labor Committee: ""If members of Congress feel they can raise their own pay but not raise the pay of the average low-paid worker, they're mistaken."" 

   ---

           The Minimum Wage and Manufacturing Wages
                             AVG.            MIN. WAGE
               MIN.          MFG.        AS A % OF AVG.
 YEAR          WAGE          WAGE            MFG. WAGE
 1938         $0.25         $0.62                40.3%
 1939          0.30          0.63                47.6
 1945          0.40          1.02                39.2
 1950          0.75          1.44                52.1
 1956          1.00          1.95                51.3
 1961          1.15          2.32                49.6
 1963          1.25          2.46                50.8
 1967          1.40          2.82                49.6
 1968          1.60          3.01                53.2
 1974          2.00          4.42                45.2
 1975          2.10          4.83                43.5
 1976          2.30          5.22                44.1
 1978          2.65          6.17                43.0
 1979          2.90          6.70                43.3
 1980          3.10          7.27                42.6
 1981          3.35          7.99                41.9
 1987          3.35          9.81                34.2
   NOTE: Years listed, prior to 1987, are years during which
the minimum wage was raised.
   Source: Bureau of Labor Statistics

",18,"[ 0.96082493  0.00155259  0.05193392 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
182,"
   Congress soon will consider an increase in the federal minimum wage to $5.05 from $3.35 an hour. 
Supporters of the increase argue that a major impetus has been recent boosts in many state minimum-wage levels. 
Last year alone, nine states and the District of Columbia raised their minimum wage above the current federal level, and this year New York, New Jersey and Pennsylvania are considering doing the same. 
Yet, state and federal minimum-wage comparisons should be made with a great deal of caution. 

   There are many loopholes in federal minimum-wage coverage. 
Certain occupations, including casual babysitters and most farm workers, are excluded as well as employees of small businesses and firms not engaged in interstate commerce. 
State minimum-wage laws are intended to cover these workers. 
At the same time, if a state's minimum is higher than the federal minimum, the state minimum applies. 

   Moreover, the quoted minimum wage for a state is often deceptive. 
Some states offer what is, in reality, a menu of minimum wages rather than a single minimum. 
The District of Columbia, whose minimum of $4.85 is the highest in the country, actually has seven other ""minimum wages,"" all of which are lower than $4.85. 
Workers in the retail trade and laundry industry, for example, receive a minimum of only $3.50. 
Furthermore, the District of Columbia, like many states, has a subminimum, or ""training"" wage, of $3.35 for employees in some job categories who are under age 18. (Some states also have subminimums based on age, student status, approved internship programs or for new hires.) 
Moreover, 13 states have minimums below the federal level and nine have no minimum at all. 

   Another frequently overlooked point is that although 16 states have enacted minimum-wage levels above the current federal minimum of $3.35, not one has a minimum at or above $5.05. 
A minimum wage of $5.05 would require even the high-minimum-wage states of California and Connecticut to increase their mandated minimums by 19%. 

   Nonetheless, both Republican and Democrat members of Congress from high-wage states will likely find it difficult to vote against raising the federal minimum wage, since raising it would equalize wage costs among states and increase the competitiveness of labor in high-minimum-wage states. 
Yet the different minimum-wage levels to a large extent reflect regional variations in levels of unemployment and labor demand, as well as costs of living. 
Typically, states with high minimum wages have low levels of unemployment and/or high costs of living. 
California and Massachusetts, with unemployment rates of 5.6% and 3.8% are representative of states with high minimum wages. 
Compare these unemployment rates to those of Alabama and Louisiana, states that have no minimum wage. 
Their unemployment rates are 7.9% and 12% respectively. 

   The advantage of allowing state or regional differences in minimum-wage levels is that the appropriate minimum wage for Connecticut might force massive layoffs in Texas. 
Wyoming's minimum of $1.60 would be meaningless, even laughable, in Massachusetts, where most employers must pay well above the federal minimum wage to attract applicants for job openings. 
Because states are the best judges of local conditions, they are in a better position to set minimum-wage laws. 

   Proponents of a federal increase argue that recent state increases signal grassroots support of the current minimum-wage bill before Congress. 
Yet 41 states are still at or below the current federal level. 
As Robert Martin of the Chamber of Commerce has pointed out: ""Most states recognize that what you pay someone is determined by supply and demand."" 
This is a lesson the folks in Washington could bear learning. 

   ---
   Ms. Ormiston is an economist for the House Republican Research Committee. 

   ---

                       Minumum Wages
    Proposed federal wage (1/1/92)          $5.05
    Wash., D.C.                              4.85
    Proposed federal wage (1/1/91)          $4.65
    Calif. (7/1/88), Conn. (10/1/88)         4.25
    Minn. (1/1/90)                           3.95
    Alaska, Hawaii, Maine (1/1/90)           3.85
    Conn., Mass. (7/1/88)                    3.75
    Maine, Mass., N.H. (1/1/89),
    R.I., Vt. (7/1/88)                       3.65
    Minn., N.H., Vt.                         3.55
    Current Federal wage                    $3.35
    Calif., Del., Ill., Ken., Md., Mich.,
    Mont., Neb., Nev., N.J., N.M., N.Y.,
    N.C., Okla., Ore., Penn., S.D., (7/1/88),
    Texas, W.V., Wisc.                       3.35
    Ark., (1/1/89)                           3.30
    Ark., Ga.                                3.25
    N.D.                                     3.10
    Colo.                                    3.00
    S.D.                                     2.80
    Utah                                     2.75
    Va.,
    Iowa (7/1/88)                            2.65
    Idaho, Ohio, Wash.                       2.30
    Ind.                                     2.00
    Kan., Wyo.                               1.60
    Ala., Ariz., Fla., Iowa, La.,
    Miss., Mo., S.C., Tenn.                  None

",18,"[ 0.97894086  0.00172194  0.02303942 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
183,"
   Prospects for enactment of the first minimum-wage increase in eight years have improved sharply in recent days, sparked by Vice President George Bush's call for a boost in the wage floor. 

   Wage-increase bills were languishing on Capitol Hill only two weeks ago, with many members of Congress reluctant to support a wage rise in the face of heavy small-business lobbying and arguments that the increase would mean job losses. 
Also, proponents of the bills feared the measure would be watered down too much. 

   But the tide began to turn when Mr. Bush, the Republican presidential candidate, voiced his support for a higher minimum wage soon after he was jeered by Portland, Ore., shipyard workers who have suffered pay cuts in recent years. 

   Now, with the Senate debating a minimum-wage bill on the floor, and House members more eager to follow with similar action of their own, ""the national election dynamics have changed the whole issue,"" said Robert Martin, human-resources manager for the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, which opposes the legislation. 
""We felt a lot better a week ago,"" he said. 

   A union official rated prospects for enactment as ""next to zero"" before the Bush remarks, but said they're now at least 50-50. 

   ""I only wish that {Mr. 
Bush} had spoken up sooner. 
Perhaps, if he had, we would already have passed this bill,"" said Sen. Edward Kennedy (D., Mass.), chairman of the Senate Labor Committee. 

   President Reagan, who had sternly characterized minimum-wage increases as causing unemployment, was quoted by the Detroit News last week as saying he and Mr. Bush were ""in agreement -- there could be some {minimum wage} increase because of inflation."" 

   The Senate took up the minimum-wage bill late last week, and backers and opponents alike said prospects are strong for Senate approval of the measure. 

   And if the legislation's backers in the House like the Senate version, they'll move to have the House simply adopt it. 
Some conservative Southern Democrats were reluctant to vote for a minimum-wage increase and be left out on a limb by Senate inaction. 
But any Senate approval this week ""takes that argument away from them,"" said Jay Butler, a spokesman for the House Labor Committee. 

   The biggest stumbling block is an attempt by the bill's opponents to add an amendment, offered by Sen. Orrin Hatch (R., Utah), ranking minority member of the labor panel, that would allow employers to pay a ""training wage"" to new employees. 
That wage, 80% of the minimum wage, could be paid for 90 days, and its advocates argue that it's necessary to encourage companies to hire inexperienced workers who are just entering the work force. 

   The training wage, previously called a youth sub-minimum wage, has long been pushed by the Reagan administration, and Mr. Bush said he wants it too. 
But the AFL-CIO and many other backers of a minimum-wage boost say the training wage is merely a way for employers to get cheap, entry-level workers. 
Sen. Kennedy has offered a substitute amendment that would allow each employer to pay 85% of the minimum wage to as many as 12 full-time students, instead of the limit of six students set by current law. 

   If the Hatch amendment prevails, a House labor panel staff member suggests the House may spurn the bill. 
But despite their dislike for the provision, some union officials indicate they might wind up accepting it, if they must, rather than let Republicans blame the Democrats for killing a minimum-wage increase. 

   The Senate bill would boost the minimum wage from the current $3.35 an hour, which has prevailed since January 1981, to $4.55 an hour over three years. 
Pending House legislation would lift the wage floor to $5.05 an hour over four years. 
Provisions that would tie increases in the minimum wage to rises in average manufacturing wages after three years have been stricken from the bills. 
Reagan administration officials have indicated that any increase would have to be smaller than provided in the measures, and Mr. Bush takes that stand too. 

   The legislation's proponents say it's needed to raise the incomes of several million workers who are below the poverty line, and they insist that the majority of those earning at or near the minimum wage support or help support families. 
But opponents contend that not only would a minimum-wage rise cause sizable job losses, but that many minimum-wage workers are teen-age members of well-to-do families that don't need larger incomes. 

",18,"[ 0.23003855  0.00946552  0.22163431 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
184,"
   Even the scientists came to cross-purposes in designing this
little world. Botanists wanted wind for pollination. Entomologists
did not want their bugs sucked up by big fans. The people in the
middle were the engineers, constantly revising plans, compromising.
   It is the professional nature of engineers and architects to
keep the outside world out. Now suddenly they had to devise ways to
keep the wild world in. As for the scientists, they were used to
having the whole outdoors as a laboratory. Now they have to be
satisfied with a very confined indoors.
   Consider hummingbirds, great little pollinators. But a pair of
hummingbirds need the nectar of 3,200 flowers a day for energy.
Scientists had to be sure there would be that many in bloom every
day of the year.
   At the outset, no one thought what would happen to the airtight
bubble with the air heating up and expanding during the day. It
would explode the glass. So the engineers devised external,
inflatable lungs that would store the excess until it cooled for
return to the biosphere.
   With a closed water supply, engineers also had to devise
exterior tanks to cool the liquid. In short, this small world in
some cases is too small for its own good.
   Nevertheless it will be the same air and water year-round. The
oxygen is breathed in by humans and animals who breathe out carbon
dioxide which is breathed in by the plants and used in
photosynthesis which produces more oxygen.
   Biosphere II is built on a hill to take advantage of the natural
proclivity of water. A stream begins on an 85-foot mountain that
dominates the rain forest. It then flows through the plains and
grasslands of the savanna, down to the 25-foot deep ocean with its
coral reef and then to the salt and freshwater marshes, drying up
before it reaches the desert.
   The water-laden air then is drawn and climbs the mountain where
natural cooling and condensing coils bring it down as rain and dew
to feed the stream again.
   The desert required a compromise. There was no way to reduce the
humidity. So Dr. Tony Burgess of the University of Arizona
patterned the deserts after those of Baja California where the
cactus and other plants have learned to live with ocean fog.
   Perhaps the most difficult design was Dr. Walter Addey's for the
salt and freshwater marshes. He built prototypes, one in the
basement of the Smithsonian Institution where he is director of the
Marine Systems Laboratory, and another in a greenhouse of
Washington's Old Soldiers Home. The problem was the proximity of
the fresh and saltwater species. The result is a miniature Florida
Everglades.
   ``The marsh may have been one of the most fragile of the systems
because of the life that lives in the mud,'' explains Kathy Dyhr.
``But in the prototypes he found they had virtually no species
extinctions except for the mosquitoes, to which everyone raised a
cheer. But Walter said that's not so great because we need them for
the fish. So they put up signs that said don't swat the
mosquitoes.''
   In a world without chemicals, the biosphere settlers will rely
on ladybugs, lacewings, marigolds and crop rotation to control
pests. Human and animal waste and compost becomes fertilizer.
   ``The earth has its problems,'' says Carl Hodges of the
University of Arizona who designed the human habitat. ``We've got
acid rain problems, dirty air problems, and we've got carbon
dioxide increasing at an alarming rate. Right now we don't have a
research tool where we can control the global parameters, like CO2
and the quality of the atmosphere. I see the big payoff of
Biosphere II as learning how to do a better job of stewardship of
Biosphere I.''
   The rain forest and its towering mountain and stream are the
design of Dr. Ghillean Prance, director of the Kew Royal Botanical
Gardens of London in association with the New York Botanical
Garden. He patterned it after the dwindling rain forests of the
Amazon.
   Dr. Peter Warshall of the University of Arizona patterned the
savanna grasslands after those of South America, Australia and
Africa. Plants and animals from those areas create the grasslands
in Biosphere II.
   In all, some 3,800 species of plant and animal life are being
invited to the party, and as in the original Eden, snakes. Says
Dyhr, ``We may need a python in there, if we put in rodents which
help aerate the soil and carry seeds.'' There will be no large
predators, however. Not enough room. An ocelot needs two acres to
range for food. There might be some mouse deer to help eat the
grasses.
   Of almost as much interest as the individual biomes are the
ecotones or tension areas where one biome yields reluctantly to the
next. In these areas, where well-defined habitats change,
scientists hope to learn how desert encroaches on more productive
areas, what happens when fresh water turns brackish, what goes on
when climates change.
   The idea of a biosphere, a living creation of nature with its
own logic, its own rules, is not new. Probably the first to
consider Earth and its environment as a biosphere was a Soviet
scientist, V.I. Vernadsky, in 1926. The idea was further developed
by James Lovelock and Lynn Margolis, who postulated, after Darwin,
that the environment helps mediate species variation.
   In the beginning, or near it, they suggested that oxygen was
sparse and so most of the early creatures were anaerobic bacteria
that didn't need oxygen. But they gave off oxygen, and in the
process poisoned their own environment so they had to retreat into
the mud.
   Biosphere II may teach mankind enough so it does not suffer the
same fate.
",19,"[ 0.29499074  0.0084967   0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
185,"
   Botanist Linda Leigh, who has spent the
last three weeks literally in her element, called her stay in an
experimental biosphere a success Wednesday but said she's ready to
return to Earth.
   When Ms. Leigh exits Thanksgiving afternoon from 21 days inside
an airtight, 17,000-cubic foot glass-and-steel structure, she will
have been the longest inhabitant of a completely enclosed
ecosystem, with air and water generated and recycled independently
of Earth's.
   ``I'll be emerging tomorrow at 2 p.m. as scheduled, and
everything is rolling,'' she said.
   Ms. Leigh has been living inside a test module for Biosphere II,
a $30 million project under construction. Scientists plan to place
four men and four women inside a much larger sealed structure for
two years to determine whether humans can duplicate Earth's life
systems for possible use in space.
   ``The one thing that I really do miss is just companionship,''
Ms. Leigh said Wednesday in a telephone interview from within the
module, located on a ranch about 30 miles north of Tucson.
   ``I don't think that it's a matter of feeling lonely, but
there's just something about direct human contact and sitting with
somebody and pouring them a cup of tea or a cup of coffee and
having that morning discussion; it's very different than doing it
over the phone or over the video,'' she said.
   ``Other than that, I'm quite content on the inside. I feel like
I could stay in here indefinitely.''
   Since entering the module Nov. 2, Ms. Leigh has been in frequent
daily contact with her outside support team by telephone, video
conference, two-way radio and just looking through the glass
windows.
   Three daily medical checks, including pulse at rest and after
exercise, blood pressure, pulmonary function, blood oxygen
saturation and urine tests, have shown her health is ``unbelievably
positive. The physicians on the outside can't believe it,'' she
said.
   Two people also check her psychologically each day, Ms. Leigh
said, ``just to make sure that my state of mind or humor is
normal.''
   Ms. Leigh baked herself a 39th birthday cake on Nov. 12 of
sorghum, rice flour and sweet potatoes harvested from her
mini-field. Her colleagues serenaded her with ``Happy Birthday'' by
video and directed her to gifts hidden in her living area.
   Other crops have ranged from jalapeno peppers to kohlrabi. Lemon
grass, mint, tarragon and fennel are among the herbs she has used
to season her meals and make tea. She also has a tank of talapia
fish.
   ``I had talapia Vera Cruzana the other night,'' she said.
   Water for drinking, cooking and showering is dehumidified from
the air. Samples are passed through a special port for outside
analysis, along with samples of waste water and her urine. The rest
of the waste water is fed into a marsh recycling system.
   The botanist also has had to be a mechanic and technician,
repairing the loose belt of a large fan that heats and cools the
module, and fine-tuning the irrigation system.
   Ms. Leigh said she hasn't felt isolated because her support team
is excellent. In fact, she occasionally has had to pull the
curtains in her living area to get away from the observing eyes
outside. Either that, ``or I go out into what we call `the
wilderness' and just stay out within the plants.''
",19,"[ 0.31776772  0.01144094  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
186,"
   So, you say, what will happen when they
lock four men and four women inside this fancy fish bowl for two
years and watch 'em grow alfalfa sprouts and rice?
   How, indeed, are eight ``biospherians'' going to fare testing
the completely sealed compound with five adjacent but contrasting
environments, called biomes, as well as an intensive agricultural
complex, to duplicate the Earth's ecology?
   How are they going to react in shepherding 3,800 species of
plants and animals that will provide food and air while all wastes
are recycled within Biosphere II?
   And in getting along with each other?
   Exceedingly well, according to predictions.
   It's unlikely, all agree, that any of the eight crew members to
be selected later this year from among 14 candidates in this $30
million private experiment, will go bonkers. Withdrawal or
confrontation under stress are unlikely, all say.
   ``They're so highly motivated in the first place, I would not be
surprised to see the whole thing go through without a hitch,
personnel-wise,'' said Robert B. Bechtel, an environmental
psychologist at the University of Arizona.
   ``My guess would be that they would probably have somewhat fewer
problems than you would normally encounter in the classical
isolation experience,'' said Mary Connors, a psychologist and
division staff member at the National Aeronautics and Space
Administration's Ames Research Center near Sunnyvale, Calif., who
until recently was acting chief of its Crew Research and Space
Human Factors Branch. ``They just have more options.''
   The biospherians will be physically separated from the outside
world, or Biosphere I, but they will not be isolated, said John
Rummel, a life sciences physician at NASA. Nor are they likely to
suffer sensory deprivation or claustrophobia in the main compound,
which measures 2\ acres.
   They'll have the latest gadgets, from video teleconferencing and
worldwide phone contact to television, VCRs and computers in their
plush apartment complex and office-laboratory area.
   And they will have unusual options if they want to get away from
each other. The biospherians will be able to stargaze from their
own rain forest or ocean beach.
   Experiments in long-term situations where small groups of people
live in harsh climatic or environmental extremes, such as the in
Antarctica or underwater, usually are viewed in terms of
``isolation, confinement, deprivation and risk,'' Connors said.
   But crew members will be allowed to leave through air locks if
health or extreme family emergencies necessitate, eliminating the
sense of risk, she said.
   Roy Walford, a pathologist, nutrition specialist and the only
physician seeking one of the eight slots, says he thinks the
biggest problem may be overwork.
   A community and rural health family practitioner associated with
the University of Arizona who has developed a close relationship
with the candidates will be among those watching from the outside.
   Walford and Biosphere spokeswoman Kathleen Dyhr, also hoping to
make the crew, said each candidate has worked on the project for at
least three years.
   Ms. Dyhr said the selection process uses no psychological
testing. Rather, such factors as ability to work together,
problem-solving skills, willingness to accept other views and
professionalism are keys, and ``by selecting for some of those
factors you can relieve a lot of interpersonal tensions.''
   Connors and Bechtel said the strong job focus, cross-work
training and the fact that the potential crew members have worked
and spent significant time together all are highly advantageous.
   Creativity, spontaneity, withdrawal, unexpected irritability,
eating patterns and general health will be watched, but the best
sensors likely will be the crew members themselves.
   Most say the crew will develop its own ``equilibrium'' once
closed life gets under way.
   But will that lead to romantic relationships, to interludes
under the waterfall or in the huge basements beneath the complex?
Will the crew be celibate?
   Views range from ``who cares'' to unlikely to probable.
   ``Mine has always been that it's unlikely, because I think
people tend to act as crews when they get in an experience that is
prolonged,'' Connors said.
   ``I would suspect that they would get into a familial
relationship rather than a couples relationship ... more like
siblings act,'' she said.
   Bechtel said: ``How could you avoid it? But on the other hand,
they're in a fish bowl.''
   ``Let's just put it this way,'' Ms. Dyhr said, ``there's nothing
really that a corporation can do about what their employees do
after 5 o'clock. We live in a free country and for the most part
people do whatever they want to do.''
   But what if two people fall in love? Is marriage by
teleconferencing possible?
   ``Given the fact that various members of the clergy have shown
themselves to be innovative and agreeable to doing marriages under
very unusual circumstances, I'm sure that they could find a way to
do it,'' Ms. Dyhr said.
   On the other extreme, the psychologists say literature on
confinement and isolation studies shows few examples of violence.
   The Biosphere's purpose is ``not to test interpersonal
relations,'' but to test ``whether they can reproduce the Earth's
atmosphere by a mixture of plants, animals and bacteria,'' Bechtel
said.
   Bechtel thinks the biggest problem will be whether seals around
the glass panels covering the gigantic geodesic dome stay under
wide ranges of heat and cold.
   He and Connors also said most studies of crews, including
mixed-sex groups in environments far harsher and smaller than the
biospherians are likely to encounter, have shown them to be highly
motivated, energetic and willing to put up with almost anything for
the sake of the project and the team's success.
   Bechtel said the public has a misconception that putting eight
people together will mean ``all kinds of interesting things can
happen.''
   Rather, he said, ``They're really caretakers. They're really out
there to tend the plants and animals. It's a kind of farming
adventure.''
",19,"[ 0.4822903   0.00817149  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
187,"
   A 66-year-old physician, a botanist and a
marine biologist were among four men and four women picked today to
spend two years inside a 2\-acre sealed dome intended to be a
microcosm of Earth.
   The eight from the United States, West Germany, England and
Belgium will be the crew of the giant terrarium known as Biosphere
II. The privately financed $30 million project aims for a December
start.
   Biosphere II will resemble a space colony tethered to Earth. It
will be a laboratory for solving environmental problems on
Biosphere I _ the Earth _ as well as a prototype for sustaining
life outside this world.
   The crew, all single, consists of:
   _ Dr. Roy Walford, 66, the oldest crew member and only
physician, a research gerontologist, nutritionist and professor of
pathology at the UCLA School of Medicine, and the project's medical
chief and biomedical consultant.
   _ Linda Leigh, 38, a botanist who directed and coordinated the
project's ecosystem planning for land areas, or biomes, directed
the collection and acquisition of more than 2,000 plant species and
spent three weeks last fall inside a completely closed test module.
   _ Bernd Zabel, 41, an electrical engineer from Munich, West
Germany, who served as construction general manager for the project.
   _ Sally Silverstone, 35, a native of Walthamstow, England, who
has administered the Space Biospheres Ventures' architectural
division.
   _ Abigail K. Alling, 31, a marine biologist from Maine with
degrees from Middlebury College and Yale University who has
directed the Biosphere's marine ecological systems.
   _ Taber Kyle MacCallum, 26, of Albuquerque, N.M., in charge of
the Biosphere's analytical laboratory.
   _ Jane Elizabeth Poynter, 28, a native of Surrey, England, who
has been manager of the intensive agriculture system.
   _ Mark Van Thillo, of Wilrijk-Antwerp, Belgium, who has been in
charge of construction quality control.
   Two others who had been finalists included Norberto
Alvarez-Romo, 37, of Guadalajara, Mexico, and Silke Schneider, 31,
a West German.
   For two years, the crew's world inside the geodesic frame of
glass and steel will consist of seven ecological regions: rain
forest, savannah, ocean, fresh and saltwater marshes, desert,
agriculture and human habitat. The latter includes apartments and
laboratory, office and recreational facilities.
   Sprinkled into the ecological stew will be 3,800 plant and
animal species. All air, water and food will be generated
independently of the Earth's atmosphere and will be recycled, as
will all wastes.
   The only link between the dome's ecological system and Earth
will be electrical power transmissions, as well as computers and
telecommunications.
   The experiment, a stepchild of Texas financier Edward P. Bass,
could become a money-producing venture, particularly as a means of
showing ways of responding to environmental problems such as
pollution, scientists have said.
",19,"[ 0.37239636  0.0126191   0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
188,"     Welcome to Biosphere 2 -- a domed Garden of Eden in the foothills of the
Santa Catalina mountains outside Tucson. Here, beginning on Thursday, four men
and four women will confine themselves for two years in one of the most
bizarre research escapades in modern times.;   Is it science or schlock? A
tour de force or a tourist trap?;   A year behind schedule and five years in
the making, Biosphere 2 has forged ahead despite questions about its
credibility, charges of cultism and accusations that leaders bullied departed
consultants.;   The creation of billionaire oil mogul Edward Bass, Biosphere 2
aims to study how people can live in an airtight world. In this biological
maze, plants will recycle human wastes and turn them into the sustenance of
life -- air, food and water.;   Biosphere 2 could be the first step in the
construction of a massive way station in space, its developers hope, and at
the very least could help improve life on Earth.;   But as the ""Biospherians""
prepare to don their spiffy blue jump suits and kiss the outside world
goodbye, Earthlings are watching with a mixture of awe, fascination and
skepticism.;   Supporters gush that the grand experiment rivals the moon
landing. Detractors snicker that Biosphere 2 could be the greatest stunt since
""War of the Worlds."";   ""I don't know what they are attempting to do,"" said
Robert D. MacElroy, a scientist at NASA/Ames Research Center at Moffett Field,
where plans for a small space cottage are in their infancy.;   MacElroy has
visited the Biosphere 2 project and said, ""There's a pretty grotesque size
differential to what we're involved in. I don't know . . . how it would help
with what we're doing."";   'NASA could never do this'; ""NASA could never do
this,"" countered Robert Frye, a project consultant and ecologist at the
University of Arizona's Environmental Research Laboratory. ""NASA would have
spent a hundred million dollars and come up with a roomful of reports. But
Biosphere 2 has a structure that can be used and studied for 100 years."";  
Looking like Hollywood's ""Battlestar Gallactica,"" the gleaming steel-and-glass
shell of Biosphere 2 is as long as three football fields and as tall as a
five-story building. Inside are parts of a South American rain forest, a
Caribbean coral reef and ocean, a Florida freshwater swamp, a Baja desert and
a tropical Australian savannah. They are inhabited by 3,800 transplanted
species of birds, reptiles, plants and insects.;   The eight Biospherians, all
single, will electronically monitor their world through a maze of computers in
the glitzy command center. A short walk will take them from the shore of an
ocean to the mountains of a rain forest to barren desert. They will live in
modern loft apartments and be under the constant watch of Biosphere 1 -- the
Earth -- from a ""Mission Control"" located across the street.;   The mood
inside Biosphere 2 was upbeat last week as participants counted down the days
until Thursday's ""closure,"" when air locks will be shut and the crew sealed
inside. They seemed unperturbed by continuing questions from reporters about
the project's credibility.;   News reports since 1985 have linked the
project's leaders to a 1970s commune where, some ex-commune members say,
Biosphere 2 executive John Allen led a cult devoted to creating a new
civilization. The Fort Worth Star-Telegram reported that one of Allen's
protege's was oilman Bass, Biosphere 2's main financier.;   Leader was a
'tyrant';   Laurence Veysey, a retired history professor from the University
of California, Santa Cruz, who studied the commune in 1971, remembers Allen as
a tyrant given to rages. Veysey recalls seeing ""biosphere"" written on a
dining-room wall of the New Mexico commune, Synergia Ranch.;   ""They were a
very secretive group,"" said Veysey, who devoted 100 pages to the ranch in a
book on communes. ""It was hard to figure out what they were up to."";   In the
years since the commune disbanded, Allen's vision and Bass's deep pockets have
funded ecological ventures from Katmandu to France to western Australia. One
was the Institute of Ecotechnics in London, billed by Biosphere 2 as ""a
major-ecological think-tank."" Several of Biosphere 2's leaders have
unaccredited degrees from the institute.;   Institute non-existent;   A
Canadian television documentary last year went looking for the institute and
found only an office over a cafe and art gallery.;   Allen and Bass could not
be reached for comment. In the past, Bass has denied being influenced by
Allen, who told the Arizona Daily Star in June that he never operated ""any
mystical program."";   ""The whole cult thing is ridiculous,"" said Kathleen
Dyhr, spokeswoman for Biosphere 2. ""There have been so many people with
Biosphere 2 who never had anything to do with John Allen 20 years ago."";  
During construction, Biosphere 2 recruited outside consultants from such
reputable institutions as Yale University and the Smithsonian, Dyhr said. And
many of the ecological studies here have been lauded by the scientific
community, she said.;   Project has defectors;   But at least a half-dozen
respected researchers have left the project, citing differences of substance
and style. Some later recanted their criticisms, saying they were warned by
Biosphere representatives they could be sued for libel.;   Even now, many
mainstream scientists wonder what Biosphere 2 will accomplish.;   Its makers
contend they have made an ecological system ""out of nothing."" But the
structure will be powered by a set of natural gas generators and maintained by
a staff of 50 outside support people.;   Some scientists also wonder whether
Biosphere 2 will be leakproof. How will it hold up under the elements? And if
they survive two years, what will Biospherians learn, other than how to live
in a gigantic terrarium?;   Naivety suggested; ""I think they went into this
rather naively,"" said Frank Salisbury, a plant physiologist at Utah State
University. ""I hope something good comes out of this, but I'm skeptical."";  
Biosphere 2 officials counter that something good already has, and point to 50
design patents in the works.;   First and foremost, they say, Biosphere 2 is a
business. It's already the state's second largest tourist attraction after the
Grand Canyon, and promoters are banking that more than a million people a year
will visit.;   In fact, in the first five months of 1991, 65,000 people came
to see the project, a hundredfold increase over the same period in 1990.;  
Shown a movie and taken on a walking tour for $9.95, visitors mostly gush over
the landscape and rarely ask probing questions. They crowd the gift shop
buying up Biosphere 2 memorabilia.;   ""It's really turning out to be nothing
more than a tourist attraction,"" said Yvonne Clearwater, an environmental
psychologist at NASA/Ames who sees little scientific value to Biosphere 2.;  
""It's kind of like a kooky Disneyland.""  ",19,"[ 0.41232594  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
189,"     Billionaire oil executive Edward Bass, who bankrolled much of the $150
million project, invoked the visions of Galileo, Leonardo da Vinci and the
Wright brothers. One crew member gushed about a future when humans will become
""custodians of our world."";   ""Today we gather at a new instrument . . . to
explore the mysteries of our very own home planet,"" Bass said, as the crew
members, wearing futuristic black uniforms, fought to contain their emotions.;
  Crew member Abigail Alling, 31, her voice quavering, evoked the sometimes
mystical bent of Biosphere 2's organizers: ""By necessity, we biospherians walk
in as custodians of our world and bring past and future together."";   At 8:18
a.m., the four men and four women of the crew exchanged quick hugs and kisses
with relatives and project officials, stepped through an air-lock door, waved
through the round window, and disappeared inside the 3.15-acre geodesic-framed
compound.;   ""I have had a vision that man could change from being a
desert-maker into a builder of oases,"" crew member Mark Nelson said before
stepping through the air lock.;   Biosphere 2 consists of several climatic
zones -- rain forest, savanna, ocean and marsh -- packed with 3,800 plant and
animal species. It's all part of a test of space-colonization technology with
the dream of someday locating such a complex on Mars.;   The ultra-modern
complex includes such luxury items as computers, facsimile machines,
telephones, televisions, videocassette recorders and exercise equipment. The
communications apparatus will tie the crew into a control center located a few
hundred yards away, and to the rest of the world.;   Critics say the project
has little scientific merit. It has forged ahead despite doubts over its
authenticity, charges of cultism and the loss of several of its prominent
consultants.;   ""The guise of science has fallen over time,"" said Yvonne
Clearwater, an environmental psychologist at the NASA Ames Research Center at
Moffett Field. ""It's really turning out to be a tourist attraction."";   Space
Biospheres Ventures, developer of the private, for-profit project, expects to
draw up to a million visitors annually and has applied for some 50 design
patents.;   ""Fundamentally, we are a business,"" Bass said. ""Our first name
'Space' draws upon the most dramatic applications for the technologies we are
developing."";   The crew members, ranging in age from 27 to 67, will raise
their own food and recycle all air, water and wastes. Wednesday they
celebrated a final day of freedom with diversity by attending an ecological
seminar, a laser show, a cocktail party and a press conference.;   The
45-minute closing ceremony after dawn today included prayers from a Tibetan
monk and a sun dance by Dan Old Elk, a Sioux from Montana who presented each
crew member with a braided sprig of sweet grass from Canada.;   Alling, a
native of New York, said before the experiment began that she expects life
inside Biosphere 2 to be ""much like a ship setting sail for the open sea."";  
""You're out there, and whatever you have on board and whoever is with you on
board is who you've got, and you've got to make it through whatever comes up,""
she said.;   The four-man, four-woman group has two people from England, one
from Belgium and five from the United States.;   Each crew member is likely to
spend about four hours daily on farming and other chores to maintain the
complicated machinery driving the Biosphere. Another four hours a day will go
to scientific work.;   Sex has not been ruled out among the crew members, but
none of the four women plans a pregnancy.;   Mark van Thillo, 30, of Belgium
said he would miss his country's chocolates, while Taber McCallum, 27, of
Albuquerque, N.M., said he'll regret not ""sailing on the open ocean and the
open sky."";   The crew is hoping to stay inside for two years, barring serious
illness or other calamity.;   But Margret Augustine, president and chief
executive officer of the project, said problems could crop up after a month or
so that would require the crew to leave temporarily before returning for a
solid two years. And a person could leave if he or she suffered from extreme
psychological pressure, she said.;   'It's not a prison,"" she said.  ",19,"[ 0.41617047  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
190,"     Biospherian Abigail Alling, 32, a Yale-educated marine biologist, broke
down during the emotional send-off but recovered her composure as she and Dr.
Roy Walford followed the six others into the sprawling terrarium.;   After two
tries, the main passage to the outside slammed shut Thursday morning.;   At
midmorning, after a half-hour getting accustomed to their new situation, the
eight told project officials that each was about to begin work in his or her
respective ""biome,"" or ecosystem. The Biosphere has a growing area as well as
wilderness rain forest, marsh, mini-ocean, African savanna and desert.;   What
the Biosphere residents find out over the next 24 months, proponents say, will
help to understand the workings of nature and the possibilities of living in
artificial atmospheres in outer space.;   They will recycle their air, water
and waste, and live off a half-acre of land and from plants grown in tanks of
water infused with nutrients. If french fries are on the menu, peanuts would
have to be uprooted and pressed for cooking oil and spuds harvested and
peeled.;   The eight researchers are all single, and there is no prohibition
against sex. This has led to more than a little speculation in nearby Oracle,
a 111-year-old community of 6,000, many of them copper miners and retirees.;  
""I told Laser (the nickname for Biospherian Mark Van Thillo), 'You're in there
two years and I'll bet you $5 you'll come out with two kids,' "" said Larry
Springfield, 45, a locksmith on the project and manager of Maria's, an Oracle
saloon. ""He said, 'Four.' ""  ",19,"[ 0.31363069  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
191,"     The project began with much fanfare in September when four men and four
women, accompanied by 3,000 species of plants and animals, sealed themselves
inside a eight-story glass structure for a two-year experiment in biological
recycling.;   The allegations of misrepresentation involve a device that
removes carbon dioxide from the air and turns it into a solid for storage
inside the Biosphere.;   Carbon dioxide is exhaled by humans and metabolized
by plants.;   The current issue of the Village Voice says the group secretly
installed the device, violating the advertised goal of recycling all materials
naturally.;   The Voice also said the levels of carbon dioxide in Biosphere 2
were becoming dangerously high, apparently because of the decrease in sunlight
and the resulting decline in photosynthetic activity by the plants.;  
Kathleen Dyhr, a Biosphere spokeswoman, said in a telephone interview that the
group had indeed installed a carbon dioxide remover.;   She conceded that it
was not ""natural"" but called it a minor aid to help stabilize the atmosphere
during its initial fluctuations. The carbon dioxide levels were currently
fine, she added, though higher than outside the closed environment.;   Dyhr
said the privately financed project had no obligation to disclose all the
details of work in progress.;   ""If the experiment were formally reported,
written up in a publication, and no mention was made of that fact, then that
would be fraud,"" she said. ""But I don't know of any research project that
would discuss all its methods and techniques"" this early in the process. ""No
experiment would be giving out data to the press."";   From the start, when
planning for the Biosphere got under way in the mid-1980s, it was billed as a
futuristic experiment in closed recycling where plants and animals would
provide each other with all the essentials for life.;   Most especially, green
plants would take human wastes (urine, feces and carbon dioxide) and turn them
into oxygen, water and food for human consumption. No mention was made of
chemical aids to the process.  ",19,"[ 0.33783326  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
192,"
   At the White House as elsewhere, Vice
President George Bush's search for a running mate has people
guessing _ and now one of their own is part of the guessing game.
   President Reagan says he's just guessing along with everybody
else.
   ``I don't have a candidate,'' he said Wednesday when asked about
it. ``That's up to him.''
   Reagan also was asked about a newspaper column suggesting his
national security adviser, Lt. Gen. Colin L. Powell, as a
possibility for the second spot on the ticket. Powell is the first
black ever to hold the post of national security adviser.
   ``You'd better watch out,'' the president quipped. ``He's
standing right behind you.''
   Powell, stationed behind the group of reporters who were
questioning Reagan during an Oval Office photo opportunity, made no
comment.
   White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater, asked what he thought of
Powell as a vice presidential prospect, said, ``Colin Powell is a
great American and would be an outstanding candidate for any
position. I hope he's listening to this.''
   Fitzwater's daily briefings are piped into the offices of top
White House aides.
   Later, as Reagan bade farewell to visiting Icelandic Prime
Minister Thorsteinn Palsson in the White House East Room, the
question came up again.
   Secretary of Defense Frank C. Carlucci, responding to a
reporter's query, nodded toward Powell and said with a grin, ``He's
my candidate.''
   Powell just grinned and shook his head but said nothing.
   Before he went to the Pentagon, Carlucci had Powell's job, and
Powell was his deputy.
   The most recent thing Powell has said about his future was in a
speech to the World Affairs Council of Los Angeles on July 19.
   ``As for myself,'' he said, ``I expect to go back to a nice
quiet foxhole where I can serve my country in a more comfortable
and perhaps less exposed position.''
   Powell is an army officer and, before becoming Carlucci's deputy
in January 1987, was commanding General of V Corps in Frankfurt,
West Germany.
   The questions about his future were spurred by a column in
Wednesday's Washington post by William Raspberry suggesting that it
would be a ``brilliant idea'' for Bush to pick Powell as his
running mate.
   Despite the jesting tone of the questions and answers, it's not
just a joke.
   Rep. Jack Kemp, R-N.Y., who is himself a potential vice
presidential candidate, is among those who have mentioned Powell as
a possible Bush running mate.
   The congressman's press secretary, Marci Robinson, said Kemp
believes Powell would be ``an exciting choice'' with the foreign
affairs and other experience to be able to serve as president if
necessary and that ``politically speaking, it would hit the
Democrats at their strength.''
   Powell is the only current White House aide being mentioned as
even a remote possibility to be Bush's running mate, although
former chief of staff Howard H. Baker Jr. has been reported under
consideration.
   Fitzwater was asked jokingly whether he is interested.
   ``I`m available,'' he replied to laughter. ``I ought to get the
honesty vote. I say it right up front _ I will be vice president.
Just ask. I never disparaged the job. I thought it was terrific
when I was on the staff.''
   Fitzwater was Bush's press secretary before taking his present
job.
",20,"[ 0.47055035  0.01178556  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
193,"
   President Reagan's national security adviser,
Colin Powell, on Thursday credited Soviet leader Mikhail S.
Gorbachev for pushing economic reform, but said it ``remains to be
seen'' how much improvement can be made under a communist, one-party
system.
   Powell, an Army lieutenant general, said it has become clear,
however, that the Soviets have chosen to pursue a policy of
declining adventurism in foreign policy so they can focus ``energies
and resources on internal economic reform.''
   ``The bold new leadership in the Kremlin has candidly
acknowledged the problems the Soviet system faces,'' Powell said in
a speech prepared for delivery to the National Press Club. ``But the
problems are fundamental, even structural.''
   Soviet officials in Moscow on Thursday said they will begin
liquidating unprofitable businesses and farms to bolster the
nation's economy and overcome a budget deficit expected to reach $58
billion next year.
   Finance Minister Boris Gostev told the Supreme Soviet legislature
that Gorbachev's government is finding it difficult to bring deficit
spending under control.
   In his speech, Powell took his audience on a tour of world
trouble spots, saying resistance forces fighting communism and
totalitarians have made great strides in Afghanistan, Angola, and
Cambodia. But Powell said the push for freedom in Nicaragua has
lagged, at least in part because of divisions within the United
States on support for the Contra rebels.
   He said a principal lesson to be learned from the various
regional conflicts is that American foreign policy has tended to
succeed in instances in which U.S. support was unquestioned. He said
this included Afghanistan, where the Soviets have begun pulling out
forces that have occupied the Southwest Asian nation since 1979 but
were fought continuously by the Mujahedeen resistance.
   ``The Soviets are correctly reassessing their past foreign
policy, including their adventurism in the 1970s, as a series of
mistakes,'' Powell said, because they and their allies were unable
to consolidate their gains.
   ``One lesson here is that sometimes leaders have the wit to see
the futility of war, to see diplomatic solutions,'' he said. ``But
the deeper lesson is that effective resistance to aggression is what
demonstrates the futility of war.''
   Of the changing political climate in the Soviet Union, he said:
``Essentially, perestroika is an acknowledgment of the failure of
the Soviet system to provide for its people. Whether it can be fixed
as long as it remains a communist, one-party system remains to be
seen.''
   But Powell also said that Gorbachev, who recently took on the
additional title of president of the Soviet Union with the
retirement of Andrei Gromyko, is facing problems with ``restive
nationalities in the Soviet Union and around the Soviet empire.''
   This, he said, is going to ``preoccupy Moscow more than anyone
anticipated.''
   ``There is little we can do to affect the Soviet Union's internal
evolution,'' said Powell, who plans to resume his active duty
military career when Reagan's term ends Jan. 20. ``We can encourage
steps that are clearly improvements in Soviet internal political
practice, even if they do not correspond fully to what we know as
democracy.''
   Reagan on Wednesday voiced hope that Gorbachev would free
remaining political prisoners in the Soviet Union _ as West German
Chancellor Helmut Kohl had indicated following talks with Kremlin
officials.
   ``Our adversaries face a systemic crisis,'' Powell said. ``They
sense that their system is wrong but they are seeking to fix it
without changing it wholesale. It is not yet clear whether they can
succeed.''
   ``The immediate problem they're facing is an economic system that
is not up to the demands of the 1990s and the 21st century,'' he
said in answer to a question from the audience.
   Powell said the Soviets will be ``left behind'' in global
economic competition ``unless they make the necessarty adjustments.''
",20,"[ 0.33379351  0.011311    0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
194,"
   President Reagan will nominate national
security adviser Colin Powell for promotion to four-star rank and
the post of commander-in-chief of the Army's Forces Command, the
White House and Pentagon announced today.
   The promotion would make the 51-year-old Powell, now a lieutenant
general with three stars, the fourth black officer to attain
four-star rank in the U.S. armed forces. One of those four is
currently on active duty _ Air Force Gen. Bernard P. Randolph.
   The promotion requires Senate confirmation.
   In the new post, Powell would be in charge of all the Army troops
in the continental United States. The command is headquartered at
Ft. McPherson in Atlanta and has traditionally been a major career
stepping stone for senior Army commanders.
   ``President Reagan has the highest respect and affection for
General Powell and wishes him all success in his Army career,''
White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said in announcing the
nomination. He noted that Powell and Reagan ``have had a close
personal relationship.''
   ``He was the general who guided preparations for the Gorbachev
summits, who helped restructure and give new direction to the
National Security Council following the Iran Contra investigation,
and who, by his personal integrity and commitment, has restored
confidence in the National Seucirty Council itself,'' Fitzwater told
reporters.
   ``General Powell has been a friend and colleague whose advice and
counsel have been valued by all members of the White House staff. He
is a man of rare quality and distinction,'' the spokesman added.
   The spokesman said that Powell is expected to assume command in
April, 1989, when the current commander, Gen. Joseph T. Palastra
Jr., retires. Palastra has held the post since June 1986 and is
retiring after 35 years of active military service.
   After leaving the White House Powell plans to visit a number of
army units before assuming his command, Fitzwater said.
   The spokesman said Powell's new job includes preparing soldiers
for world-wide deployment and to defend the U.S. continent.
   The upcoming promotion was first reported Thursday by the Cox
News Service and confirmed a short while later by administration
officials. The Pentagon later released a short statement announcing
President Reagan's intent to nominate Powell for the job.
   Sources at the Pentagon said the FORSCOM position was one of the
few Army four-star posts scheduled to open in the next few months.
   Powell succeeded Frank C. Carlucci as President Reagan's national
security adviser after Carlucci was tapped to replace the retiring
Caspar W. Weinberger.
   Carlucci was called back to government service by President
Reagan to replace Navy Rear Adm. John M. Poindexter in the wake of
the Iran-Contra arms-for-hostages affair. Carlucci immediately
recruited Powell as his deputy, drawing him away from a major
command in Europe, and Powell moved up to the top White House spot
after Carlucci's move to the Pentagon.
   Powell is a graduate of City University in New York and received
an MBA degree from George Washington University in Washington.
   Commissioned in the infantry, he was wounded during both of his
two tours in Vietnam, once falling into a trap lined with sharpened
bamboo sticks, impaling a foot.
   In 1977 Powell was assigned to the Pentagon as an assistant to
the deputy assistant secretary of defense. While later serving as an
assistant to Carlucci in the National Security Council, Powell
received his first star. He went on to become military assistant to
Weinberger before a stint as commander of the Army's Fifth Corps in
Europe.
   Powell's decorations include the Distinguished Service Medal, the
Bronze Star and the Purple Heart.
",20,"[ 0.33477201  0.01071392  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
195,"
   Gen. Colin L. Powell, who is expected to be named
the new chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, is described by
colleagues as a ``soldier's soldier'' who doesn't particularly like
staff jobs.
   The four-star Army general, who became national security adviser
in 1987 and heads the U.S. Forces Command at Fort McPherson in
Atlanta, would become the first black to serve as the nation's
senior military officer.
   The 52-year-old son of Jamaican immigrants, Powell was highly
regarded by President Reagan, succeeding Frank C. Carlucci as
Reagan's national security adviser.
   ``He was the general who guided preparations for the Gorbachev
summits, who helped restructure and give new direction to the
National Security Council following the Iran-Contra investigation,
and who, by his personal integrity and commitment, has restored
confidence in the National Security Council itself,'' said White
House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater.
   Those qualities were cited by The Washington Post in calling
Powell the ``antidote to Ollie North,'' the former NSC aide
convicted in the Iran-Contra scandal.
   ``Colin gets mad at me when I say this, but I think he should go
to the very top of the military establishment _ up to and including
chairman of the joint chiefs of staff,'' Carlucci has said.
   A senior administration official said in Washington on Wednesday
that President Bush is expected to name Powell to the position.
   Powell took over U.S. Forces Command, or FORSCOM, in April,
putting him in charge of troop readiness and deployment for the
U.S. Army. In interviews since then, he has emphasized he's proud
of the accomplishments of the average U.S. soldier over the years.
   In the old days, Powell said, soldiers would keep a pinball
machine in a corner of their barracks. ``Today there's a computer
there.''
   On personal level, however, Powell doesn't always keep up with
the times. You'd only know the 1972 Chrysler station wagon parked
in the general's space each day was his by reading the four-star
decal on its front.
   Washington colleagues have described Powell as a ``soldier's
soldier'' who doesn't like staff jobs. Carlucci says that Powell
has always been reluctant to be a bureaucrat and that Reagan got
Powell to accept the job of national security adviser after the
general had turned Carlucci down several times.
   In his time off, he tells young blacks to spend their lives
helping to open doors for minorities.
   ``Don't squander the blood, sweat and tears of those who paved
the way for you,'' he told Clark Atlanta University graduates this
spring. ``The greatest danger ... is complacency.''
   He tells of his battles with racial discrimination, recalling
the time an Alabama state trooper pulled him over for speeding in
the early 1960s. The trooper looked at the car, complete with New
York plates and an LBJ bumper sticker, and hissed, ``Boy, get out
of here.''
   On the job, Powell emphasizes his commitment to obtaining
resources for his troops, a task he said was top priority when he
became FORSCOM commander.
   As leader of Powell is responsible for the training and
preparedness of more than 1 million active, reserve and National
Guard troops in the United States.
   Powell's daily interests are more pressing: Keeping his troops
ready for combat ``with the hope they will never be needed.''
   And in that position, he keeps a close eye on the Soviet Union.
   ``The Soviets are going through wrenching historic change,
beginning with the irreversible acknowledgement that their system
is broken and has to be changed,'' he said at his FORSCOM
installation. But ``their FORSCOM is strong. We must be strong.''
   Born in New York, Powell completed training in the Airborne and
Ranger schools and served in Germany and Vietnam.
   Commissioned in the infantry in 1958, he was wounded twice
during two tours in Vietnam, once falling into a trap lined with
sharpened bamboo sticks and impaling a foot.
   His decorations include the Distinguished Service Medal, the
Legion of Merit, the Bronze Star and the Purple Heart.
   Powell and his wife, Alma, have two daughters and a son.
",20,"[ 0.42118145  0.01054905  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
196,"
   Gen. Colin Powell, tapped as the next chairman
of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, is widely viewed as an adroit
politician and pragmatic commander capable of representing the U.S.
military at a time of sweeping change both home and abroad.
   Powell, 52, was nominated on Thursday by President Bush to
become the nation's top military officer.
   ``I am ready to go to it and I look forward to the challenges
ahead,'' Powell said.
   He's expected to win easy Senate confirmation and make history
as the first black and the youngest-ever officer to hold the post.
   Powell, who served as national security adviser in the final
year of President Ronald Reagan's administration, will succeed Adm.
William Crowe Jr., who is retiring Sept. 30.
   Bush praised Powell, a decorated veteran of two combat tours in
Vietnam, as ``a complete soldier'' as well as a distinguished
scholar.
   ``As we face the challenges of the '90s, it is most important
that the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff be a person of
breadth, judgment, experience and total integrity,'' Bush said.
``Colin Powell has all those qualities and more.''
   Powell fits the mold of Bush's national security advisers,
like-minded pragmatists who favor consensus-building rather than
confrontation.
   Sen. Sam Nunn, D-Ga., chairman of the Senate Armed Service
Committee, called Powell ``an excellent nominee.'' Nunn said his
panel will hold confirmation proceedings soon after Congress
returns from recess in September.
   The four-star general's associates predicted he will work hard
to present all sides to the commander-in-chief.
   ``He was marvelous to work with, because he could deal with all
the internal conflicts'' that the National Security Council adviser
must resolve for the president, said Dan Howard, former NSC
spokesman who was recently confirmed as undersecretary of the Navy.
   ``Colin was an honest broker. ... He was very fair in presenting
others' viewpoints. That doesn't mean he didn't have one, because
he did. He was just very fair, and could present all sides without
putting a `spin' on it. That's a rare talent in this town,'' Howard
said.
   Such abilities will be essential when Powell is called upon to
deal with the intense rivalries that can afflict the Pentagon.
Contests among the services are widely expected to reach new highs
as the military budget shrinks and the assessment of the Soviet
threat diminishes.
   As well, Powell is seen as a wise choice by those who have seen
the role of chairman evolve into one where diplomacy and political
finesse with Congress are as essential as toughened battlefield
instincts.
   Powell's nomination was met with surprise by some in the
Pentagon, given that his political credentials are deemed to have
outweighed his military experience. But those who know him contend
his mix of jobs, in command roles and political trenches of
Washington, will stand him in good stead.
   ``He's been head of the NSC. He's commanded troops in Europe.
He's dealt with the (National) Guard and reserve in his current
post and he's been at the elbow of the secretary of defense. He's
had experiences few can match,'' said Robert Sims, a former
Pentagon spokesman who knew Powell when he served as Defense
Secretary Caspar Weinberger's military aide.
   Powell currently is commander of the Army Forces Command in Fort
MacPherson, Ga., responsible for the combat readiness of 1 million
troops on active, reserve or National Guard duty.
   Along with his predecessor as national security adviser, Frank
Carlucci, Powell was credited with helping the Reagan White House
recover from the Iran-Contra affair. He was a key figure in the
planning of Reagan's national security strategy and for his summits
with Soviet leader Mikhail S. Gorbachev.
   Before his stint at the NSC, Powell commanded the Army V Corps
in West Germany for six months. Earlier, he was Weinberger's senior
military assistant from 1983-86.
   Powell was born of Jamaican immigrant parents in New York City
and raised in the South Bronx.
   He was commissioned a second lieutenant in 1958 after earning a
bachelor's degree in geology at the City University of New York. He
got his first taste of the White House in 1972 during a stint as a
White House fellow at the Office of Management and Budget.
   Powell served in Southeast Asia as an adviser to South
Vietnamese units in 1962 and 1963 and as executive officer of an
infantry battalion and as a division operations officer in 1968 and
1969.
   Holder of a Purple Heart for being wounded in combat, Powell
also won the Bronze Star for valor.
",20,"[ 0.39033472  0.00977645  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
197,"
   The nation's top military officer jumped into
the Pentagon budget battle Friday, arguing that hasty cuts in
military spending will end up ``breaking the back'' of America's
defense.
   ``If you suddenly cash in your insurance policy to buy a
so-called peace dividend, you will get neither,'' Gen. Colin
Powell, chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, said in a speech to
the National Press Club.
   ``As we get smaller, we also need to get better. If we do it too
fast, we don't get better _ we get hollow,'' he said, warning
against a return to the post-Vietnam War and World War II
reductions.
   Powell's blunt remarks were his first major commentary on the
debate over spending for the nation's military arsenal at a time of
lessened East-West tensions.
   A former national security adviser, Powell now serves as the
president's primary military counselor and coordinator of the
nations' military leaders.
   Powell said that even though the Berlin Wall has fallen and the
Warsaw Pact has nearly evaporated, he has had to place the American
military in dangerous situations during his brief stint in office.
   ``I have been reminded again and again since becoming chairman
that this is still a dangerous world and that you'd better be able
to respond if someone challenges your interests,'' he said, citing
Panama, the Philippines, the Persian Gulf, Europe and Korea as
examples.
   Powell said that despite changes in the Soviet Union, the
Soviets still have the ability to destroy the United States with
nuclear weapons.
   ``We must not confuse a decline in defense spending with a
decline in the nation's enduring defense needs to deal with the
enduring realities we face,'' Powell said.
   The four-star general said that although Soviet President
Mikhail S. Gorbachev remains ``very much in charge,'' his policies
``are sowing the seed of his own weakness.''
   The Soviet Union will remain a superpower well into the next
century, Powell said. ``So even as we reduce, we must maintain our
ability to deter and defend,'' he said.
   Powell said Defense Secretary Dick Cheney's plan released
earlier this week to cut military forces by 25 percent over five
years shows ``we are willing to examine any reasonable proposal.''
   But the general also defended President Bush's $303.3 billion
spending plan for fiscal 1991 as ``a realistic, prudent response''
to the changing world.
   The administration budget blueprint, Powell said, will begin to
reduce the nation's forces over time. ``On this glide path we will
reach a base force which I believe is not prudent to go below if we
wish to match enduring defense needs with enduring realities,''
Powell said.
   ``We know we will get smaller. That is inevitable, that is the
correct thing to do,`' Powell said. But if Bush's budget request is
cut back significantly, ``You will force us to start breaking the
back of our armed forces,'' he said.
   The general also took aim at lawmakers who are seeking more
severe cuts over a shorter period of time. Although he named no
names, House Armed Services Chairman Les Aspin, D-Wis., has been
sharply critical of Cheney's 25 percent plan, and Senate Armed
Services Chairman Sam Nunn, D-Ga., has complained about strategic
``blanks'' in Cheney's budget.
   ``We are looking ahead with our eyes open. We're cutting
programs. We want to close bases. We've frozen construction and
hiring. We're cutting troops, and believe it or not _ we're cutting
generals,'' Powell said.
   ``What we need are not more insights on how to trim the margins,
what we need is breathing space. We need to time to make the plans
work,'' Powell said.
",20,"[ 0.3554598   0.01137601  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
198,"

America's senior military officer Tuesday endorsed the East Bloc's move toward 
a more defensive military posture and reassured his Warsaw Pact counterparts 
that the United States and its NATO allies will not launch an offensive 
military operation against Eastern Europe. 


At a meeting in Vienna, Gen. Colin L. Powell, chairman of the Joint Chiefs of 
Staff, cited ""initial evidence"" that the Warsaw Pact is restructuring its 
forces in line with new defensive military doctrines in the wake of the Cold 
War. 


Despite the encouraging signs, the West's key concern remains ""the specter of 
confronting greatly superior forces armed, trained and suited for offensive 
ground operations,"" Powell said in prepared remarks at a Vienna session of 
defense chiefs representing 35 nations from both the East and the West. 


""Throughout Eastern Europe we see the dramatic movement toward political 
pluralism,"" Powell said. ""For the United States, as for any democracy, glasnost 
-- public discussions and debates over military strategy and programs -- is as 
important as perestroika. For through real glasnost, national security and 
military policies will no longer be the purview of the few but the 
responsibility of the many."" 


Powell's remarks appeared to be directed primarily at the chiefs of Eastern 
Europe's military organizations, whose future roles in the Warsaw Pact are 
uncertain as a result of the the major domestic upheavals that have swept their 
nations. 


Powell also met Tuesday for the first time with the Soviet chief of staff, Gen. 
Mikhail Moiseyev, an encounter that officials said would allow Powell to raise 
further questions about the Soviets' efforts to restructure their military 
forces. 


U.S. military intelligence officials have complained that while the Soviets say 
they are reshaping their forces for defensive operations, they continue to 
deploy large supplies of spare weapons parts and huge ammunition caches near 
the East-West border, where they could be used by troops in an offensive 
operation. 


If the forces had genuinely renounced offensive operations, the analysts said, 
the supply and ammunition sites would be withdrawn from the border. 


The Vienna meeting came as the East European nations, several of which sent new 
defense chiefs to represent them, are debating the roles of their militaries at 
home and in potential joint military actions with the Soviet Union. 


Several of those countries, including Hungary, Poland and Czechoslovakia, have 
moved to impose extraordinary new restrictions on the use of their troops 
outside their national territories -- gestures that Powell appeared to applaud. 


Contrasting the postwar origin of the Atlantic Alliance with that of the Warsaw 
Pact, Powell said that in Eastern Europe, ""the instruments of war were replaced 
by the instruments of coercion. Throughout the capitals of Eastern Europe, the 
liberated became the occupied."" 


Powell delivered his remarks on the first day of an unprecedented ""military 
doctrine seminar"" organized by a 35-nation forum that negotiates limitations on 
the military operations and practices of its member countries, most of which 
are European nations. 


Saying the seminar's task ""is to help shape a new order in Europe,"" Powell 
defended U.S. military initiatives that have introduced to Europe new, 
long-range weapons designed to attack Soviet forces sent in to reinforce the 
first wave of a Warsaw Pact attack on Western Europe. 


""This NATO commitment to preserve territorial integrity at every potential 
point of attack . . . explains the NATO strategy of bringing force to bear on 
successive echelons of attacking forces,"" Powell said, noting that NATO would 
be overwhelmed quickly if it had to face the full brunt of the Warsaw Pact's 
tank armies. 


""Under no circumstances, however, does this imply the alliance's intent to 
invade and seize territory,"" Powell said. 


He also echoed suggestions by other U.S. officials that American ground forces 
will shrink significantly in response to changed military threats in Europe, 
while the U.S. Navy is expected to remain large. 

",20,"[ 0.          0.          0.01691888 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
199,"

Gen. Colin L. Powell, 52, won unanimous approval from the Senate Armed Services 
Committee on Wednesday to be chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, with both 
Republicans and Democrats hailing him as an outstanding choice. 


The Senate panel voted 20 to 0 to recommend Powell's nomination to the full 
Senate. If confirmed, Powell, who would be the youngest officer to head the 
Joint Chiefs, would replace Adm. William J. Crowe Jr. on Oct. 1. 


The committee action came after several hours of a confirmation hearing at 
which Powell told the panel that he has ""some level of confidence"" that reforms 
might succeed in the Soviet Union. 


Such reforms, he said, would give the United States ""opportunities to reshape 
our defense programs, our national security policies and our armed forces. . . 
."" 


But he warned that changes in Soviet military capabilities, not budget 
restraints, should prompt the scale-back and called for continued modernization 
of long-range nuclear weapons. 


""It's very premature to start basing any of our plans and programs and actions"" 
on assumptions of Gorbachev's success, said Powell. ""But I think it is not 
premature to begin thinking about it."" 


His comments came as senior Bush Administration officials offered increasingly 
gloomy assessments of Gorbachev's prospects for success. On the eve of a key 
meeting between Secretary of State James A. Baker III and Soviet Foreign 
Minister Eduard A. Shevardnadze, several U.S. officials have backed away from 
earlier expressions of active U.S. support for the Soviet leader's reform 
efforts. 




Expects 'Backward Steps' 


Reflecting the rising skepticism, Senate Armed Services Committee Chairman Sam 
Nunn (D-Ga.) told Powell: ""We certainly, I think, have to be prepared for 
backward steps to occur in the Soviet Union. Almost inevitably, we'll have 
disruptions and changes, perhaps with suddenness, perhaps at times with 
violence."" 


In choosing the 31-year veteran to lead the nation's 2 million troops, 
President Bush skipped over several more senior military officers. 


""It's an easier decision simply to go down a few numbers, as we say, and pick 
the next senior officer,"" said Sen. John W. Warner (R-Va.), the Senate panel's 
ranking minority member. ""But here, a deep selection was made, which conveys to 
me that the President and his principal advisers thought carefully and long 
about this particular selection, and I think it was a wise one."" 


Echoing praise for Powell, who would be the first black to head the nation's 
military services, Sen. Albert Gore Jr. (D-Tenn.) called Powell's appointment 
""one of the finest appointments that our President has made."" Nunn said that 
Powell offered ""tremendous . . . talent, insight, and experience."" 


Powell now serves as commander of the U.S. Forces Command, which oversees all 
U.S.-based troops. Those include the active and reserve forces that are slated 
to play a major role in the drug war. 


Responding to lawmaker's concerns, Powell said that he would make the 
military's role in the drug war one of his top priorities. 


""I have no reservations and I know that none of my colleagues have any 
reservations,"" said Powell. ""The American people have spoken clearly on this 
one. We ought to be concerned about this cancer that is in our midst, and I 
think we do have capabilities to bring to this war,"" he added. 




Cooperation Over Border 


""In Forces Command, I have got people jumping through their butts right now 
trying to see which forces that are available . . . (that) can be diverted from 
other missions, other training activities, to work with the Border Patrol and 
see if we can do a better job of sealing the border between the United States 
and Mexico,"" said Powell. 


Powell told lawmakers that as the President's principal military adviser in a 
time of shrinking budgets, he would ""rather have (a force) that is smaller, as 
long as it's always ready to perform, as advertised, and when called upon."" 

",20,"[ 0.          0.          0.01998622 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
200,"     Although Florida Republicans are hoping to draft Schwarzkopf for a Senate
bid, he seems unlikely to trade his fatigues for a candidate's general-issue
blue suit. But the silky steeliness displayed during the crisis by Powell, the
first black chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, has revived discussion of
moving Vice President Dan Quayle out to make room for the general on the 1992
Republican ticket.;    Yet there is some evidence to suggest that if Powell
ever decided to seek elected office, he might be at least as comfortable
running as a Democrat.;    No one, of course, can imagine Powell carrying the
Democratic banner next year against President Bush, his commander-in-chief.
But Powell's ultimate political fate does not now seem likely to be decided in
the coming election.;    It is true that many Republican strategists say
nightly prayers for Bush to replace Quayle with Powell in 1992. In a recent
poll, grass-roots Republicans -- by a resounding 47 percent to 29 percent --
said they would make that trade in a minute.;    But with the gulf war victory
so dramatically strengthening Bush's re-election prospects -- his approval
rating is the highest ever recorded -- few now believe he will dump Quayle.;  
 So if Powell, who is only 53, has a future in national politics it is likely
to come in 1996. And, as the general's career unfolds, Democrats should not
assume his loyalties lie irrevocably with the GOP.;    To begin with, no one
knows Powell's political affiliation. Like many accomplished military
commanders -- Eisenhower throughout the 1940s, for example -- Powell has kept
everyone guessing.;    In the Bronx, N.Y., neighborhood where he is registered
to vote, Powell has not stated a party preference. Though he has prospered in
Republican administrations, he also thrived in the Carter administration.;   
Publicly, Powell brushes aside all questions about his political ideology and
ambitions. Privately, he is no more forthcoming. Even among those on a
first-name basis, people such as retired Maj. Gen. Chuck Bussey, virtually
none can locate where the man stands in a partisan landscape.;    ""I know
Colin, and have known him for a long time,"" says Bussey, who is black. ""But I
cannot honestly tell you what are his political positions. I can tell you,
however, that proves how great his political skills are."";    As reticent as
he is, though, Powell has publicly expressed views on enough foreign and
domestic subjects to give some clues of his leanings. Clearly, his positions
on foreign policy and the aggressive use of U.S. force abroad fall within the
mainstream of the GOP, not the post-McGovern Democrats.;    But on domestic
issues, Powell has signaled values that reflect the experiences that shaped
him -- a course that led him down roads many Republicans see only from inside
their cars, with the windows sealed and the doors locked.;    Powell is, after
all, not a product of comfortable suburbia, but a son of Jamaican immigrants
who was born in Harlem, grew up in the South Bronx, watched his parents
struggle to earn a living as a sales clerk and a seamstress in New York's
garment district, attended the public City College of New York and joined the
ROTC during the 1950s, partly because it was one of the few institutions
offering opportunities to blacks.;    Though some blacks have criticized
Powell for being too cautious in addressing issues of concern to
African-Americans, he has, on several occasions, pointedly indicated that he
has not forgotten those struggles. A few years ago, he told a dinner of the
Joint Center for Political and Economic Studies that he was ""mindful . . .
that the struggle is not over . . . that the struggle will not be over until
every American is able to find his or her own place in our society, limited
only by his or her own ability."";    More recently, Powell displayed
impatience with the progress of that struggle, when he told a congressional
committee questioning the large number of minority soldiers in the gulf war
that he ""wish(ed) that there were other activities in our society . . . as
open as the military is to upward mobility, to achievement, to allowing them
in. I wish that corporate America, I wish the trade unions around the nation,
would show the same level of openness and opportunity to minorities."";    With
his foreign-policy views Powell would scrape against some encrusted
conventions in today's Democratic Party. But Powell's views do not represent a
new mold for the party. Rather, if he choose a political career as a Democrat,
Powell could revive the tattered tradition of the party's Henry ""Scoop""
Jackson wing that combined an assertive domestic policy with tough convictions
on defending U.S. interests abroad.;    The bottom line is that Powell
presents intriguing opportunities for both parties. Nominating Powell to a
future national ticket offers Republicans the chance to cement their
presidential majority by breaking the Democratic hold on black votes.;    For
Democrats, conversely, a national slot for Powell could allow the party to
simultaneously affirm its commitment to equal opportunity and dispatch
persistent doubts about whether it is tough enough to protect American
interests in an unstable world.;    If Powell hints even the slightest
interest, and Democrats are uncharacteristically alert, it could set off the
kind of bipartisan bidding war not seen since 1948, when activists in both
parties tried to draft Eisenhower as their presidential candidate. In the
meantime, Americans of all ideologies would be well-served to hear more of
Powell's views on the battles yet to be fought at home. (box)  ",20,"[ 0.43448676  0.00863079  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
201,"
   Many past national security advisers have fancied themselves grand world strategists, yet have failed at the basic task of making the national-security apparatus run smoothly. 

   Lt. Gen. Colin Powell, by contrast, is an unpretentious infantryman who gets his kicks by buying old cars and rebuilding them at home in his spare time. 
But he also is an experienced bureaucratic player who is skilled at operating the national-security system. 

   As a result, Gen. Powell, named the new national security adviser last week, appears to be the right man for the job at this stage of the Reagan administration. 
The Reagan foreign policy agenda has been winnowed down largely to the quest for arms-control agreements with the Soviets and the search for change in Nicaragua. 
The time for grand new concepts has passed. 
Now Mr. Reagan needs someone who is respected inside the system and capable of ironing out remaining internal disputes quietly. 

   Gen. Powell, who has been serving as deputy national security adviser, fits the bill. 
""He always impressed me as being a good inside politician -- a good infighter, yet also a peacemaker,"" says Michael Burch, who was an assistant defense secretary when Gen. Powell was Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger's top miltary assistant. 
""While I don't know that he's a great strategist, he more than makes up for it with common sense and getting the right people together at the right time and resolving problems before they happen."" 

   Secretary of State George Shultz and Frank Carlucci, the current national security adviser and Mr. Reagan's nominee to become secretary of defense, are both better known in Congress and will be more visible, selling the pending arms-control treaty and other administration policies. 

   Gen. Powell, a genial and plain-spoken 50-year-old, is one of a special breed of Washington figures: He is well known within the tightly knit national security establishment, yet largely unknown to the rest of the nation. 

   He has combat experience in Vietnam. 
He has been a senior aide under three cabinet officers -- Mr. Weinberger, former Defense Secretary Harold Brown and former Energy Secretary Charles Duncan -- and has known Mr. Carlucci since working under him in the Office of Management and Budget 15 years ago. 

   Gen. Powell works the bureaucracy with a deft touch and he has a keener sense of public relations than many of his predecessors. 
When the Reagan administration was planning its invasion of Grenada, for example, Gen. Powell was serving as Mr. Weinberger's chief military assistant at the Pentagon. 
He was almost alone in the government in sensing that the Pentagon's press office should be given some warning of the impending operation so it could be prepared for the deluge of press inquiries certain to come after the operation was launched. 

   Gen. Powell convinced Mr. Weinberger to warn the Pentagon public affairs office a day in advance. 
Pentagon press officers kept the secret, avoided directly lying to suspicious reporters before the operation was launched, yet were ready once news broke. 
By contrast, John Poindexter, then the deputy national security adviser, froze out White House spokesman Larry Speakes and even prompted him to lie about the operation just before it began. 

   Gen. Powell also has shown that he can present issues to his boss without seeming to impose his own views -- a skill useful in maintaining the image of honest broker of ideas important for a national security adviser. 
Colleagues recall that when Gen. Powell thought an issue should be brought to Mr. Weinberger's attention, he often privately urged other officials to raise it at the defense chief's regular staff meetings. 
""Colin is the consummate staff man,"" says Lawrence Korb, a former assistant defense secretary. 

   Gen. Powell was so trusted by Mr. Weinberger that he was one of the few government officials who knew of the secret arms sales to Iran, and of Mr. Weinberger's strong objections and efforts to find out more about them. 
Colleagues say it is extremely unlikely that Mr. Powell, both because of his own style and experience in the affair, would try to keep information from President Reagan as Adm. Poindexter did during the Iran-Contra affair. 

   Recently, Gen. Powell has told visitors that the National Security Council staff should function as a ""collegial infantry batallion."" 
It isn't a term a grandiloquent national security adviser like Henry Kissinger would have used, but it's an indicator of the kind of efficient and noncontroversial NSC operation Gen. Powell can be expected to run. 

",20,"[ 0.19621444  0.00941936  0.18904593 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
202,"
   The candidate backed by Mikhail S. Gorbachev for
president of the Russian republic withdrew from the race today,
strengthening the campaign of Boris N. Yeltsin, the populist who
has repeatedly clashed with Gorbachev.
   The state news agency Tass reported the withrawal of Russian
Premier Aleksandr V. Vlasov but did not give a reason. It said
Vlasov's pullout had been announced at the Congress of the Russian
Federation, which will elect the president, a newly created post in
the largest of the 15 Soviet republics.
   On Wednesday, Gorbachev attacked Yeltsin's platform, accusing
him of calling for the ``breakup of the Soviet Union.''
   The Russian republic contains Moscow and encompasses 11 time
zones, from the Baltic to the Pacific. The Russian language
predominates in the Soviet Union, and much of the nation's wealth,
including vast natural resources, is concentrated in the republic.
   In addition to Yeltsin, two other men remained in the race _
Ivan Polozkov and Vladimir Morokin _ but from the start the
campaign had appeared to be a contest between Yeltsin and Vlasov. A
vote was possible later in the day.
   Prior to Vlasov's announcement, Yeltsin delivered a
well-received speech pledging that if elected, he would defend the
republic from meddling by the national Soviet government, but
refrain from clashing with Gorbachev.
   Gorbachev holds the posts of president of the Soviet Union and
general secretary of the Soviet Communist Party, the two most
powerful jobs in the Soviet Union.
   ``I am for businesslike relations, dialogue and negotiations
with the president and the government, but on the principle that
Russia's sovereignty is not damaged,'' Yeltsin told the Russian
Congress.
   His bass voice booming through the hall of the Great Kremlin
Palace, Yeltsin pressed a radical platform for bringing the Russian
republic ``out of crisis.''
   He presented a point-by-point program on how he would fight for
Russian's sovereignty, unleash market forces, increase housing and
flood stores with consumer goods.
   He blasted the government program for a transition to a market
economy presented by Premier Nikolai Ryzhkov on Thursday, saying it
had ``already created panic in the stores today.''
   Instead, he backed an alternative program involving sale of
government property, more liberal laws on ownership and foreign
loans to make the transition without ``everything falling on the
shoulders of the people.''
   Yeltsin already is a member of the Congress of People's
Deputies, which is the national parliament; the Russian Congress of
People's Deputies, the Russian republic's parliament; and the
Communist Party Central Committee.
   During a question-and-answer session, he was asked several times
about his relations with Gorbachev, who entered the hall halfway
through the speech. Yeltsin, formerly Gorbachev's protege, has
become an opponent in the last two years, blaming the Soviet
president for ``halfway reforms.''
   But Yeltsin said their personal relationship would not influence
their interaction as presidents. ``If there was or is something
personal, I'll set it aside,'' he said.
   Yeltsin left the podium to prolonged applause, and was followed
by Ivan Polozkov, a Communist Party chief from Krasnodar who is now
considered Yeltsin's main rival.
   Russia is the largest of the 15 Soviet republics, with just more
than half the country's population and two-thirds of its territory.
",21,"[ 0.34380923  0.01165039  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
203,"
   Russian lawmakers cast ballots Friday night in a
vote to determine whether populist Boris N. Yeltsin would become
president of the Soviet Union's largest republic.
   Yeltsin, a onetime Gorbachev ally ousted two years ago as Moscow
Communist Party chief after calling for faster reform, gained a
double boost Friday. Russian deputies and Soviet media praised a
key campaign speech he made, and the candidate backed by President
Mikhail S. Gorbachev withdrew.
   But Yeltsin, 59, needs backing from 531 of the 1,059 members of
the Russian Congress, more than he himself has estimated he could
count on. Official results from voting late Friday are expected by
Saturday morning.
   The candidate backed by Gorbachev, Russian premier Alexander
Vlasov, withdrew from the race after it became clear he lacked
Yeltsin's popularity.
   Vlasov's departure left Ivan Polozkov, a Communist Party chief
from the southern Russia city of Krasnodar, as Yeltsin's main
rival. The third remaining candidate, aviation instructor Vladimir
Morokin, did not appear to have any chance of winning.
   Russia, by far the largest of the Soviet Union's 15 republics,
comprises more than two-thirds of the country's territory. It is
home to half the Soviet populace.
   A Yeltsin victory would mean an important setback for Gorbachev,
who has clashed repeatedly with his former protege. Gorbachev spoke
out Wednesday against Yeltsin's plan for increased Russian
autonomy, claiming it would mean ``the breakup of the Soviet
Union.''
   Yeltsin, however, pledged Friday that if elected, he would
defend the republic from Moscow interference while not letting
personal conflicts interfere with his Kremlin dealings.
   ``I am for business-like relations, dialogue and negotiations
with the president and the government, but on the principle that
Russia's sovereignty is not damaged,'' Yeltsin told the Russian
Congress. The Russians use the term ``sovereignty'' to mean
increased autonomy _ not secession.
   With his bass voice booming through the hall of the Great
Kremlin Palace, Yeltsin pressed a point-by-point program on
promoting for Russian sovereignty, unleashing market forces,
increasing housing and flooding stores with consumer goods.
   ``Vremya,'' the nightly news program on state-run Soviet
television, gave Yeltsin high marks for his platform. ``Having
heard all the contenders, I can say his program for the rebirth of
Russia came off the best-argued and thought-through,'' the Vremya
report said.
   ``The people believe in Boris Nikolayevich Yeltsin,'' deputy
Nina Sivova told the Congress. ``His great force of will is needed
today.''
   In an early indication of Yeltsin's plans if he wins, his speech
blasted the government program announced Thursday for a transition
to a free market economy. He said it had ``already created panic in
the stores today.''
   Instead, he backed an alternative program involving sale of
government property, full independence for enterprises, more
liberal laws on ownership and foreign loans.
   Yeltsin is already a member of the national Congress of People's
Deputies and a member of the Communist Party Central Committee.
   He has made a remarkable political comeback from disgrace two
years ago, when he was ousted from his post as Moscow party chief
and ostracized by the Kremlin elite, including Gorbachev. Yeltsin
has continued to level public blasts of criticism at Gorbachev for
his ``halfway reforms.''
   If no one wins more than 50 percent of the vote in the first
round, the election goes into a runoff between the top two
vote-getters.
",21,"[ 0.35783285  0.0121256   0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
204,"
   Radical reformer Boris N. Yeltsin triumphed over
opposition from Mikhail S. Gorbachev to win the presidency of the
largest Soviet republic today in what he called ``Russia's social,
economic and spiritual rebirth.''
   After three hard-fought ballots in the 1,060-member Russian
Congress of People's Deputies, Yeltsin won 535, four more than the
majority he needed. Russian Premier Alexander Vlasov, received 467
ballots.
   Yeltsin now poses a substantial challenge to Gorbachev, who
retains the two most powerful jobs in the country: president of the
Soviet Union and general secretary of the Soviet Communist Party.
   However, Gennadi Gerasimov, spokesman for the Soviet Foreign
Ministry, said Yeltsin's election could strengthen Gorbachev's
campaign for economic reforms.
   ``Yeltsin's victory is an expression of general discontent with
how things are going in the Soviet Union's biggest republic,''
Gerasimov told reporters at the United Nations in New York.
   ``The Soviet Union is a democracy, so we accept what the Russian
parliament has decided. It may be a blessing in disguise. President
Gorbachev has his critics from both the left and the right, and
possibly it is better to have the election of a critic from the
left,'' he said.
   Igor Malashenko, foreign policy advisor to the Communist Party
who accompanied Gerasimov at the news conference, agreed.
   ``This victory of Yeltsin has been misinterpreted as a problem
for Gorbachev,'' Malashenko said. ``Yeltsin is also a reformer,
although he reflects concepts which are different from Gorbachev.
   ``In this respect I believe it (the election) can strengthen the
cause of reform in the Soviet Union. Today, many people blame
Gorbachev for problems and now they have another person to blame.''
   After the election result was announced in the Grand Kremlin
Palace, the burly 59-year-old Yeltsin, strode to the podium,
received warm applause and cheers from fellow lawmakers, and was
handed a bouquet of flowers.
   Yeltsin said he felt ``a certain satisfaction, but at the same
time, I have much more a feeling of responsibility at this turning
point for Russia and the country.''
   ``I pledge not to spare anything _ health or time _ to do
everything to get out of this crisis and lead Russia to better
times,'' Yeltsin said in his victory speech.
   He called the day ``the beginning of the road to Russia's
social, economic and spiritual rebirth, the way out of the crisis
and toward the blossoming of Russia as a sovereign, independent
government in the framework of our union.''
   Gorbachev actively opposed Yeltsin's election, telling the
Russian Congress last week that his platform of moving political
and economic power from central to local authorities would lead to
a ``breakup of the union.''
   The Russian Federation is by far the largest of the 15 Soviet
republics, stretching from the Baltic Sea in the west to the
Pacific Ocean in the east. It is home to one-half the country's 285
million people and includes Moscow.
   As the president of Russia, Yeltsin will have a highly visible
platform from which to wage his campaign for more radical reforms
than those pursued so far by Gorbachev.
   The victory marks an amazing comeback for Yeltsin. Less than
three years ago, he was reviled in the Soviet press, attacked by
party officials, rebuffed by his former mentor, Gorbachev, and
considered finished politically. Gorbachev had brought Yeltsin to
Moscow to head the city's Communist Party, but he was fired in 1987
after showing little reverance for party hierarchy.
   Yeltsin, however, made his rift with Gorbachev work for him.
   The popular and outspoken Yeltsin had lost the second round of
voting on Saturday by just 28 votes. He lost the first round Friday
with 497 ballots to 473 for Krasnodar regional Communist Party
chief Ivan Polozkov.
   He was nominated again Monday and faced Vlasov, who had
Gorbachev's support, and Valentin Tsoy, a little-known businessman
from the Soviet Far East, who received 11 votes.
   After his election, Yeltsin walked through the Kremlin grounds
with reporters and well-wishers. After passing through the Spassky
Gate, he was joined by more supporters.
   ``Thank you! Thank you for our future!'' one man shouted.
Yeltsin mounted the steps of an embankment below the Kremlin wall
for an impromptu speech to supporters who rushed across the
cobblestone street. To shouts of ``victory!'' Yeltsin pledged to
work for a ``renewed Russia.'' The crowd pledged support.
   ``We're prepared to go together with him into tough times.
Everyone says that,'' one crowd member, Nadezda Matveyeva said.
   During his campaign, Yeltsin called on the Congress to reject
the Kremlin's new program for gradually transforming the country's
crippled, centrally planned economy to a partial market economy.
   ``The Congress must take the citizens of Russia under its
defense,'' he said. The reform program, which would triple the
price of bread on July 1 and double the cost of other foodstuffs
starting Jan. 1, caused panic buying that prompted Moscow city
authorities to bar sales to non-residents of the capital.
   Gorbachev, who left Moscow today for a Washington summit, went
on national television Sunday night to try to calm fears. But
anxiety is high and the list of items being rationed is on the rise.
   Yeltsin has broadly outlined a plan that would more rapidly seek
a transition to a market-based economy, giving more freedom to
enterprises and entrepreneurs.
   Lawmakers said Monday they believed Yeltsin's offer of a
coalition government in the republic bolstered his chances to win
today's round.
   Discontent over the government's economic program also boosted
Yeltsin's campaign, said one of his backers, lawmaker Leonid
Gurevich of Murmansk.
   Some economists have estimated that up to 40 million people
could lose their jobs as a result of the central government's
reforms, expected to drive many inefficient businesses into
bankruptcy.
   Under the three-step reform plan, to be implemented through
1995, 60 percent of state enterprises would be sold to the public
sector, and controls would be lifted on 60 percent of prices.

",21,"[ 0.42465761  0.00789131  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
205,"
   Populist reformer Boris N. Yeltsin won the
presidency of the largest Soviet republic Tuesday, overcoming
opposition by Mikhail S. Gorbachev and declaring the start of
``Russia's social, economic and spiritual rebirth.''
   Yeltsin's election, after three hard-fought ballots in the
Congress of People's Deputies of the Russian Federation, poses a
substantial challenge to Gorbachev and may spur more radical
reforms across the country.
   Gorbachev, who arrives Wednesday in Washington for a summit,
retains the two most powerful jobs in the country: president of the
Soviet Union and General Secretary of the Soviet Communist Party.
   But as president of the largest of 15 Soviet republics, Yeltsin
will have a highly visible platform from which to wage his campaign
for more radical reforms. Yeltsin and other Soviet officials said
they believe his election will help Gorbachev push more radical
reforms.
   ``It may be a blessing in disguise,'' Foreign Ministry spokesman
Gennady Gerasimov told reporters at the United Nations in New York.
``Gorbachev has his critics from both the left and the right, and
possibly it is better to have the election of a critic from the
left.''
   Yeltsin said: ``At first, President Gorbachev will react very
unhappily, but then he'll gradually get used to this
inevitability.''
   The strapping, white-haired Yeltsin told reporters that he would
seek reconciliation with Gorbachev and avoid confrontation with
him, so long as it did not hurt Russia's interests.
   Gorbachev had brought Yeltsin to Moscow to head the city's
Communist Party, but the two men had a falling out in 1987 after
Yeltsin publicly criticized the pace of Kremlin reforms. They have
been at odds since then.
   After the vote result was announced in the Grand Kremlin Palace,
Yeltsin strode to the podium to warm applause and pledged to
``spare nothing _ health or time _ to get out of this crisis and
lead Russia to better times.''
   His bass voice echoing through the hall, he called the day ``the
beginning of the road to Russia's social, economic and spiritual
rebirth, the way out of the crisis and toward the blossoming of
Russia as a sovereign, independent government in the framework of
our union.''
   He left through the Kremlin gates later to the tumultuous cheers
of a small crowd of well-wishers chanting ``Victory! Victory!'' One
man yelled, ``Thank you, thank you for the future!''
   Gorbachev strongly opposed Yeltsin's election. He told the
Russian Congress last week that Yeltsin's platform of moving
political and economic power from central to local authorities
would lead to a ``breakup of the union.''
   The Russian Federation stretches from the Baltic Sea in the west
to the Pacific Ocean in the East. It is home to half the country's
285 million people and includes Moscow, the Soviet capital.
   As president of the Russian Congress, a newly created body that
holds the Russian Federation's highest government authority,
Yeltsin acts as chief executive of the republic and took office
immediately. As the first president of a newly reorganized
legislature, he will play a major role in shaping his powers and
duties, which as yet are unclear.
   After three votes in the 1,060-member Russian Congress, Yeltsin
won 535 votes, four more than the majority needed.
   Russian Premier Alexander Vlasov received 467 votes. Valentin
Tsoy, a little-known businessman from the Soviet Far East, received
11 votes.
   Lawmakers said Tuesday they believed Yeltsin gained the last few
votes he needed by offering to form a coalition government with
members of the conservative Communist Party bloc and other groups.
   Yeltsin said he believed he gained several votes because of a
last-minute push by Gorbachev to block his election. Gorbachev
reportedly urged delegates at a meeting Monday night not to vote
for Yeltsin.
   Russian Deputy Alexander Liubimov, a well-known TV commentator,
said Yeltsin's election would force Gorbachev to start dealing with
another strong leader instead of ``shadows'' willing to defer to
him. ``It will be a lesson for him. Maybe a hard one,'' Liubimov
said.
   Vitaly Churkin, a spokesman for Foreign Minister Eduard A.
Shevardnadze, said on NBC that Yeltsin's election ``might actually
help Gorbachev because Gorbachev is for radical reform, and he
needs more popular support for that.''
   Some also said Yeltsin may have benefited from the adverse
reaction to the Kremlin's proposed program for making the crippled
Soviet economy a partial market economy.
   The reform program, which would triple the price of bread on
July 1 and double the cost of other foodstuffs starting Jan. 1,
caused panic buying that prompted Moscow city authorities to bar
sales to non-residents of the capital Monday.
   The national legislature postponed a decision on the reform plan
Tuesday, raising the possibility of compromise with Yeltsin and
others demanding more radical measures. It also rejected a motion
for a no-confidence vote in Premier Nikolai I. Ryzhkov, who
presented the reforms last week.
   Yeltsin has proposed a more rapid transition to a market-based
economy that would grant more freedom to enterprises and
entrepreneurs.
",21,"[ 0.36510502  0.00876352  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
206,"
   Boris N. Yeltsin, the newly elected president of
the Russian republic, sat down with 130 legislators today to
negotiate the makeup of a coalition government for the largest
Soviet republic.
   Legislators said Yeltsin immediately came under pressure to
retain as Russian prime minister Alexander Vlasov, a member of the
Communist Party Politburo who had been Yeltsin's rival in Tuesday's
balloting for president.
   Yeltsin opened today's meeting in a businesslike fashion and set
only one limit, asking that one of his deputies be a woman,
legislators said.
   Yeltsin, a frequent critic of Soviet President Mikhail S.
Gorbachev and his gradual reforms, was reported to have gained the
last few votes he needed by offering to guarantee a place in his
government for other factions.
   Although most of the Russian legislators are Communist Party
members, they range from radical reformers like Yeltsin to
hard-liners unhappy with even the more modest innovations of
Gorbachev.
   Yeltsin won his new job Tuesday on the third ballot in the
Russian Congress of People's Deputies.
   Yeltsin poses a substantial challenge to Gorbachev, both through
his personal popularity and his demand that much authority be
transferred from Gorbachev's central government to the republics.
   That would greatly increase his power, since Russia is the
largest republic with 52 percent of the Soviet Union's 289 million
people and three-quarters of its land.
   The strapping, white-haired Siberian said Tuesday he would seek
reconciliation with Gorbachev and avoid confrontation with him as
long as it would not hurt Russia's interests.
   He took the first step in that direction today, meeting in the
ornate St. George's Hall of the Grand Kremlin Palace with
representatives of each political faction and each ethnic region in
the Russian Federation.
   Yeltsin asked for two to three nominations for each ministerial
post in the Russian government. He said the candidates would be
presented to the full Russian Congress for confirmation starting
Thursday. It was not clear how such a system would lead to the
delicate balance of political forces and personalities typical of a
coalition government in the West.
   The session was closed to reporters after the first few minutes.
   Legislators said the talks were not aimed at parceling out
portfolios in the Council of Ministers to specific political
parties or factions.
   ``We don't really have hard political divisions like that right
now,'' explained Igor Bratishev, an economist and deputy from
Rostov-on-Don who participated in today's meeting with 130
legislators arrayed around a vast rectangle under the ornate
vaulted ceiling of St. George's Hall.
   So far, 24 legislative groups have registered, including
Yeltsin's own Democratic Russia and one called Communists of
Russia. But the majority have a narrow focus, such as ecology,
medical workers and legislators concerned with the problems of
refugees.
   The so-called ``conciliation committee'' is seeking a consensus
on candidates for prime minister and the three assistants to
Yeltsin, said Vladimir Ivanov, a legislator from Buryatia near Lake
Baikal in Siberia.
   ``People want Yeltsin to suggest Vlasov for prime minister,''
Ivanov said.
   The committee, representing each political group and each ethnic
region in the Russian Federation, is examining candidates' personal
qualifications and morale convictions, Bratishev said.
   In Ottawa, Canada, on Tuesday Gorbachev told reporters he was
``somewhat concerned'' about Yeltsin's victory but encouraged by
the new Russian president's vow to settle divisions in the Congress
and work with the Kremlin leadership.
   ``If, however, he is playing a political game, then we may be in
for a difficult time,'' Gorbachev said.
   Gorbachev, who was to arrive in Washington today for a summit
with President Bush, spent days watching the struggle for control
of the Russian Congress. He even took the floor to speak against
Yeltsin.
   Yeltsin and many Soviets said the election could help advance
reforms in the Soviet Union.
   ``It may be a blessing in disguise,'' Soviet Foreign Ministry
spokesman Gennady Gerasimov told reporters at the United Nations in
New York. ``Gorbachev has his critics from both the left and the
right, and possibly it is better to have the election of a critic
from the left.''
   Vitaly Churkin, another Foreign Ministry spokesman, said
Yeltsin's election ``might actually help Gorbachev because
Gorbachev is for radical reform, and he needs more popular support
for that.''
   Gorbachev brought Yeltsin to Moscow to head the city's Communist
Party, but the two men fell out over Yeltsin's public criticism in
1987 of the pace of reform and have been at odds ever since.
   As president of the Russian Congress, a newly created body that
holds the Russian Federation's highest government authority,
Yeltsin acts as chief executive of the republic.
   As the first president of a newly reorganized legislature, he
will play a major role in shaping his powers and duties, which as
yet are unclear.
",21,"[ 0.42419424  0.00905051  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
207,"
   Boris N. Yeltsin, the new president of the Russian
Federation and a leading critic of Mikhail S. Gorbachev, said
Thursday he will try to make peace in his personal feud with the
Soviet president.
   Yeltsin, a radical reformer, was quoted by the official Tass news
agency as saying he would put aside personal differences with
Gorbachev when the president returns from the Washington summit.
   Yeltsin was seeking to calm the fears of the deputies of the
republic's Congress about his stormy relationship with Gorbachev,
his former mentor.
   In his new position as president of Russia, the largest Soviet
republic, Yeltsin has a formidable platform from which to challenge
and criticize Gorbachev, who opposed his election.
   Deputies speaking Thursday at the Russian Congress ``expressed
concern over the exchange of statements about each other'' by
Yeltsin and Gorbachev, Tass reported.
   Yeltsin answered that after Gorbachev returns June 4 from the
summit in Washington, ``I think we'll have an appropriate
conversation, and we'll resolve most issues without damaging the
sovereignty and aims of Russia,'' Tass said.
   At a news conference Wednesday, Yeltsin called for achieving
Russian ``sovereignty'' within 100 days. The term is used here to
mean not independence, but autonomy in most internal decisions.
   Yeltsin also urged the Kremlin to allow the other 14 republics to
enjoy the same autonomy, making the country a federation of states
that could overrule the central government on most matters.
   Although Yeltsin said he wanted a ``businesslike'' relationship
with Gorbachev, he also made an oblique call Thursday for Gorbachev
to give up one of his posts: either Soviet president or Communist
Party general secretary.
   ``I am against combining any post in one person. And I am talking
not just about the chairmanship of the party at the Russian level,
at the regional level, or at the local level,'' he said.
   In Ottawa on Tuesday, Gorbachev said he was ``somewhat
concerned'' about Yeltsin's victory and feared that if Yeltsin ``is
playing a political game, then we may be in for a difficult time.''
   There have been no reports that Gorbachev sent congratulations to
Yeltsin on his election.
   Gorbachev brought Yeltsin to Moscow to head the city's Communist
Party but fired him in 1987 after Yeltsin publicly criticized the
pace of reform. Relations have been strained ever since.
   Yeltsin capped a remarkable political comeback by winning
election Tuesday as Russian president.
   However, at Thursday's session of the Russian Congress, Deputy
Ivan Galushko from the Jewish autonomous region in the Soviet Far
East said Yeltsin was overstepping his authority with some of his
statements the day before.
   He called on Yeltsin ``to refrain from hasty statements on
questions that are within the competence of the Congress or Supreme
Soviet.''
   Tass said many deputies seconded Galushko's opinion.
   In his reply, Yeltsin acknowledged disagreements with Gorbachev
but said he would put them aside.
   ``True, we have our differences,'' said Yeltsin. ``I renounce all
these personal aspects fully and completely. I leave that behind.''
   A deputy of the national Supreme Soviet legislature, Anatoly
Denisov, said in an interview that the differences between Yeltsin
and Gorbachev are so pronounced they portend ``very bad
consequences'' and ``difficult conflicts'' for the nation.
   He said they could lead to the imposition of Soviet presidential
rule nationwide.
",21,"[ 0.40378647  0.01107655  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
208,"     Russians vote Wednesday in the first democratic elections for the
presidency of the huge Russian Republic as well as for the mayors of Moscow,
Leningrad and other cities.;    In Moscow on Monday, an estimated 30,000
people marched through the streets in a show of support for Yeltsin, carrying
balloons and photos of their candidate and urging Russians to vote for him.
World chess champion Gary Kasparov spoke in Yeltsin's behalf.;    Just before
the first of the negative articles appeared, Yeltsin's aides privately charged
that Soviet President Mikhail Gorbachev personally had ordered a KGB smear
against Yeltsin. Though Yeltsin's staff would not repeat the allegations
publicly, the cycle of smear and recrimination indicated that the
rapprochement between Yeltsin and Gorbachev is little more than skin deep.;   
It also indicated growing desperation on the part of the Soviet leadership as
it watched Yeltsin build an apparently unassailable lead. If Yeltsin failed to
win an absolute majority, he would be forced into a runoff with his main
opponent, former Soviet Prime Minister Nikolai Ryzhkov. It is a matter of
debate whether Yeltsin will face a runoff.;    The Pravda article, purporting
to be a psychological study of Yeltsin by four academics, mentioned ""a suicide
attempt at a time when his party career was finished."" The assertion was used
to buttress a claim that Yeltsin was particularly unstable under stress.;   
""The main feature of Boris Nikolayevich's personality is his excessive need
for power,"" the professors wrote.;    Throughout his career, Yeltsin has shown
himself to be simplistic, disloyal and, above all, authoritarian, the
professors said, and his striving for power shows ""an unconscious striving to
compensate for feelings of inadequacy."";    The suicide story was developed at
greater length in Sovietskaya Rossiya by former dissident Roy Medvedev, now a
conservative member of the Soviet Parliament. Medvedev supports Ryzhkov for
president.;    In a stinging attack on Yeltsin for hypocrisy and opportunism,
Medvedev declared that in late 1987 ""Yeltsin even attempted to commit suicide
with a pair of sharp scissors used for cutting paper. This was a serious
nervous breakdown."";    Medvedev alleged that the incident took place soon
after a stormy meeting of the Communist Party Central Committee in October
1987.  ",21,"[ 0.41423256  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
209,"     Nikolai Ryzhkov, the former Soviet prime minister, was reported running a
distant second, averaging about 20 percent of the votes cast but doing better
in rural areas where the Communist Party had mobilized support among
farmworkers.;    Although a strong vote for Ryzhkov and perhaps other
conservative candidates in Russia's smaller cities and rural areas could
diminish Yeltsin's margin, he appeared certain of the absolute majority of
more than 50 percent he needed to win the presidency on the first ballot,
avoiding a runoff election.;    The likely size of that victory, moreover,
should not only assure Yeltsin the new executive presidency of the Russian
federation, the largest Soviet republic, but also give him the mandate he
sought for sweeping political and economic changes in the Soviet Union as a
whole.;    A beaming Yeltsin was greeted by chants of ""Victory! Victory!"" from
scores of supporters as he voted in Moscow. After dropping his ballot in a
box, he raised his fist and clasped his hands above his head in triumph.;   
""This is a celebration of the Russian federation's sovereignty,"" said Yeltsin,
noting that Wednesday was a holiday in the republic to mark the first
anniversary of Russia's move to wrest control of its resources away from the
Kremlin.;    Soviet President Mikhail Gorbachev refused to say who got his
vote after he cast his ballot in Moscow. But he stressed that he is willing to
work with the winner.;    ""I am ready to cooperate with anyone who will be
elected by Russians,"" Gorbachev said. ""There will be no problems from my
side."";    It is clear, however, that a Yeltsin victory would represent a
distinct threat to Gorbachev, who has never faced a popular election. Yeltsin
would be able to claim that he alone has a democratic mandate to speak for the
people of the Soviet Union's largest republic.;    Ryzhkov, at another polling
station, said: ""Social tension is high, and if we make drastic decisions that
affect people's lives, there will be unpredictable consequences. . . . I
cannot allow Russia and the rest of the country to be divided into two camps,
one camp for Gorbachev and the other for Ryzhkov or some other person."";    In
other results, the radical leaders of Moscow and Leningrad, Gavriil Popov and
Anatoly A. Sobchak, appeared to have won election over conservative rivals as
executive mayors with greater executive powers, according to the independent
Russian Information Agency.;    A proposal to change the name of Leningrad
back to St. Petersburg reportedly won the approval of 55 percent of the voters
in a non-binding referendum, but the ballot counting was not yet complete.;   
Even from the preliminary reports gathered by the Russian Information Agency
and other independent news organizations from across Russia, the size of
Yeltsin's victory was impressive.;    In constituencies as diverse as the
Soviet navy's Pacific fleet, fishermen and merchant sailors at sea, mining
towns beyond the Arctic Circle, Siberia's great industrial centers, the
ancient cities of European Russia and regions along the Chinese and Mongolian
borders, Yeltsin won the support of 55 percent to 80 percent of the voters,
according to unofficial reports from the Russian Information Agency.;    Such
a victory, demonstrating a strong majority support across the country, should
boost Yeltsin's political stature considerably.; Boris Yeltsin ahead in
election; (box) Born: Feb 1, 1931, in Butka, Siberia, in Russian republic;
(box) 1955: Construction worker in Sverdlovsk; (box) 1976: First secretary,
Sverdiocsk District Central Committee; (box) 1985: First secretary of Moscow
Communist Party.; (box) 1987: Outburst against conservative archrival Yegor
Ligachev leads to Yeltsin's ouster from Politburo.; (box) 1989: Bounces back
from disgrace; wins 89% of vote to be Moscow's representative in New Congress
of People's Deputies, the national parliament.; (box) 1990: Republic's
parliament elects him president of Russia.; (box) June 12, 1991: In Russia's
first popular election, Yeltsin leads by large margin in race for president.  ",21,"[ 0.40118306  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
210,"     By winning up to 57 percent of the vote, Yeltsin avoided a run-off and
strengthened his hand against Communist Party stalwarts who oppose his program
to transfer ownership of state-owned farms and factories to individuals.;   
The victory cleared the way for the white-haired Siberian to travel to
Washington next week, at the invitation of members of Congress, in a
demonstration of his independence from Soviet President Mikhail Gorbachev.;
The White House today applauded Yeltsin's election as ""a good sign"" for
democracy and said he would visit the White House next Thursday.;   
Presidential spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said President Bush wants to discuss
with Yeltsin ""his new position and to discuss the future of the Russian
Republic as well as any other matters he wants to talk about.""; Yeltsin's
Russian republic has more than half the nation's 285 million people,
three-fourths of its territory and most of its natural wealth and industry.;  
 Two other radical reformers, Moscow Mayor Gavriil Popov and Leningrad Mayor
Anatoly Sobchak, also won, according to preliminary results. Popov received
65.11 percent of the vote, and Sobchak 65.5 percent, commission officials
said.;    And a 54 percent majority in Leningrad voted to restore that city to
its original czarist name, St. Petersburg, election officials said. Gorbachev
and other Communist Party officials oppose dropping the current name, which
honors Vladimir Lenin, founder of the Soviet Union.;    The chairman of the
Central Election Commission, Vasily Kazakov, was quoted by the state news
agency Tass as saying that Yeltsin has won a majority, and ""a second round in
the elections for the president of Russia, apparently will not take place."";  
 Alexander Zamyatin, another member of the commission, said Yeltsin was
winning, but said t the results were ""preliminary. We cannot give official
results until June 22."";    Democracy is still in its infancy in Russia, and
election officials said they were laboriously counting paper ballots cast at
each of the 98,000 polling stations, stretching from the Pacific to the Baltic
coasts. Election officials were unable to say precisely what percentage of the
vote had been counted.;    The 61-year-old Yeltsin was resting at home, his
office said, and planned no immediate comment on Wednesday's historic vote.;  
 Yeltsin's closest rival, former Soviet Prime Minister Nikolai Ryzhkov was
supported by the hard-line Russian Communist Party, and advocated a more
gradual transition from a centrally planned to a market economy.;   
Gorbachev, who has never faced a popular election, did not endorse any of the
six candidates for the newly created post of Russian president. He declared
after he voted Wednesday: ""I am ready to cooperate with anyone who will be
elected by Russians. There will be no problems from my side."";    Yeltsin said
after casting his ballot that the election was ""a celebration of the Russian
Federation's sovereignty. For the first time in its 1,000-year history, the
Russian people are electing their president in a direct vote."";    Four of
Yeltsin's opponents are members of the Communist Party, and party elders were
widely thought to have flooded the field with candidates to block Yeltsin from
a first round victory.;    Preliminary results showed Yeltsin won:;    (check)
75 percent of votes in Moscow.;    (check) 67.5 percent in Leningrad, the
second-largest Soviet city.;    (check) 90 percent in his hometown of
Sverdlovsk, in the Ural Mountains.;    (check) 81 percent in the Pacific and
Indian Ocean Navy fleets, and about two-thirds of the vote among fishing
fleets off Nakhodka on the Sea of Japan.;    (check) 74 percent of votes cast
by officers and students of a special secondary school intended to train
Soviet Interior Ministry staff in Rostov-on-Don.;    Tass, quoting
unidentified ""trustworthy sources,"" said Yeltsin received an average of
between 60 and 70 percent of the vote in major industrial cities. The agency
also said Yeltsin won the most votes in rural areas, countering predictions
that Ryzhkov was stronger among farmers.;    The three-week campaign was not
as boisterous as a Western election, with most of the campaigning confined to
factories and auditoriums. Only Yeltsin drew large rallies as he stumped
across the Russian heartland.;    Besides Ryzhkov, his challengers were former
Soviet Interior Minister Vadim Bakatin, who also enjoys Communist support;
Gen. Albert Makashov, a hard-line law-and-order Communist; Vladimir
Zhirinovsky, head of the tiny Liberal Democratic Party; and Aman Tuleyev, a
Siberian active in the trade union movement.;  Boris Yeltsin elected
president; Born: Feb. 1, 1931, in Butka, Siberia, in Russian republic; 1955:
Construction worker in Sverdlovsk; 1976: First secretary, Sverdlovsk District
Central Committee; 1987: Outburst against conservative archrival Yegor
Ligachev leads to Yeltsin's ouster from Politburo; 1989: Bounces back from
disgrace; wins 89% of vote to be Moscow's representative in new Congress of
People's Deputies, the national parliament; 1990: Republic's parliament elects
him president of Russia; June 12, 1991: In Russia's first popular election,
Yeltsin received about 57% of the vote in race for president; SOURCES: Facts
on File, news reports, International Who's Who;  NOW call him Mr. President;
Although Boris Yeltsin has been called the president of Russia, he actually
has been the chairman of its legislature since May 1990.;    The new, more
powerful post of president of Russia was created last month by the republic's
lawmakers.;    Source: Associated Press  ",21,"[ 0.48151241  0.02412023  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
211,"
   In recent months Mr. Yeltsin has positioned himself as a
tradition-oriented politician looking back to basic Russian
values and lamenting the destruction of the Russian village.
His electoral platform and the movement that supported him --
Democratic Russia -- represents an inward-looking Russian
nationalism that promotes Russia's sovereignty against the
state apparat and has little in common with Russian
imperialism.
   On May 4, while visiting Spain, Mr. Yeltsin criticized Mr.
Gorbachev's blockade of Lithuania. A Spanish newspaper
reported that he also called for the emergence of ""an
independent Russian republic"" that ""as an independent state
would sign agreements with other republics, also as
independent states."" In Mr. Yeltsin's view, it would then be
up to the various sovereign republics to determine whether
they should be part of a federation or confederation, or
fully independent.
   Among non-Russian peoples fighting for economic and
political sovereignty, the Yeltsin victory is greeted with
unalloyed delight. One leader of Sajudis, the Lithuanian
independence movement, anticipated Mr. Yeltsin's success when
I met him in late April. ""He'll sign a trade agreement
between Russia and Lithuania. He'll challenge the blockade,""
the Lithuanian leader predicted. Just three months ago, in an
interview in an Estonian daily, Mr. Yeltsin came out
four-square for ""maximum independence"" for the republics.
   Independence-minded Georgians and Azerbaijanis, too,
regard Mr. Yeltsin favorably. He is on record denouncing the
brutal murders of non-Russian demonstrators by Soviet troops
in 1989 and 1990, and has gone after Marshal Dmitri Yazov,
who, says Mr. Yeltsin, ""must answer for Tbilisi and Baku.""
   Mr. Yeltsin's victory shows how far the process of
democratization and radicalization has gone in the past 15
months. It also shows Mr. Yeltsin's keen political sense. Mr.
Yeltsin and his reformist cohorts scored their electoral
victory in March elections to Russia's Parliament by playing
to a major shift in Russian public opinion, which is warming
to the idea of surrendering domination of non-Russian
peoples.
   There are many important signs of this turn inward. A
public-opinion poll conducted in late February by the Soviet
Academy of Sciences' Institute of Sociology in cities across
the Soviet Union indicated that 52.4% of those polled
supported the right of union republics to secede. Another 14%
partly endorsed this right and only 7% were clearly opposed.
Ethnic Russians are opting out of the empire with their feet
and leaving the non-Russian republics in droves. Between 1979
and 1989, nearly two million citizens -- most of them ethnic
Russians -- left the non-Russian republics to return to the
Russian republic.
   As president of a republic of 147 million, Mr. Yeltsin
will be confronted with a new constituency -- the 25 million
Russians who live in the non-Russian republics. Mr. Yeltsin
realizes that this group could represent a force for the
maintenance of empire. But, to diffuse this time bomb, Mr.
Yeltsin, according to reports in the Soviet press, favors a
""law of return."" Such a law would, in effect, include a
transitional program for the orderly withdrawal of worried
Russians from the non-Russian republics.
   On the political front, Mr. Yeltsin will be an advocate of
a multiparty system and an opponent of Lenin's principle of
""democratic centralism."" He already has called for
dismantling the Communist Party's vast salaried apparat and
supplanting it with a party based largely on volunteers and
democratically accountable officials. He also will work for
the ""depoliticization"" of the army, the Interior Ministry and
the KGB ""by eliminating the political organs in them"" and
breaking officer links with the Communist Party.
   On the economic front, Mr. Yeltsin's thinking is a bit
fuzzier. He opposes half-hearted reforms that impose
austerities on Soviet workers. His economic prescriptions
include a rapid transition to currency convertibility from
the current three-tiered monetary structure. In Mr. Yeltsin's
view, enterprises that produce goods in excess of state
orders could sell their products on the free market. Any
proceeds from sales would be in the form of a single currency
with which enterprises could improve wages, increase capital
investments and purchase needed consumer goods for workers
and for workplace-related educational facilities.
   Whether Mr. Yeltsin is the leader of the future, however,
remains to be seen. While he is popular with the Soviet
public, the new Russian president is regarded by younger
radicals, who backed his bid for office, as a man of limited
ability. He may well turn out to be a Soviet version of Imre
Posgay, the radical Hungarian Communist reformer who laid the
groundwork for democracy in his country in 1989 and then was
defeated in his quest for his country's presidency by an
ungrateful electorate.
   This is the second time that Mikhail Gorbachev embarks on
a U.S. visit while facing a challenge from a formidable
political rival. The last time he was here that rival was the
arch-conservative Yegor Ligachev, whom Mr. Gorbachev would
later outmaneuver and defeat. This time, with Boris Yeltsin,
he may not be as lucky. But at least he's prepared. Just a
couple of weeks ago, the Soviet Parliament passed a law
guaranteeing a pension, ""dacha"" and private limousine for
retired Soviet presidents.
   ---
   Mr. Karatnycky is director of research at the AFL-CIO's
department of international affairs.
",21,"[ 0.20753971  0.00919665  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
212,"
   In Washington, the White House welcomed Mr. Yeltsin's
election, and invited him to meet with President Bush next
Thursday, a meeting Mr. Yeltsin had sought for months. Mr.
Yeltsin was to be in Washington as a guest of the Senate
leadership, but until winning the election he had been
shunned by the White House. On his last trip to the U.S. in
1989, Mr. Bush had only ""dropped in"" briefly on a meeting Mr.
Yeltsin was holding with National Security adviser Brent
Scowcroft.
   In general, the Bush administration has avoided doing
anything to add to Mr. Yeltsin's stature as a rival to Soviet
President Mikhail Gorbachev, whose strong personal ties to
Mr. Bush underlie current U.S.-Soviet relations. But
administration officials said Mr. Yeltsin's democratic
election, and his new working partnership with Mr. Gorbachev,
have changed the situation.
   Indeed, many analysts believe Mr.Gorbachev now has no
choice but to work with Mr. Yeltsin, his erstwhile rival, to
transform the Soviet Union at a more rapid pace than the
Soviet leader's Communist allies are advocating. The two men
recently put aside their strong personal differences and
started cooperating on a new federal structure that would
decentralize much political and economic power to the
nation's 15 republics.
   Mr. Yeltsin's election ""is a gigantic historic step
forward,"" said Gavriil Popov, the reformist mayor of Moscow.
""It will give additional stimulus to that process"" of
cooperation between Mr. Gorbachev and Mr. Yeltsin.
   Preliminary election results gave Mr. Yeltsin an outright
victory with about 60% of the vote, defying some predictions
that a second round of balloting would be needed. His main
opponent, former Prime Minister Nikolai Ryzhkov, came in a
poor second with between 15% and 20%. One of the biggest
surprises was the strong showing by Vladimir Zhirinovsky, who
finished third with about 7%.
   Mr. Zhirinovsky, almost unknown a month ago, campaigned
hard on a populist, anti-Communist platform. He easily
defeated the other three candidates, who included a hard-line
Communist general, a former interior minister close to Mr.
Gorbachev and a worker from the Siberian coal fields.
   Much of the campaign turned on the issue of how quickly
change should come to Russia, particularly economic reform.
With the exception of Messrs. Yeltsin and Zhirinovsky, all
other candidates warned against moving too fast to destroy
the decaying socialist system. Mr. Ryzhkov, in particular,
strongly opposed the introduction of private property and
said the government should move very gradually to sell off
any state assets.
   But the Russian public, tired of years of half-measures
that have merely reduced their already low living standards,
clearly rejected the idea of yet more caution. It remains to
be seen if Mr. Yeltsin can live up to his campaign promise
that the economy will start to turn around within a year or
two. As chairman of the Russian parliament since 1990, he has
introduced much new economic legislation. But it has had
little effect, largely because of a crippling deadlock
between Russia and Mr. Gorbachev's central authorities that
now appears to have ended.
   Mr. Yeltsin's aides say he is now likely to push for
radical economic measures, including large-scale
privatization, lower military spending and the introduction
of private farming. But opponents, and even some supporters,
say that even such moves may not fill the empty shelves of
stores as quickly as Mr. Yeltsin hopes.
   Mr. Ryzkhov's main support came from the military,
industry and the government bureaucracy. Despite their
considerable powers, they failed to persuade voters to back
their candidate. ""Only the official structures of power
supported Ryzhkov,"" said sociologist Yuri Levada.
   A glaring example of the establishment's declining clout
came at the Lenin collective farm near the town of Vladimir.
Its managers were among the first to nominate Mr. Ryzhkov for
president. But in the voting, a majority of the 1,130 workers
ignored their bosses and opted for Mr. Yeltsin. The
unofficial Russian information agency said Mr. Ryzhkov was
backed by just 18% of the farm laborers; 51% voted for Mr.
Yeltsin. Further indicating the rout of the establishment,
two allies of Mr. Yeltsin, Mr. Popov and Anatoly Sobchak,
were easily elected mayors of Moscow and Leningrad
respectively.
   Mr. Yeltsin has said he will try to forge a broad
coalition for change, one that includes reform-minded members
of the Communist Party as well as more radical anti-Communist
democrats. On the campaign trail, he sought to present
himself as a responsible, presidential figure who could keep
his emotions in check. Seeking to build bridges to his former
adversaries, he even picked an air force colonel and
Communist Party member, Alexander Rutskoi, as his running
mate.
   As expected, he won strongest support from city dwellers
throughout the Russian republic. He captured 90% of the vote
in his hometown of Sverdlovsk and more than 70% in Moscow.
But the total was pushed down by rural dwellers, who are
traditionally more conservative. And the outcome was far less
of a landslide than the 89% support Mr. Yeltsin won in Moscow
in 1989, when he ran for the national parliament.
   Political analysts say his popularity appears to have
peaked since he gave up his stance as the rebel outsider
fighting the system and became chairman of the Russian
parliament. ""He wasn't absolutely dominant,"" said Andrei
Zdravomyslov, president of the Soviet Sociologists
Association. Mr. Levada said some voters may have been irked
by the slow pace of practical change in Russia under Mr.
Yeltsin's leadership. ""People are growing tired of waiting,""
the sociologist added.
   Mr. Yeltsin's more conciliatory stance has made it easier
for Mr. Gorbachev to distance himself from Communist
hardliners, who seemed to have the upper hand only six months
ago. Sergei Parkhomenko, a political analyst for the liberal
Independent newspaper, said he suspects Mr. Gorbachev
actually wanted Mr. Yeltsin to beat Mr. Ryzhkov, a comment
echoed by other analysts who hope that the U.S.S.R. is now on
the way toward more decisive reforms.
   Mr. Gorbachev was careful not to take sides during the
campaign, saying only that he was prepared to work with any
winner, including Mr. Yeltsin.
",21,"[ 0.21971622  0.00791068  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
213,"
   By rallying the general public and parts of the army
against the eight leaders of the coup, Mr. Yeltsin showed
that democratic changes ushered in by President Mikhail
Gorbachev over the past six years have had an enormous -- and
perhaps irreversible -- effect on the U.S.S.R. The defeat of
the hard-liners is widely expected to speed efforts to
transform the Soviet Union into a stronger democracy based on
a new federal system of decentralized power and market
economics. It also provides a unique opportunity for the
nation's legitimate leaders to purge the remains of the old
totalitarian system.
   ""The failure of the coup marks the Soviet Union's
transformation into a kind of modern European society,"" says
Francis Fukuyama, a former State Department official who has
written about the meaning of the collapse of communism. ""It
proves that Gorbachev's revolution hasn't been just a
revolution of elites, that there's been this spontaneous
development of a political consensus among Russians.""
   But while jubilation filled the streets and squares of
cities throughout the country, and while columns of armored
vehicles retreated from Moscow's center, many people were
cautioning that difficult times lie ahead: The hard-liners
may have been ejected, they say, but the vast problems of
reviving the moribund Soviet economy and streamlining its
central government remain. Both could take years to
accomplish and could usher in new periods of unrest,
particularly in Soviet republics eager to exercise autonomy.
   ""There is no stability in the country at the moment, we
recognize that fact,"" said Foreign Minister Alexander
Bessmertnykh. Restoring coherence to the economy and
government is ""the greatest task facing us.""
   Mr. Gorbachev's future role in bringing about stability is
uncertain. Late last night, he returned to Moscow from the
Crimea, where he was vacationing when the coup occurred and
where he spent the last three days under house arrest. On
arriving at the Moscow airport, Mr. Gorbachev stepped down
the stairs from his plane, shook hands with waiting aides and
was taken by motorcade to his home.
   In a subsequent television broadcast, a tanned and
vigorous-looking Mr. Gorbachev called the failure of the coup
""a great victory for perestroika."" He proclaimed his respect
for the Soviet people and, specifically, Mr. Yeltsin and said
he had been ""surrounded"" by troops during his house arrest.
""They wanted to break the will of the president and his
family,"" he said. ""But they lost, it just didn't happen."" Mr.
Gorbachev said he would describe the details of his house
arrest at a later time when he convenes a ""broad conference""
of Soviet leaders.
   But the 60-year-old Soviet president may be surprised by
the circumstances that greet him today, for the balance of
political power in the country has shifted clearly in Mr.
Yeltsin's favor. Thanks to his popular mandate, the feisty
Mr. Yeltsin was able to withstand the very forces that
deposed Mr. Gorbachev, his longtime rival.
   As a result, many people in Moscow are starting to talk
about Mr. Gorbachev in the past tense, predicting he will
play a more symbolic than substantive role in the future.
Some even contend that he will stay on only briefly as an
interim figure, and then be forced out by public opinion. Mr.
Gorbachev himself helped bring about the coup, these people
argue, because he elevated most of its ringleaders to high
posts in his government and kept them there despite dire
warnings from both his detractors and supporters.
   ""Gorbachev created the possibilities for such a coup to
take place,"" says Valery Lunin, a chemistry professor at
Moscow University and member of the Russian Parliament. ""He
should resign, although perhaps not at once, and allow
elections to be held.""
   Mr. Gorbachev's future now rests largely in his own hands.
If he acts decisively to punish the leaders of the coup and
purge his administration of their supporters, he could regain
some of his popularity, which eroded as the economy worsened
in recent years. But any wavering -- something he has done
often -- could relegate him to a minor role.
   Whatever he does, the Soviet Union seems headed for a
period of fundamental change that could have a major impact
on the way it deals with the outside world. Mr. Yeltsin, 60,
is expected to press relentlessly for the Kremlin to
relinquish most of its administrative powers to the
increasingly assertive republics. For the nation as a whole,
that could create considerable upheaval as newly ""sovereign""
republics attempt to build a federal system from the bottom
up.
   For the West, the problem of balancing relations with the
Kremlin and with individual Soviet republics is likely to
worsen. Mr. Yeltsin himself, who has sought a greater voice
in international affairs, clearly relished his contacts with
world leaders during the crisis. He told the Russian
Parliament Wednesday of his conversations with heads of state
ranging from President Bush to France's Francois Mitterrand
and British Prime Minister John Major, proclaiming proudly
that ""they all support the Russian leadership.""
   The 64-hour coup disintegrated with astonishing speed.
After seizing power and deposing Mr. Gorbachev at 4 a.m.
Monday, the eight-man committee headed by Vice President
Gennady Yanayev and including the Soviet prime minister, the
defense minister, the interior minister and the KGB chief,
soon found the tables turning.
   By Tuesday the regime was under fierce verbal attack not
just from Mr. Yeltsin, but from tens of thousands of Soviet
protesters, the leaders of many republics, and the
governments of virtually every country in the world. The
loyalty of the army was being sorely tested; a handful of
divisions switched sides to protect the Russian leadership in
its parliament building. Even hard-liners who had been
expected to support the junta condemned it for what they
called its ""illegal"" actions.
   Tuesday night, hundreds of unarmed volunteers stood
outside the white parliament building on the Moskva river,
nervous about rumors of an imminent armed assault. It never
came. At least three civilians were killed in a brief clash
around midnight, when a column of six light tanks stormed a
barricade near the parliament. But the troops quickly backed
off, and the rest of the night was quiet.
   The Russian Parliament convened for an emergency session
Wednesday, and after three hours of debate, Mr. Yeltsin
suddenly announced that the coup leaders were ""heading to the
airport for an unknown destination."" Amid growing excitement,
he ordered them to be stopped.
   Around the same time, the hundreds of tanks and armored
cars positioned around the Soviet capital started to
withdraw. Russian officials said top Defense Ministry and
general staff brass had issued the order after a brief
meeting.
   Within hours, a delegation of two Russian republic
officials and four Gorbachev aides flew to the Crimea to meet
with the Soviet president. He had been held incommunicado
since the beginning of the coup, guarded by 32 KGB officers
with machine guns in his spacious yellow dacha in Foros, at
the southern tip of the peninsula.
   The hard-line regime had justified its takeover by saying
that Mr. Gorbachev was incapacitated by poor health. The
officials quickly discovered otherwise. Arkady Volsky, a
Gorbachev aide, declared the health problems ""a gross
invention."" He also reported that the coup had taken place
after the eight-man committee had tried and failed to
pressure Mr. Gorbachev into signing a statement imposing a
state of emergency on the nation.
   By 8 p.m., the coup was officially over and Mr. Gorbachev
announced he was ""in full control of the situation and {had}
restored contact with the country, broken off as a result of
the adventurist actions of a group of state officials."" After
telephone conversations with leaders of five of the 15 Soviet
republics and with President Bush, Mr. Gorbachev headed for
Moscow from the Crimea.
   Even before the coup ended, the nation started returning
to normal. Soviet television, which had been broadcasting a
diet of classical music and black-and-white patriotic movies
throughout the previous two days, suddenly switched to
showing the Russian Parliament session. Russian radio resumed
its broadcasts, and all restrictions on the media were
lifted. In Lithuania, Estonia and Latvia, Soviet troops
retreated from television and radio stations they occupied
earlier in the week.
   The situation in the Baltic states remained tense,
however: According to news wire reports, gunfire was reported
in Vilnius, Lithuania, where one person was shot dead, and a
Latvian died from injuries received when the Soviets this
week took over the radio station where he worked. Some U.S.
analysts are predicting that the coup and the forces it has
unleashed have dramatically increased the chances that the
Baltic states will win their independence. During the coup,
Estonia and Latvia unilaterally declared their independence,
a move Lithuania took last year but which Soviet troops
thwarted.
   The Soviet federal prosecutor's office, meanwhile,
announced that it had started criminal proceedings against
the eight coup leaders. At one point early yesterday, there
were reports that four of the eight had flown to Mr.
Gorbachev's vacation home in the Crimea to make a personal
appeal to him. But this couldn't be confirmed. Last night,
Reuter reported that Alexander Rutskoi, the vice president of
the Russian republic, said one plotter, Vladimir Kryuchkov,
chairman of the KGB, had been arrested and would be tried.
The whereabouts of the other seven leaders of the coup wasn't
immediately known.
   As news of the rapid developments spread, hundreds of
jubilant Russians braved the rain and streamed toward the
parliament building, which was bedecked in the Russian white,
blue and red national tricolor. ""We can say that today is the
last day of Soviet Communism, and it's a rainy one,"" one
parliament deputy, Yevgeny Ambartsumov, shouted down to the
crowd from a first-floor balcony. ""Yeltsin, Yeltsin,"" the
crowd shouted back.
   But some were already looking to the future, and sounding
more cautious. ""A 70-year nightmare doesn't end that
quickly,"" said Nikolai Medvedev, a member of the national
parliament.
   As the future takes shape for the Soviet Union, one thing
is certain: U.S. relations with the country will never be the
same.
   Over the last three days, Mr. Bush became a vocal partner
of Mr. Yeltsin's in the effort to oust the Communist
hardliners who launched the coup. The U.S. now seems to be
moving inexorably toward recognizing the charismatic Russian
leader as the rising force in the Soviet Union. Mr. Bush, who
has struggled for two years to balance relations between his
friend Mr. Gorbachev and the unabashedly pro-Western Mr.
Yeltsin, confirmed that relations with Mr. Yeltsin will now
be different. ""They have taken a quantum leap forward now by
this man's displayed courage and by his commitment to
democracy,"" he said at a press conference.
   By moving closer to Mr. Yeltsin, the U.S. inevitably will
also be moving closer to his vision for the Soviet Union,
which sees the U.S.S.R. as a political umbrella but Russia
and the other Soviet republics with vastly expanded freedoms
and power; some republics, particularly the Baltic states,
would acquire their complete independence from Moscow. The
triumph of Mr. Yeltsin is also likely to give new impetus to
proposals for truly radical shock therapy for the Soviet
economy, which Mr. Gorbachev avoided.
   But a new relationship with Mr. Yeltsin doesn't mean Mr.
Bush will abandon his friendship with Mr. Gorbachev. In fact,
their personal bond was evident yesterday when Mr. Bush spoke
with the Soviet leader by phone.
   Mr. Bush was in his boat in the waters off his vacation
home in Maine when Mr. Gorbachev finally was able to return
the repeated calls Mr. Bush had made during the coup. Mr.
Bush went ashore and took the call in the bedroom of his
home, with Barbara Bush at his side. Later, he told aides the
conversation was an emotional one in which Mr. Gorbachev was
effusive in his thanks for American support during the
unrest.
   ""The personal thing kicked in,"" says one administration
official. ""It was emotional for both of them."" Later, an
obviously relieved Mr. Bush declared that ""freedom and
democracy have prevailed."" And he insisted that there isn't
any ""Gorbachev versus Yeltsin battle.""
   Moreover, it isn't just Mr. Bush who still has a strong
link to Mr. Gorbachev. If anything, West European leaders
have been even more committed to Mr. Gorbachev. They worry
about any push for radical Soviet changes that might produce
chaos and instability on their eastern borders -- and a
possible halt to the withdrawal of Soviet troops from German
soil.
   That means that an American drift closer to Mr. Yeltsin
isn't risk-free. It could produce strains and differences in
approach between Washington and its European allies if the
drift is too pronounced.
   Still, there probably isn't any way for Mr. Bush to avoid
moving closer to the policies and tactics Mr. Yeltsin
espouses. ""Boris Yeltsin's actions during this coup attempt
-- his courage and his ability to exercise charismatic
leadership -- offer the greatest possible hope of some
leadership for the future,"" said Sen. Richard Lugar
yesterday. ""My own view is that, by and large, Gorbachev is a
spent force.""
   As it became apparent that the coup was falling apart,
some of those in the Soviet Union who had supported it rushed
for cover. Prime Minister Valentin Pavlov, a member of the
eight-man committee, was said by his deputy to have agreed to
take part in the coup because ""he had been misled by the
information on the state of health of the Soviet president.""
   Senior officials of the Soviet Communist Party, which is
believed to have played a supporting role in the takeover,
quickly distanced themselves from the coup leaders and
declared the action to have been unlawful. Sensing that
reprisals could be in the air, they also warned against
jumping to hasty conclusions about who is guilty. ""Some
forces will probably try to use the situation to strike a
blow at the Soviet Communist Party,"" said Sergei Kalashnikov,
a nervous secretary of the party's central committee. He said
the coup leaders shouldn't be described as a ""junta,"" but
acknowledged that they had ""blundered in a difficult
situation.""
   In fact, both sympathizers and opponents of the coup were
united in a belief that the whole affair had been handled
with extraordinary clumsiness. The emergency committee
clearly failed to anticipate the fierce reaction from Mr.
Yeltsin and the general public. And once it came, it seemed
at a loss as to how to deal with it and lacked the nerve to
carry out a bloody assault on the Russian Parliament, the
focus of protest.
   ""We must admit that mistakes by the junta let us gather
people and continue disseminating information,"" said Gleb
Yakunin, a Russian Orthodox priest and reform-minded member
of the Russian Parliament.
   The coup leaders also alienated some potential hard-line
allies by saying they planned to continue with Mr.
Gorbachev's policies. ""The committee was created because of
the catastrophic situation in the country caused by
Gorbachev's policies,"" said Col. Viktor Alksnis, a critic of
the Soviet president and leader of the Soyuz parliamentary
group. ""But Yanayev publicly praised Gorbachev. If he {Mr.
Gorbachev} was so good, where was the need to get rid of
him?""
   According to several sources, Marshal Dmitri Yazov, the
defense minister and a member of the eight-man committee, may
have played an important role in bringing about the coup's
collapse. He appears to have had major reservations about
ordering troops to attack the parliament building. ""It seems
to me that Yazov was just sucked into a political game. He
didn't want bloodshed,"" said Konstantin Kobets, the head of
the Russian defense committee who is well connected with the
army's general staff.
   The future of the entire army now seems certain to become
a serious point of contention as Mr. Yeltsin, Mr. Gorbachev
and leaders of the other republics move to build a new
federal structure.
   Until the failed coup, there had been a tacit agreement to
preserve a single army. But the events of the past few days
have driven home to Mr. Yeltsin and his aides how vulnerable
they are without some defense force of their own. Mr. Kobets
and other top Russian officials now talk about the need to
form a Russian national guard. And some radicals want Mr.
Yeltsin to take another, far more critical look at the entire
union treaty he, Mr. Gorbachev and two other republican
leaders had been expected to sign on Tuesday. The treaty is
designed to transfer some powers from the central government
to the republics, and is believed to have precipitated the
coup.
   ""Many Russian deputies say they don't want the treaty to
be signed as it stands,"" says Sergei Belosertsev, a reformist
member of the republic's legislature. ""The latest events show
how much still has to be done, including the clauses on the
army. Yeltsin will be wiser after the {coup}. He was in too
much of a hurry before.""
   Whatever the fate of the union treaty, Mr. Yeltsin is
already confident about one of its key economic clauses. He
told the Russian Parliament that if the treaty had been
signed, President Gorbachev would have immediately handed
over jurisdiction of all factories in Russia to the republic.
As it turned out, Mr. Yeltsin went ahead and ordered the
transfer himself. He also stole a march on the Soviet
president by firing the head of state-run TV, a notorious
hard-liner.
   For many Russians, though, yesterday was a time to
celebrate, not to worry about the future. As barricades began
to come down, the libations came out. ""I'm drunk,"" said
Stepan Kisilyov, deputy editor of the reformist weekly,
Moscow News, which was banned during the coup. Speaking over
the phone in the early hours of Thursday morning, he added:
""The whole editorial board has been drinking cognac all
night. We won] We won]""
   ---
                      THE AUGUST COUP
                                                                                                       

                      MONDAY, AUG. 19
                                                                                                       

   -- Around dawn in Moscow, an eight-member ""State Committee
for the State of Emergency,"" headed by Vice President Gennady
Yanayev, says it has taken over all power in the Soviet
Union. It Says that Soviet President Mikhail Gorbachev has
been replaced because of health reasons. The publication of
major independent newspapers is suspended.
                                                                                                       

   -- Troops move into Moscow, and later seize radio and
television stations in the Baltic republics.
                                                                                                       

   -- Thousands of demonstrators assemble around the Russian
republic's parliament, where Russian President Boris Yeltsin
remains defiant of the coup.
                                                                                                       

   -- Mr. Yeltsin climbs atop a tank outside parliament and
urges a general strike to protest the coup. He warns that
""clouds of terror and dictatorship are gathering over the
whole country,"" and calls for the restoration of power of mr.
Gorbachev.
                                                                                                       

   -- On Monday morning in Kennebunkport, Maine, President
Bush says the coup is ""disturbing"" and appears to be
""extra-constitutional."" He expresses support for Mr.
Gorbachev and says he will ""follow the events very carefully
as they unfold in order to determine the appropriate
response.""
                                                                                                       

   -- President Bush later issues a statement from Washington
stiffening his criticism and condemning ""the unconstitutional
resort to force."" The statement supports Mr. Yeltsin's call
for returning power to legally elected leaders and says the
U.S. ""will avoid in every possible way any actions that would
lend legitimacy or support to the coup attempt.""
                                                                                                       

                     TUESDAY, AUG. 20
                                                                                                       

   -- In the morning, Bush says he has recently spoken with
Mr. Yeltsin and that he reaffirmed U.S. support for
constitutionally chosen Soviet leaders. Mr. Bush adds that
""there will be no normal relations with the United States as
long as this illegal coup remains in effect.""
                                                                                                       

   -- During the day, allied countries halt aid to the Soviet
Union. The European Community freezes action on more than $1
billion in technical aid and credit guarantees. The U.S.
Export-Import Bank suspends its new Soviet program, and
Japanese Prime Minister Toshiki Kaifu tells his parliament
that export credits will be put on hold.
                                                                                                       

   -- In Moscow, Soviet television reports that Prime
Minister Valentin Pavlov, a member of the emergency
committee, has resigned because of poor health. Reports also
circulate that two other committee members, Defense Minister
Dmitri Yazov and KGB chief Vladimir Kryuchkov, have resigned.
                                                                                                       

   -- The Soviet Foreign Ministry says Foreign Minister
Alexander Bessmertnykh is ill after returing from vacation.
                                                                                                       

   -- Huge crowds in Moldavia, the Ukraine and Leningrad
protest the coup, while coal miners go on strike in several
regions.
                                                                                                       

   -- In the evening in Moscow, demonstrators near the
Russian republic's parliament clash with Soviet armored
vehicles. Soviet radio reports that at least three people are
killed.
                                                                                                       

                    WEDNESDAY, AUG. 21
                                                                                                       

   -- Troops begin moving out of Moscow. Soon the coup
leaders are reported to have left the city.
                                                                                                       

   -- Leaders of the Soviet parliament demand the
reinstatement of Mr. Gorbachev, and the legislature rescinds
the emergency committee's decrees.
                                                                                                       

   -- At 10:30 in the morning EDT, President Bush says he has
spoken with Mr. Yeltsin, who said that more and more troops
appear to be turning against the coup. Mr. Bush declines to
say that the crisis is over, but says the situation appears
""somewhat more positive.""
                                                                                                       

   -- Shortly after noon, Mr. Bush says he has spoken to Mr.
Gorbachev, who tells him that ""the constitutional authorities
are back in power."" Soviet television broadcasts a statement
by Mr. Gorbachev declaring that the coup is dead.
                                                                                                       

                     Yeltsin's Agenda
                                                                                                       

   -- With his triumph over the coup plotters, Russian
President Boris Yeltsin is in a far stronger position to
implement the reform measures for which he has long
campaigned. These measures include:
                                                                                                       

   -- Popular Elections to implement a ""genuine democracy""
                                                                                                       

   -- Autonomy for the Soviet republics, a far more
decentralized government with vast powers transferred from
the Communists-dominated Kremlin
                                                                                                       

   -- Faster transition to a market economy with guarantees
of economic freedoms and rapid privatization of agriculture
and industry
                                                                                                       

   -- Dismantling of the stultifying central bureaucracy
                                                                                                       

   -- Lower military spending and greater leeway for
republics to conduct their own foreign policy
",21,"[  9.90279531e-01   3.94922728e-04   1.71731503e-02 ...,   0.00000000e+00
   0.00000000e+00   0.00000000e+00]"
214,"
   The only remaining U.S. manufacturer of a
crucial space shuttle fuel component announced a halt in production
until it can be shown the factory is safe after explosions leveled
another plant last week.
   Kerr-McGee Corp. made Thursday's announcement in the face of
state pressure.
   Later in the day, the demolished plant's operator said a leaking
natural gas line was responsible for the series of earthquake-force
blasts May 4, which killed two people, injured 326 and did an
estimated $73 million in damage.
   The report by Pacific Engineering and Production Co. was
challenged by Southwest Gas Corp., which said the line ruptured
after the explosions, not before.
   Kerr-McGee said it would suspend production of ammonium
perchlorate, an oxidizer for solid fuel used in the space shuttle
and military rockets, until an independent inspection shows the
plant is safe.
   Paul Gaines, the company's director of governmental relations,
said he hoped production could resume within a few days.
   ``A prolonged shutdown is not helpful to any of us,'' Gaines
said.
   He said the company has already contracted with a safety
consultant to study the plant, and the inspection could begin by
Monday. Gaines said the plant will continue making other chemicals.
   Gov. Richard Bryan announced the shutdown after company
officials agreed late Thursday morning to the halt. Bryan said
``legal work was being prepared'' to force Kerr-McGee to suspend
production before it agreed to the shutdown.
   Local and state officials had expressed outrage when the plant
resumed production Tuesday of ammonium perchlorate, particularly
since last week plant officials said they would wait until
authorities determined the cause of the blast before reopening.
   Kerr-McGee and Pacific were the only two plants in the country
to manufacture ammonium perchlorate, and National Aeronautics and
Space Administration officials have said the explosion could delay
the space shuttle program..
   Pacfic Engineering Chairman Fred Gibson said Thursday that a
large natural gas line passing through the plant had been leaking
for at least 30 minutes before the first fire broke out at his
company's plant.
   ``The massive gas leak is believed to have saturated the earth
below the paved surfaces of the ... plant and to have ignited at
the point of origin as a result of circumstances unrelated to
(plant) operations,'' Gibson said.
   ``All of the subsequent destructive events were caused by the
gas leak, the gas fire and the gas explosion,'' he said.
   Southwest Gas spokesman Dennis Hetherington disputed the report.
   ``As far as we're concerned, our facilities are a victim of the
explosion and not the cause,'' Hetherington said.
   Fire Chief Roy Parrish said the fire department would withhold
judgment until it completes its own investigation.
",22,"[ 0.37484422  0.01270205  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
215,"
   Illinois Power Co. has agreed to pay
$11.5 million to a couple critically injured in a natural-gas
explosion in their home two years ago.
   In a settlement reached Monday, the utility company agreed to pay
Jerry Sickmeier, 33, and Lisa Jines, 26, $10 million in damages and
$1.5 million for medical expenses, said the couple's attorney, C.E.
Heiligenstein.
   Both sustained burns on over 80 percent of their bodies in the
Dec. 7, 1986, explosion at their home in Cahokia, a St. Louis
suburb. They now live in nearby Belleville.
   The settlement was reached on the day a trial in the case was
scheduled to begin.
   ``They are much relieved that this financial ordeal is over with
and that they can have some lifetime financial security,''
Heiligenstein said. ``Both suffered severe burns and have severe
limitations in the limbs.''
   Heiligenstein said neither has worked since the explosion.
   Illinois Power spokeswoman Barbara Lillyman said the utility had
no comment on the settlement.
   The couple alleged that Illinois Power was negligent when it
allowed a natural-gas pipe to deteriorate to the point that it
ruptured. Gas from the pipe traveled through sewer lines into the
home's utility room and was ignited by the pilot light of a
hot-water heater, they said. The explosion occurred as police were
awakening area residents and telling them to evacuate.
   Sickmeier was treated for seven months at Massachusetts General
Hospital in Boston for third-degree burns that covered most of his
body. He also suffered burns in his lungs and spent more than two
months on a respirator.
",22,"[ 0.29802821  0.01907597  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
216,"
   Natural gas explosions that leveled two
homes and damaged a third in two days were called a coincidence by
utility officials, but some residents remain unconvinced.
   Northern Illinois Gas Co. crews reported finding nothing unusual
Monday while scouring more than 100 homes and a school within a mile
radius of the explosions Thursday and Saturday in this town of
17,000 about 60 miles northwest of Chicago.
   ``It's just a coincidence. No relationship exists between the two
explosions,'' said utility spokesman Bob Edwards.
   There were no serious injuries, but some residents remain uneasy.
   ``I was really, really upset. I couldn't sleep last night,'' said
Angela Carparelli, who lives in the neighborhood.
   One house was leveled following an explosion on Thursday and more
explosions on Saturday destroyed one house and knocked another off
its foundation.
   Fire Chief Richard Nebel said it will probably take investigators
weeks to determine the causes of the blasts.
   ``The leaks we know of have been stopped,'' Nebel said late
Monday. ``We are taking test bores and no leaks or vapors have been
found today.''
   Jerry and Becky Rentschler, whose home was destroyed Saturday,
said they almost left their youngest children _ Shelly, 13, and
Matthew, 11 _ home while they went away for the weekend. They
changed their minds at the last minute.
   ``I saw aluminum siding flying through the air and all of a
sudden there was this big flame,'' said 12-year-old Lisa Bernau, who
saw the Rentschlers' house explode. ``It was so scary.''
   Minutes after another neighbor went outside to see what happened,
the neighbor's house was blasted from its foundation, said Nebel.
   On Thursday, James Steurer, 79, was sitting on his bed tying his
shoes when a gas explosion leveled his house and sent him and the
mattress flying into the driveway. He suffered only cuts and
scratches, noting ``absolutely, I'm lucky.''
   In addition to being two days apart, the explosions were at sites
about six blocks apart and in houses fed by two separate gas lines,
Nebel said.
   Government and utility officials insist there is no need for
residents to worry.
   ``It's one of those rare things of Mother Nature or the man
above,'' said investigator Terry Pitkus of the state fire marshal's
office.
",22,"[ 0.40797579  0.01566805  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
217,"
   An explosion in a 12-unit, three-story apartment
building less than a mile from Parliament killed a man on Thursday
and injured three people, sending rubble flying a full block away.
   Police believed the explosion was caused either by natural gas or
propane.
   Witnesses said they smelled gas immediately after the blast at
about 9:30 a.m., but there was no confirmation the explosion was
caused by a gas leak.
   Two hours after the explosion, firefighters rescued a middle-age
woman trapped inside her apartment. She was taken to a hospital.
   Three other people were taken to the Ottawa Civic Hospital
earlier. One man, not identified, was pronounced dead on arrival.
   A dog brought in by police searched for more possible victims.
   Flying debris damaged cars and nearby downtown buildings.
   Bill Maxwell, the landlord of two nearby buildings, said the
explosion sent ``huge chunks of concrete, the size of television
sets'' hurtling through the air.
   Cab driver Steve Legault was returning to his nearby apartment
when he heard the blast. As he ran toward the building, he
encountered a dazed and bleeding woman.
   ``She was delirious and was crying that her 7-year-old son was
still in the apartment.''
   Legault said he ran into the building and saw a man lying halfway
out of a doorway in a pool of blood.
   ``He was covered with blood and his head had deep cuts in it. I
checked and I think he was dead.''
   John Kalina, 36, who lives one block north, said the explosion
``sounded like someone was kicking our door in.''
   The building is in a fashionable neighborhood of renovated older
homes, townhouses, boutiques and restaurants.
",22,"[ 0.43460357  0.01788287  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
218,"
   Motel guests jumped out of windows and
lowered themselves to the ground using bedsheets to escape fire
from an explosion apparently caused by a natural-gas leak that
killed four and injured 10.
   A night desk clerk was investigating reports of a gas leak at
the 62-unit Super 8 Motel when the explosion occurred early Sunday,
officials said.
   ``I had just gotten up to go to the bathroom and had come back
and my wife said, `Don't you smell the gas?''' said Neal Woodrick,
60, of Trenton, N.J. ``And then it happened.''
   ``It sounded just like a bomb had gone off _ boom,'' said his
wife, Joan Woodrick, 58.
   Fire officials were to comb the charred remains of the motel
today for clues to the explosion.
   All of the 45 to 50 guests were believed to be accounted for,
authorities said.
   Firefighters used a crane, pitch forks and shovels to sift
through piles of charred mattresses, carpet, pink insulation and
dry wall left from the fire and explosion, which threw debris as
far as 300 feet from the building.
   ``I'm almost positive it was a natural gas explosion,''
Hagerstown Fire Chief Gary Hawbaker said. ``The whole front of the
building _ first, second and third floors _ was blown out. That
whole chunk was engulfed.''
   Hawbaker said there was a natural gas line in the middle of the
fire, ``so we couldn't put out the rest of the fire until the gas
was shut off.'' It took firefighters about 30 minutes to shut off
the gas, he said.
   Joan Ganje-Fischer, a spokeswoman for Super 8 Motels Inc. of
Aberdeen, S.D., said that after a guest told the clerk that gas was
leaking from the laundry room area, the gas company told the clerk
to try to turn the gas off.
   ``He was right in the center of the explosion when it
happened,'' she said. ``He came back to the front desk and his hair
was on fire. He put his hair out with a towel, pulled the alarm
notifying the guests, called 911 and then began evacuating the
motel.''
   Donald Lee, 39, of Shorewood, Wis., said he awoke, put on pants,
a shirt and a coat and jumped 12-15 feet out of a second-story
window, breaking his wrist in the fall.
   ``I heard screaming and glass breaking,'' he said. ``A number of
people saw flames. A family had their hair singed.''
   Some guests were moved to a motel across the street, and the Red
Cross provided food, clothing and shelter.
   The dead were identified as James G. Scharnek, 34, of Milwaukee,
Wis.; Kristoddie Brown, 25, of Capital Heights; Mercedes Keyes, 26,
of Hagerstown; and Margretta E. Parker, 70, of Richmond, Va.
   Ten people were treated at Washington County Hospital for smoke
inhalation and minor injuries and were released, spokesman John
Costopoulos said.
",22,"[ 0.35655739  0.01283753  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
219,"
   An explosion blasted a natural gas well
Tuesday in southeastern Mississippi, killing at least one worker
and critically burning four others, authorities said.
   A two-mile area around the well was evacuated, affecting about
145 people.
   Authorities initially evacuated only those within a half-mile,
but expanded the plan after the fire went out by itself and then
re-ignited, for fear that winds would scatter poisonous hydrogen
sulfide gas.
   The gas is naturally associated with some gas fields.
   Experts at capping gas wells were to fly in Tuesday night. The
explosion occurred at about 2 p.m., authorities said.
   The rig collapsed in the initial burst of what sounded like four
successive explosions, said Alex Thomas, who lives within a
half-mile of the rig. Others said there was another explosion later
in the afternoon.
   Jim Maher, director of the Mississippi Emergency Management
Agency in Jackson, said officials intended to keep the gas escaping
from the well afire to burn off the poison.
   ``What they are going to do is bring a flame thrower-type device
to keep the well burning,'' Maher said.
   Roads were closed leading to the well, which is about 75 miles
southeast of Jackson, as was a five-mile stretch of U.S. Highway 11.
   ``Until we get a firm handle on this and somebody that can tell
us with absolute certainty what is going on there, we will continue
to take extreme precautions,'' said Mississippi Emergency
Management Agency spokesman Dusty Perkins.
   Perkins said the rig was known as Travis No. 3 and was owned by
R&amp;H Oil and Gas Inc. of Tickfaw, La.
   City Clerk Debbie Logan identified the dead man as Dwayne
Kennedy of Heidelberg. His age and exact job were unavailable.
   The four burn victims were in critical condition and would be
moved to burn units in Greenville and in Mobile, Ala., said Lafe
Jones, a spokesman for the South Central Regional Medical Center in
Laurel. A fifth worker was treated for minor injuries and released.
",22,"[ 0.37503139  0.01661867  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
220,"
   Southern Natural Gas Co. has agreed to
pay ARCO Oil and Gas Co. more than $300 million for damages that
resulted from an explosion on an ARCO drilling platform in the Gulf
of Mexico last year.
   The March 19, 1989, blast and resulting fire killed seven
people, injured 23 and destroyed the platform. The blast occurred
while workers for Southern Natural Gas were attempting to make
repairs on the platform.
   Representatives agreed on the settlement Monday during a recess
in a civil trial that began June 11 in State District Court in
Madison County.
   They presented the agreement to Judge Bill McAdams while he was
holding court in neighboring Grimes County.
   ``We feel we've been adequately compensated for our losses,''
said Don Riddle, lead counsel for ARCO.
   ``Aside from Pennzoil, it's the largest settlement around as far
as anybody knows,'' Riddle told the Bryan-College Station Eagle.
   Pennzoil Co. in 1984 won a $10.3 billion judgment against Texaco
Inc. after claiming that Texaco had broken up its deal to buy Getty
Oil Co. Texaco agreed to settle the case for $3 billion in 1988.
   Houston attorney Randy Wilson, one of about 20 attorneys
representing Southern Natural Gas, declined to comment on the
settlement.
   According to the settlement, Southern Natural Gas made no
admission of guilt but agreed to pay ARCO $300.5 million by Aug. 6,
and to pay a total of $500,000 to three ARCO employees injured in
the explosion.
   ARCO was a party to several lawsuits pending against Southern
Natural Gas in federal court in Louisiana. The settlement will end
those suits, Riddle said.
   The settlement will be paid by the gas company's insurance
carriers, primarily Lloyd's of London, Riddle said.
   ARCO had asked for between $250 million and $325 million in
actual damages and $5 billion in exemplary damages resulting from
the explosion on a drilling platform about five miles south of the
mouth of the Mississippi River.
   In addition to damage to the platform itself, ARCO claimed it
lost about $200 million in profits from oil and natural gas sales
because the destroyed platform was crucial to a seven-platform oil
field.
   Southern Natural Gas bought natural gas from ARCO and
transported it to shore by means of pipeline running from the
platform. The explosion occurred when subcontractors hired by the
gas company cut into the pipeline while trying to make repairs.
",22,"[ 0.30284894  0.01246149  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
221,"
   A natural gas explosion rocked an apartment
complex at an Army base, killing a 5-year-old girl and injuring 17
residents and rescuers, authorities said.
   The girl's remains were discovered in the rubble of the building
at 9:30 a.m. today, about 12 hours after it blew up, officials at
Fort Benjamin Harrison said.
   The blast occurred hours after fire authorities arrived to
investigate a gas leak at another building in the complex. That
building was being evacuated when the blast hit several hundred
feet away, authorities said.
   The explosion, in a housing area for enlisted personnel,
destroyed a four-family housing unit and damaged another unit, said
post spokesman Maj. Ronald Downing.
   ``The fire engines were trying to get in and we were trying to
get out. It was total chaos,'' said Joan Adams, a resident of the
complex. She described people running through streets in their
pajamas, carrying children.
   At least 17 residents and firefighters were injured. By midday
today, three people were still listed in critical condition, one of
them a 4-year-old girl, authorities said.
   Marion County Deputy Coroner Charles W. Green said he could not
conclusively identify the dead child until after dental records
were checked. But base officials said there was little doubt it was
the 5-year-old girl who had been reported missing earlier.
   Firefighters and police called off their search through the
smoldering rubble after the body was found. The girl's identity was
not released. Other members of her family were among the injured,
Downing said.
   The post on the edge of town serves as a processing center for
soldiers en route to the Persian Gulf, although none of those
soldiers stayed in the affected area.
   Fire authorities had been called in about 5:45 p.m., or 3{ hours
before the blast, after people reported smelling gas, Downing said.
He said officials had planned to evacuate the 240-unit Harrison
Village complex before the explosion.
   Harley said authorities turned the gas off at one housing unit
where they thought the leak was occurring. But a nearby unit, where
the gas had not been turned off, blew up, he said.
   Some residents complained that they were not adequately warned.
   Adams, whose husband is a sergeant, said that about two hours
before the explosion, military police began telling residents that
a gas leak had been found elsewhere in the complex and would be
fixed.
   ``He told us there was no danger for us to stay there,'' she
said. Her family had planned to leave anyway, because the complex
was without heat and hot water, but the explosion happened before
they did so, she said.
   Lt. Col. Bill Carey, provost marshal, said the building where
the leak was detected was evacuated as a precaution, but ``we
didn't feel the whole area needed to be evacuated.''
   However, the blast occurred in another building about 800 to
1,000 feet away, he said, adding that ``prior to the explosion, we
had not been to this building.''
   The blast was felt more than two miles away. Wood and other
debris were scattered where a two-story building once stood. Rubble
was strewn over four blocks. About 210 families were evacuated
after the explosion.
   ``Insulation was coming down like snow when we got here. One
apartment was engulfed in flames and the other building was in
flames,'' said State Trooper Anthony Blackburn.
",22,"[ 0.36529492  0.01169077  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
222,"

A series of explosions and fire shut down electricity generation at the world's 
largest solar power plant near here Wednesday. 


Thick plumes of black smoke spiraled into the clear desert air when one of four 
natural gas-fired heaters used to back up the solar heating system exploded. 


A short time later, a second natural gas heater caught fire and exploded as the 
first of 75 firefighters and 25 pieces of equipment were arriving at the site, 
about 140 miles northeast of Los Angeles. 


""We had a series of explosions, more than two,"" said Capt. Sharon Sellers of 
the San Bernardino County Fire Department. ""Our first units got on-scene at 
9:16 a.m. and a second explosion occurred at that point, then a series of them 
during the entire incident,"" Sellers said. 


""There was a mushroom cloud. The heat was real intense and there were 
explosions,"" said an inmate from the Boron Federal Prison Camp who was pressed 
into service to help fight the fire. He would not identify himself. 


Sellers said two workers at the plant suffered minor breathing problems and 
were treated at Barstow Community Hospital. 


Operated by LUZ International Ltd. of Los Angeles, the $280-million Harper Lake 
solar plant began generating electricity on Dec. 28 and produces 80 megawatts, 
enough power to serve 115,000 people. The company operates eight such plants in 
the California desert. Combined, they generate 274 megawatts, which is sold to 
Southern California Edison Co. An Edison spokesman said there was no 
interruption of electric service to its customers. 


""We had two oil heaters on line and were bringing up the third and fourth oil 
heaters when this explosion occurred,"" LUZ International spokeswoman Kathleen 
Flanagan said in Los Angeles. 


While no flames were visible 1 1/2 hours after the fire began shortly before 9 
a.m., San Bernardino County firefighters had difficulty reaching the blaze deep 
within the generating equipment. 


""There is fire up there somewhere still heating that oil,"" Sellers said. 


The blaze was contained, but continued to burn late Wednesday. 


Cause of the fire was unknown, but fire officials ruled out arson and said it 
probably resulted from an equipment malfunction. 


While Flanagan said she could not immediately estimate the cost of the blaze, 
the Fire Department said a single natural gas heater costs $500,000. One was 
destroyed and a second was heavily damaged. 


Flanagan said the black smoke from an estimated 15,000 gallons of burning 
synthetic oil was not any more toxic than smoke from natural crude or refined 
oil and was not carcinogenic. 


But that report was disputed by Capt. Clyde Gamma of the California Department 
of Forestry and Fire Protection. He identified the synthetic oil as Therminol 
and said it is cancer-causing. 


Flanagan said the plant could resume generating electricity by Monday. But she 
said the backup natural gas-fired heaters would not be used. 


""We will be operating strictly in the solar mode,"" she said. For solar 
generation, large curved mirrors are used to concentrate the sun's energy onto 
synthetic oil, which flows through an insulated steel pipe. The hot oil boils 
water into steam that drives conventional electrical turbines. 


Sellers said LUZ International had a fire about two years ago at another solar 
plant at Daggett and that explosions continued five hours into the incident. 


Stammer reported from Los Angeles and Harris from Barstow. 

",22,"[ 0.          0.          0.01928123 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
223,"
   Federal officials delayed closing a
troubled Colorado savings and loan largely because President Bush's
son was on its board, a former federal bank regulator charged in a
published report Wednesday.
   ``Neil Bush's presence was a material part of unconscionable
delays in taking over Silverado,'' James Moroney told the San
Francisco Chronicle.
   Moroney is a former staff analyst for the Topeka Federal Home
Loan Bank, which supervised Silverado Savings and Loan of Denver.
   The head of the Topeka bank at the time denied that Neil Bush's
presence was an influence.
   ``The economic substance of Silverado's loan portfolio was
comparable to a Ponzi scheme (a type of pyramid investment fraud),
and it couldn't have worked out,'' said Moroney, 42, a Kansas City
lawyer who left the Topeka bank after six months in 1986.
   ``It was insolvent back (in 1986). It was not a judgment call.
That place, clearly, was very insolvent,'' Moroney said.
   Neil Bush resigned from Silverado's board just after his father
won the Republican nomination in 1988 and only four months before
the S&amp;L's seizure.
   The Chronicle also reported that documents it obtained show top
federal regulators knew the thrift's financial situation was bad
enough to mandate restrictions on investments and insider deals at
least 14 months before it was closed Dec. 9, 1988.
   Moroney said he believes a big reason his district superiors,
including former Topeka bank president Kermit Mowbray, allowed
Silverado to continue was their knowledge that Neil Bush and
Republican Party fund raiser Larry Mizel, of MDC Holdings, were
involved with the institution.
   Mowbray, who retired the month that Silverado closed, denied
Moroney's allegations Tuesday, saying: ``Neil Bush being on that
board had no effect on our decisions.'' Mowbray, who said he never
met Bush, also denied knowing that Silverado was insolvent in 1986.
   In 1986, Moroney said he approached a fellow supervisor and
asked: ``Why are we putting up with this Silverado? We would not
permit that type of loan work-out for another institution.''
   ``And he looked at me, and said, `Well, you know who one of the
directors is.' And I said, `No.' And he said, `The vice president's
son. Neil Bush,''' Moroney told the Chronicle.
   However, he said he has no evidence that either Bush or Mizel
exerted direct pressure for ``the preferential treatment they
got.'' He said their presence was enough to cause Mowbray to take
an extraordinary interest in Silverado and to proceed cautiously in
the case.
   Bush, reached by telephone at his office in Denver, said, ``I'm
going to cooperate in any way I'm asked to. It would be
inappropriate for me to get into any details except with
authorities investigating Silverado.''
   In a news conference Wednesday in Washington, D.C., President
Bush's spokesman Marlin Fitzwater was asked whether the president
was concerned that Silverado's collapse might have have been partly
due to regulators who were ``fearful of Neil Bush's role.''
   Fitzwater replied, ``These matters are all under investigation
and consideration and we won't offer any comment on any aspect of
it. I might say, Neil's been off that board for a long time.''
   President Bush is scheduled to visit Denver on Friday.
",23,"[ 0.35802071  0.01213196  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
224,"
   President Bush's son Neil was unqualified to
be a director of a Colorado thrift, but that doesn't excuse him
from harm caused to the institution that failed at a cost of $1
billion, federal regulators say.
   Neil Bush described himself Wednesday as ``just a Denver guy
trying to make a living and raise a family,'' and not as a
freewheeling former director of Silverado Banking, Savings and Loan
Association.
   Bush, 34, continued to deny conflict of interest allegations
raised against him by thrift regulators.
   Meanwhile, President Bush strongly defended his son on
Wednesday, saying he has confidence in his ``honor and integrity.''
   The president, who has pledged to vigorously prosecute fraud in
the savings and loan industry, repeated his promise not to
interfere with regulators' investigation of his son.
   ``If he's done something wrong, the system will digest that,''
he told a news conference in Houston. ``This is not easy for me as
a father. It's easy for me as a president because the system is
going to work. I am not going to intervene.''
   In documents released by the Office of Thrift Supervision,
regulators asserted that Neil Bush was ``unqualified and
untrained'' for his position as an outside director of Denver-based
Silverado.
   ``Certainly he had no experience in managing a large
corporation, especially a financial institution with almost $2
billion in assets,'' said the documents released this week.
``Unfortunately, he was not cognizant of the conflict-of-interest
situations he encountered as a director of Silverado.''
   However, the regulators added, Bush's inexperience does not
excuse him ``from the harm and potential harm he caused'' to the
thrift.
   The younger Bush has been ordered by the thrift office to answer
allegations of conflict of interest in his role as a director of
Silverado, which lent millions of dollars to his business partner,
who never repaid the money.
   At a news conference in Denver, Neil Bush said, ``I am standing
on very solid ground when it comes to defending my role as an
outside director.''
   He said that his father ``had wanted me to keep a little lower
profile.''
   However, he told reporters for The Denver Post after the news
conference that he is thinking about running for Congress because
he thinks there should be more congressional accountability. ``I
may (run),'' he said. ``Not anytime soon because it's something I
have to build up to. But if I do it, it's probably going to be with
the intent of being part of a shakeup.''
   The federal government is considering filing lawsuits to recover
misspent funds from the officers and directors of 1,300 failed
banks and savings institutions, officials told a congressional
hearing Wednesday. Neil Bush could be among the defendants.
   L. William Seidman, chairman of the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corp., appearing at Wednesday's hearing, declined to comment on
whether FDIC officials have recommended whether to sue Neil Bush.
   ``We are treating the Silverado case the way we treat every
other case,'' Seidman told the House Judiciary subcommittee on
criminal justice. ``Every failed institution, we go into and make a
thorough investigation of whether or not there is the possibility
of civil or criminal activity.''
   In other savings and loan developments Wednesday:
   _The Senate approved a broad crime bill that stiffens prison
terms for savings and loan fraud and offers rewards to
whistleblowers for turning in S&amp;L looters.
   _The former president of one of Texas' largest collapsed thrifts
was indicted on fraud charges in connection with a $700 million
real estate scheme. FBI officials in Dallas announced the
indictment against Edwin T. McBirney III, former president of
Sunbelt Savings Association.
   The regulators asserted that Bush was unqualified to sit on
Silverado's board. They noted that he graduated from college in
1977, worked on his father's political campaign for a year and
received a master's degree in business administration in 1979.
   The documents also noted that Bush worked as an oil lease
negotiator for Amoco Production Co. in Denver from 1980 through
late 1982, and later started his own oil company, JNB Exploration.
He became a director of Silverado in the summer of 1985 and quit
the job in August 1988, shortly after his father won the Republican
presidential nomination.
   In earlier years, Bush held summer jobs with Republic National
Bank in Dallas and a small oil equipment company there.
",23,"[ 0.39960572  0.01046359  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
225,"
   Former Rep. Thomas Ashley, a longtime friend
of President Bush, confirmed today that he's been giving advice to
Neil Bush since last winter on the controversy surrounding the
president son's role in the collapse of a Denver savings and loan.
   But Ashley, a banking lobbyist, denied that Bush had asked him
to contact his son.
   ``That is absolutely inaccurate,'' Ashley said in an interview.
``I'm to smart to do that.''
   The Denver Post reported in today's editions that Ashley, a
college classmate of George Bush's from Yale, had talked to the
younger Bush at the president's behest before Neil Bush was
questioned by federal banking regulators.
   The newspaper attributed the report to comments by Neil Bush
himself, contained in a deposition taken by the Office of Thrift
Supervision.
   ``If Neil thinks his father called me, he's mistaken,'' Ashley
said.
   Ashley, 67, a Democrat, is a former congressman from Ohio. He is
currently president of the Association of Bank Holding Companies, a
banking lobbying organization based in Washington.
   Neil Bush faces a public disciplinary hearing before federal
regulators in September on his role as a director of the bankrupt
Silverado Banking, Savings and Loan.
   Ashley said that he contacted Neil Bush on his own last winter
after reading about his troubles in the paper.
   Since then, ``I've seen Neil a half dozen times. We talk about
it,'' Ashley said.
   He said that, although President Bush didn't ask him to contact
Neil Bush, the president is aware that he has been counselling the
son.
   Bush has pledged not to get personally involved in the
investigation of his son.
   Ashley said ``I don't think the president has any problem'' with
the fact that he has involved himself in the matter. ``What he
feels is I'm a longtime friend of Neil's.''
   ``Is everyone who is close to the president supposed to stay
away from Neil?'' Ashley asked.
   President Bush ``doesn't go along with that. He rejects that,''
Ashley said.
   ``I've talked to the president (about the situation) on a couple
of social occasions, when we're alone,'' including once at Camp
David, Ashley said. ``I talk about the kids. Neil's one of the
kids.''
   Ashley said that Neil has made his own decisions in the matter.
``What we do is talk about the consequences of one course or
another,'' Ashley said.
   Ashley said that his own experience in politics and in bank
regulation make him a good source for advice for Neil Bush.
   ``The situation is such that he can't go to his father and talk
to him,'' Ashley said.
   ``It's not a partisan matter or he wouldn't be coming to a
Democrat,'' Ashley added. ``It's just a situation where somebody
he's known for a long time is available and has experience in
matters involving regulatory matters.''
   ``I'm a good sounding board,'' Ashley added.
   Ashley said that Neil Bush decided on his own ``not to take the
easy way out'' and that he's been the victim of ``a little
selective treatment'' from federal regulators.
   But, Ashley said, ``He hasn't whined or complained about that.''
   He said that Neil Bush was concerned that when the Office of
Thrift Supervision ``decided to go public'' about the case, ``it
only presented its side of the matter. A thousand pages. It didn't
include Neil's defense.''
   Ashley and Bush have remained close friends since they were both
members of the secret society Skull and Bones while they were
undergraduates at Yale University in the late 1940s.
",23,"[ 0.39515001  0.00910529  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
226,"
   Congressional Democrats are one signature
short of the 12 needed to demand the appointment of a special
prosecutor to examine the collapse of a savings and loan led by
Neil Bush.
   Meanwhile, former Rep. Thomas L. Ashley said Friday he has been
regularly advising President Bush's son on his savings and loan
troubles as a longtime family friend _ but not at the president's
request.
   Neil Bush told federal regulators last December that Ashley, a
banking industry official who was a college classmate of the
president's, ``apparently, you know, called my father, and then so
at Dad's request he called me.''
   Ashley confirmed in a telephone interview he has talked to the
president about Neil Bush but said he contacted the son on his own
after reading of his troubles in the newspaper. He said President
Bush was well aware of his activity.
   Rep. Edward F. Feighan, D-Ohio, withdrew his name Friday from a
petition to trigger the independent counsel law in the Neil Bush
case, leaving Democrats one short of the 12 signatures needed to
trigger the independent counsel law.
   The law requires the signature of at least 12 Democrats, a
majority of the 21 on the committee, to make the request for a
special prosecutor.
   Andrea Camp, a spokeswoman for Rep. Pat Schroeder, D-Colo., who
is organizing the Democratic effort, said, ``I don't think it's a
question of whether we get another signature, but when. It's a live
proposal.''
   Feighan wrote in a letter to Attorney General Dick Thornburgh,
``Although I had originally signed a draft of this request, I
notified the authors of the letter earlier today that my name and
signature should be withdrawn from the document that would be
delivered to you.''
   He did not indicate why he had changed his mind.
   And Democratic House Speaker Thomas S. Foley lashed back at a
Republican official's accusation that the Democrats were to blame
for a national S&amp;L crisis expected to cost taxpayers hundreds of
billions of dollars.
   Ed Rollins, chairman of the Republican Congressional Campaign
Committee, said the Democrats had sold out ``for a few million
dollars in campaign contributions.'' But the normally mild-mannered
Foley, D-Wash., angrily dismissed Rollins as ``in a panic ... an
out of control person'' making an ``unrestrained and totally raw
partisan accusation.''
   Tempers on all sides have risen as more attention has been given
to Neil Bush, who faces a public disciplinary hearing before
federal regulators in September on his role as a director of the
bankrupt Silverado Banking, Savings and Loan.
   He has been accused of conflict of interest but has said he has
done nothing wrong. His father, the president, has twice defended
his ``honor and integrity'' during news conferences but has
promised to stay out of the investigation.
   Neil Bush's statement to federal regulators is contained in a
deposition included in documents released by the Office of Thrift
Supervision. It was first reported Friday in The Denver Post.
   Asked by the regulators whether he had ever discussed operations
of the S&amp;L with his father, the younger Bush replied:
   ``I didn't discuss details with him. And if he inquired about
Silverado, it would have been very rare, I mean if at all, and I
don't know if I ever voluntarily disclosed to him when I was a
member of the board anything about the goings on of Silverado.''
   He added, ``I never, I can state this with great clarity, that I
never intentionally brought him into, you know, I mean I never
asked him for assistance or advice on Silverado matters.''
   In response to the regulators' questions, Neil Bush said no one
had suggested to him what his testimony on any matter should be.
   Schroeder one of the petition signers among the Democrats on the
Judiciary Committee, said their request for a special prosecutor
was made because ``the people have a right to feel we're doing
everything to get impartial justice done.''
   She said there is a public sense that in the S&amp;L mess and now
the aftermath, ``it's who you know, not what you know or what
you've done.''
   Justice Department spokesman Dan Eramian said, ``The letter is
under consideration as provided for under the independent counsel
statutes.''
   Thornburgh has 15 days to decide whether to open a preliminary
inquiry to determine if a special prosecutor should be appointed,
then another 15 days to tell Congress how he acted on its request.
He has 90 days from start of the preliminary inquiry to determine
whether to appoint an independent counsel.
   Ashley, a former Democratic congressman from Ohio, said Friday,
``I've talked to the president (about his son's situation) on a
couple of social occasions, when we're alone. ... I talk about the
kids. Neil's one of the kids.''
   Ashley said that his own experience in politics and in bank
regulation made him a good source of advice for Neil Bush. ``The
situation is such that he can't go to his father and talk to him,''
Ashley said.
   Ashley, who was a college classmate of George Bush's at Yale,
denied President Bush had asked him to intervene. He said, ``If
Neil thinks his father called me, he's mistaken.''
   Ashley, 67, is president of the Association of Bank Holding
Companies, a banking lobbying organization based in Washington. The
organization generally does not get involved in savings and loan
issues, Ashley said.
   He said he contacted Neil Bush on his own last winter after
reading about his troubles in newspapers.
   Since then, ``I've seen Neil a half dozen times. We talk about
it,'' Ashley said.
   He said he is not trying to serve as a go-between for Neil Bush
and the president, nor trying to influence any decisions. ``I'm too
smart for that,'' Ashley said.
   Ashley and Bush have remained close friends since they were both
members of the secret society Skull and Bones while they were
undergraduates at Yale University in the late 1940s.
   ``Is everyone who is close to the president supposed to stay
away from Neil?'' Ashley asked. President Bush ``doesn't go along
with that. He rejects that,'' the former lawmaker added.
   Ashley said that Neil Bush has made up his own mind in the
matter, including his decision to fight the case and refusal to
negotiate an out-of-court settlement.
   ``I'm a good sounding board,'' he said. ``It's not a partisan
matter or he wouldn't be coming to a Democrat.''
",23,"[ 0.425625    0.00742994  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
227,"
   To hear Neil Bush tell it, he's ``just a Denver
guy trying to make a living and raise a family,'' and he's
bewildered and angry at the attention he's receiving.
   Neil Bush, 35, slim, tanned, blond father of three children,
epitomizes the young, enterprising businessmen who came to Colorado
in the early 1980s to get rich in the oil business.
   ``We lived month to month, begged for money from time to time,
and our business was relatively dormant,'' Bush recalls. But he
relishes that time in his life.
   Like his father, Bush speaks in deliberate, run-on sentences,
tipping his head during delivery, jabbing his finger occasionally,
laughing an engaging, hiccuppy sort of laugh, displaying
near-perfect teeth.
   He is comfortable enough in front of a television camera to be a
political commentator, which he was, briefly, two years ago at KMGH
in Denver.
   Lately, however, Bush hasn't been in the spotlight voluntarily.
   Bush faces a public disciplinary hearing before federal
regulators in September on his role as a director of the bankrupt
Silverado Banking, Savings and Loan. Some Democrats are pushing for
a special prosecutor to examine the case.
   He has been accused of conflict of interest and failure to
disclose ties to men who received loans from Silverado, but has
said he has done nothing wrong. His father has defended his ``honor
and integrity'' but has promised to stay out of the investigation.
   The subject makes Neil Bush angry. While some maintain he played
a major role in pushing through suspicious loans while a director
of Silverado, he is enraged that Democrats are now making political
hay out of his predicament.
   ``Neil Bush is it for the Democrats. I'm the highest-profile guy
they have to shoot at out there,'' he said in an interview last
week.
   ``As a director of Silverado I acted prudently, I acted
responsibly. I acted and took my responsibilities seriously, and I
acted with diligence in overseeing the activities of Silverado.''
He also expresses anger at what he calls ``government
mismanagement'' in the way troubled savings institutions are being
sold off.
   Neil Bush played his most prominent role on the hot, steamy
night of Aug. 17, 1988, at the Republican National Convention in
New Orleans, when he delivered all of Colorado's delegates to help
seal his father's nomination for president.
   It was a heady moment for the third of George and Barbara Bush's
four sons, and it led to suggestions Neil Bush might have the stuff
from which U.S. House or Senate candidates are made. The
possibility had him shrugging and smiling and saying ``maybe.''
   His job then, he told reporters, was to help his father's
campaign. ``I'd hate to be the only son to have lost his home state
for his dad.''
   Dyslexic as a child, Bush practiced reading exercises until he
was able to overcome his problem, his brother George recalled. He
eventually earned undergraduate and master's degrees in business
from Tulane University.
   Until a few months ago, Neil and Sharon Bush and their three
children lived in a tan brick, two-story home in a friendly,
established neighborhood in central Denver.
   Former neighbors say they would often pile into the family Volvo
for weekend excursions. And they were community oriented, with Neil
serving on the Children's Museum board and Sharon co-chairing the
1989 Children's Hospital Gala.
   The family moved to a new house, a $550,000 structure on
Denver's wealthier, newer, southeast side. ``It offers privacy,
something that I now thrive on,'' Bush says.
   His downtown office is light and airy, with Western paintings
and a clear view to the west, where the Rockies can be seen on most
days. His desk carries a name plate, ``Mr. Bush,'' which belonged
to his grandfather, Prescott Bush, when he was a U.S. Senator from
Connecticut.
   It is more lavish than he was accustomed to when he was a
partner in a fledgling exploration company, JNB Exploration Co.
   JNB paid him a salary _ he won't say how much _ but the business
was later sold, in 1989, and Bush now heads Apex Energy, also an
exploration company.
   ``My business is oil and gas,'' he said.
   Bush says the oil business has been interesting, and he made
some profit selling lease-hold interests.
   ``The only problem is,'' he recalls with a smile, ``even though
we kept things going and everything was in pretty good shape in
terms of operations _ we didn't find any oil.
   ``It's a pretty high-risk business. But we were successful to
the extent we managed to put prospects together and sell them,
which is probably why we attracted the partners we did.''
",23,"[ 0.42791386  0.00986026  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
228,"
   The ``Jail Neil Bush'' posters have sprouted
around town, making their way from the bohemian side streets of
Dupont Circle to the broad avenues of the capital's downtown.
   The third son of George and Barbara Bush has become, literally,
the poster boy of the nation's savings and loan scandal, his
patrician face plastered on lamp posts in a parody of an FBI
``Wanted'' handbill. His family name, which catapulted him into the
altitudes of wealth and power in Denver five years ago, now has
thrown him into the vortex of public controversy.
   In August 1985, with scant banking experience behind him, Neil
Bush joined the board of directors of Silverado Banking, Savings
and Loan Association, a Denver thrift that went bust three years
later at a cost to taxpayers of $1 billion.
   Now Bush stands accused by thrift regulators of conflict of
interest for not disclosing business links to big Silverado
borrowers _ he denies any wrongdoing. He also could be a target of
a negligence lawsuit that the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. is
considering filing against him and other Silverado directors.
   Federal investigators are looking into thousands of cases of S&amp;L
fraud and mismanagement, and scores of similar lawsuits could be
filed by the FDIC. But Neil Bush's case is different. As a symbol
of the thrift crisis, he could become a political liability for his
father and the Republican Party in a $500-billion campaign issue.
   Neil Mallon Bush, born on Jan. 22, 1955, was recently described
by the president as ``probably the most sensitive of the four boys,
maybe the second-most sensitive'', ``a good kid.'' His childhood
problems with dyslexia inspired his mother's avid interest in
reading programs.
   He was 30 years old when he joined the Silverado board _ a
tender age to assume such a position of trust at a federally
insured institution. Only 1 percent of all savings and loan
directors were under 35 in 1988, according to a survey by the U.S.
League of Savings Institutions. The average age of a thrift
director was 57.
   Bush's only work in banking before becoming a Silverado director
was a summer job at Republic National Bank in Dallas. ``I worked in
the trust department filling out forms,'' he told regulators in a
closed hearing last December.
   The regulators have asserted Bush was ``unqualified and
untrained'' to be a savings and loan director _ although that
doesn't excuse him, they said.
   Flashback to the heady days of the oil industry in the American
West in the early 1980s. The Iranian oil cutoff in 1979 had spawned
skyrocketing prices and long, aggravating waits in gasoline lines
at home.
   The rugged oil fields of Colorado and Wyoming, which overnight
had become economic to develop, were gripped by a gold rush fever.
Suddenly, it seemed, everyone was in the oil business. Legions of
brash entrepreneurs swept into town, eager to take risks and get a
piece of the action.
   Neil Bush was one of them. He came to Denver armed with a
bachelor's degree and an MBA, both from Tulane University in New
Orleans, and some experience working in his father's 1980
presidential campaign and his brother George's unsuccessful bid for
Congress in Texas.
   In the summer of 1980, Bush was hired as a landman by Amoco
Production Co. in Denver, negotiating oil leases.
   ``Neil was very, very tough,'' said Tom Vessels, a Denver oilman
who negotiated lease deals with Bush. He also was ``all-round
curious,'' asking more questions than most landmen, recalled
Vessels, who owns a small oil company bearing his name and is
president of the Independent Petroleum Association of Mountain
States.
   Few others in what's now left of the Rockies oil industry seem
to remember Bush. That's not surprising, since there were scores of
small independent oilmen in the region in those days.
   ``I've never known anybody who's dealt with him in the oil
business,'' said Bill Owens, executive director of the Colorado
Petroleum Association.
   Bush left Amoco in late 1982 and set up an oil partnership with
two geologists called JNB Exploration Co. For an investment of only
$100, Bush acquired 23.4 percent of the business.
   For two years, JNB drilled a succession of dry holes in
Wyoming's Powder River Basin and failed to become profitable.
   That was common in those days. What was unusual, oilmen say, was
how Bush's ``silent'' partners kept pumping money into the business
despite its track record.
   The fact that Bush was a son of the vice president likely had
something to do with that. His silent partners in JNB _ wealthy
Denver developers Kenneth M. Good and Bill L. Walters _ probably
reckoned they might get more than oil from the millions of dollars
they invested in Bush's company.
   Influence and connections can often be as valuable as money to
people like Good and Walters, who were already heavy borrowers from
high-flying Silverado when Bush joined the board.
   Michael R. Wise, the chairman of Silverado at the time, also
knew the value of connections. He was on the board of the U.S.
League, the S&amp;L industry's main lobbying group, and had personal
contacts with regulators.
   In mid-1985, Wise invited Bush to join the board of Silverado,
which was at the zenith of its go-go period.
   Silverado was making huge loans for grandiose real estate
schemes right and left, though many of the ventures were never
finished. The thrift was a gold mine for fast-and-loose developers,
since it was playing with depositors' money that was insured by the
federal government.
   Good and Walters, two of the biggest borrowers, got a combined
$117 million in loans that they never repaid. The leading borrower,
Bell Savings and Loan Association of San Mateo, Calif., got $124.8
million. Its chairman at the time, David Butler, pleaded guilty
last year to loan fraud and was sentenced to two years in prison.
   ``Management of Silverado took excessive risks, engaged in
abusive or questionable practices to generate short-term gains and
undertook innovative manipulations to avoid recording losses,'' the
Office of Thrift Supervision said in a report published last May.
``The board did little beyond rubber stamping the activities of
(Silverado's) sophisticated, bright and manipulative management
team.''
   As a director, Bush voted to approve loans _ including some of
the projects sponsored by Good and Walters. The regulators have
accused him of conflict of interest in not disclosing to Silverado
his links with the two developers through JNB.
   Bush denies the allegations. He concedes, however, that his
family ties helped him get the Silverado position.
   ``I would be naive if I were to sit here and deny that the Bush
name didn't have something to do with it,'' he said in a recent
interview with Time magazine. ``Maybe the advantage of being part
of the vice president's family at the time was that I was accepted
more quickly in terms of age and years in this community (Denver)
than others of my peer group.''
   The family name, however, has become a double-edged sword.
Because he is the president's son, Bush has captured the public
imagination more than any other player in the national S&amp;L drama.
The unsigned ``Jail Neil Bush'' posters haven't reached Main
Street, but across the country, Neil Bush's face is now recognized
by many of the taxpayers who will have to shell out $2,000 each to
cover thrift losses.
",23,"[ 0.36198633  0.00695093  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
229,"

Federal regulators charged that President Bush's son Neil engaged in ""personal 
dishonesty"" as a director of the failed Silverado Banking Savings &amp; Loan 
Assn. and sought to bar him from future service as a thrift director, according 
to a confidential memorandum disclosed Tuesday at a congressional hearing. 


The memo, prepared early this year by the enforcement staff of the federal 
Office of Thrift Supervision, was never formally issued as a complaint against 
Bush, and the agency eventually moved against him on lesser charges. 


The allegations contained in the OTS memorandum provide the most detailed 
account made public about the role of the President's son in the financial 
demise of Silverado, one of the biggest failures among hundreds of S&amp;L 
insolvencies. 


Neil Bush was not present at Tuesday's hearing, but in previous appearances he 
has strongly denied any wrongdoing in connection with his tenure as a Silverado 
director. He is challenging in an administrative proceeding the government's 
allegations that he violated thrift rules. 


Bush ""willfully breached"" his duty as a director by failing to inform the board 
that a major borrower at the S&amp;L, Kenneth M. Good, was going to pay $3 
million for an 80% interest in Bush's oil exploration company, the OTS document 
says. 


About the same time Good was buying control of Bush's firm, the Silverado board 
agreed to forgive $11 million in loans and obligations owed by Good to the 
S&amp;L because he allegedly could not pay his bills, the memorandum states. 


Bush abstained from voting on Silverado's loans to Good, but the OTS document 
said he did not disclose his business relations with Good as required by 
federal regulations affecting thrift directors. 


Good and another investor in Bush's firm, William L. Walters, ultimately 
defaulted on more than $130 million in loans at Denver-based Silverado. The 
cleanup of the institution, which was seized by federal regulators last 
December, could cost taxpayers as much as $1 billion. 


Good, appearing in response to a subpoena by the House Banking, Finance and 
Urban Affairs Committee, defended the President's son. 


""At no time did I ask or expect Neil to influence or vote on any of the 
transactions that were negotiated with Silverado management,"" he testified. 


Good said he was ""shocked by the personal attacks that continue to be made upon 
(Bush) with regard to his role in Silverado. I can testify without hesitation 
that Neil is a man of absolute integrity . . . ."" 


Rep. Frank Annunzio (D-Ill.), who obtained the OTS document, said the office 
and its predecessor, ""under Republican control for nearly the past 10 years, is 
clearly not an agency designed to make political hay by going after the son of 
the President of the United States."" 


""Serious charges have been leveled against Neil Bush,"" Annunzio said. ""Is that 
the end of the case? That the taxpayers are going to have to pick up a 
$1-billion tab without ever knowing whether Neil Bush was right or wrong?"" 


Good and other key figures in Silverado's downfall testified in the third day 
of Banking Committee hearings on the S&amp;L, where Neil Bush served as a 
director from August, 1985, until August, 1988. 


Democrats have tried to link the President's son to greedy real estate 
developers who defaulted on loans from the thrift, and Republicans have 
defended him as an honest, if occasionally naive, young man. 


When Bush left the Silverado board in August, ""the Colorado savings and loan 
commissioner had all but sounded the death warning when he told Silverado that 
it would have to raise $62 million of new capital or face a closure order,"" 
committee Chairman Henry B. Gonzalez (D-Tex.) said. 


When the state official moved to enforce his order and attempted to shut 
Silverado in October, the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp. in 
Washington quickly ordered a two-month delay, putting off any action until 
after the presidential election. Kermit Mowbray, serving as the chief regulator 
for the region, told the committee that he received a phone call from his 
superiors in Washington directing a postponement in closing Silverado. 


On Nov. 9, the day after President Bush won the election, Mowbray submitted a 
formal recommendation that Silverado be placed into receivership, and the 
government took control on Dec. 9. In response to questions, Mowbray said he 
did not think the postponement was based on political considerations. He said 
he had never been subjected to any political pressure or influence in the case. 


In the memo, the federal regulators' criticism of Neil Bush focused on his 
failure to disclose his business ties with Walters and Good, major borrowers at 
Silverado. 


Walters invested $150,000 in JNB, Bush's oil exploration firm, providing half 
of its original capital. Bush later voted to approve loans to Walters and his 
companies, although he abstained from voting on loans to Good. 


The enforcement staff's document, prepared in January, named Bush, along with 
former Silverado Chairman Michael Wise, Director James Metz, Executive Vice 
President Russell Murray, and outside counsel Ronald Jacobs. It said their 
conduct ""involved personal dishonesty, or demonstrated a willful or continuing 
disregard for the safety or soundness of Silverado."" 


The document called for a hearing to decide on issuance of an order barring the 
four men from ever working again for federally insured institutions without 
prior government approval. The proposed prohibition was never issued by the 
Office of Thrift Supervision. 


Gonzalez noted that Wise and Metz, and two other former Silverado executives, 
chief operating officer Richard K. Vandapool and chief financial officer Robert 
M. Lewis, signed consent orders accepting the prohibition. 


The OTS filed a lesser complaint against Neil Bush, seeking a cease-and-desist 
order that would direct him to refrain from committing any future violations of 
disclosure rules. An administrative law judge at the agency will conduct a 
hearing later this year to determine whether to proceed against Bush. 


There was not sufficient evidence against Bush to seek a prohibition order, 
according to OTS officials. 


The pending case against Bush ""has thrown a bright spotlight on the obligation 
of boards of directors to meet their fiduciary responsibility,"" Gonzalez said. 
""This responsibility is critical to the safety and soundness of any 
institution, and it is the first line of defense against raids on the insurance 
funds and the taxpayers."" 

",23,"[ 0.          0.          0.01324512 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
230,"

The failed savings and loan association where Neil Bush was a director had a 
strict code of ethics requiring officials to avoid any action that might ""in 
any way"" be a conflict of interest, and the President's son ignored the rules, 
a federal regulator testified Wednesday. 


""A director is required to give full disclosure to other directors,"" said 
regulator Terry Sandefur, offering an emphatic shorthand summary of the case 
against Bush. He is accused of failing to inform his colleagues on the board of 
Silverado Banking, Savings &amp; Loan Assn. that he had important business 
connections with Bill L. Walters and Kenneth M. Good, two big borrowers at 
Silverado. 


Even if there is nothing more than an appearance of conflict of interest, ""the 
director should seek to avoid that situation,"" said Sandefur, the assistant 
deputy district director for the Office of Thrift Supervision. 


The OTS is seeking a cease-and-desist order barring Bush from any future 
violation of conflict of interest regulations. 


Because the collapse of hundreds of S&amp;Ls will cost taxpayers $130 billion, 
the role of the President's son in the Silverado case is drawing nationwide 
attention. 


His defenders portray Neil Bush, who was 30 when he joined the Silverado board 
in 1985, as an honest but naive young man who is being persecuted because he is 
the President's son. But federal regulators say Neil Bush was supporting 
Silverado financing for Good and Walters without disclosing that they were 
bankrolling his oil exploration business. 


In addition to the OTS complaint, Bush is one of the defendants in a 
$200-million suit by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. against the Silverado 
directors. Walters and Good defaulted on more than $130 million in loans at 
Silverado during the three-year period when Bush served on the board. 


The Silverado code of ethics, made available by the OTS on Wednesday, said 
officers and directors should ""keep themselves free of influences that might 
conflict or appear to conflict"" with the S&amp;L's interest. 


Directors also should submit annual statements covering potential conflicts of 
interest, and should offer special submissions ""if the director feels any of 
his activities, interests or relationships might possibly give rise to a 
conflict of interest,"" according to the Silverado ethics guide, dated April 24, 
1985. 


The officer or director's statements should ""include any activity that might in 
any way be deemed to constitute"" a conflict of interest, the document said. 


The hearing will conclude today with the long-awaited appearance of Neil Bush. 


Daniel Davidson, the administrative law judge handling the case, will decide 
next year whether to recommend issuing the cease-and-desist order against Bush. 
The final decision will be made by Timothy Ryan, the OTS director. His ruling 
can be appealed to the courts. 

",23,"[ 0.          0.          0.02271336 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
231,"

An administrative law judge ruled Tuesday that President Bush's son, Neil, 
violated conflict-of-interest regulations in the failure of a Denver thrift and 
recommended that he be restricted in any future roles with financial 
institutions. 


The judge agreed with federal regulators that Neil Bush failed to properly 
disclose his business relationships with two of the largest borrowers at 
Silverado Banking, Savings &amp; Loan Assn., where he was a director for three 
years. 


Bush ""engaged in unsafe and unsound practices involving multiple conflicts of 
interests,"" said the judge, who works for the Office of Thrift Supervision, 
which regulates thrifts and brought the civil charges against Bush. 


Bush contested the allegations at a hearing in Denver last September, and his 
attorney said Tuesday that the judge's decision would be appealed to the 
director of OTS. If the ruling is upheld, the attorney said he will take the 
matter to federal appeals court. 


""I don't think it sounds any more logical or rational than when OTS argued it,"" 
said James E. Nesland, Bush's attorney. ""When we go to a real court with real 
judges, I expect to have a contradictory decision and have it decided on the 
merits."" 


OTS could have sought a ban that would have barred Bush from being involved 
with a bank or savings institution ever again. But the agency had requested 
only a so-called cease-and-desist order to restrict Bush's activities. 


Daniel J. Davidson, the administrative law judge, recommended that Bush be 
required to obtain a lawyer's advice on potential conflicts if he takes another 
position at a financial institution. The judge also said Bush should make a 
full disclosure of his business deals annually and abstain from voting on 
issues where he has an interest if he joins another institution. 


The White House press office said President Bush would have no comment on the 
judge's findings. When the allegations first surfaced, the President said he 
had full faith in his son, but he vowed to stay out of the legal process. 


Neil Bush, a Denver oilman, was a director of Silverado from 1985 to 1988. He 
resigned when his father was nominated to the Republican presidential ticket. 
Later that year, regulators seized Silverado and declared it insolvent. Its 
failure is expected to cost the taxpayers $1 billion. 


At the center of the allegations against Bush were his relationships with two 
Colorado developers, Bill L. Walters and Kenneth M. Good. The two developers 
ultimately defaulted on more than $100 million in loans from Silverado, which 
helped bring about its collapse, according to regulators. 


The regulators charged that Neil Bush failed to disclose adequately to his 
fellow directors that he had extensive business dealings with the developers at 
a time that they were receiving loans from Silverado. 


According to the charges, Neil Bush violated his duties by voting to approve 
loans to Walters without disclosing the extent of his business deals with 
Walters and he personally arranged for Walters to receive a $900,000 line of 
credit from Silverado. 


The regulators also accused Bush of failing to tell his fellow directors that 
Good was preparing to invest $3 million in Bush's oil drilling firm at a time 
Good told Silverado he was broke and could not make his loan payments. Good 
also loaned Bush $100,000 that was never repaid. 


In his ruling, Davidson accepted the agency's allegations concerning the 
conflict-of-interest violations and said they constituted unsafe practices. 


Rep. Henry B. Gonzalez (D-Tex.), chairman of the House Banking Committee, said 
in an interview that the administrative judge's decision seemed appropriate to 
the actions of Bush, who testified at hearings conducted earlier this year by 
the committee. 


""Frankly, my own opinion is that he was a little minnow swimming with a bunch 
of barracudas,"" said Gonzalez. 


Bush and his fellow directors and some former Silverado executives also face a 
$200-million lawsuit by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp., which accuses them 
of gross negligence. 

",23,"[ 0.          0.          0.01940208 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
232,"
   Mr. Bush says he's never violated his smell test by
trading on being George Bush's son. But with the spotlight on
his role in the collapse of Silverado Banking, Savings &amp; Loan
Association, which is expected to cost taxpayers $1 billion,
comparisons inevitably are made with Billy Carter, Donald
Nixon and other presidential relatives whose finances brought
embarrassment to the White House. As a former Silverado
director, Mr. Bush has come under fire for overseeing loans
that involved two investors in his oil company.
   But what has caught public attention is a $100,000 loan
that Mr. Bush received before joining the Silverado board
from Kenneth Good, a Denver real-estate developer and
investor in JNB Exploration, Mr. Bush's oil company. Mr. Good
arranged to invest the money in the commodities market on Mr.
Bush's behalf, with the understanding that any profits would
be Mr. Bush's, while any losses would be absorbed by Mr.
Good.
   Mr. Bush, who not only looks but also acts like the Jimmy
Stewart of ""Mr. Smith Goes to Washington,"" made headlines by
conceding in congressional testimony that the Good loan
sounded ""a little fishy.""
   Mr. Bush's friends say he lacks a sophisticated
understanding of the darker forces in life. ""I think there's
a refreshing naivete about Neil,"" says Mr. Bush's adviser,
former Democratic Rep. Thomas Ashley, who's known George Bush
since his Skull and Bones days at Yale. ""He's not jaded.""
   Since Neil Bush's youth, when he was afflicted with
dyslexia -- his brother Marvin recalls that ""homework would
take him a little bit longer"" than the other Bush children --
he has been known for his good-natured willingness to pitch
into any task. While his siblings would scatter when their
parents ordered that yard work be done, recalls Marvin Bush,
""Neil would step up and say, `Yeah, great.'""
   Friends and business associates agree that Neil Bush's
family name lent him a certain aura within the Denver
business community when he settled there after working on his
father's 1980 presidential bid. Mr. Bush put in two years at
Amoco Corp. to learn the oil business, then left that
$30,000-a-year job to start an oil-exploration company of his
own. Investors were drawn to Mr. Bush ""partly, I suppose,
because he was the son of the vice president,"" concedes Evans
Nash, Neil Bush's former partner. ""I'm sure that helped him
meet people.""
   Even Mr. Bush's lawyer concedes that being George Bush's
son raised Neil's profile in Denver. ""We don't have a lot of
celebrities,"" explains attorney James Nesland. ""We had Marvin
Davis for a while. Now he's gone,"" he says, registering that
oil man's departure for Hollywood with a shrug.
   Settled in Denver, Neil Bush became a fixture on the local
political scene, giving speeches at Lincoln Day dinners and
stumping for his father and a variety of local Republican
candidates. ""He's an enthusiastic speaker,"" notes Bruce
Benson, chairman of the Colorado Republican Party. ""He speaks
of good Republican values.""
   Neil Bush can be startlingly blunt in enunciating
conservative themes. According to one local news account, Mr.
Bush told a group of Hispanic voters in 1988 that welfare was
""worse than slavery.""
   Mr. Bush also settled into Denver's social elite. With his
wife, Sharon, and three children, he lived in suburban
seclusion amid rolling greens and humming golf carts inside a
walled country-club development. The handsome young couple
became a fixture at dinner parties and charity events.
   It was at one such party in 1985 that Neil Bush met
Michael Wise, chairman of Silverado. Mr. Wise was seeking a
new director for Silverado's board -- preferably someone
young, because the board was top-heavy with older members,
and preferably someone with experience in the oil business,
which was underrepresented. Mr. Bush accepted. ""I considered
it a chance to learn,"" he later told the Denver Post.
   With no experience in banking, Mr. Bush, then 30 years
old, nevertheless seemed a logical choice to those close to
Mr. Wise. ""Mike Wise seemed to like to be a first-class
dresser,"" observes Alexander Walter, a former loan-portfolio
manager at Silverado. ""His automobile was always impeccably
clean."" Neil Bush, Mr. Walter implies, was another such
ornament.
   Mr. Wise declined to return calls, and through an
intermediary referred all inquiries to his lawyer, Bettina
Lawton. Ms. Lawton says Mr. Bush's last name was ""certainly
not a primary consideration"" when Mr. Wise chose him for the
board.
   Despite Mr. Bush's youth and inexperience in banking
matters, former Silverado officials say Mr. Bush was no less
able a board member than the others. According to Mr. Walter,
most had ""no hands-on experience"" with the complex
Silverado's business. Former Silverado board member Diane
Ingels says Mr. Bush was a ""very diligent"" director who ""met
with other directors and with management to enhance his
understanding.""
   Still, Mr. Bush remains defensive about his qualifications
to sit on Silverado's board. Sitting in his office
overlooking downtown Denver, a small bust of his father
behind him, he lurches unprompted from discussing his work on
a political campaign into a defense of his work on
Silverado's board. ""I was just as well prepared to be on that
board as anyone,"" he protests.
   Mr. Bush is also emphatic in denying that Mr. Good's
risk-free loan violated the Smith Smell Test. ""It's just his
way of having fun,"" Mr. Bush says. ""I wasn't going to deny
him his chance of having fun.""
   Mr. Bush says Mr. Good set up similar accounts for Mr.
Good's secretary and bookkeeper. Mr. Good couldn't be reached
for comment, but in testimony last month before the House
Banking Committee, he described the loans as ""a means of
attracting and keeping loyal business associates."" Still,
neither of Mr. Bush's two partners at JNB Exploration
received such loans. Mr. Bush says they weren't as close to
Mr. Good. The money was eventually lost when the commodities
investments went sour.
   Meanwhile, Mr. Bush is wrestling against
conflict-of-interest charges by the federal Office of Thrift
Supervision concerning his service on the Silverado board.
The thrift office has charged that as a Silverado director
Mr. Bush voted on loans to William Walters, a Denver real
estate agent who was one of two original investors in JNB
Exploration. Mr. Bush answers that there wasn't any legal
requirement that he abstain from the votes.
   The thrift office also contends that Mr. Bush failed to
properly disclose his interest when he helped Mr. Good
receive a $900,000 line of credit from Silverado in order to
assist an Argentine project involving JNB Exploration. But
Mr. Bush produced a memo that appears to demonstrate that his
interest was disclosed to the board before it approved the
line of credit. These and other charges will be publicly
aired at administrative hearings to be held this September in
Denver.
   Amid everything, Mr. Bush maintains a self-deprecating
wit. He has ""no airs or graces about him,"" observes
Republican political consultant Peter Teeley, who recently
phoned Mr. Bush to offer advice and support. Mr. Nesland, the
lawyer, says that after he scolded Mr. Bush for his ""fishy""
gaffe, Mr. Bush clipped a newspaper photograph of himself at
the hearing, with Mr. Nesland and Sharon Bush sitting behind
him. ""I can't believe he said that,"" Mr. Bush scribbled in a
bubble drawn above Mr. Nesland's head, according to Mr.
Nesland. ""Oh no, not again,"" Mr. Bush wrote in another bubble
above his wife.
   Indeed, Mr. Bush's spirits are sufficiently buoyant that,
in the midst of seeing himself portrayed as a major S&amp;L
villain, he can still envision pursuing a career in politics.
Ten years from now, he muses, ""I may be a U.S. senator. Who
knows?""
",23,"[ 0.22517683  0.00617698  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
233,"
   A government scientist says his detailed new
analysis disproves the theory that volcanoes are more likely to
erupt at certain times of the year.
   Historically, volcanoes have erupted slightly more often in some
months than others, leading to disputes over whether the variation
was enough to constitute a periodic pattern.
   Richard B. Stothers concluded that it isn't in a report in the
May issue of Geophysical Research Letters, published by the
American Geophysical Union.
   Stothers, of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration's
Goddard Space Flight Center in Greenbelt, Md., compared the dates
of recorded strong volcanic eruptions between 1500 and 1980.
   During that time 265 eruptions were recorded in the first half
of each calendar year and 236 in the last six months, a difference
Stothers said is not statistically significant.
   Breaking down the eruptions by month and area, Stothers did find
some clustering, but this was explainable, he concluded.
   For example, nearly all eruptions south of 50 degrees south
latitude occurred between November and April.
   This is almost certainly because that is summer in that part of
the world, the time of year the nearly uninhabited region is most
often visited by outsiders who would record eruptions, Stothers
said.
   No similar pattern was seen in the far north, where residents
are always present to notice eruptions.
   Stother's monthly analysis found a peak average of 52 eruptions
in February between the years 1500 and 1980 and a minimum of 36
eruptions in the months of April and December during that period.
   The average number of eruptions in other months fell in between
those two, a variation within the range that statisticians would
expect to occur in a random sample.
   Stother's analysis rebuts several studies done in the late 1800s
and early in this century that indicated a seasonality to volcanic
eruptions.
   At least one 1917 report speculated that eruptions would cluster
around the equinoxes in the spring and fall as a result of changes
in the angle of the sun.
   Periodic springtime eruptions of some volcanoes have been
associated with melting snow seeping into the ground and reacting
with molton lava below the ground, scientists have suggested.
   But seasonality occurring at individual volcanoes disappears
when they are averaged in with many others around the world,
according to Stother's analysis.
",24,"[ 0.38353412  0.01472939  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
234,"
   Dust plumes spewed out by volcanoes, long
thought to cool the climate, may well have little weather effect, a
new study contends.
   ``Previous suggestions of large cooling during the first few
months after volcanic events appear to be unwarranted,''
researchers Clifford F. Mass and David A. Portman say in the June
issue of the Journal of Climate, published by the American
Meteorological Society.
   Volcanic eruptions have often been blamed for cooling of the
climate in the past, based on the theory that the dust they inject
into the atmosphere would block sunlight and reduce the normal
warming of the land and sea surface.
   Indeed, the cold weather in 1816, known to historians as ``the
year without a summer,'' has been widely blamed on a series of
volcanic eruptions that occurred in various parts of the world
between 1812 and 1815.
   In their study, Portman and Mass said prior analyses may have
been confused by temperature changes that involve a periodic
warming and cooling of sea and air temperatures, a pattern known as
the El Nino-Southern Oscillation.
   After subtracting those effects from the historical records,
they concluded that ``only the largest eruptions are suggested in
the climatic record and that a modest cooling is observed for one
to two years after these large events.''
   They defined modest cooling as about one-tenth to two-tenths of
a degree Celsius in average temperatures. That would amount to 0.2
to 0.4 degrees Fahrenheit.
   The authors found little hint of any effect on air pressure or
rain or snowfall.
   Considering that eruptions throwing dust into the air should
interfere with radiation from the sun, they asked themselves: ``Why
is the volcanic effect on surface climate so small?''
   The answer, they concluded, amounts to an altered form of the
greenhouse effect _ the currently widely discussed threatened
heating of the planet.
   ``Volcanic stratospheric aerosols can drastically reduce the
direct solar beam,'' they concluded, an effect which should lower
the temperature by reducing the warming from the sun.
   But at the same time these chemicals and dust also block
infrared rediation from the ground and ocean what would normally be
radiated back into space, cooling the planet.
   Because volcanic clouds often shade only a small portion of the
surface and have only a negligible net effect on the radiation
balance, they result in little measurable climate change, concluded
Mass, of the University of Washington in Seattle, and Portman of
Atmospheric and Environmental Research Inc., Cambridge, Mass.
   Records which seem to indicate cooling following eruptions could
reflect ordinary variations in climate, they conclude. In fact, a
more detailed analysis of the records indicates that in some cases
gradual cooling reported following eruptions had actually begun
beforehand.
   As for 1816, Mass and Portman conclude that it was an unusually
cold summer in North America and parts of Europe, but the degree of
cooling was not unprecedented. The cold year could have resulted
from consistent wind patterns bringing arctic air south, they said.
   The greenhouse effect which has become a source of concern in
recent years results from an accumulation of carbon dioxide and
other gases in the atmosphere, largely a result of burning fossil
fuels and other industrial processes.
   Like volcanic dust, these gases trap the earth's heat,
preventing it from radiating out into space and cooling the planet.
But unlike the volcanic dust, the greenhouse gases do not balance
things by blocking incoming sunlight.
",24,"[ 0.31194719  0.01057071  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
235,"
   Doctors Wednesday reported a growing number of
stress-related illnesses among people in a resort city southwest of
Tokyo that has been jolted by thousands of tremors and several
volcanic eruptions in the past two weeks.
   ``We've had an increasing number of patients complaining of
insomnia and gastritis due to stress and fear of earthquakes and
volcanic eruptions,'' said Mikio Kakefu, director of the National
Hospital in Ito City.
   Ito, a coastal resort city on the Izu peninsula, about 60 miles
southwest of Tokyo, has had more than 23,000 temblors, including 486
strong enough to be felt, since June 30.
   On July 13, an undersea volcano erupted off the Ito coast,
creating a mound 82 feet high, according to the Maritime Safety
Agency, Japan's coast guard.
   Volcanic activity has slowed since then, and no strong
earthquakes have been recorded since Sunday. No injuries or damages
were reported after the eruption.
   But the Central Meteorological Agency has warned the volcano is
likely to erupt again because the movement of magma, or molten rock,
continues.
   Kakefu said the hospital, which has an average of 250 outpatients
daily, Monday began receiving more patients with stomach aches,
insomnia and diarrhea, ``all from fear and stress.''
   ``They didn't feel sick for a couple of days after the eruption
because they were still tense,'' he said. Kakefu said he does not
have any statistics, but indicated the number of such patients is
likely to increase.
   Pets have also been developing similar symptoms since shortly
after the eruption, said Masaaki Mochizuki, an Ito veterinarian.
   He said he has examined 129 cats and dogs suffering the
``earthquake syndrome'' between July 4 and July 14.
   Symptoms such as nausea, diarrhea and loss of appetite were
frequent among cats, and many dogs suffered skin problems including
rashes and hair loss, he said. He said some dogs were also afflicted
with coughing and trembling due to excessive fear.
   ``My busiest day was July 14, the day after the eruption,''
Mochizuki said. ``Symptoms in animals appeared earlier than in
people because animals are more sensitive, and they feel the
temblors and noises more strongly.''
   ``We humans have information from the municipal office and the
meteorological centers, which help to relieve our tensions ... but
such things don't work for animals,'' he said.
",24,"[ 0.34608913  0.01533615  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
236,"
   Eight years after a volcano scare incited
fear, anger and economic gloom in Sierra resorts, residents are
nonchalant about renewed underground lava movement that is
triggering thousands of tiny earthquakes.
   Scientists say there is a very small chance of a volcanic
eruption. But most of the quakes are too small to be felt, so ``you
don't really think about it,'' said Pam Murphy, spokeswoman for
Mammoth Mountain Ski Area.
   ``You can get hit by a car,'' she said. ``You can be in a plane
crash. The chances of those are a lot higher than the chance of
being killed by an earthquake or a volcano.''
   ``People who are frightened left long ago. I don't believe it's
a conscious concern of anyone in the community,'' said Mammoth
Lakes Mayor Gordon Alper.
   The resort town's 4,700 permanent residents live in Long Valley,
a 19-mile-long, 9-mile-wide volcanic crater known as a caldera. It
is located on the east slope of the Sierra Nevada range 250 miles
north of Los Angeles. The Earth's crust is being stretched apart in
the region, allowing molten rock to fill half-mile-wide chambers
under the caldera.
   The valley was created 730,000 years ago by one of Earth's most
powerful eruptions, a blast that spewed 600 times more material
than the May 1980 eruption of Mount St. Helens in Washington state.
   Eruptions somewhat smaller than Mount St. Helens' happened 550
years ago at the Inyo craters, which span Long Valley's north rim,
and 650 years ago at the Mono craters, several miles north of the
caldera.
   Despite the current activity, the probability of a major
earthquake or a volcanic eruption in the area is ``less than 1
percent each year,'' said David Hill, the U.S. Geological Survey
geophysicist in charge of research at Long Valley.
   Mono County Sheriff Martin Strelneck called such estimates ``a
scientific guessing game,'' and said area residents rarely discuss
the latest swarm of earthquakes, which started in May 1989.
   That low-key attitude contrasts with feelings of anxiety, denial
and hostility when thousands of quakes - some exceeding 6 on the
Richter scale - rocked the area from 1979 to 1984.
   During that period, subterranean molten rock pushed upward,
lifting the caldera's floor. As a result, the Geological Survey
issued a ``notice of potential volcanic hazard'' for Long Valley in
May 1982.
   That warning, coupled with jarring earthquakes, damaged tourism
and aggravated a recession in the once-booming real estate market.
   ``The community overreacted,'' Murphy said. Residents accused
journalists of sensationalizing the possibility of an eruption and
denounced scientists for scaring people.
   ``Initially we thought this was a big ploy for them to get
funding from Congress,'' Alper said.
   The hazard notice was rescinded in 1984 after the beleaguered
Geological Survey changed its warning system and seismic activity
diminished, reducing the possibility of an eruption.
   Swarms of thousands of small quakes resumed 18 months ago and
continue to rattle Mammoth Lakes, June Lake, Lee Vining and other
Mono County resort towns. The temblors, most measuring 1 to 3 on
the Richter scale, started beneath Mammoth Mountain. In September
1989, they shifted to the caldera, where five to 10 small quakes
now happen daily.
   A quake estimated at 5 to 5.8 on the Richter scale shook the
region last Tuesday, tumbling rocks onto Yosemite National Park's
roads. It was eastern California's largest quake since 1984, but
wasn't related to volcanic activity that causes the quake swarms,
Hill said.
   Long Valley's floor continues to bulge upward as molten rock
moves inside two or three chambers about four miles under the
caldera, he said. The caldera floor rose about 2 feet since 1979,
including 3 inches in the past year.
   While Long Valley ``is clearly an area that's showing unrest,
large calderas can do these kinds of things over years to decades
without necessarily erupting,'' Hill said.
   The floor of a caldera near Naples, Italy, rose 9 feet between
1970 and 1984 but didn't erupt. Comparable uplift inside a New
Guinea caldera also failed to produce volcanic disaster.
   Nevertheless, Hill said, eastern Sierra residents are addressing
the volcanic threat by developing or revising emergency plans and
helping the Geological Survey prepare a new system to issue a
warning if an eruption appeared likely.
",24,"[ 0.37011712  0.01015294  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
237,"
Volcanoes, which spit ash, ooze lava and create darkness in the middle of
the day, are impressive displays of nature's restlessness. They are also
life-threatening: more than 28,500 people died from eruptions during the
1980s. They can cause millions of dollars in property damage and bring
industrial activity to a grinding halt.
New technology to improve the accuracy of eruption forecasts is helping to
minimise the devastation volcanoes can cause. After the Nevado del Ruiz
eruption killed nearly 25,000 people in Colombia in 1986, the US government
began taking volcanic forecasting seriously. The US Geological Survey, which
tracks volcanic activity around the world, was infused with new funds to
create a detailed database and update its techniques.
The new technology will not only help to save thousands of lives, it may
also save millions of dollars. According to the Aviation Safety Journal,
more than 60 aircraft have been damaged by drifting clouds of volcanic ash
since 1980. The repair of a 747 aircraft damaged during the 1989 eruption
from Redoubt Volcano in Alaska cost Dollars 80m (Pounds 53m).
The continuous eruption of Hawaii's Kilauea since 1983 has caused more than
Dollars 5m in damage, much of it to properties and crops affected by the
acid-bearing volcanic pollutants. Mount St Helens in Washington state wiped
out thousands of acres of productive timberland.
Losses from interrupted economic activity are harder to quantify, but may be
more devastating. Redoubt's eruption, for instance, caused a valuable oil
storage terminal to close for several weeks and halted most flights into and
out of the region.
Tourism often takes the hardest hit of all. When US geologists issued
eruption warnings in California's Long Valley in 1982, the resort area
turned into a ghost town almost overnight. And the tourist-based economy of
Guadeloupe neared collapse in 1976 after an international group of
volcanologists forecast the eruption of La Soufriere.
The Long Valley and Guadeloupe incidents are tinged with bitterness since
the predicted disasters never happened. Guadeloupe evacuated 72,000 people
and tourists stayed away. Yet the only crisis that hit the Caribbean island
was in the economic sphere.
Scientists blame these fiascos on insufficient data. 'The identification of
fresh volcanic glass in the erupted ash - which seemed to indicate that the
volcano was about to erupt violently - was a mistake,' wrote Richard Fiske,
a volcanologist at the Smithsonian Institution, about the incident.
Volcanologists today use more sophisticated techniques. Detailed databases
are maintained on all life-threatening volcanoes around the world.
High-frequency monitors to measure debris flows are now in place.
Earthquakes - often the first warning of volcanic activity - are tracked
with increasing accuracy. And changes in gas composition, electrical
conductivity and other clues are carefully monitored.
As a result, volcanic activity can now be forecast with substantial
accuracy, often pinpointing the eruption to within days or even hours of its
actual occurrence. When Redoubt erupted in Alaska in 1989 and Pinatubo blew
its top in the Philippines in 1991, volcanologists provided important
information, not only about the timing of the events, but also about the
direction of debris flows and ash blooms - vast clouds formed when tiny
pieces of lava or rock are thrown into the air.
'We used information on the ash blooms (during the Redoubt eruption) to know
which areas to stay away from, and which were safe to fly through,' says
Greg Witter, a spokesman for Alaska Air.
Companies can also take advantage of eruption forecasts to move valuable
equipment out of the way, and evacuate employees from the area.
'Businesses with sensitive electronics may want to shut down their air
filtration system during an ash bloom,' says Steven Brantley, public
information scientist with the US Geological Survey. Since ash blooms often
drift for many miles, they can wreak havoc on property well beyond the
life-threatening zone of eruption.
Volcanology can also be used for future planning. After much of its timber
was wiped out during the eruption of Mount St Helens, the paper group
Weyerhaeuser consulted experts to decide which areas should be replanted and
which avoided as too high-risk.
Not all businesses welcome the interference of volcanologists, however. In
Long Valley developers have refused to heed warnings in land use planning.
'We've had mixed results, because we can't force people to follow our
advice,' says Daniel Miller, a geologist with the US Geological Survey.
'We've had a very negative and unpleasant response from businesses in Long
Valley. They just don't believe that they might be in a risk zone and insist
on building things anywhere they please.'
Developers in the region complain that the volcanologists' warnings have
resulted in higher insurance rates, limited areas of potential development
and stoked the fears of tourists.
The relationship between active volcanoes and the communities that surround
them is not always confrontational. Kilauea has become a leading Hawaiian
tourist attraction. It is considered the ideal volcano. Because the eruption
is continuous, it is seldom life-threatening and ash blooms are rare.
Instead, the volcano throws up a scenic display of colourful lava, which
attracts hikers by day and creates a natural light show at night.
Scientists have gleaned much useful information from the decade-long
eruption.
'The resorts look to us to provide information on best viewing times, which
they pass on to the tourists,' says David Clague, scientist in charge of the
Hawaii Volcano Observatory at Kilauea. 'It's generally pretty tame as far as
volcano eruptions go, but it's spectacular at night because it's
iridescent.'
",24,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
238,"

The mysterious geologic forces behind the current eruptions of Mt. Kilauea are 
quietly creating the newest piece of America. 


Climbing with agonizing slowness from the warm tropical waters just southeast 
of the Big Island of Hawaii is an undersea mountain named Loihi. Volcanologists 
believe Loihi eventually could emerge as the ninth Hawaiian island. 


""Loihi has grown about 10,100 feet from the Pacific floor,"" Thomas L. Wright, 
scientist-in-charge of the Hawaiian Volcano Observatory, said. ""It seems to be 
tapping the same source of magma (lava still underground) as Kilauea. Loihi 
needs about 3,100 more feet to break the surface."" 


The observatory, on the rim of Kilauea's summit caldera, or lava lake, is 
operated by the U.S. Geological Survey. 


Volcanoes have been creating and modifying the environment over eons of 
geologic time. More than 80% of Earth's surface is of volcanic origin. Volcanic 
eruptions have formed fertile soils and sculpted mountains, plateaus and other 
majestic landscapes. Gaseous emissions from volcanic vents helped to form the 
early atmosphere and oceans where scientists believe life first emerged. 


The volcanic machine powering Kilauea and building Loihi may represent the most 
visible and most persistent example of this little-known facet of volcanoes. 


Kilauea has been in the news time and again since it resumed erupting on Jan. 
3, 1983. Lava oozing at the rate of 635,000 cubic feet each day has traveled 20 
miles east to the Pacific Ocean. 


Lava flowing from the eruption, 50 feet thick in some places, already has 
torched 140 houses and caused more than $60 million in damage. Last May 5, a 
2,000-foot-wide flow cut off an entire village on the island's southeast coast, 
and Gov. John D. Waihee declared the town a disaster area. 


These highly publicized lava flows, and those silently lifting Loihi toward the 
surface, result from the peculiar form of volcanic activity occurring in 
Hawaii. 


Most of the 500 active surface volcanoes on Earth straddle the margins of 
continents and the huge plates of rock that fit together like pieces of a 
jigsaw puzzle to make up the planet's surface. 


There are about a dozen of these plates, each of which is about 50 miles thick. 
The plates move relative to each other a few inches a year. Active volcanoes 
tend to occur in zones of under-thrusting, or ""subduction,"" where one plate is 
slipping beneath another. 


How can volcanic activity occur in the Hawaiian Islands, which are more than 
2,000 miles from the nearest plate margin? 


Hawaiian volcanoes are believed to result from a different phenomenon termed 
""hot spot"" volcanism. Geologists theorize that deep under the Pacific plate is 
an exquisitely hot, stationary region termed the ""Hawaiian hot spot."" 


Like a propane torch placed under a moving sheet of plastic, the hot spot melts 
rock in the overriding Pacific plate. The molten rock, or magma, is less dense 
than surrounding solid rock and rises through fractures to spill onto the 
surface or ocean floor. 


Over about 70 million years, the continuous movement of the Pacific plate over 
this stationary ""fountain of fire"" left a trail of more than 80 big volcanoes 
over the floor of the Pacific Ocean. Called the Hawaiian Ridge-Emperor Seamount 
Chain, the islands and undersea mountains, or seamounts, stretch northwestward 
about 4,000 miles, from the Big Island of Hawaii to the Kamchatka Peninsula in 
Soviet territory. 


The five main Hawaiian islands are the tops of volcanic mountains that were 
formed as the Pacific plate moved over the Hawaiian hot spot. 


A scientific record of the plate's movement to the northwest is evident in the 
age of solidified lava left on each of the islands. The age decreases from 
northwest to southeast. Kauai, in the extreme northwest, is 5.6 million years 
old; Oahu is 3.4 million; Molokai is 1.8 million, Maui is 800,000, Hawaii is 
under 700,000 years old. Lava ages even decrease in the same 
northwest-to-southeast fashion on each individual island. 


Continued movement of the Pacific plate promises to give the goddess Pele a new 
home and Hawaii a new island. 


If theories about hot spot volcanism are correct, plate movement eventually 
will carry the Big Island off the Hawaiian hot spot. The two active volcanoes 
on the island, Kilauea and Mauna Loa, will become extinct. The hot spot then 
will pour molten rock onto the surface through the next volcano in the Hawaiian 
chain. 


Experts do not know exactly when Loihi will emerge as a new island. Assuming 
Loihi's growth continues at current rates, it could take from a few thousand to 
a few tens of thousands of years. 


But other fates also may await the infant volcano. 


Infusions of molten rock from the hot spot, for instance, may cease 
unexpectedly. Loihi's growth would be stunted, leaving it just another seamount 
in the chain. The ninth Hawaiian island thus may form in an entirely different 
place. 


There is also the possibility a sudden major undersea eruption could raise 
Loihi to the surface sooner than anyone expects. 

",24,"[ 0.          0.          0.01335043 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
239,"

British researchers have found ""the first unambiguous evidence"" that small 
changes in gravity can precede a volcanic eruption. 


In an article published today in the journal Nature the researchers report that 
gravity increased at the Poas volcano in Costa Rica over a two-year period 
before the volcano erupted in April and May of 1989. The increased gravity was 
thought to result from the intrusion of dense molten rock into the volcanic 
cone. 


Geophysicists Helen Rymer and Geoff Brown of the Open University in Milton 
Keynes, England, believe that measurements of very small changes in gravity -- 
called microgravity -- can be used to predict eruptions of certain types of 
volcanoes like Poas. 


Rymer speculated that Poas may erupt again next April or May. 


Rymer and Brown are also now beginning to monitor microgravity at Mt. Etna in 
Sicily, where the population in the area is threatened by periodic eruptions. 


""Microgravity would seem to be a very promising technique that should be used 
(for predicting volcanic eruptions),"" said geophysicist Dan Dzurisin of the 
U.S. Geological Survey's Cascades Volcano Observatory in Washington. But the 
technique has yet to be tested, in part, because monitoring changes in 
microgravity is an extremely labor-intensive process that cannot be readily 
automated. 


As a result, most studies have measured microgravity changes only at long 
intervals, often simply before and after a volcanic eruption, and the results 
have been open to various interpretations. 


The Rymer and Brown study, in which microgravity was measured at regular 
intervals over a 10-year period, ""represents the first time we can see a 
progression in microgravity over a long period of time"" so that the results are 
much clearer, said geologist Al Eggers of the University of Puget Sound in 
Tacoma, Wash. 


Measuring gravitational changes is extraordinarily exacting, Dzurisin said. The 
accelerometers that are used are highly sensitive and easily get out of 
calibration, he said. It is thus necessary to calibrate the instruments 
frequently by moving them to a site where gravity does not change, requiring a 
constant human presence. 


The process is even more complicated because the accelerometers are sensitive 
to slight changes in elevation -- changes as small as fractions of an inch. (If 
the device is raised an inch, for example, it is that much farther from the 
center of the Earth, so that the pull of gravity is slightly less.) 


Measurements of gravity must be accompanied by highly accurate measurements of 
the level of land at the measurement site so that changes in elevation -- which 
often occur before volcanic eruptions -- are not misinterpreted as actual 
changes in gravity. 


Poas volcano is a classical cone-shaped volcano with a clear, deep (120 to 150 
feet) lake in its center. The lake is normally quite warm, about 104 degrees 
Fahrenheit, indicating that at least some molten rock lies close to the surface 
and heats it. 


After the volcano's last eruption in 1953, the lake filled to its normal depth 
and remained stable for three decades. But in 1983, Rymer said in a telephone 
interview, the lake's level began dropping slowly. 


By 1987, when Rymer and Brown began detecting an increase in microgravity, the 
lake level was dropping much more rapidly. Rymer believes the molten rock, or 
magma, that was causing the gravity to increase was also heating the water and 
making it evaporate faster. 


In June, 1987, geysers of water began erupting and the water level went down 
even faster. By April of this year, the water was gone and the volcano erupted 
in a mile-high cloud of ash. The ash eruptions subsided when spring rains 
re-established the lake, Rymer said, but she believes the volcano may erupt 
again as the lake is depleted during the coming dry season. 


The researchers do not know what happened to gravity levels after the eruption 
because their funding expired at about the same time the volcano erupted. But 
they will go back to Costa Rica in March to take new measurements. 


The lessons learned at Poas may not be applicable everywhere. Although Japanese 
researchers have some preliminary evidence of increases in microgravity before 
volcanic eruptions, Eggers found that microgravity actually decreased at Pacayo 
volcano in Guatemala before an eruption 10 years ago. 


Eggers speculates that the decrease was caused by formation of gaseous pockets 
in the magma. 


Still other volcanoes monitored by Dzurisin and others have shown no apparent 
changes. But it is likely, Dzurisin said, that each volcano has its own 
characteristic pattern of gravity changes and that once those changes are 
known, the pattern can be used for future predictions. 


Furthermore, Rymer noted, both Poas and Mt. Etna are filled with very light 
material, so that the intrusion of magma is more readily detected. In such 
cases, she said, gravity changes should be a particularly useful predictive 
tool. 

",24,"[ 0.          0.          0.01367944 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
240,"     The Mount Pinatubo volcano was slowly rousing from 600 years of sleep.;   
Two months ago, when the drama began, scientists knew almost nothing about
this drowsy Philippine giant, swaddled in thick jungle and ignored by the
hundreds of thousands of people living around its flanks.;    They didn't know
it had a habit of exploding with a force twice as great as the 1980 eruption
of Mount St. Helens in Washington -- or that the debris from these eruptions
had covered much of what was now Clark Air Base.;    But with the first small
signs of trouble, researchers went on alert, throwing a network of instruments
around the restless mountain. And in a few frenzied weeks of investigation,
they learned enough to recommend evacuation of some 84,000 people.;    The
warning came just in time. A series of violent eruptions has rocked the
mountain since Wednesday, blowing ash and pumice 80,000 feet in the air and
sifting volcanic grit over villages 90 miles away. At least 101 people have
been killed, 150,000 Filipinos have crowded into refugee centers in Manila and
20,000 American military dependents and civilian workers are being evacuated
from the country. U.S. officials said the damage may lead them to permanently
close Clark Air Base.;    On Monday, scientists said much of the pressure
inside the volcano had dissipated and the worst may be over.;    Although
Pinatubo never erupted into the cataclysmic blow-up that some had feared, the
damage and death toll from related earthquakes, mudslides and falling ash and
pumice could have been far higher had scientists not recommended evacuation.
The successful forecast points up just how far the science of volcanoes has
come in the past decade.;    The basics are the same. Researchers still use
seismometers and other instruments to measure the trembling, quaking and
bulging of the ground that often spell danger.;    But the technology has
improved immensely:;    (check) Instruments are cheaper and more expendable,
so they can be deployed where they will do the most good -- right in the path
of the volcano's fury.;    (check) The instruments continually beam data to
scientists who are waiting a safe distance away. Before, they had to visit
their instruments and collect the data by hand.;    (check) Information is
routinely analyzed by computer, allowing researchers to assess a situation
quickly -- and to develop computer models for predicting the behavior of
volcanoes.;    Researchers have also made strides in interpreting what they
see. ""Our biggest improvement has been in our own heads,"" said Peter Lipman, a
volcanologist with the U.S. Geological Survey in Menlo Park.;    These skills
were honed in a series of volcanic disasters that rocked the world over the
past decade.;    ""The 1980s was a very interesting decade because of the
number of eruptions that have occurred for which we have good monitoring
information,"" said Steven Brantley, a geologist with the survey's Cascades
Volcano Observatory in Vancouver, Wash. ""It was a rather remarkable decade,
really."";    Scientists say the eruption of Mount St. Helens, which killed 57
people and caused $1 billion in property damage, triggered a renaissance in
volcano research.;    It alerted the American public to volcano hazards and
prompted a tenfold increase in government spending for volcano research and
monitoring, said geologist Robert Tilling of USGS in Menlo Park.;    As a
result, the survey opened two new volcano observatories. One, in Washington,
keeps track of active volcanoes in the Cascades Range of the Pacific Northwest
and Northern California, including Mount St. Helens, Mount Rainier, Mount
Hood, Mount Baker, Mount Shasta and Mount Lassen. The second is in Alaska,
where Redoubt Volcano put on a spectacular show in 1989 and 1990. A third
observatory has been operating in Hawaii since 1912.;    American scientists
have since responded to a number of volcanic awakenings throughout the world,
from Galunggung in Indonesia to Nevado del Ruiz in Colombia, improving their
ability to quickly evaluate volcano hazards. Such a quick response is crucial
because only a few dozen of the world's 500 active volcanoes have been
adequately investigated and monitored.;    ""Now,"" Tilling said, ""we can go in
there and literally overnight set up a seismic network, and start getting data
within a day or two."";    The blossoming research has in turn spurred
development of cheaper and more rugged instruments.;    Take tiltmeters.;   
Like glorified carpenters' levels, they are used to measure the bulging and
tilting of the ground as magma muscles its way toward the surface.;    A
decade ago they cost thousands of dollars each. But after Mount St. Helens
blew, scientists looked for cheaper models. One was developed by James
Westphal, a well-known astronomer and gadgeteer at the California Institute of
Technology, who patterned it after an idea used in missile guidance systems.
Now tiltmeters are inexpensive enough to place in areas likely to get wiped
out in eruptions.;    The humble seismometer has also grown more useful as
scientists learn to better interpret what it's saying.;    ""Volcanoes are
probably the most complex structures you can find on this planet,"" said
Bernard Chouet, a seismologist at the USGS in Menlo Park.;    It's not unusual
for them to produce thousands of small earthquakes -- but those quakes can
have a variety of causes. Most are innocuous, caused by the cracking of rock
above pools of magma that, for the moment, aren't going anywhere. But others
are ominous, reflecting the surge of magma toward the surface in preparation
for an eruption.;    In the past few years, Chouet said, seismologists have
learned to recognize distinctive tremors that mean an eruption is on its way.
These patterns were successfully used to forecast the 1989 eruption of Redoubt
Volcano in Alaska, as well as the current eruptions at Pinatubo.;    But even
though volcano warnings have proved far more accurate than earthquake
forecasts, they're far from foolproof.;    Some volcanoes give virtually no
warning. Even when they do, the decision to evacuate is difficult and
expensive. In the Philippines, for instance, vandals looted parts of Clark Air
Base that were left unguarded. Factories and businesses shut down; crops and
livestock were left unattended.;    This time the evacuation paid off,
possibly averting a number of deaths. But it won't always. In the end, every
volcano is a rugged individualist, with its own distinct patterns of activity.
Some wake up, make threatening noises for weeks or months, then drift back to
sleep.;    The burden of deciding whether to warn the public weighs heavily on
scientists.;    Randall White, another seismologist with the USGS in Menlo
Park, recalled how he felt while working near the freezing summit of
Colombia's Nevado del Ruiz six years ago.;    Struggling to hear their
instruments above the noise of nearby broadcast towers, he and his colleagues
warned local officials that an eruption was on its way. But their warnings
were vain. For reasons that are still unclear, the officials did not order an
evacuation, and 22,000 people died after lava spewed from the volcano, melting
glaciers and forming devastating mudslides.;    ""I found it nerve-racking,""
White said. ""We were literally afraid to go to sleep at night, thinking that
some technician would get the interpretation (of the incoming data) wrong, and
a lot of people would die."";  Tools give clues that can save lives;    The
basic tools of volcano monitoring are cheaper and more portable than they were
10 years ago. Scientists can move in fast and set up instruments that
continually broadcast readings, which are then analyzed by computer. This
allows quicker evaluation of volcano hazards -- and forecasts that can save
lives.; 1. Surveying: Researchers measure the volcano, with optical
instruments or high-tech laser tools, to see if it is bulging or stretching as
a result of magma rising inside. They also put tiltmeters near the volcano's
vent to record changes in the slope of the ground.; 2. Pick and shovel:
Geologists dig through layers of old ash and lava to determine how often a
volcano erupted in the past -- a clue to what it might do in the future. The
thicker and more extensive the deposit, the bigger the eruption.; 3.
Seismometer: Measures ground shaking. Volcanoes often produce swarms of small
earthquakes. Researchers are learning to distinguish ordinary earthquakes from
those caused by magma rising toward the surface -- a sign of impending
eruption.; 4. Spectrometer: First developed to measure pollutants from factory
smokestacks, it is now also used to measure sulfur dioxide in the smoke
belched by volcanoes. Increasing levels of the gas may signal an impending
eruption. The amount of gas reflects the amount of magma beneath the volcano,
and thus the potential size of the eruption.;    Sources: Robert Tilling and
Steven Brantley, U.S. Geological Survey: "" The Earth,"" by Peter J. Smith.;
Reporting by Glennda Chui, graphic by Jenny Anderson and Kevin Boyd - Mercury
News.; (3 Drawings showing Laser, Pick, Seismometer and Spectrometer)  ",24,"[ 0.55554015  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
241,"     In Japan, heavy rain sent tons of mud and volcanic debris cascading down
Mount Unzen, washing away or damaging at least 70 empty houses and slightly
injuring one fleeing resident, officials said today.;    Weather forecasters
predicted continuing rain in the area.;    In the Philippines, 4,795-foot
Mount Pinatubo is in its fourth week of eruptions after being dormant 600
years. Officials say 338 people have been killed during the eruptions.;   
Volcanologist Julio Sabit said low-frequency tremors, similar to those
observed prior to major eruptions three weeks ago, preceded the ash ejection
this morning.;    Authorities warned residents to be alert for high walls of
flowing volcanic ash, boulders and debris that move rapidly downstream and can
bury whole towns in their path.;    Mudflows hit settlements near the towns of
Porac and Florida Blanca, about 40 miles northwest of Manila.;    Witnesses
said houses were buried up to their rooftops and an undetermined number of
cattle were killed.;    There were sketchy reports today of similar mudflows
in the Balintawak River northwest of the volcano but poor communications made
it impossible to verify the reports.;    Defense Secretary Fidel Ramos,
chairman of the National Disaster Coordinating Council, said crews were
deepening river channels near the volcano in hopes of preventing spillovers.; 
  The eruptions severely damaged the U.S.-run Clark Air Base and Subic Bay
Naval Base, raising doubts over their future. The lease on the bases expires
Sept. 16, and talks resume here this month in an effort to reach an agreement
on a possible extension.;    U.S. officials said today they expect to complete
a damage assessment of the bases by July 9.;    The Philippine government has
also not completed its assessment of overall damage, which was extensive.
Agriculture Secretary Senen Bacani said today that damage to crops alone was
$15 million.;    Near Mount Unzen in Japan, the flow of mud, almost 450 feet
wide, started Sunday and was knee-deep today in an abandoned residential area
along the Mizunashi River.;    Many residents along the river left their homes
after Mount Unzen erupted in early June, killing 41 people. About 1,200 people
were evacuated from the area Sunday as rain swept ash and basketball-size
rocks down three rivers.;    By this afternoon, the mudflow had reached
Shimabara port, five miles east of the 4,485-foot volcano, police said. It
wrecked a bridge and partially blocked a road and a railway as it swept
through Shimabara, a city of 45,000 residents, said a Nagasaki police
officer.;    The observatory monitoring Mount Unzen said volcanic debris still
covering the east side of the mountain lends itself to landslides. It said the
volcano is still spewing out gas, rocks and ash.;    About 9,000 people have
been evacuated from the foot of Mount Unzen.;    Mount Unzen, 610 miles
southwest of Tokyo, erupted Nov. 17 for the first time in 198 years.;    Unzen
was the site of Japan's worst volcanic disaster, which killed about 15,000
people in 1792.  ",24,"[ 0.57251775  0.01137268  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
242,"     In tropical regions, said atmospheric scientist Brian Toon, ""green suns and
blue moons are probably being seen now"" because of the volcanic plume being
carried by stratospheric winds.;    In the fall, throughout the Northern
Hemisphere, ""it will be extremely obvious to the ordinary person. At sunrise
and sunset, the horizon will have a glowing purplish color."";    Drivers
heading toward the sun will see extra-intense glare. And airliners' windows
may be etched by acid, as happened after the 1982 eruption of Mexico's El
Chichon volcano, said Toon, of the National Aeronautics and Space
Administration's Ames Research Center in Mountain View. Sulfuric acid in the
air comes from huge amounts of sulfur dioxide released by the volcano.;   
Last month's eruption of Mount Pinatubo produced a massive cloud of dust,
sulfur dioxide and other gases that rose into the stratosphere, reaching
altitudes between 80,000 and 120,000 feet. The plume is at least twice as
large as El Chichon's, Toon said, and probably will remain aloft for years.;  
 Jim Lynch, of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, is
tracking the plume using instruments aboard the Nimbus-7 satellite. He said,
""All indications are that this eruption has exceeded El Chichon by two or
three times."";    Toon said that in the past 80 years, there have been only
three volcanic eruptions that might have global climatic impact -- El Chichon
in Mexico; Agung, which erupted in Bali in 1963; and Pinatubo.;    The cloud
now covers a zone 30 degrees north and 30 degrees south of the equator, so
almost 50 percent of the globe is blanketed.;    ""We're expecting it to stay
around for about five years. With time it will spread north and south from
where it is,"" Lynch said.;    Whether climatic cooling will result from
Pinatubo's eruption is not known, scientists said. El Chichon may have caused
a fraction of a degree of global cooling, but researchers are still unsure. El
Chichon's eruption coincided with an El Nino climatic event, which may have
reversed or accentuated the volcanic effects. Another El Nino seems to have
started recently, scientists said.;    An El Nino event -- which involves
periodic warming of the Pacific Ocean's surface waters -- can severely disturb
normal climate.  ",24,"[ 0.37294243  0.0138606   0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
243,"
   Federal Reserve Chairman Alan Greenspan,
looking back on his work for Lincoln Savings and Loan Association,
says he doesn't believe he could have foreseen the thrift's
spectacular failure, expected to be the costliest in the nation's
history.
   Nearly five years ago, Greenspan testified before Congress as a
private consultant and lobbied regulators on behalf of Lincoln and
its owner, Phoenix, Ariz., millionaire Charles H. Keating Jr.
   Keating objected to federal regulations restricting thrift
institutions' direct investments in real estate development.
Greenspan, a conservative economist generally opposed to government
meddling in business, supported him.
   In an interview last week, Greenspan said he was surprised and
distressed by Lincoln's eventual failure because of sour real
estate deals. But he said he still supports short-term direct
investments when thrifts are exposed to interest rate risks.
   Supporters of direct investments have long argued that they can
benefit S&amp;Ls struggling with a portfolio of long-term mortgages.
   ``I look back and I say to myself, `Was there something I should
have seen and didn't see?' and the answer is, `There was nothing
visible _ at least to me,''' Greenspan said.
   In early 1985, Irvine, Calif.-based Lincoln was a fast-growing
institution under aggressive managers who eschewed traditional
home-mortgage lending. Greenspan was a private economist with
impressive political credentials as President Ford's chief economic
adviser a decade earlier.
   Now, Lincoln is insolvent and under government control.
Regulators say it will cost taxpayers $2 billion to protect its
depositors, making it the nation's largest S&amp;L failure.
   Greenspan is no longer a private consultant and, suddenly, his
five-year-old statements loom large. As chairman of the Federal
Reserve Board, he is considered by many to be, after the president,
the most powerful official in the nation. The Fed influences daily
life, perhaps more than any other government agency, through its
manipulation of the economy and credit.
   In a Feb. 13, 1985, letter to the Federal Home Loan Bank of San
Francisco, Greenspan argued that Lincoln deserved an exemption from
regulations limiting to 10 percent thrifts' direct investment in
real estate and other commercial ventures.
   Lincoln's management, he said, was ``seasoned and expert in
selecting and making direct investments'' with ``a long and
continuous track record of outstanding success.'' The institution
itself was ``financially strong,'' in a ``vibrant and healthy
state'' and ``present(ed) no foreseeable risk to the Federal
Savings and Loan Insurance Corp.,'' he said.
   Two weeks later, on Feb. 27, 1985, Greenspan told the House
Government Operations subcommittee on consumer, commerce and
monetary affairs that direct investments, while undoubtedly risky,
were essential for thrifts to diversify their holdings.
   Traditional S&amp;Ls, which took in short-term deposits and made
long-term mortgage loans, were vulnerable to a sharp rise in
interest rates and direct investments were a valuable alternative,
he said.
   He also endorsed a study by economist George Bentsen, now with
Emory University, which cited the success of 17 S&amp;Ls in direct
investments. Fifteen of the 17 have since failed.
   ``It was my view then, as it is now, that interest rate risk was
the crucial problem confronting S&amp;Ls _ the problem of long-term
assets financed by short-term deposits. In that particular context,
at that particular time, direct investment would reduce risk,'' he
said.
   Greenspan still believes Bentsen took a ``rather sensible
statistical approach'' but he points out that most of the 17 S&amp;Ls
cited in his study were located in Texas, later the center of the
oil and real estate bust.
   The central bank chairman's views have been cited as one of the
reasons why a petition, calling on S&amp;L regulators to postpone
direct investment limits, attracted 225 signatures in the House in
early 1985.
   It is also being cited as a reason why, two years later, five
senators decided to intervene with S&amp;L regulators after Keating
complained about their efforts to examine Lincoln's finances.
   The five _ Alan Cranston, D-Calif.; Dennis DeConcini, D-Ariz.;
Donald W. Riegle Jr., D-Mich.; John Glenn, D-Ohio, and John McCain,
R-Ariz. _ met with the regulators in April 1987.
   Two of them _ Cranston and McCain _ said Greenspan's views on
Lincoln's health heavily influenced their thinking.
   ``The problem, as conveyed to me at the time, not only by Mr.
Keating but also by Mr. Greenspan and Arthur Young &amp; Co. (an
accounting firm) was that federal examiners bore substantial
responsibility for creating a most destructive and irrational state
of limbo for this institution,'' Cranston told the Senate Ethics
Committee in a Nov. 16 letter.
   Greenspan said he does not understand why the senators cite his
opinion as a reason for actions taken so long after it was given.
   ``You do not rely on a 2{-year-old letter unless you call the
guy who wrote it. No one ever called me,'' he said.
   Greenspan, as president of Townsend Greenspan &amp; Co., was hired
to review Lincoln's condition by the New York law firm of Paul
Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton &amp; Garrison. He said he could not remember
how much he was paid for his work, but said he charged his usual
hourly rate.
   The partners of the law firm, he said, were long-time, trusted
associates. ``They certainly never gave me the slightest impression
that these were other than good people'' at Lincoln.
   Greenspan said he recalls meeting Keating himself two or three
times, but never for a detailed, analytical discussion. The people
working under Keating ``frankly I found fairly impressive,'' he
said.
",25,"[ 0.39328924  0.00871386  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
244,"
In his youth, Mr Alan Greenspan, the Federal Reserve chairman, was a
disciple of Ayn Rand, the ultra right-wing American novelist and philosopher
who stressed the moral, as opposed to economic, virtues of full-blown
capitalism.
According to Time magazine, in an article for Rand's journal the
Objectivist, Mr Greenspan once argued that the welfare state was 'nothing
more than a mechanism by which governments confiscate the wealth of the
productive members of society'. This was probably just youthful indiscretion
but Mr Greenspan is now having to adapt to an intellectual climate far
removed from Rand's social Darwinism.
This is not proving all that difficult. Mr Greenspan has always drawn a
sharp distinction between his private views and his duties as a public
servant. Although appointed to the Fed in 1987 by President Ronald Reagan,
he has never been publicly associated with radical conservatism. Having
served in the mid-1970s as chairman of Gerald Ford's Council of Economic
Advisers, he is seen as a moderate Republican. At the Fed he has built a
reputation for non-partisan professionalism; only the odd hint of his
personal philosophy emerges, as, for example, in his opposition to any form
of capital gains tax.
President Bill Clinton and Mr Greenspan are circling each other warily. Mr
Clinton has stressed his support for the Fed's independence; Mr Greenspan
has promised to co-operate with the White House and has publicly praised the
president's deficit-cutting plan. However, as one of the few remaining
conservatives with real power, Mr Greenspan has become a target for
congressional Democrats. In recent hearings, he was denounced for failing to
cut interest rates quickly enough during the recession and for refusing to
pledge further easing of monetary policy in response to fresh efforts to
curb the deficit.
At times, as senators adopted the sarcastic tone of prosecuting attorneys,
the hearings took on an almost surreal aspect. Oblivious to encouraging data
(such as growth at an annual rate of 3.8 per cent in the fourth quarter), Mr
Paul Sarbanes of Maryland acted as if the Fed chief were on trial for crimes
against the state. When Mr Greenspan had the temerity to defend his record,
the prosecutor reeled off the names of eminent economists - such as Nobel
prize-winners Milton Friedman, James Tobin and Paul Samuelson - who had
publicly criticised him for doing 'too little too late'.
The attack on Mr Greenspan's economic competence was wholly unjustified.
With hindsight he has navigated treacherous economic seas with great skill.
He courageously raised interest rates in the late 1980s, thereby setting in
motion disinflationary forces. But he was sensitive to the risk of a
1930s-style financial meltdown and subsequently brought rates down faster
than conventional wisdom abroad (although not at home) thought desirable,
thus laying the ground for a quite vigorous recovery.
Of course, Mr Greenspan's curriculum vitae does not compare with those of
armchair theorists such as Friedman, Tobin and Samuelson. He has published
little and was finally awarded a PhD by New York University only in 1977 -
after he had served three years as chief economist under President Ford.
Indeed, by the silly standards applied to Mr Clinton's appointees, Mr
Greenspan was not qualified to be CEA chairman. Instead of seeking a
university chair, young Mr Greenspan founded his own Wall Street consultancy
and spent decades analysing the minutia of business cycles, in the process
gaining more practical wisdom than half a dozen professors.
Having handled the recession adroitly, he now faces even tougher challenges.
With inflationary pressures still low and the economy only just beginning to
gather momentum, monetary policy is currently tight enough. But if Mr
Greenspan wants to be remembered as the first Fed chairman for a generation
to secure something approaching price stability, he may need to raise
short-term interest rates substantially in coming years, certainly by 1995.
The scene is thus set for a bitter tussle of power with the Clinton
administration, which is unlikely to be enthusiastic about a sharp
tightening of monetary policy ahead of the next election.
Yet there is a more insidious threat. Since the US has never suffered a
hyperinflation, there is little popular support for Fed independence. Some
of Democrats are pressing for legislation that would increase Congress's
leverage over monetary policy. Democrats have long been unhappy about the
role played by the presidents of the Fed's regional branches. Often
monetarist by inclination, the regional presidents have five of the 12 votes
on the Federal Open Market Committee (the body that determines the level of
short-term interest rates). Yet, unlike Washington-based Fed governors, they
are not selected by the White House or subject to congressional
confirmation.
Mr Clinton may mean what he says about Fed independence. But if the
electoral cycle proves more important, Mr Greenspan and his board (all
Reagan/Bush appointees) will face a painful dilemma. If the Fed resists
pressure for expansionary monetary policies, it may end up subject to
greater political control; if it does not, it risks higher inflation. It is
not an inspiring outlook for a man who prefers crunching data to playing
political poker.
",25,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
245,"
As US interest rates rose another notch this week, traders in London and
other European financial centres were reminded that the German Bundesbank is
not the only star in the monetary firmament. The US Federal Reserve is still
the world's most powerful central bank and its decision to start tightening
monetary policy while many of America's trading partners are still
economically depressed has sent shivers through bond markets from New York
to Tokyo.
It has also irritated the White House, which believes the Fed may be
overreacting to what are still only tentative signs of mild upward pressure
on inflation. Last week, President Bill Clinton summoned Mr Alan Greenspan,
the Fed chairman, to the White House for talks on economic policy. In
financial markets the ill-timed meeting was seen (perhaps unfairly) as a
blatant attempt to put pressure on Mr Greenspan. The Fed would probably have
increased rates anyway this week, but the administration's clumsy
intervention settled matters since inaction would have raised doubts about
the Fed's independence.
Critics fear that a tighter US monetary policy will slow the pace of
economic recovery which, on Main Street, is seen as having only just got
going. US banks are already raising their prime lending rates and mortgage
rates are up sharply, reflecting the steep increase in bond yields. The
Fed's action need not have much impact on growth overseas, but probably will
because European central banks are reluctant to see their currencies
depreciate against the dollar. To prevent depreciation, they may postpone or
abandon planned rate cuts.
Although the White House and the Fed disagree on policy, there is little
sign of personal animosity. As policymakers Mr Clinton and Mr Greenspan
share a love of detail; there is every sign that the White House appreciates
the quality of Mr Greenspan's economic advice, which many regard as the best
available in Washington. The Fed chief, a Reagan appointee in a city run by
Democrats, has also deliberately courted the Clintons. He sat next to
Hillary Rodham Clinton during the presentation of the White House economic
plan to Congress last year and subsequently pronounced the deficit-cutting
measures 'credible'.
Since the plan included the biggest tax increase on the wealthy in decades,
conservatives were infuriated. It seemed a strange lapse for a former
disciple of Ayn Rand, the ultra-libertarian author. But it stood Mr
Greenspan, a canny political operator, in good stead. So far, Mr Clinton has
refused to support congressional calls for legislation to reduce the Fed's
independence. And he has offered only lukewarm support for a Treasury plan
to strip the Fed of its powers as a bank regulator. Even on interest rates,
Mr Clinton is showing more restraint than George Bush, so far expressing
only mild misgivings in public about Fed policy.
Mr Greenspan has thus played his cards shrewdly. Administration officials
doubtless also appreciate the fact that the Fed chief, the most powerful
figure in international finance, is so willing to keep out of the public
eye. A fixture on the Washington media and political cocktail circuit (his
girlfriend Ms Andrea Mitchell is a reporter for NBC television), he often
meets privately with journalists. But he refuses to give on-the-record
interviews and unlike other top economic officials he never appears on TV
shows. The public knows him mainly through his dry, rather technical
testimony before congressional committees. The image he cultivates is of a
courteous, knowledgeable and pragmatic civil servant.
Occasionally, however, Mr Greenspan lets slip his private views and these
suggest a more radical temperament. For example, he advocates the abolition
of capital gains tax - not a view shared by many moderate Republicans. And
he recently shocked Democrats by admitting he was a bit of a gold bug. He
claimed that the gold price was a good indicator of inflation pressures and
even expressed nostalgia for the financial rigour induced by the 19th
century Gold Standard.
His views on the role of central banks are sometimes misunderstood. When Mr
Gordon Brown, the UK shadow chancellor, passed through Washington recently,
he naturally called on Mr Greenspan. Mr Brown's aides came out of the
meeting deeply impressed - Mr Greenspan apparently said the task of a
central banks was to promote economic growth as well as to control
inflation, thus distancing himself from the sterner rhetoric of his European
colleagues.
Sensitive to his audience, Mr Greenspan probably failed to add that his
recipe for stimulating growth is to push for zero inflation or 'price
stability' - not a policy that the British Labour party is likely to
endorse. Mr Greenspan defines price stability as inflation so low that it
can be ignored because it no longer interferes with the microeconomic role
of relative prices in guiding resource allocation. He does not think the US
has yet reached this goal even though many economists believe the true rate
of inflation is lower than the 2.5 per cent to 3 per cent shown by the
consumer price index.
If Mr Greenspan fears anything more than inflation, it is financial
instability. He reacted to the 1987 stock market crash in textbook fashion
by making unlimited liquidity available to endangered financial
institutions. He cut interest rates more rapidly in the early 1990s than
most central banks thought prudent because he feared the combination of
excessive borrowing in the 1980s and falling real estate prices might
threaten the stability of the US banking system. With hindsight the Fed's
policy looks finely judged: the US has emerged strongly from recession and
inflation, so far, has stayed subdued.
Cutting interest rates is easy. But Mr Greenspan has now embarked on what
may prove a long upward path. During the recession his 'gradualist' approach
 -lots of small quarter or, occasionally, half point interest rate cuts -
worked well. If the financial markets discounted future cuts all well and
good: share and bond prices simply surged, providing an additional economic
stimulus. But Mr Greenspan is now discovering that gradualism on the way up
is a little more problematic.
The Fed hoped that by raising short-term rates promptly it would convince
markets that it was serious about preventing a resurgence of inflation as
the recovery matures. In theory greater confidence that inflation would
remain low ought to have countered upward pressure on long bond yields
caused by higher borrowing needs as companies expand capacity to meet
increased demand. But this has not happened mainly because markets are
betting that Mr Greenspan's gradualist strategy will involve many future
rate rises.
Some Wall Street analysts are urging the Fed to act more boldly. If, instead
of nudging rates higher, Mr Greenspan quickly raised rates to a 'neutral'
level consistent with sustainable non-inflationary growth, say 4-5 per cent,
markets might regain their composure. On this view, nothing is more
destabilising than the present 'drip drip' approach which critics dub
Chinese water torture.
While occasionally quibbling with his judgments, Wall Street nevertheless
regards Mr Greenspan as a class act. He has more than filled the shoes of
his admired predecessor Paul Volcker, partly because he brought diverse
qualities to the top Fed job: intimate knowledge of financial markets
gleaned from decades as a Wall Street consultant, mastery of economic
theory, and prior experience in public service - during the mid-1970s he was
chairman of Gerald Ford's council of economic advisers.
None of the people mentioned by Clinton aides as possible successors can
match this experience - another reason why nerves are on edge in financial
markets. For example, Mr Robert Rubin, the director of the National Economic
Council, is a respected former co-chairman of Goldman Sachs, but he lacks Mr
Greenspan's economic expertise. Mr Larry Summers, the Treasury
undersecretary, is another potential candidate, but he lacks practical
experience of financial markets. And although he was an economics professor
he has a reputation as an inflation dove.
Mr Greenspan's critics should perhaps realise that the financial outlook
would be darker if he were less eager to nip inflation in the bud. US
interest rates might not be rising now, but if the economy was allowed to
hurtle into capacity constraints, they would eventually be forced into the
stratosphere. Unless Mr Clinton makes an inspired choice (which could
involve reaching out to a Republican), the expiration in 1996 of Mr
Greenspan's second term as Fed chairman could spell the end of a long period
of US monetary stability.
",25,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
246,"     With his television set tuned to Cable News Network, a phone line open to
the White House and an aide poised by his elbow to provide the latest economic
statistics, Greenspan is playing the role of wartime Washington policy-maker
to the hilt.;    Indeed, unlike his predecessor, the prickly and standoffish
Paul A. Volcker, Greenspan has developed close ties to the White House and has
quietly become a key economic adviser to President Bush.;    Greenspan's
influence over White House economic policy became clear during President
Bush's State of the Union address, when Bush announced that he was tapping
Greenspan to lead a new commission to study a controversial proposal to cut
the tax rate for capital gains.;    The appointment will plunge Greenspan --
himself a strong supporter of a cut in capital gains tax rates -- directly
into the middle of a raging political debate between the president and
Congress over tax policy.;    By any standard, Fed-watchers say Greenspan is
taking on a role that is almost unprecedented in modern times. Most say they
cannot recall any time the Fed chief has been asked to step so directly into
the middle of such a political controversy.;    ""Whenever there are major
economic decisions to be made, (Greenspan) is in on them,"" a delighted Fed
official said. ""His voice is listened to."";    But even before his new capital
gains study begins, it is clear Greenspan has chosen to side with the
administration in the battle over fiscal policy. Soon after the war began, the
Fed chairman signaled he planned to cut interest rates further in order to
ease the credit crunch that seems to be prolonging the economic slump.;    On
Feb. 1, he moved decisively, chopping the Fed's key discount rate to 6 percent
from 6.5 percent. It was the second time in six weeks Greenspan had turned to
this key anti-recession weapon, the heaviest in the Fed's arsenal.;    While
such actions may be justified on economic grounds, they also conveniently jibe
with what the administration wants from the Fed. Secretary of the Treasury
Nicholas Brady, who frequently criticized Greenspan last year for not moving
quickly enough, has been noticeably silent on Fed policy.;    Greenspan's
responsiveness on interest rates, his apparent eagerness to join the
administration's fight on capital gains -- and Bush's decision to place the
capital gains issue in his hands -- show just how close Greenspan's relations
with the White House have become.;    It also may signal that Greenspan, who
will turn 65 in March, is almost certain to be reappointed as chairman when
his current term expires next summer.;    Indeed, Fed-watchers say the only
parallel in history to Greenspan's close relations with the White House came
in the days of another wartime central banker, Mariner S. Eccles, the Fed
chairman who stood beside President Franklin D. Roosevelt during World War
II.;    ""I think Bush is turning more and more to him for economic advice,""
says Lawrence Kudlow, an economist and senior managing director at Bear
Stearns in New York. ""There seems to be a real interesting power shift going
on, with Greenspan becoming more and more influential."";    It wasn't always
that way. During most of Bush's first two years in office, the administration
and the Fed chairman were virtually in a state of war.;    Brady and White
House Chief of Staff John Sununu criticized him repeatedly for refusing to
push interest rates down -- a move Greenspan insisted might send interest
rates even higher by making financial markets fearful that the Fed was
abandoning the inflation fight.;    There were even some hints that Bush had
decided not to reappoint Greenspan to the Fed chairmanship. Some close to the
president reported that he had all but announced that to intimates in
mid-1990.;    Yet now, with the war under way at a time when the recession has
yet to abate, Greenspan finds himself trying to perform an increasingly
difficult balancing act.;    At the same time he is seeking to be a player in
setting White House policy, he must also guide the Fed through an economic
minefield -- the booby-traps of war, recession, bank failures, soaring budget
deficits and crashing consumer confidence.;    Clearly, Greenspan, a longtime
Washington insider with good political instincts, hopes to keep economic
policy in sync with the nation's military strategy -- hoping to calm both the
financial markets and the public in order to help keep the wartime economy
stable.;    But critics are cautious about charging that Greenspan is
politicizing the Fed in any way.;    ""It is hard to know whether he is
accommodating the White House or if this is just the sensible thing to do,""
says Allan Meltzer, an economist at Carnegie-Mellon University in Pittsburgh
and a longtime Fed-watcher.;    Moreover, even if he wants to please the White
House, Greenspan still can't appear overly eager to loosen the Fed's reins. He
must still appease the hard-liners within the Fed who remain concerned about
inflation.;    As a result, critics have noticed gleefully that Greenspan --
uncharacteristically, Fed-watchers say -- has made some seemingly conflicting
statements on the direction of interest rates and monetary policy in recent
weeks.;    ""I've noticed a real change in the message from one day to the
next,"" Meltzer says.;    Still, most analysts believe that, despite the
confusing message, Greenspan is now solidly in favor of easing interest rates
further -- a position that clearly has made him more welcome at the White
House.;    Observers note that Greenspan, who ran his own economic consulting
firm before coming to the Fed to replace Volcker in 1987, is ideally suited to
the role of gray eminence -- of a senior behind-the-scenes adviser.;    In
fact, he played such a role on a more official basis during the Ford
administration, when he served as the president's chief economic adviser.;   
It was during the Ford administration in the mid-1970s that Greenspan first
came to know Bush, who served in a series of posts under Ford, including
director of the Central Intelligence Agency.;    ""That's really his forte,
providing one-on-one advice,"" says Robert Kavesh, an economics professor at
New York University and a Greenspan friend since they were college classmates
at New York University in the late 1940s.;    ""He's a low-key guy who is at
his best in a private situations where he can quietly exchange views. And I
think Bush is someone who is open to that kind of advice.""  ",25,"[ 0.54420873  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
247,"     ""What are they waiting for? Does it mean that something's up?"" asks William
Dudley, senior economist at Goldman Sachs &amp; Co.;    Delaying reappointment,
say some analysts, is the Bush administration's way of keeping Greenspan on
tenterhooks and making sure the central bank doesn't assert its independence
too strongly.;    Dudley says the fact that Greenspan hasn't been reappointed
with six weeks left in his term ""does raise legitimate questions"" about the
Bush administration's intentions.;    Bush and his advisers have often
criticized Greenspan's Fed and have implied that the central bank waited too
long to cut interest rates at the start of the recession last summer. And, in
recent weeks, there have been vague rumors in the financial markets that the
administration may seek to replace Greenspan.;    One name that has popped up
as a prospective candidate is Martin Feldstein, the former chairman of
President Reagan's Council of Economic Advisers. He is rumored to be
interested in the Fed chairmanship and supposedly has some backing from within
the Bush administration.;    Feldstein didn't return several telephone calls
to his office in Cambridge, Mass., where he is president of the National
Bureau of Economic Research.;    However, David Jones, economist at Aubrey G.
Lanston &amp; Co., says the idea of Feldstein as Fed chairman is ""a little
far-fetched."";    ""There's nobody in the wings, in the way that Greenspan was
in the wings"" when former Fed Chairman Paul Volcker was being considered for
reappointment, says Jones.;    Volcker was reappointed June 18, 1983, after
considerable public debate. Then-President Reagan's Treasury secretary, Donald
Regan, opposed Volcker's reappointment, but Volcker's popularity in the
financial community pushed Reagan into giving him four more years.;   
Greenspan also holds the confidence of the financial community.;    ""It's hard
to fault his performance, in terms of his pushing for an ease, while
maintaining the credibility of the Fed,"" says Goldman's Dudley.;    Even so,
the June 18 date Volcker was reappointed was viewed late and that date has
long since passed for Greenspan. Some analysts note, too, that Joint Chiefs of
Staff Chairman Gen. Colin Powell, whose term wasn't up until October, has
already been reappointed.;    ""There are reasons to ask questions"" about
whether a Fed chairman should be retained, says Carol Stone, senior economist
at Nomura Securities International Inc. ""After all, we've had a recession."";  
 Indeed, the U.S. economy has been locked in a recession since July 1990.;   
But few economists lay the recession at the Fed's doorstep and, Stone says,
""The level of satisfaction (with Greenspan) is certainly sufficient to keep
him on."";    Jones of Lanston, a firm noted for its Fed connections, says his
""sources inside the Fed say nobody feels anything other than that Greenspan
will be reappointed."";    If reappointed, Greenspan would have to go through
another round of confirmation hearings before the Senate Banking Committee.;  
 But a Fed spokesman in Washington says those hearings could be scheduled for
a date after the Aug. 11 end of the chairman's first term, provided the
president said he wanted Greenspan to carry on.;    Technically, that means
Greenspan could be kept in limbo until after his mid-July Humphrey-Hawkins
testimony, where he will give the central bank's economic outlook for the rest
of the year. No date has been set as yet for the semi-annual Humphrey-Hawkins
hearing.;    A reappointment delay would sustain the administration's pressure
on the Fed chairman not to say or do anything particularly depressing in
regard to economic growth.;    ""By delaying the reappointment, the
administration is able to put considerable political heat on Greenspan,"" says
Jones. ""They can lean on him a little more strongly."";    Certainly, there's
been heat on the Fed in the last few months from the administration and from
private analysts.  ",25,"[ 0.54689054  0.0196903   0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
248,"
   In a surprise move, President Reagan announced yesterday that Paul Volcker had declined a third term as the chairman of the Federal Reserve Board and that he would nominate Alan Greenspan to replace him as the chief of the nation's central bank. 

   By picking Mr. Greenspan, who headed the Council of Economic Advisers under President Ford, Mr. Reagan signed on a man who comes as close as anyone to enjoying Mr. Volcker's credibility in financial markets. 
The 61-year-old economist is expected to generally pursue policies on inflation, interest rates and economic growth that may appear almost indistinguishable from Mr. Volcker's. 

   Even so, Mr. Greenspan faces a daunting challenge in proving to the financial markets that he is a worthy replacement for the outgoing Fed chief. 
The bond market, reacting to the news that Mr. Volcker won't stay on, took its worst pounding in years. 
The dollar also plunged yesterday against all major currencies. 
The stock market, however, ended only modestly lower, apparently banking on the notion that the Fed's policies won't change significantly. 
The commodity markets, sensing a possible resurgence of inflation, rose sharply. 

   ""Volcker is sort of a financial demigod, and it's hard for anybody who's new to develop that stature,"" notes Robert Hormats, a vice president of Goldman, Sachs &amp; Co. 
As for Mr. Greenspan, Mr. Hormats adds, ""The markets are going to feel him out."" 

   The new Fed chief also will face political pressures. 
Some Republicans think that Mr. Greenspan may be more accommodating politically during next year's presidential campaign. 
A former top Reagan administration official says Mr. Greenspan will probably be ""a shade"" less likely than the 59-year-old Mr. Volcker to tighten credit and drive up interest rates while the Republicans are trying to retain the White House. 

   Moreover, Mr. Greenspan, who currently heads the New York economic consulting firm of Townsend-Greenspan &amp; Co., will head a diverse seven-member board that has shown it no longer automatically follows the chairman's lead. 

   But Mr. Greenspan is known as a skilled political operator -- even more so than Mr. Volcker, who is widely admired for his political acumen. 
In 1983, Mr. Greenspan gained praise for his role in helping forge a compromise to shore up the Social Security system. 
He was also one of two men -- the other was Henry Kissinger -- who negotiated on former President Ford's behalf at the 1980 Republican Convention when Mr. Ford was seeking the No. 2 spot on the GOP ticket. 

   Mr. Greenspan undoubtedly recognizes that his worst political mistake would be to appear a lackey of the White House. 
Jerry Jasinowski, the chief economist of the National Association of Manufacturers, says Mr. Greenspan may be forced ""to out-Volcker Volcker,"" at least at first, by adopting a tough anti-inflation policy aimed at bolstering the dollar and his own credibility. 
Volcker associates, predicting that Mr. Greenspan will try to mold himself in the Volcker image, hailed the nomination. 

   ""I think it's an excellent appointment, and I think there will be very little change in direction as a result of this,"" says Frederick Schultz, who was the Fed vice chairman from 1979 to 1982 and remains a close friend of Mr. Volcker's. 
At the Fed, a senior official says that despite disappointment over Mr. Volcker's pending departure, ""I think the reaction is that Greenspan is probably the best choice outside the Federal Reserve System that could have been made."" 

   Traditional Republican politicians also praise the choice. 
Senate Minority Leader Robert Dole says the ""country is very fortunate to have a man of Alan Greenspan's character"" to replace Mr. Volcker. 
But supply-siders, who oppose high interest rates because they would slow economic growth, are considerably less enthusiastic. 
GOP Rep. Jack Kemp of New York says he was ""disappointed"" that Fed Vice Chairman Manuel Johnson wasn't picked. 
And supply-side publicist Jude Wanniski calls the Greenspan appointment ""the worst decision to come out of the Ronald Reagan White House,"" saying that Mr. Greenspan ""is one of the ringleaders of the austerity gang."" 

   And Mr. Greenspan does have a reputation as a stern foe of inflation. 
In the Ford administration, he strongly supported the Fed's tight-credit policies despite the deep recession those policies helped engender in 1974 and 1975. 
He told this newspaper in March 1976: ""The cost of being wrong in overstimulating the economy is far greater than the costs of being wrong in understimulating."" 

   More recently, Mr. Greenspan has been an outspoken backer of Mr. Volcker, often echoing the Fed chief's warnings about the dangers of a precipitous decline in the dollar. 
Speaking of Mr. Volcker at the White House yesterday, Mr. Greenspan said: ""Under Paul's chairmanship, inflation has been effectively subdued. 
It will be up to those of us who follow him to be certain that those very hard-won gains are not lost. 
Assuring that will be one of my primary goals."" 

   In a striking endorsement of Mr. Volcker's policies, Mr. Greenspan added: ""There are very few people in this profession who are more impressive than he and who seem to do the right thing at the right time almost every time."" 

   And Mr. Volcker, in turn, lavishly praised his designated successor, saying that he was ""very happy"" that Mr. Greenspan was going to take over the board. 

   The announcement of a change of leadership at the Fed comes at a delicate time. 
The plunge in the dollar earlier this year is forcing the Fed to put a high priority on defending the greenback lest foreign investors pull their funds out of the U.S. and precipitate a financial crisis. 
To attract foreign funds, the Fed has nudged up interest rates in recent weeks despite continued weakness in the domestic economy. 

   Mr. Greenspan has publicly supported some of the remedies that Mr. Volcker favors -- especially cutting the federal budget deficit, an action that both men believe would reduce U.S. reliance on foreign funds. 
In fact, Mr. Greenspan was quoted as saying on Feb. 11 that ""the long-run solution is almost surely going to mean increasing taxes."" 
President Reagan hotly disputes that view. 

   But although Mr. Volcker and his successor see eye to eye on most issues, some of Mr. Greenspan's recent statements have diverged from the Fed chief's. 
On one sensitive matter, for example, Mr. Greenspan was quoted on May 27 as predicting that the dollar ""will be significantly lower"" in the long run. 
That assertion contrasts with the statements of Mr. Volcker, who has avoided saying anything that might depress the dollar. 

   Analysts speculate that Mr. Greenspan is likely to change his tune on the dollar now that he is headed back to an official capacity. 
Asked yesterday at the White House whether the dollar has bottomed out, Mr. Greenspan replied: ""There's certainly evidence in that direction."" 
He declined to answer further questions about monetary policy, noting that he expects to be quizzed closely at his Senate confirmation hearing. (Democratic members of the Senate Banking Committee vowed yesterday to question Mr. Greenspan extensively at his confirmation hearing, but it seems unlikely that the Senate will block his nomination.) 

   On monetary policy generally, Mr. Greenspan clearly shares Mr. Volcker's pragmatic approach of tightening and easing credit based on a variety of factors -- the money supply, interest rates, foreign-exchange rates and other indicators of growth and inflation. 
Under Mr. Volcker, this approach came to be known as ""the Volcker standard"" because its credibility -- unlike other approaches, such as the gold standard -- depended heavily on the Fed chief's personal stature and judgment. 

   Now, the question is whether a ""Greenspan standard"" will prove as successful. 
One problem that Mr. Greenspan will face will be to unite the other Fed governors around his policies. 
Mr. Reagan has appointed several supply-siders to the seven-member board, and they have loosened Mr. Volcker's once-iron grip over Fed policy. 
Mr. Greenspan might be even less able to control the other Reagan appointees and will have to take time to gain their confidence, as Mr. Volcker has done. 

   Mr. Greenspan, who speaks with assurance and possesses a dry sense of humor, has excellent relations with the press. 
He is a bachelor and has dated several female journalists, including, in past years, Barbara Walters. 
In contrast to the aloof Mr. Volcker, Mr. Greenspan enjoys socializing and has been known to relax at parties by playing the piano; he also played tenor sax and clarinet in the Henry Jerome orchestra, sitting next to Leonard Garment, who later became White House counsel and who now is a Washington lawyer. 

   Although he is a follower of Ayn Rand, the late philosopher who fervently advocated freeing capitalism from government constraints, Mr. Greenspan gets along well with politicians of both parties. 
In 1979, for example, Mr. Greenspan was one of the first people consulted by Sen. Edward Kennedy as the Massachusetts Democrat was launching his unsuccessful bid for the presidency. 

   By all accounts his consulting business has been very successful, although not all his private ventures have gone well. 
Mr. Greenspan was a principal at Greenspan O'Neil Associates, a pension fund management concern founded with $2 million of Hollywood talent-agent Marvin Josephson's money back in September 1984, but the firm folded earlier this year. 

   Mr. Greenspan will be able to draw authority from his popularity in financial markets -- which, though clearly not as great as Mr. Volcker's, is considerable. 

   Richard Hoey, a Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. economist who frequently conducts polls about the Fed, says Mr. Greenspan ""has always been No. 1 or No. 2 since 1983"" in surveys asking Wall Streeters who could best replace Mr. Volcker. 
The one person who sometimes ranked higher in the surveys was E. Gerald Corrigan, the president of the Federal Reserve Bank of New York and widely considered a Volcker protege, ""and the general view was that Corrigan didn't have a serious chance,"" Mr. Hoey says. 
""So Greenspan was No. 1 among those believed to have a reasonable chance."" 

   But in global monetary affairs, ""Greenspan is a totally unknown quantity,"" says Dimitri Balatsos, a London-based economist with Kidder, Peabody &amp; Co. ""Volcker also has a good rapport with his central-bank counterparts around the globe, which Greenspan clearly lacks."" 

   Treasury Secretary James Baker dismissed the markets' sour reaction to yesterday's announcement. 
""I really believe that when the market focuses on . . . the outstanding qualifications of the successor to Chairman Volcker that you won't see that kind of activity continue for a sustained period of time,"" Mr. Baker said. 

   On Capitol Hill, reaction was mixed. 
House Speaker James Wright, a Texas Democrat, said Mr. Greenspan ""would not have been my choice. 
One day, we'll have a Federal Reserve chairman whose primary interest is in keeping interest rates low."" 
Democratic Sen. William Proxmire of Wisconsin, the chairman of the Senate Banking Committee, lamented the loss of Mr. Volcker, saying, ""We're going to miss him, miss him very much,"" and adding that he needs ""to take a long, careful look at Alan Greenspan"" before deciding whether to support his nomination. 

   But Senate Majority Leader Robert Byrd, a West Virginia Democrat, said Mr. Greenspan ""is a man of considerable knowledge and experience."" 
And Senate Finance Chairman Lloyd Bentsen, a Texas Democrat, said the president had made ""a good appointment."" 

   At the White House yesterday, Mr. Greenspan acknowledged that he faces a tough task. 
""Trying to fill Paul Volcker's shoes,"" he said, ""is going to be an extraordinary challenge."" 

",25,"[ 0.20383466  0.00391407  0.19638775 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
249,"
   How strong a Federal Reserve Board chairman will Alan Greenspan be? 
There are reasons to wonder. 
He has close ties to the traditional wing of the Republican party, especially with top Reagan administration officials, and this raises questions about his independence from the White House. 
And he has had run-ins with supply-siders. 
This raises doubts about whether he can control the Fed's seven-member board, which includes a majority of members in the supply-side camp. 

   Mr. Greenspan's admirers predict confidently that he will overcome these concerns. 
Kathryn Eickhoff, an economist who was once second-in-command at Mr. Greenspan's consulting firm, says anyone fretting about his capacity to be his own man ""does not know Alan Greenspan."" 
Former Deputy Treasury Secretary Richard Darman says Mr. Greenspan -- who chaired a bipartisan commission on Social Security overhaul in 1983 -- is ""a good consensus builder"" who will work well with the board. 

   Also in Mr. Greenspan's favor is the fact that Congress is inclined to give the Fed wide latitude, thanks to the inflation-fighting success of the retiring chairman, Paul Volcker. 
Mr. Greenspan appears anxious to protect that legacy. 

   It's the Reserve Board itself that may prove most troublesome for Mr. Greenspan. 
The Reagan administration made life difficult for Mr. Volcker by packing the Fed with supply-siders, who see less inflationary threat from robust growth than economists generally, including Mr. Volcker. 
At one point the Fed's supply-siders nearly provoked him to resign, outvoting him to cut interest rates. 
And recently released minutes of a Fed policy-making meeting show that some of the supply-siders resisted Mr. Volcker's policy of nudging rates higher to defend the dollar. 

   Some Volcker associates say his problems with the board contributed to his decision to leave. 
They believe he would have agreed to remain if President Reagan had exhorted him to put aside his personal preferences; this would have increased his clout inside and outside the Fed. 

   The five board members appointed by Mr. Reagan ""are much more individual and in a lot of ways much more unpredictable"" than their predecessors, one Volcker associate says. 
""That makes the job of chairman more difficult and unattractive. 
So against that background, it was all the more important that he get a strong presidential appeal."" 

   Mr. Greenspan is unlikely to find the situation much easier. 
Norman Ture, a friend of Vice Chairman Manuel Johnson, the board's most influential supply-sider, observes that Messrs. 
Greenspan and Johnson ""march to quite different drummers"" on many economic issues. 
Another Johnson friend recalls that when the vice chairman served at the Treasury he ""was very, very critical"" of positions Mr. Greenspan -- then an outside Reagan adviser -- took in favor of tax increases and Social Security overhaul. 

   On the other hand, some of the Reagan Fed appointees have privately voiced optimism that Mr. Greenspan's leadership will result in greater harmony because he, unlike Mr. Volcker, shares the Reagan majority's pro-deregulation views on banking issues. 
Moreover, says one source close to the Reagan board members: ""Everyone on the board knows that while the president might not stand behind Volcker, he would have no choice but to stand behind Greenspan,"" who will be Mr. Reagan's most visible representative at the central bank. 

   Mr. Greenspan has to keep enough distance from the White House to avoid compromising the Fed's independence. 
The administration clearly hopes that under his leadership the Fed will be less likely than it might have been under Mr. Volcker to drive up interest rates during next year's election campaign. 
But if Wall Street, leery of inflation, should begin to sense Mr. Greenspan caving in to White House pressure, the outcome -- as Mr. Greenspan himself surely knows -- could be a financial-market debacle not at all helpful to Republicans. 

   Nevertheless, Mr. Greenspan will almost certainly maintain a much closer relationship than Mr. Volcker did with the president and other senior administration officials. 
He enjoys excellent relations with White House Chief of Staff Howard Baker and Treasury Secretary James Baker. 
He may even seek the sort of ties former Fed chairman Arthur Burns had with the Ford administration back in the mid-1970's, when Mr. Greenspan was chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers. 
The crusty Mr. Burns met often with top Ford administration officials and influenced the White House on important issues including fiscal policy. 

   In a recent interview, Mr. Greenspan indicated he's well aware of the dangers of this kind of relationship. 'Burns was in no way compromising the independence of the Fed,"" he recalled. 
""Issues of monetary stimulus never came up; he would not have allowed them to come up, and we would never push him. 
One of the reasons he felt comfortable doing that is that I'm his old buddy; he was my professor at Columbia University, and he knew that the last person to get him to do anything inappropriate would be me. 

   ""It was not a model of political coordination,"" Mr. Greenspan continued. 
""Nor was it a model that would suggest that the Federal Reserve under Burns would take indirect instructions from the White House."" 

   Mr. Greenspan concluded: ""You have no choice as a member of the Fed but to defend the institution. 
You have to. 
That's priority number one."" 

",25,"[ 0.18495087  0.00819568  0.17819387 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
250,"
   By a vote of 91 to 2, the Senate overwhelmingly approved the nomination of economist Alan Greenspan to become chairman of the Federal Reserve Board, a position often referred to as the second most powerful post in the land. 

   Mr. Greenspan will succeed Paul Volcker, whose term as chairman expires Thursday. 
Fed spokesman Joseph Coyne said that Mr. Volcker will stay on in the post until Mr. Greenspan is sworn in, probably next week. 

   A widely respected economist who headed the Council of Economic Advisers under President Ford, Mr. Greenspan comes to the new job with considerable knowledge and experience. 
In presenting the nomination, however, Senate Banking Committee Chairman William Proxmire (D., Wis.) questioned whether the new chairman will act independently of the Reagan administration. 
Sen. Proxmire also criticized Mr. Greenspan's advocacy of banking deregulation. 

   The only two senators to vote against Mr. Greenspan were Sen. Kent Conrad (D., N.D.) and Sen. Bill Bradley (D., N.J.). 
In a statement, Sen. Bradley said he is concerned that the new chairman ""would move too rapidly toward deregulation"" and that he lacks sufficient international experience. 
""My personal preference,"" Sen. Bradley said, ""would have been for the administration to prevail upon Chairman Volcker to stay for another term."" 

   After the vote, Mr. Greenspan said, ""I'm obviously gratified and I thank the Senate."" 

   As chairman of the Fed, Mr. Greenspan will be in a position to influence monetary policy and affect the economy's performance over the next four years. 
He has developed a reputation as a determined inflation-fighter, and is generally expected to follow monetary policies similar to those of his predecessor. 

   President Reagan issued a statement after the vote thanking the Senate for its ""overwhelming support"" for Mr. Greenspan. 

   Mr. Volcker's departure marks the end of a turbulent era at the Fed. 
When he was named chairman in 1979, inflation was running at double-digit rates. 
By keeping a tight grip on credit, despite severe economic and political pressures, Mr. Volcker and the Fed were able to bring that rate down to less than 2% last year. 

",25,"[ 0.20843156  0.01500878  0.20081671 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
251,"
   Federal Reserve critics used to complain of ""stop and go"" monetary policies. 
They claimed that the Fed would first give a green light to the economy by making credit readily available and then turn on the red and bring growth to a screeching halt. 
But under Alan Greenspan that has changed. 
A supremely cautious man, the Fed chairman is forever blinking yellow. 

   Indeed, his caution has become legendary within the government. 
He fusses endlessly over economic statistics, dissecting them in dozens of ways, probing for hours in search of potential problems. 
After thoroughly digesting reams of information, he often concludes that more data are needed, and when he finally decides to act, his movements sometimes seem excrutiatingly small. 

   Such caution was evident after the recent Friday-the-13th stock market plunge. 
Some Bush administration officials urged Mr. Greenspan to make an immediate public announcement of his plans to provide ample credit to the markets. 
But he refused, claiming that he wanted to see what happened Monday morning before making any public statement. 

   Mr. Greenspan's decision to keep quiet also prompted a near-mutiny within the Fed's ranks. 
A ""senior Fed official"" spoke on Saturday after the market swoon to both the Washington Post and the New York Times, saying the Fed was prepared to provide as much credit as the markets needed. 
The statement angered Chairman Greenspan, but it was greeted with applause by the Bush administration and the financial markets. 
And, while the mutinous Fed member hasn't gone public, some Fed governors, most notably Vice Chairman Manuel Johnson, are known to have disagreed with the chairman's decision to remain silent. 
Ironically, the anonymous official's comments have earned some plaudits for Mr. Greenspan, who is mistakenly seen as the source. 
At a hearing last week, Democratic Sen. Chris Dodd of Connecticut told Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady that ""Chairman Greenspan's"" announcement over the Oct. 13 weekend was a ""very important statement."" 
Mr. Brady hesitantly replied that he wasn't sure whether Mr. Greenspan ""made a statement himself, or whether that was a newspaper report."" 

   The Fed chairman's caution was apparent again on the Monday morning after the market's plunge, when the central bank took only modest steps to aid the markets. 
A surprisingly small amount of reserves was added to the banking system. 
And, by the end of that week, the key federal funds interest rate, which is largely controlled by the Fed, had settled at 8.75%, barely changed from the level of just under 9% that prevailed the previous week. 

   Bush administration officials appear increasingly concerned that Mr. Greenspan is cautious to a fault. 
Signs of growing weakness in the economy, paired with indications that inflation is staying well under control, have caused them to wonder why the Fed chairman is so grudging in reducing rates. 

   Those concerns aren't expressed in public. 
In fact, the administration and the Fed have been going out of their way in the past two weeks to dispel any impression that they are at odds, fearing stories about an administration-Fed split added to the stock market's jitters. 
Still, the split is there. 

   The administration's concerns are understandable. 
The economy is showing signs of weakness, particularly among manufacturers. 
Exports, which played a key role in fueling growth over the last two years, seem to have stalled. 
Factory payrolls and production fell in September, and the auto industry and housing are in a severe crunch. 

   But Mr. Greenspan remains reluctant to loosen policy, partly because he faces a phalanx of presidents of regional Fed banks who oppose credit easing. 
In addition, the chairman has a wary eye aimed a year or two down the road. 
Inflation may be stable at the moment, running at about 4.5%. 
But if the Fed eases too soon, Mr. Greenspan fears, prices may begin to accelerate again next year. 
Moreover, if the Fed holds tight, it may be able gradually to reduce inflation, moving toward the zero-inflation goal that the Fed chairman embraced in testimony to Congress last week. 

   So far, Mr. Greenspan's cautious approach to policy has served both him and the nation well. 
His hand on the monetary tiller seems one reason why the economy next month seems highly likely to begin an unprecedented eighth year of peacetime growth without a recession. 
""We've gotten through two stock market crashes, and we've gone through an election without any major problems,"" says David Hale, an economist of Kemper Financial Services. 
""I think you have to give Greenspan a good rating."" 

   But such caution is no guarantee against mistakes. 
The Fed's reluctance to ease credit now could be laying the groundwork for a new recession, perhaps starting early next year. 
If that happens, Chairman Greenspan could well become an open target. 
Already, Congress is toying with legislation to curb the Fed's independence. 
If the economy turns down, such proposals could gain strong momentum. 

",25,"[ 0.1720724   0.00901136  0.1657859  ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
252,"
   Administration officials insist he's still the likeliest
choice, though the deal is never over until the thin man in
the Oval Office sings. The thin man likes Mr. Greenspan more
than is widely known. But the mere hint that he might be
replaced shows how little Washington has learned from 20
years of economic turmoil.
   Chairman Greenspan is actually President Bush's biggest
economic asset. Yet having pushed Mr. Greenspan out to sea to
steer the U.S. economy with only a single oar -- monetary
policy -- the kibitzers in Congress and the White House are
now telling him how to row. And if his form isn't perfect,
they jeer and then threaten to get a new oarsman.
   In other words, the same crowd that raised taxes three
months into a recession is now lecturing the one Washington
official who inspires confidence in financial markets. If Mr.
Bush wants to kill what everyone hopes is an incipient
recovery, he could certainly do it by dumping Mr. Greenspan.
   In a town where integrity breeds enemies, Mr. Greenspan
has shown too much character. He and his Fed allies haven't
laid down and played the usual game of ""roll-the-Fed."" Last
year's budget deal was supposed to open the money spigots, or
so the White House promised. But unlike the Bush Treasury,
the Greenspan Fed remembers the 1970s, when roll-the-Fed
produced inflationary booms followed by ever-nastier busts.
Enough of its members know that the Fed's main task is to
keep prices stable; stimulating economic growth is the job of
fiscal policy.
   Mr. Bush's economic advisers either don't understand this,
or won't admit it lest they accept blame for their own fiscal
abdication. It's so much easier to bash the Fed. Treasury
Secretary Nicholas Brady spent most of April lobbying for
easier money, even if a little more inflation had to go along
with it.
   The Japanese and Germans first turned him down, so he
leaned on the Fed. He even made phone calls to two Fed
governors to urge them to ease, as columnists Evans and Novak
report. The governors agreed, but for their own economic
reasons. Governor Wayne Angell dissented -- less for policy
reasons than to warn administration inflationists.
   Congress is a co-conspirator because it too is in fiscal
gridlock. Larry Lindsey, a White House aide and new nominee
to the Fed board, went for his Senate hearing last week and
allowed that the Fed could have eased more last year. The
inflation monster was still not appeased; every Banking
Committee senator but Florida Republican Connie Mack griped
or ranted for easier money. Mr. Greenspan is well liked on
the Hill, but Congress still wouldn't mind an easy-money
replacement.
   Even the corporate elite are scapegoat hunting. The
Business Council, composed of men who never object to higher
taxes on working stiffs, is whining about Mr. Greenspan. ""The
Fed should ease more and bring interest rates down,"" says
James Robinson, the American Express chairman. Amex
shareholders can only hope Mr. Robinson knows more about
finance than he does about monetary policy.
   Mr. Greenspan's main defenders are the financial markets,
and ultimately the American middle class. Lawrence Kudlow,
the Bear Stearns economist, calls Fed performance under Mr.
Greenspan ""uniformly constructive."" Inflation has fallen from
the oil-price spikes in October to an annualized rate of less
than 3%.
   The Fed's real struggle has been to get long-term interest
rates, the main engine of a recovery, to fall too. That takes
art as well as science. The Fed can tinker with short-term
rates, but long-term rates carry an inflation premium and so
don't always fall in lock-step. They may even rise if
investors think the Fed is being rolled by the White House.
The fact that long-term rates rose after the last Fed easing,
on April 30, is one reason the Fed is believed not to have
eased again this week.
   It's this political factor that argues most for Mr.
Greenspan's reappointment. Any replacement will be seen as a
victory for the cause of roll-the-Fed. One possible
alternative, New York Federal Reserve Bank President Gerald
Corrigan, is widely seen as Mr. Brady's ally; if he's
nominated, invest in deutschmarks.
   A second possibility, current Fed governor and former
Treasury aide David Mullins, has shown signs of independence
but not yet enough for the big job. Former Fed vice chairman
Manuel Johnson is popular in the White House, but he is also
seen as highly political. In short, any replacement would
spend months or years winning credibility in financial
markets that Mr. Greenspan has already earned.
   The markets' political sensitivity is a signal that the
American middle class does not want its wealth robbed again
by a new inflation. If the recession persists longer than the
White House expects, the solution lies in a new fiscal
policy, such as a renewed campaign to cut capital-gains
taxes. (Mr. Greenspan recommends a zero capital-gains rate.)
It won't help Mr. Bush to fire the one economic-policy
official who's learned something from the past 20 years.
",25,"[ 0.2218083   0.00982893  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
253,"
   -- Mr. Greenspan is well-regarded in financial markets. A
poll of financial decision-makers by Wall Street economist
Richard Hoey finds 76.5% favor his reappointment; that is
nearly as high as the 76.9% that favored Paul Volcker's
reappointment in May 1983. (Ironically, Mr. Greenspan was the
decision-makers' second choice in 1983 with 5.8% support; Mr.
Volcker is now the second choice, with 8.8% support.)
   -- While President Bush's top economic advisers have their
complaints about Mr. Greenspan, they are unaware of a
replacement they all could support. Former Fed Vice Chairman
Manuel Johnson is a favorite of Budget Director Richard
Darman, but has a testy relationship with Treasury Secretary
Nicholas Brady. Mr. Brady is friends with New York Fed
President Gerald Corrigan, but Mr. Corrigan -- a Volcker
protege -- would probably be vetoed by Mr. Darman or by the
President's top economic adviser, Michael Boskin.
   -- And despite the criticisms by his aides, President Bush
still considers Mr. Greenspan a friend and adviser. They have
known each other for years, and the president recently issued
a statement praising the ""strong leadership"" at the Fed. In
addition, Mr. Greenspan has strong support in the Senate,
which must confirm his reappointment.
   Mr. Greenspan's support in financial markets is especially
important. Past administrations have paid close attention to
market sentiment in choosing a Fed chief. A choice that is
poorly regarded by the financial community, they feared,
would cause market turmoil and possibly higher long-term
interest rates, as traders drove up rates out of fear that
the new chairman might fuel inflation. ""The Fed chairman is
basically a Wall Street call,"" says David Jones of Aubrey G.
Lanston &amp; Co.
   Wall Street's influence was apparent in 1983, when
President Reagan's Treasury secretary, Donald Regan, mounted
a strident campaign to keep Mr. Volcker from being
reappointed. Most of the president's top advisers agreed with
Mr. Regan; but in the end, the president reappointed Mr.
Volcker anyway, to avoid financial turmoil.
   Mr. Greenspan, appointed by Mr. Reagan in August 1987,
hasn't made much of an impression on the general public. A
new Wall Street Journal/NBC News poll shows that 24% of
voters support his reappointment and 17% oppose it; but an
overwhelming majority of 59% don't have an opinion one way or
the other. Even in the midst of a recession, it is clear ""the
public does not pay close attention to the Federal Reserve,""
say pollsters Robert Teeter and Peter Hart.
   Among professional economists, opinions are stronger, and
generally positive. James Tobin, Nobel prize-winning
economist at Yale University, criticizes the Fed chairman for
being too cautious in easing credit, but says: ""I think Alan
has a lot of respect among academic economists as a good
applied numbers man, who knows the ins and outs of the
forecasting business."" And at the Hoover Institution,
economist Milton Friedman, who also won a Nobel prize, says:
""I think on the whole the Fed has done extremely well since
he's taken over. It's hard for me to find a period this long
in which I have as little fault to find with the Fed.""
   Mr. Greenspan draws high praise from academics for his
talents as a business and government economist rather than
for his academic performance. In fact, his major academic
work is obscure. Unlike most such works, Mr. Greenspan's 1977
doctoral dissertation, a collection of previously written
papers, isn't available. Librarians at New York University,
which awarded the Ph.D., say it is their policy to keep a
copy of every dissertation, but they are unable to locate Mr.
Greenspan's. University Microfilms in Ann Arbor, Michigan,
which keeps microfilmed copies of all doctoral dissertations,
also says it doesn't have a copy of the paper. Asked about
the dissertation, Fed spokesman Joseph Coyne said: ""We do not
have a copy at the board, but the chairman has a copy in
storage in New York.""
   At times, Mr. Greenspan has come under criticism both from
some of his Fed colleagues and from outsiders for being too
""political,"" and too willing to succumb to pressure from the
Bush administration. A recent harsh attack came from the
Economist magazine of London, which said the timing of last
month's decision to cut rates -- just two days after
Secretary Brady's plea to other industrialized nations for
global rate cuts -- was ""a textbook example of how not to
conduct monetary policy"" because it made the supposedly
independent Fed look like it was doing the Treasury's
bidding.
   Fed officials, however, say Mr. Greenspan had little
choice in the timing of the rate cut. He favored an earlier
rate cut but was unable to win the support of three of the
five Fed governors -- Wayne Angell, John LaWare and Edward
Kelley. On April 30, prodded by weak economic indicators as
well as phone calls from Secretary Brady, Mr. LaWare and Mr.
Kelley agreed to support a rate cut.
   Fed officials considered delaying the move so they
wouldn't seem to be succumbing to Mr. Brady's plea. But the
Treasury's quarterly sale of securities was to be announced
the next day. The Fed generally doesn't like to disrupt the
quarterly refunding operation by changing rates, so that
ruled out any action for another two weeks. Fed officials
decided to make their move right away, and take the
criticism.
",25,"[ 0.17422364  0.00912402  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
254,"
   Thousands of peole
prayed, cheered, danced, beat drums and observed other traditions
today as a total eclipse of the sun darkened a wide area of
Indonesia and the southern Philippines.
   The sun was blacked out by the shadow of the moon for up to four
minutes along a 108-mile swath that moved from the Indian Ocean
across Indonesia and the southern Philippine island of Mindanao.
   A partial eclipse was visible across a wide area of Asia as far
west as India _ including Southeast Asia, China, Japan and New
Guinea as well as parts of Australia and the Pacific islands.
   Scientists said the eclipse would end at sunset in the Gulf of
Alaska.
   Clouds obscured the solar spectacular in Jakarta, Indonesia,
Hong Kong and in the eastern Mindanao city of Davao, where
thousands of tourists and scientists had gathered to observe the
eclipse.
   But it was visible for about 3 minutes in this city about 650
miles southeast of Manila despite early scattered clouds. President
Corazon Aquino flew in to witness the event.
   Richard Fisher of the High Altitude Observatory in Boulder,
Colo., said that despite scattered clouds, scientists were
confident they had taken useful pictures of the eclipse.
   In Jakarta, Wilson Sinambela of the National Institute of
Aeronautics said a total eclipse was observed in several parts of
the country, including by about 1,000 tourists in the South Sumatra
capital Palembang.
   He said thousands of Indonesians prayed and beat drums to herald
the start of the eclipse, which began in southwestern Sumatra
before heading on to the Philippines.
   In Kuala Lumpur, where a partial eclipse blocked out about 80
percent of the sun, some Malaysian Hindus visited temples to pray
for protection against harm during the eclipse.
   In Kurukshetra, India, an estimated 1 million pilgrims dipped
into the waters of the sacred Sannihit and Brahmsarover tanks after
a public address system announced the start of the eclipse. Hymns
were chanted and conch shells blown during the ceremony about 90
miles north of New Delhi.
   Clouds blocked the first moments of the eclipse in General
Santos City. But the cloud cover broke, setting off wild cheering
among the thousands who watched the phenomenon in a scorching
tropical heat.
   Street lights switched on, and members of the Naragcas tribe, in
the city for a festival, danced in the streets to the beat of drums.
   In Baguio City, 130 miles north of Manila, pregnant women of the
local Ilocano community rinsed their hair during the eclipse with
water dripped from burned rice straws in a traditional ritual.
   According to local superstition, babies conceived during or
shortly before an eclipse will be deformed unless their mothers
practice the ritual.
   Many other Filipinos marked the eclipse by going to church. The
Philippines is Asia's only predominately Christian country.
   ``This phenomenon is a clear reminder from God for mankind to
repent its sins,'' said Theresa Teopengco, a government employee.
   Officials said about 20,000 tourists and scientists from around
the world had come to the southern Philippines to watch the
eclipse, the last one expected here for at least 50 years.
   Scientists said the area afforded the best opportunity to
witness and study the eclipse because skies are usually clear this
time of year.
   But in Davao City, 60 miles to the northeast, morning clouds
sent hundreds scurrying to the airport for flights to General
Santos.
   Church bells in Davao tolled while police and civilians set off
firecrackers and fired weapons in the air to mark the eclipse.
   In Manila, thousands turned out under clear skies to see the
partial eclipse that blocked about 75 percent of the sun's surface
at its height.
   Police said four people were injured when a passenger bus
collided with a jeep during the eclipse.
   ``The drivers were probably looking skyward when the accident
occurred,'' said policeman Ricardo Manansala. ``It's impossible to
gaze at the sky and drive a vehicle at the same time.''
   Solar eclipses occur when the moon positions itself between the
Earth and the sun. The Chinese first recorded a total solar eclipse
in 2137 B.C., regarding them as signs of a battle to death between
the sun and the dragon.
",26,"[ 0.39627402  0.00913119  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
255,"
   Hundreds of thousands of Hindu
pilgrims plunged into sacred rivers and pools during a solar
eclipse Sunday, believing they would be freed of sin and attain
salvation. Authorities said a 12-year-old boy drowned.
   As the moon partially passed between the Earth and sun,
worshipers chanted hymns and blew conch shells. About 3,000 naked
holy men waded into the giant sacred pools of Sannihit and
Brahmsarovar, followed in turns by an estimated 500,000 men and
women, some clothed, others naked.
   Many carried coconuts, auspicious symbols for Hindus, and set
them in the water. Others gave alms to beggars or Hindu priests,
who offered prayers to the sun. There is an ancient belief that the
sun is in pain during an eclipse and prayers must be offered for
its relief.
   The scene was repeated, in smaller numbers, at rivers and pools
across India.
   An epic Hindu poem, the ``Mahabharata,'' promises salvation to
those who bathe or give alms at Kurukshetra during a solar eclipse.
   Kurukshetra's larger pool, Brahmasarovar, has a two-mile
perimeter. Sannihit's perimeter is about half that size. The pools
can accomodate 125,000 people.
   Thousands of police stood guard and directed traffic in the town
of 25,000 people about 90 miles north of New Delhi. Divers and
lifeguards kept watch over the bathers but could not save the
12-year-old boy from drowning, authorities said.
   The eclipse, which lasted about 90 minutes, was the third in the
past year. The others occurred on March 18 and Sept. 13, 1987.
   According to Hindu legend, Kurukshetra was created by the Hindu
god Lord Brahma and was the scene of an ancient battle in which
Lord Vishnu, the protector of the Hindu diety, pleaded for
righteousness.
",26,"[ 0.27190136  0.01740367  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
256,"
   A partial solar eclipse visible across
western North America bored scientists but thrilled crowds that were
able to see it despite clouds covering parts of the region.
   ``It's fabulous to know this is actually taking place. It's very
fascinating,'' said Edie Lurie, an employee at the California
Institute of Technology in Pasadena, where dozens used solar
telescopes to watch the moon eclipse 37 percent of the sun at 9:50
a.m. PST Tuesday.
   As the moon passed between the Earth and sun to cause the partial
eclipse, it was possible to see mountains on the edge of the moon
silhouetted against the sun. Also visible were gas jets on the sun's
surface and a giant group of sunspots that on Monday and Tuesday
produced major solar flares _ eruptions of heat and radiation _
including the largest since 1984.
   Clouds over downtown Salt Lake City dashed Hansen Planetarium's
plans to set up telescopes to watch the moon block 36 percent of the
sun at 11:10 a.m. MST.
   ``It's a bummer, but that's the way it goes,'' planetarium
spokesman Patrick Wiggins said.
   The eclipse was visible to at least some extent west of a
diagonal line stretching roughly from Mazatlan, Mexico, northeast to
Dallas and Chicago. Views were best farther west and north.
   In sunny Los Angeles, 600 schoolchildren and at least 400 other
people watched the eclipse at Griffith Observatory through
telescopes and other devices equipped with filters to prevent eye
injury.
   ``There was a childlike delight with the wonder of nature,''
observatory Director Ed Krupp said.
   Most astronomers were unimpressed, saying they were waiting for a
total solar eclipse that will sweep across Hawaii, the Pacific
Ocean, lower Baja California in Mexico, Central America, Colombia
and Brazil on July 11, 1991.
   ``You can see a partial eclipse every three or four years,'' said
Caltech astrophysicist Ken Libbrecht. ``They're not that exciting. A
total eclipse is exciting.''
   In Tucson, dozens of citizens peered through telescopes on the
University of Arizona mall to see the moon eclipse 23 percent of the
sun at 10:55 a.m. MST, but 90 solar scientists stayed inside,
attending a five-day conference titled ``The Sun in Time.''
   ``That's partly my fault,'' said conference co-organizer Mark
Giampapa, an astronomer at the National Solar Observatory. ``I
should have listed it in the program: `Partial eclipse, presented by
God.'''
   In Anchorage, Alaska, where the moon obscured 80 percent of the
sun at 9:13 a.m. AST, the eclipse was watched by 26 students from
Bartlett High School, several people wearing welders helmets as
filters and Providence Hospital workers who ended a staff meeting
early to see the spectacle.
   Clouds parted long enough to allow a glimpse of the eclipse for
100 people outside the Oregon Museum of Science and Industry in
often rainy Portland.
   ``Typical Oregon astronomy,'' said amateur astronomer Dan Dunn.
``You always have to deal with the clouds.''
   Scientists had warned against staring at the sun directly or
through inadequate filters, including smoked glass and photographic
film or filters.
   Alan MacRobert of Sky &amp; Telescope magazine said 245 eye injuries
were reported in the United States after an eclipse in 1970, but
warnings about the danger reduced the number to three during a 1984
partial eclipse.
",26,"[ 0.32458507  0.01099896  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
257,"
   A total lunar eclipse visible from five
continents occurs after sunset Wednesday when the full moon orbits
into the shadow of the Earth and slowly turns from a bright silver
into a copper or orange disk.
   More than a billion people will have a chance to watch as the
moon appears to be slowly nibbled away, changing from the normal
bright reflected light of a full moon into the colorful glow of
eclipse.
   The celestial show starts at 8:23 p.m. EDT over the United
States and will end about 5{ hours later. The eastern United States
will get the best viewing and Alaska will miss the eclipse
altogether.
   Visible eclipse phases will vary for the central and western
parts of the country because of the difference in sunset and
moonrise. In Los Angeles, for instance, the eclipse will have
started before the sun has set or the moon has risen. By the time
the sky has darkened completely in California, the moon will
already be in the deepest part of its eclipse. For Seattle, the
moon will still be below the horizon at mid-eclipse, but will rise
during the totality phase.
   Clouds, of course, could ruin the viewing at any location.
   With clear skies, though, some phase of the celestial spectacle
should be visible to observers in North and South America, western
Europe and Africa, and the Antarctic. Sailors at sea in the
Atlantic and in the eastern Pacific Ocean also will be able to see
part of the eclipse, weather permitting.
   A lunar eclipse occurs when the moon passes through the shadow
created by the Earth blocking the sun's light. The moon, in its
orbit of the Earth, usually passes above or below this shadowline,
but every few years it follows a path that puts it completely in
shade for a time. When the whole moon passes through the shadow, it
is called a total eclipse.
   The last total lunar eclipse visible over most of North America
occurred in December 1982, and the next one is not until December
1992.
   Astronomers are forecasting that Wednesday's eclipse may be a
bright one.
   The moon can appear during an eclipse to be a bright coppery red
if there is clear, clean air between the lunar surface and the
observer on Earth. If smoke or dust obscure the view, the moon will
diminish to an orange color or perhaps even fade from view
altogether.
   Volcanic eruptions historically have dimmed eclipse viewing by
dumping tons of dust into the atmosphere. But astronomers say
enough time has passed since the last major volcanic eruption that
most dust has settled.
   The eclipse starts when the moon enters what is called the
penumbra. This outer fringe of the Earth's shadow will show up on
the moon as a grayish shading. After about half an hour, the moon
will edge into the umbra, the dark, central part of the shadow.
Total eclipse, when all of the moon is covered by the umbra, will
begin at about 10:20 p.m. EDT and last for one hour, 36 minutes.
   When the moon leaves the umbra, the events will occur in reverse
order. The eclipse ends about 1:53 a.m. EDT when the moon edges out
of the shadow altogether.
   While a lunar eclipse occurs when the Earth blocks sunlight from
the moon, a solar eclipse is caused when the moon blocks sunlight
from the Earth.
   To experts, a solar eclipse is more interesting because it
permits unique measurements of the sun.
   ``Solar eclipses attract a lot of scientific attention,'' said
John Bangert, a U.S. Naval Observatory astronomer in Washington.
``A lunar eclipse is just a good show.''
   Here is when the various phases of the eclipse will occur. All
times are Eastern daylight.
   Moon enters penumbra: 8:23 p.m.
   Moon enters umbra: 9:21 p.m.
   Moon enters totality: 10:20 p.m.
   Middle of Eclipse: 11:08 p.m.
   Moon leaves totality: 11:56 p.m.
   Moon leaves umbra: 12:56 a.m., Thursday.
   Moon leaves penumbra: 1:53 a.m.
   Because of the differences in sunset and moonrise times, viewing
will start at different eclipse phases in the western parts of the
country.
   Here are times for the local events that affect eclipse viewing.
The first hour is for local sunset and the second is for local
moonrise. The best viewing will follow twilight which ends about 25
minutes after sunset. Local time zones apply in all cases:
   Baltimore: Sunset at 8 p.m. Moonrise at 7:53 p.m.
   Boston: 7:43 p.m. and 7:36 p.m.
   Chicago: 7:49 p.m. and 7:43 p.m.
   Cleveland: 8:25 p.m. and 8:18 p.m.
   Houston: 8:01 p.m. and 7:55 p.m.
   Kansas City, Mo.: 8:12 p.m. and 8:06 p.m.
   Los Angeles: 7:39 p.m. and 7:35 p.m.
   Philadelphia: 7:56 p.m. and 7:48 p.m.
   Salt Lake City: 8:24 p.m. and 8:20 p.m.
   San Francisco: 8:01 p.m. and 7:58 p.m.
   Seattle: 8:20 p.m. and 8:16 p.m.
   St. Louis: 7:54 p.m. and 7:47 p.m.
   Washington: 8:01 p.m. and 7:54 p.m.
",26,"[ 0.37406931  0.00552534  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
258,"
   Cloudy weather Saturday threatened to
mar the show for thousands of Finnish and foreign skygazers hoping
to glimpse a total solar eclipse in this land of the midnight sun.
   The weather forecast took a turn for the worse in the evening,
when the Finnish Meteorological Services predicted cloudy weather
with a chance of showers for eastern Finland on Sunday.
   In the eastern town of Joensuu, a television news broadcast late
Saturday showed it was already cloudy there with a light drizzle
falling.
   The solar eclipse in Finland starts at 4:03 a.m. Sunday (9:03
p.m. EDT Saturday). At that time, the moon will begin gradually
moving between the Earth and the sun.
   The total eclipse begins at 4:52 a.m. in Helsinki and will last
83 seconds. After the total phase of the eclipse, the moon will
move away, uncovering more and more of the sun. The eclipse ends at
5:45 a.m. in Helsinki.
   About 10,000 people _ including 3,000 foreigners _ have
converged on Joensuu, about 50 miles from the Soviet border. There
conditions there are considered especially good for viewing the
eclipse _ weather permitting.
   In Helsinki, the total eclipse phase will occur 16 minutes after
sunrise, when the sun is only 1 degree above the horizon. At
Joensuu, 310 miles northeast of Helsinki, the sun will be 5 degrees
above the horizon in the total phase at a better angle for watchers.
   The sun rises unusually early during summer in the extreme
northern latitudes where Finland is located. The sun comes up
unusually late during winter.
   Ten months ago, Joensuu hired an ``eclipse secretary'' to handle
arrangements for the expected influx of visitors.
   But that official, Marjut Cadia, said she had underestimated the
interest in the event.
   ``We completely sold out the 10,000 special eyeglasses we made
for this event, and our extra stock is finished too,'' she said in
a television interview Saturday.
   During the past week, newspapers, television and radio have been
full of information about solar eclipses, as well as advice for
spectators not to stare directly into the sun.
   Some eclipse viewers won't have to worry about the clouds,
because they will be above them. Finnair, the national airline, has
arranged a dozen special flights for eclipse watchers, and private
companies with small planes will provide more.
   The eclipse will be total in an arc about 125 miles wide from
the northern Baltic Sea and southeast Finland, across the Kola
Peninsula and northeast Soviet Union, to the Aleutian Islands near
Alaska.
   Scientists will conduct several experiments during the eclipse,
including gravity test measurements of the radius of the sun.
However, scientific interest in this eclipse has been less than in
longer eclipses, such as the seven-minute eclipse seen from
northern Kenya on June 30, 1973.
   Seppo Linnaluoto of the Ursa Astronomical Association said the
best place for observations of this eclipse will be the northeast
Soviet Union.
   The last total eclipse to be seen in Finland occurred in 1945.
",26,"[ 0.31867721  0.01079876  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
259,"     While Angel and his followers meditate to prepare for their journey, French
New Age musician Jean-Michel Jarre is coordinating an elaborate
sound-and-light show to play at the foot of the pyramids in Teotihuacan, north
of the capital.;    Also on E-day, July 11, crowded cruise ships will linger
off Mexico's Pacific Coast, and thousands of U.S. tourists will drive south
into Baja California, which, usually boasting clear skies, is being billed as
the world's most promising site from which to view nature's own light show.;  
 Eclipse fans from Japan to New York to the Netherlands are expected in
droves, but Californians -- because of their proximity to Baja and propensity
for mystical phenomena -- should be conspicuous.;    However, the chic hot
spot for eclipse watchers won't be Mexico, but the big island of Hawaii, where
the 18,000 tourists who would be there anyway to enjoy the sunshine will be
joined by an additional 30,000 or more coming to watch the sun go out for four
minutes.;    Even more people might be there for the show, but for the lack of
seats on flights to the island. Most visitors will be funneled in through the
relatively small airport at Kailua.;    Airlines are adding scores of flights
to ferry thousands of people from neighboring islands in the hours just before
the eclipse.;    Car rental companies have shipped in 3,000 or so extra cars.;
   More than one caller from the mainland has asked the visitors' bureau
whether the island is in danger of tipping over under the tourists' weight.;  
 But Mexico will host the biggest share of travelers, partly because of its
easy access from the United States and partly since the eclipse will last
longest here: up to seven minutes, which is three more minutes than the
maximum length in Hawaii. This will also be the longest-lasting total eclipse
until 2132, according to Alan Dyer, an associate editor at Astronomy
magazine.;    The midday eclipse will consist of a 160-mile wide lunar shadow
speeding at up to 5,000 miles per hour along the Earth's surface.;    While
many Mexicans are looking forward to the event, some are quietly taking
precautions. In pre-Colombian times, eclipses were viewed as bad omens by the
sun-worshiping Aztecs.;    In the capital's Sonora market, specializing in
magic, vendors have stocked up on garlic bulbs tied with red ribbon, which
they hawk as protection from ""the bad vibrations of the eclipse."" A thriving
trade is also taking place in magnets, for those with low blood pressure to
carry in their pockets on July 11, and old copper coins for pregnant women to
place as charms in their belly buttons.;    As in Hawaii, Mexico could
probably use some otherworldly intervention to cope with the scores of
thousands of tourists who have already started arriving.;    In the southern
half of the Baja Peninsula, some hotels have had rooms reserved for more than
a year. All are now booked up, and authorities fear competition at campsites.;
   ""We're worried that Californians will drive down on the spur of the moment,
without taking water or fuel,"" said Marivi Lerdo, who promotes tourism to
Mexico in New York.;    Although Hawaii's isolation will limit the size of the
crowds, locals are still predicting problems. ""By God, there's just one road
on this island,"" a circle route that often narrows to two lanes, one shop
owner said. ""It's going to be total insanity."";    ""We're worrying that we
won't have enough alcohol and food on the island,"" said the manager of a local
restaurant and disco called The Eclipse, named by coincidence 10 years ago.;  
 While authorities fret over infrastructure capacity, many Californians are
preparing to revel in a New Age wonderland.;    ""These are people who have
never, ever, missed a single episode of 'Star Trek,' "" said Ken Stewart, who
is planning to lead a caravan of 50 enthusiasts from San Diego to Cabo San
Lucas, on the south tip of Baja.;    Mexico's government is heavily involved
in eclipse planning, having formed an Intersecretarial Commission for the
Eclipse, which, among other things, is supposed to oversee production of as
many as 60 million protective lenses. Newspapers here are carrying frequent
reminders not to stare directly at the sun.;    During the eclipse, the mystic
and the scientific will not be far apart.;    At six observatories atop
Hawaii's Mauna Kea, a dormant volcano that is the highest peak in the Pacific,
solar researchers will turn their telescopes on the sun's outer atmosphere as
the moon covers the rest of the star.;    Twenty miles downhill, at The
Crystal Grotto in Honomu, Wendy Gilliam is selling pouches of three stones
called corona crystals and advising people to ""expose them to the energy""
during the eclipse. ""As the moon passes over the sun, there are certain power
vortexes here that are going to be opened up and awakened,"" she said.; DON'T
LOOK DIRECTLY AT IT; (box) If you want to watch the moon's progress across the
sun: Don't look at it. Staring at the sun during a partial eclipse could
quickly -- without your feeling a thing -- burn into your retina a permanent
image of the crescent sun, causing severe and permanent vision loss.;    (box)
It's safest to watch the eclipse indirectly by projecting the sun's image
through a pinhole and onto a sheet of white paper.;    (box) Other safe
methods: (check) Pieces of arc-welders' glass labeled  14 and available at
welding supply stores. Most welders' goggles are not suitable protection.
(check) Two or three layers of Mylar plastic heavily coated with aluminum.
Some stores are selling ""eclipse glasses"" made with this material.; COMING
TUESDAY IN SCIENCE &amp; MEDICINE;    (box) All the details about Thursday's
eclipse, one of nature's most stunning events.;    (box) How to watch it,
including directions for a pinhole projector.  ",26,"[ 0.52763061  0.02338075  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
260,"     ""That's the best eclipse I've ever seen. That is truly spectacular,"" said
Don Hall, director of Hawaii's Institute for Astronomy.;    More than 40
million people saw the moon obscure so much of the sun that only a blazing
ring was visible in the western Americas. Shadows stretched from west to east,
as the eclipse turned morning into a night along a 160-mile-wide swath from
Hawaii to Baja to Mexico City to Calamar, Colombia -- the only region where
the eclipse made the Earth totally dark.;    In Hawaii, the volcano Mauna Loa
stunned visiting astronomers by producing a dazzling show of steam and glowing
lava at the height of the eclipse. Local geologists, though, indicated the
activity was probably routine.;    In the Bay Area, more than half the sun was
covered when the eclipse peaked at 11:20 a.m. The world will not see such a
long-lasting eclipse for another 151 years.;    Few people who saw it today
will forget ""The Big One."";    ""It looks neat. It looks like someone took a
bite out of an apple,"" said Matthew Mauranoh, 8, of Mountain View, who peered
through a homemade black box at the Foothill Observatory.;    The view was
diminished for many in Hawaii and Mexico, where low cloud cover obscured the
celestial display.;    As totality arrived at sea level on the Big Island, the
sun was hidden in some places by a cloud layer. At the astronomy observatory
at the top of 13,800-foot Mauna Kea, high cirrus clouds thwarted three of the
10 scientific experiments.;    But scientists were still struck by the sight
of two plumes of flame extending out 100,000 miles from the sun, one directly
on the top of the sun and one at the bottom. Both were colored bright fuchsia.
Another impressive feature was that the sun's corona, which stretched out for
a million miles around the sun, was not symmetrical, but jagged, with spikes
and valleys.;    The eclipse ended in a little more than six minutes with a
dazzling ""diamond ring"" effect on the rim as the first rays of sun emerged
from behind the moon.;    It still got dark below the mountain, but the clouds
disappointed about 500 people gathered on the driving range at the Mauna Lani
resort in south Kohala. Because of the clouds, most were unable to see the
stages of the eclipse until it got totally dark. Spectators' hopes had fallen
and risen in the previous hour as the clouds came and went.;    ""I came
especially for this, and hope we get to see it,"" said Margaret MacLeod, a
mathematics and science teacher from Manhattan Beach shortly before the
eclipse in Hawaii. ""If we don't get to see it, I may have to go to Iraq for
the next one."";    In the Bay Area, mostly sunny skies made eclipse-watching a
treat, except along the coast, where it was obscured by fog.;    Parks,
parking lots, shopping centers, back yards and planetariums became
Eclipsefests as the peak approached.;    More than a hundred sun gazers showed
up at the Branham Lane Park in South San Jose with almost as many gizmos to
help them spot sunspots and watch the moon cross the sun.;    There were funny
Mylar glasses, big pinhole projectors, small pinhole projectors, welder's
glass, welder's masks, binoculars projecting images onto cardboard and
telescopes.;    None was as impressive as Ralph Reeves' interference
birefrigent hydrogen alpha filter telescope. All most of us need to know is
that it takes electricity (provided by a gas generator) to run. And that you
can take pictures of the eclipse through it. That is, if you have film.;    ""I
didn't bring any film with me,"" said Reeves, a retired Lockheed instrument
builder. ""Isn't that awful?"";    At the Children's Discovery Museum in
downtown San Jose, hundreds of youngsters and adults made cardboard
telescopes, which projected the eclipse on white cards through a needle hole
opening. Using mirrors, the eclipse also was projected on the exterior walls
of the lavender-colored museum.;    ""We wanted to make little theaters for all
of the kids to see the eclipse without burning their eyes,"" said Paul
Stonecipher, a discovery museum staff guide.;    For nearly a week now, Hawaii
has been turned into an eclipse theme park. More than 500 astronomers and tens
of thousands of amateurs flocked to the islands to sell nearly everything
under the sun.;    Sun-minded entrepreneurs hawked eclipse T-shirts (60
different designs), hats, posters and cookies. There was even an eclipse
haircut and, of course, an eclipse drink at the Eclipse restaurant in
Kailua-Kona.;    ""Everything is selling pretty well except for the eclipse
Frisbees. Nobody wants eclipse Frisbees,"" said ""Wild Bill"" Lawrence, who
helped out at Moonshadows, one of many small shops set up to sell eclipse
mementos.;    One church offered a nightly eclipse service. Another invited
visitors to ""come worship with the sun."";    On the commercial strip in Kona,
the Big Island's equivalent of Fisherman's Wharf, the eclipse attracted a
human mass equivalent to the flock that attends the island's annual Iron Man
Triathalon.;    ""Most of the scientists who are serious about it are on the
north part of the island,"" Mary Beth Black, a Kona health food store owner,
told Bay Area radio listeners. ""The people here for the fun of it are here in
Kona."";    In Mexico City, the eclipse melded with the city's famed smog. The
Anthropology Museum held a ritual depicting the moon attempting to eat the
sun. Guatemalan Indian villagers, who worry during eclipses that the sun will
disappear forever, rang church bells and banged pots and pans to resurrect it.  ",26,"[ 0.50624592  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
261,"
   Here is a chronology of events in the first
few hours after the 12:04 a.m. (local time) March 24 grounding of
the oil tanker Exxon Valdez on a reef in Alaska's Prince William
Sound, based on Coast Guard transmissions monitored in Washington:
   12:28 a.m. _ The Exxon Valdez is reported ``hard aground'' with
1.26 million barrels of North Slope crude oil and ``approximately
150,000 barrels'' initially released. Initial pollution reports are
described as ``uncertain due to darkness.''
   12:30 a.m. _ Coast Guard closes Port Valdez to all traffic and
dispatches the commercial tug Stalwart from Alyeska Marine Terminal
to assist the Exxon Valdez. Two vessels designed to skim oil off
the water are ``being prepared ... for delivery and deployment.''
   1 a.m. _ A pilot association boat leaves Valdez carrying Coast
Guard officers and Alaska Department of Environmental Conservation
pollution personnel to the Exxon Valdez.
   2:06 a.m. _ The Coast Guard notes that high tide was reached and
the ship remained moored on the reef.
   2:27 a.m. _ A merchant ship reports the oil slick a half mile
south of the Exxon Valdez.
   2:30 a.m. _ Coast Guard personnel arrive at the Exxon Valdez for
the first time.
   3:23 a.m. _ Coast Guard officers aboard the ship report back
that 138,000 barrels of crude oil has been lost.
   4:14 a.m. _ The Exxon Baton Rouge is sent to begin taking oil
from the Valdez.
",27,"[ 0.24660024  0.01578421  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
262,"
   Exxon crews Tuesday finished pumping the
remaining crude oil out of the tanker Exxon Valdez in preparation
for refloating and removing the source of the nation's worst-ever
oil spill.
   The fugitive captain of the Exxon Valdez sent signals he was
ready to surrender to face criminal charges of operating the vessel
while drunk.
   Meanwhile, Exxon said placing an oil-catching boom around the
ship immediately after the grounding could have touched off a giant
explosion of gases from the oil, although that was not the reason
it took 11 hours to set the first containment line.
   ``The worst thing we could have done early on was try to boom
the vessel. We would have lost the vessel,'' said Exxon Shipping
Co. President Frank Iarossi.
   A boom wasn't placed around the vessel for 11 hours because it
wasn't available in Valdez, Exxon officials have said.
   Iarossi also said Exxon has changed its policy because of the
spill and now requires crews to be aboard ship, where drinking is
prohibited, four hours before sailing. Authorities charged the
captain had been drinking before the Valdez sailed.
   Thick oil has floated over more than 1,640 square miles and
soiled 800 miles of beach. Thousands of animals are known dead,
including 30 sea otters.
   Early Tuesday, Exxon said it had finished transferring about 42
million gallons of crude to three other ships. Another 42 million
gallons of oily waste water remained aboard the Valdez, which
spilled more than 10 million gallons of crude into Prince William
Sound when it struck a reef March 24.
   The company said crews would attempt to pump air into the hold
and refloat the vessel off a reef at high tide Wednesday afternoon.
If freed, the still-leaking ship, which has eight holes some 20
feet long in its hull, will be towed to a remote and already fouled
cove for repairs.
   Exxon then planned to take the ship to a port in the Far East,
or to a Portland, Ore., dry dock. Port officials there said they
weren't sure if they'd allow that, even though the $12 million
repair bill would provide about 200 jobs.
   ``We're not willing to trade in the environment for jobs,''
Portland port spokesman Darrel Buttice said Monday.
   Oregon Gov. Neil Goldschmidt said Tuesday there are ``a lot of
questions that need to be answered'' before the Valdez is allowed
in.
   Canadian authorities also asked Exxon for assurances there will
be no damage to the British Columbia coast if the tanker is towed
to Oregon, and the mayor of Valdez said the ship was not welcome
back in the port where it took on the load of crude.
   In Washington, Environmental Protection Administrator William
Reilly said the spill could put the brakes on petroleum exploration
there and in other areas. ``We will take apart the environmental
planning for every aspect of oil development in Alaska and in other
sensitive areas where the environment potentially could be
threatened,'' he told a House appropriations subcommittee.
   The family of the fired Exxon Valdez captain, Joseph Hazelwood,
said the skipper wants to surrender but is awaiting advice from his
attorney, according to Lt. Thomas Fazio, commander of the New York
State Police on Long Island.
   But after Long Island law enforcement authorities waited a
second day for Hazelwood to turn himself in, the Suffolk County
district attorney's office announced there would be no surrender
that day.
   Hazelwood, 42, is accused operating the ship while under the
influence of alcohol, reckless endangerment and negligent discharge
of oil. Bail was previously set in Valdez at $50,000.
   Of about three dozen oil-soaked otters rescued following the
spill, about one-third have died, Alaska Department of Fish and
Game spokesman Jon Lyman said. ``Dozens of otters are dying before
rescuers can get to them,'' he said. Six otters were flown to Sea
World in San Diego on Monday for rehabilitation.
   Fishermen counting on the sound's $12 million annual herring
industry were told Monday by the state that it will not allow a
season this year. Sablefish and shrimp fisheries in Prince William
waters also have been closed.
   An effort at Sawmill Bay, 11 miles west of Valdez, to keep oil
away from a hatchery where 2 million salmon are waiting to be
released to the sea appeared to be failing. Tendrils of oil had
floated past a boom streched across the bay, said officials.
   The spill has shifted public opinion in Alaska about the energy
industry, which has been lobbying for new exploration.
   U.S. Sen. Frank Murkowski, a champion of oil exploration in
Alaska, asked that plans for drilling in Bristol Bay, the state's
richest fishing grounds, be set aside until the industry can
demonstrate that it can respond effectively to spills.
   ``The Exxon Valdez accident has taught us that simply having a
plan is not sufficient,'' the Alaska Republican said.
   At the first Valdez City Council meeting since the spill, two
council members and Mayor John Devens expressed concern that anger
and frustration over the spill was surfacing as harrassment of
pipeline company workers and their children.
   Meanwhile, a multimillion-dollar class-action lawsuit was filed
Monday in federal court in California against Exxon Corp., charging
that the spill has led to gas prices of 10 to 15 cents more a
gallon for California drivers.
",27,"[ 0.36463607  0.00840217  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
263,"
   Exxon today refloated its still-leaking
oil tanker, whose fugitive captain surrendered a few hours earlier
to face charges of operating the vessel while drunk.
   A judge in Hauppauge, N.Y., set bail at $500,000 for the
captain, 20 times as much as prosecutors had recommended, saying
``we have a manmade destruction that has not been equaled,
probably, since Hiroshima.''
   With claims against Exxon for damages escalating into the
millions, U.S. Navy oil skimmers were pressed into service, and
Exxon accepted an offer of help from the Soviet Union.
   Salvage crews pumped compressed air into the $125 million ship
to float it off Bligh Reef, 25 miles from the port of Valdez. From
there, it began a 30-mile journey under the control of six tugs to
a remote cove off Naked Island for temporary repairs, picking its
way through scattered icebergs.
   The ship was refloated before tide reached its peak Wednesday.
``It was not just a stroke of good luck,'' said Gary Gorski,
Exxon's salvage coordinator. ``It took a lot of hard work.''
   Company officials turned to the Far East in search of a dry dock
willing to accept the crippled leviathan Exxon Valdez.
   As the oil off Alaska spread over 2,600 square miles, an area
larger than the state of Delaware, the fired captain of the tanker
turned himself in this morning to authorities in Hauppauge, N.Y.
   Joseph Hazelwood, who lives on New York's Long Island, appeared
with his attorney 12 days after his ship ran aground and nearly a
week after the National Transportation Safety Board said tests
showed he was under the influence of alcohol several hours after
the accident.
   He had been sought since Sunday on a fugitive warrant for three
misdemeanor charges that carry a penalty of up to 2\ years in jail.
Alaska authorities have said they will seek his extradition.
   Exxon said it has changed its policy because of the spill and
now requires crews to be aboard ship, where drinking is prohibited,
four hours before sailing.
   Oil as thick as mayonnaise has soiled 800 miles of beach,
thousands of animals are known dead, including at least 30 sea
otters.
   ``Dozens of otters are dying before rescuers can get to them,''
said fish and game spokesman Jon Lyman.
   The dead otters included a year-old pup, one of five that had
been sent to San Diego's Sea World for treatment.
   While the toll from the nation's worst oil spill mounted, its
impact on the flow of Alaskan crude was abating.
   The Alyeska Pipeline Service Co. said it would resume a normal
daily flow of 2.1 million barrels of oil through the trans-Alaska
pipeline today. The flow had been cut by 60 percent because of
restrictions on tanker traffic in Valdez harbor, but those
restrictions have eased.
   In the longer turn, though, the spill could slow petroleum
exploration in environmentally sensitive areas at least
temporarily, Environmental Protection Administrator William Reilly
told Congress.
   On Tuesday, crews finished transferring about 42 million gallons
of crude from the crippled tanker to other ships in preparation for
the refloating. The $125 million vessel, one of Exxon's newest, had
been sitting on Bligh Reef in since running aground March 24 and
spilling more than 10 million gallons of crude.
   After that, Exxon said its first choice for dry dock is
Portland, Ore., but officials there said they weren't sure if
they'd allow that, even though the $12 million repair bill would
provide about 200 jobs.
   ``A lot of questions that need to be answered,'' Oregon Gov.
Neil Goldschmidt said.
   Canadian authorities also asked Exxon for assurances that towing
the tanker to Oregon won't damage the British Columbia coast.
   Exxon Shipping Co. President Frank Iarossi said the company has
had discussions with dry docks in South Korea, Japan and Singapore
about accepting the vessel. He said the ship won't trail any
pollution while it is towed.
   Iarossi said Exxon had not added up its costs so far.
``Millions, multiple millions. It's going to be big numbers,'' he
said.
   One hundred claims have been filed with the company for damages,
including 40 on Tuesday alone. The claims have come mostly from
fishermen. Exxon has settled only two so far.
   At least 14 lawsuits have been filed.
   The National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration estimated
the leading edge of the spill was 100 miles southwest of the tanker
off the Kenai Peninsula. The spill has been pushed away from Kenai
Fjords National Park and the area south of Seward by water flowing
out of Resurrection Bay.
   Fisheries within the sound remained threatened, and the slick
appeared to be oozing slowly toward other Alaskan ports.
   Exxon gave $1 million on Monday to Prince William Sound
Aquaculture Corp. to buy boom to defend hatcheries, said Susan
Ogle, a spokeswoman for the Cordova spill response office.
   Exxon said it has asked the State Department to notify Moscow
that it has accepted a Soviet offer of an oil skimmer. Five of the
U.S. Navy's 18 heavy-duty oil skimmers went into operation Monday,
and Exxon requested the remaining 13.
   The company also said that placing an oil-catching boom around
the ship immediately after the grounding could have touched off a
giant explosion of gases from the oil, although that was not the
reason it took 11 hours to set the first containment line.
   ``The worst thing we could have done early on was try to boom
the vessel. We would have lost the vessel,'' said Iarossi.
   Officials have said boom wasn't placed around the vessel
immediately because the equipment wasn't available in Valdez.
",27,"[ 0.44138444  0.00820214  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
264,"
   The tanker Exxon Valdez was freed
Wednesday from the reef that ripped its hull and spilled more than
10 million gallons of crude oil, and Alaska's governor asked the
Coast Guard to take over the cleanup from Exxon.
   Elsewhere, the captain of the Exxon Valdez surrendered to police
and was ordered held on $1 million bond.
   Cleanup crews continued to skim mayonnaise-thick oil from Prince
William Sound, but progress was slow and the oil had spread over an
area larger than Delaware. The animal death toll rose and salmon
hatcheries remained endangered.
   In Juneau, Alaska Gov. Steve Cowper said he asked Coast Guard
Rear Adm. Edward Nelson Jr. to take over the much-maligned and
slowly progressing cleanup effort from Exxon, and Nelson indicated
he would, although he has not formally approved the request.
   Cowper said the Coast Guard should be better able to handle
coordination and management of the cleanup than Exxon, which he
said was too bureaucratic.
   ``Maybe that's been the problem all along. You need a military
system to get things done,'' the governor said.
   ``We appreciate the efforts of Exxon _ we think they were done
in good faith. But we think there has to be a much more disciplined
management structure,'' Cowper said at a Capitol news conference.
   President Bush earlier had sent a team of high-level officials
to Valdez and determined that federal management of the cleanup
wasn't necessary. Cowper said Coast Guard management is different
from the plan Bush rejected.
   Although Cowper said he didn't want to be ``extremely critical''
of Exxon, a letter sent to the Coast Guard by a state environmental
official said Exxon had been unresponsive.
   ``Exxon has failed to provide ... the information necessary to
make sound planning recommendations regarding the cleanup of oil
and the protection of resources,'' wrote Lynn Kent, chief of the
state Oil and Hazardous Substance Spill Response Section.
   Exxon spokesman Henry Beathard said the company disagreed with
charges it wasn't handling the cleanup properly and thought Exxon
was the best organization to manage the effort.
   ``We gathered all the resources and organized the cleanup. We
think the most effective and efficient way to carry out this
project is (for Exxon) to continue,'' Beathard said.
   Fired tanker captain Joseph Hazelwood, 42, surrendered to police
on New York's Long Island and a judge set bail at $1 million bond
or $500,000 in cash, up from a prosecutor's recommendation of
$25,000. He had been sought since Saturday on a fugitive warrant on
misdemeanor charges of operating the tanker while drunk.
   ``These misdemeanors are of such a magnitude that has never been
equaled, at least in this country,'' Judge Kenneth Rohl said as
Hazelwood was arraigned. ``He's got to think about that. We have a
manmade destruction that has not been equaled, probably, since
Hiroshima.''
   Salvage crews pumped compressed air into the $125 million ship
and floated it off Bligh Reef, 25 miles from the port of Valdez.
From there, it began a 30-mile journey under the control of six
tugs to a remote cove off Naked Island for temporary repairs,
picking its way through scattered icebergs.
   ``No pollution was immediately visible. There's a real good
possibility (oil) sheen will show up, but they're ready for it,''
Coast Guard spokesman Rick Meidt said.
   The ship was refloated at 10:35 a.m., hours before the tide
reached its peak Wednesday.
   ``It was not just a stroke of good luck,'' said Gary Gorski,
Exxon's salvage coordinator. ``It took a lot of hard work.''
   Exxon Shipping Co. President Frank Iarossi said the company has
talked with dry docks in South Korea, Japan and Singapore about
accepting the vessel after the temporary repairs are made.
   First choice is a Portland, Ore., dry dock, Iarossi said, but
Oregon officials have raised concerns about accepting the ship.
Iarossi said the ship won't trail any pollution while it is towed.
   Oil has floated over 2,600 square miles, soiled 800 miles of
beach and killed thousands of animals, including at least 30 sea
otters, officials said.
   ``Dozens of otters are dying before rescuers can get to them,''
said fish and game spokesman Jon Lyman.
   Favorable weather, however, has kept it offshore from a national
park and additional coastline outside Prince William Sound.
   Flow through the Alaskan pipeline returned to its normal daily
flow of 2.1 million barrels Wednesday, the Alyeska Pipeline Service
Co. said. Oil flow from the North Slope had been cut by 60 percent
because the spill restricted tanker traffic in Valdez harbor, but
traffic has increased.
   In Washington, Sen. Alan Cranston and Rep. Mel Levine accused
the federal government of covering up the possibility of a major
spill and the ineffectiveness of cleanup technology. The California
Democrats also asked President Bush to cancel oil leasing off the
California coast pending a review of the program.
   Hazelwood turned himself in with three attorneys in Hauppauge,
N.Y., and was arraigned. His lawyer said he had not decided whether
to waive extradition proceedings and return to Alaska to face the
charges.
   Hazelwood is charged with operating a ship while under the
influence of alcohol, reckless endangerment and negligent discharge
of oil. The charges carry a combined maximum penalty of 2\ years in
prison and a $10,000 fine.
   FBI officials in Washington say they also are investigating
whether Hazelwood could be charged with felony violations of the
Clean Water Act, which prohibits negligent discharge of pollutants
into navigable waters.
   Hazelwood was fired by Exxon a week ago after the National
Transportation Safety Board said tests taken about nine hours after
the disaster showed he was drunk.
   Hazelwood had been arrested twice for drunken driving and had
his license suspended three times. His mother has told The
Associated Press that her son had undergone rehabilitation and that
Exxon was aware of his drinking problem.
   Exxon said it has changed its policy because of the spill and
now requires crews to be aboard ship, where drinking is prohibited,
four hours before sailing.
   One hundred claims have been filed with the company for damages,
including 40 on Tuesday alone. The claims have come mostly from
fishermen. Exxon has settled only two so far. At least 14 lawsuits
have been filed.
",27,"[ 0.42514099  0.00765341  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
265,"
   Thousands of oil-spattered workers
hampered by worsening weather have only a few more days to clean
crude oil off Alaska's petroleum-fouled shoreline before Exxon Corp.
stops work for the season.
   Exxon says it will pull out the last of its workers by this
coming Friday after treating more than 1,000 miles of shoreline
tainted by the nation's worst oil spill. The company claimed
Thursday that only four miles remained to be treated, but state and
federal agencies disagree with Exxon about how much has been cleaned
and how well.
   ``Our position is that the weather is going to make us go
regardless of what the numbers are, regardless of how much is
left,'' said Exxon spokesman Henry Beathard.
   Exxon said it chose Sept. 15 for the withdrawal of the last of
its thousands of workers and hundreds of vessels to avoid
increasingly poor weather and reduced hours of daylight. In this
land where winter comes early, the first dusting of snow can already
be seen in some higher elevations.
   ``We have buses and planes set up for them to leave that day,''
Beathard said. ``They don't have the option to take that free trip
three days later.'' Already, the first fall storm has raked Prince
William Sound, where the tanker Exxon Valdez spilled nearly 11
million gallons of crude oil on March 24. Gusts to 70 mph and 6-to
10-foot seas shut down the Point Helen cleanup operation once. On
Smith Island, a test of a solvent Exxon wants to use to clean oily
shores was delayed for at least four days by the storm.
   Point Helen, one of the last heavily hit shorelines on the
cleanup list, was left untouched until after mid-August to avoid
disturbing a fish hatchery at Sawmill Bay, officials said.
   Weather permitting, the shore will be ``environmentally stable,''
if not clean, by Exxon's deadline, the company said.
   ``I'm quite confident we are going to make it _ if we can just
get a few good days of weather,'' said beachmaster Warren Winstead
of Baton Rouge, La. ``I think if we can get another few days in,
we'll beat it.''
   But the Alaska Department of Environmental Conservation and Exxon
dispute just about everything, including how many miles have been
treated, how well the job has been done and whether Exxon plans to
duck out after giving the shore a quick once-over.
   The state has sued Exxon and a half-dozen other oil companies
that get oil from Alaska's North Slope by way of the Alyeska
pipeline, claiming they were negligent in preventing and cleaning up
the spill. The Exxon Valdez was outbound from the pipeline terminal
at Valdez when it ripped its bottom open on a reef.
   On Saturday, environmental and fishing groups took two dozen
boats into Port Valdez for a demonstration demanding greater
protection against oil spills.
   Organizers of the event held with Coast Guard permission said
their main goal was to draw attention to tankers of foreign registry
that travel in and out of the port, terminus of the trans-Alaska oil
pipeline.
   Seven vessels that are registered in Italy, Liberia and Israel
and use the port are not regulated adequately and do not carry
sufficient liability insurance for oil-spill compensation, said
Nancy Lethcoe, vice president of the Prince William Sound
Conservation Alliance and a partner in a local tourism business. The
Coast Guard said a total of 70 tankers use the port.
   Crews have removed gross contamination from many shorelines, but
they remain oily. Exxon claims about 244,000 gallons of oil and
water emulsion have been recovered.
   Exxon, the DEC and the Coast Guard all have different figures for
virtually everything, in part because they use different criteria
for measuring contamination and what constitutes an effective
cleanup. The state agency's figures show Exxon claiming to have
treated more shoreline than was fouled.
   ``We're the only people honest about the numbers,'' said Joe
Bridgeman, a DEC spokesman. ``The numbers are being manipulated to
show great shoreline progress.''
   Exxon officials acknowledged discrepancies. ``I honestly don't
have an adequate explantion,'' said spokesman Karsten Rodvik.
   As the cleanup operation grinds down from its peak of 12,000
workers and 1,300 vessels, Valdez officials are bracing for a
shrunken economy.
   Temporary housing set up by Exxon will close. The Valdez
population likely will plunge from 13,000 to about 4,500.
   Public agencies are getting ready to pare their staffs to winter
levels, although some work will continue. Scientists are studying
the effects of fertilizer spread on test beaches to stimulate the
growth of oil-eating bacteria. Other agencies plan to collect
samples and study the environment during the winter.
   Otter and bird rescue operations are shutting down. More than
32,000 birds and 980 otters died from the spill's effects.
   Exxon has started shipping millions of pounds of equipment to
winter storage in Anchorage, home of its Alaska headquarters.
   State environmental officials say Exxon's withdrawal is premature
and that it should stay on the job as long as the weather permits.
``We don't buy the deadline. We not only want them to come back next
year. We want them to work past Sept. 15,'' Bridgeman said.
   Over the winter Exxon plans to monitor how the shoreline looks.
It has made no commitment to come back next summer but says it will
abide by any reasonable decision of the Coast Guard on whether more
cleanup is necessary.
   The price tag for this summer's cleanup is expected to top $1.2
billion and the effort has become an industry of its own.
   Exxon's spending spree was felt statewide and helped lower
unemployment, said state labor economist Neal Fried. In Valdez and
Cordova, unemployment was about half the previous year's level.
   Exxon has paid more than $90 million in damage claims so far, and
is paying up to $3 million a day, about two-thirds directly to
fishermen who were kept in port by oil-covered water.
   Exxon bought 302,000 pairs of rubber gloves, 167,000 sets of rain
gear, 73,000 pairs of rubber boots, 125,000 coveralls and 53,000
life vests.
   The company said it purchased more than 12 million pounds of
groceries, amounting to 1,000 cows, 360,000 chickens, 1,000 turkeys
and 700 pigs. Washing machines agitated more than 3 million pounds
of laundry, and equipment consumed more than 400,000 gallons of
diesel fuel each week.
",27,"[ 0.3688851   0.00732765  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
266,"
   Here is a chronology of the Exxon Valdez oil spill, its cleanup
and related developments:
",27,"[ 0.17082931  0.09840887  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
267,"

Two Coast Guard radar watchers testified Monday that they did not notify the 
skipper of the Exxon Valdez when the vessel sailed off their screens and did 
not try to track its progress by radio until after the tanker grounded on Bligh 
Reef. 


The Exxon Valdez was the only ship under surveillance by the Coast Guard vessel 
traffic center for hours before the March 24 wreck, but that failed to 
guarantee that radar watchers monitored its progress out of treacherous Prince 
William Sound. 


The Coast Guard radar watchman who started work 25 minutes before the grounding 
and 45 minutes before the Exxon Valdez radioed that it was aground said he 
never even tried to locate the off-course vessel because the earlier watchman, 
Gordon Taylor, said it had disappeared from radar. 


Bruce Blandford testified in Alaska Superior Court that, at the first radioed 
report of the wreck, he tried for the first time to find the Exxon Valdez on 
radar and the grounded tanker showed up perfectly. 


Defense lawyers capitalized on the testimony to demonstrate that perhaps it was 
Coast Guard negligence, not the captain's alleged drunken recklessness, that 
contributed to the grounding. Lawyers for the Coast Guard and the Justice 
Department listened intently. 


The skipper, Joseph Hazelwood, 43, of Huntington, N.Y., faces up to seven years 
and three months in jail and a $61,000 fine if convicted on charges of 
operating the Exxon Valdez while intoxicated, reckless endangerment, negligent 
discharge of oil and criminal mischief. 


Neither Blandford nor Taylor notified the skipper when his ship disappeared 
from their radar screens as it sailed on a collision course with Bligh Reef, 
where it broke open and spilled nearly 11 million gallons of crude oil into 
Prince William Sound last March 24. 


The two men revealed that another loaded tanker, the Arco Juneau, had taken a 
similar detour around ice four hours earlier without any problems, and thus 
they thought nothing of the Exxon Valdez leaving its prescribed tanker lane. 
Blandford said such a detour was considered routine. 


Taylor and Blandford said the radar was less than reliable, affected by 
snowstorms and sometimes went on the blink, working off and on near Bligh Reef, 
25 miles out. 


Blandford said the radar seemed to be deteriorating. Taylor indicated that in 
the weeks before the wreck, radar ""targets were getting harder to hold onto."" 


Blandford said the 987-foot Exxon tanker may have shown up on radar after the 
grounding because by then the radar had a broadside view of the tanker. 


Shortly after assuming the watch, Blandford said, he left the controls for 5 
minutes to get coffee and check the weather. 

",27,"[ 0.          0.          0.02005251 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
268,"

Former tanker skipper Joseph Hazelwood, accused of being drunk, reckless and 
most responsible for the nation's worst oil spill, was acquitted of all but a 
minor pollution charge by an Alaskan jury Thursday. 


In a crowded courtroom that included his wife and father, Hazelwood, 43, was 
found not guilty of felony mischief, operating a vessel while under the 
influence of alcohol and reckless endangerment. 


The lone guilty verdict was for the negligent discharge of oil, a misdemeanor 
carrying a maximum penalty of 90 days in jail and a $1,000 fine, far less than 
the 7 years and $61,000 fine he faced if convicted on all counts. 


The verdicts came two days before the anniversary of the grounding of the Exxon 
Valdez, which spilled 11 million gallons of crude oil into Alaska's Prince 
William Sound after slamming into a reef and ripping open its hull. 


The jury deliberated less than 11 hours. Bursts of applause greeted each ""not 
guilty"" verdict read by Judge Karl Johnstone. Attorney Michael Chalos 
triumphantly slammed the defense table with his fist when the felony charge 
fell first. 


""We're not done. We're going to appeal that misdemeanor, but we're very happy 
that all the serious charges were rejected,"" Chalos said later. 


Sentencing was set for this afternoon. 


Regardless of the appeal results, however, legal problems stemming from the 
grounding of the Exxon Valdez will continue to haunt Hazelwood and his former 
employer, Exxon Corp. 


The company still faces federal criminal charges, and Hazelwood is named in 
about 150 civil lawsuits seeking financial damages for the oil spill that 
polluted hundreds of miles of Alaskan shoreline. 


It was not clear how Hazelwood's exoneration on serious criminal charges might 
affect those other cases, but state prosecutors had argued at the close of 
Hazelwood's trial that Exxon would benefit from an acquittal. 


Jurors were clearly swayed by defense arguments that the disastrous grounding 
was an accident, not a crime. Some members of the panel said after the verdict 
that they felt Hazelwood had been negligent, but not criminally reckless, when 
he left the bridge about 12 to 15 minutes before the accident. 


The bearded Hazelwood was as stoic in victory as he had been through more than 
seven weeks of trial, but he smiled broadly as reporters and television cameras 
mobbed the defense table moments after the jury was polled. 


""I'm just relieved,"" he said. 


""It's been long and difficult. I was a pretty anonymous character up until 
about a year ago,"" Hazelwood told reporters outside the courthouse. ""I'm going 
to try to get on with my life now. I'd like to go back to sea. . . . It's what 
I do."" 


His attorney said that Hazelwood may talk to Exxon about reinstatement and 
would fight an expected U.S. Coast Guard effort to revoke his master's license. 
""The only job he ever had was working on tankers owned or operated by Exxon, so 
I suspect that's what he wants to do is go back to work as a captain,"" Chalos 
said. 


Jim Morakis, a spokesman for Exxon in New York, said the company, which has 
fired Hazelwood, was ""pleased that the ordeal of the trial is over for captain 
Hazelwood and his family. 


""The verdict would seem to confirm the view that the grounding of the Exxon 
Valdez was an accident,"" Morakis said. ""In light of pending litigation, any 
other comment would be inappropriate."" 


After the verdict, jury foreman Lori Wing stood and smiled at Hazelwood, 
wishing him ""good luck"" before disappearing into the judge's chambers with her 
colleagues. 


Hazelwood's tearful father, airline pilot Joseph O. Hazelwood, pushed through 
the media throng to embrace Chalos and greet his son. Suzanne Hazelwood, the 
former captain's wife, reached through the crowd to squeeze her husband's hand, 
then hurried from the courtroom. 


Outside the courtroom, Hazelwood at one point broke away from his attorneys to 
shake hands with one of the jurors, Jeffrey Sage, a 28-year-old grocery 
manager. 


""I'm glad to see justice done, Mr. Hazelwood,"" Sage said. ""So am I. Thank you,"" 
Hazelwood responded. 


Sage, whose sister was killed by a drunk driver more than 10 years ago, 
ridiculed the state's drunk driving case against Hazelwood. He noted, for 
example, testimony of the 21 witnesses who saw Hazelwood before and after the 
grounding, all of whom said he did not appear to be under the influence of 
alcohol. 


""For him to have had as much to drink as the state said he did, he would've had 
to crawl back to the ship,"" Sage scoffed. ""He would've been dead."" 


The key sobriety test, taken 10 hours after the grounding, proved only that the 
captain's blood alcohol level was .061%, slightly above the Coast Guard's 
permissible level but well below the state's .10% minimum standard. 


Prosecutors brought in an Oklahoma toxicologist who used a complicated, and 
scientifically controversial, formula to estimate that Hazelwood was legally 
drunk when he sailed from Valdez. 


The defense argued that Hazelwood, alone in his cabin and believing that his 
career had just ended on Bligh Reef, drank after the accident and skewed the 
test results. No evidence of that was presented during the trial, however, and 
Hazelwood did not testify. 


Sage also said the panel concluded that Hazelwood's orders before and after the 
grounding ""all were prudent and precise. He was not impaired."" 


Fellow juror Terrill Smith said the panel was leaning to acquittal from the 
very first ballot, although it took some time to reach unanimous agreement. 


The incident that provoked the most discussion, the two jurors said, was 
Hazelwood's absence from the bridge, leaving his third mate responsible for 
steering around ice floes. 


Prosecutor Brent Cole had argued that was an example of criminal recklessness. 
The jury agreed with the defense, which noted that Hazelwood had given the 
correct course instructions and was not behaving differently than other 
captains in similar situations. 


Both jurors also criticized the Coast Guard, which operates a $70-million 
vessel traffic center in Valdez. Coast Guard radar operators had failed to 
alert the Exxon Valdez that it was heading for the rocks of Bligh Reef. 


""They obviously weren't doing their jobs,"" Sage said of the Coast Guard. 


In fact, the issue of who is to blame for the disastrous effects of the spill 
remains unresolved, at least to some extent. 


Defense lawyers had complained since the outset that Hazelwood was being held 
responsible not only for the grounding -- which they conceded was ""a tragic 
accident"" -- but also for the ""botched containment and cleanup."" 


""A lot of people shared the blame for what happened, but all sides were trying 
to sink captain Hazelwood. The state of Alaska, the Coast Guard, the federal 
government, they all wanted him to be their scapegoat,"" said Tom Russo, another 
defense attorney. 


""Perhaps now people will look beyond the captain."" 


Environmental groups quickly reacted to the verdict by agreeing with the 
defense characterization of Hazelwood as a scapegoat. ""Exxon, not one of its 
employees, should have been tried,"" said Robert H. Sulnick, executive director 
of Santa Monica-based American Oceans Campaign. 


Bruce Manheim, spokesman for the Environmental Defense Fund in Washington, 
D.C., said ""we think Mr. Hazelwood has been to some extent set up by that 
corporation as a scapegoat and that Exxon is the real culprit in this 
disaster,"" he said. 


Alaska Atty. Gen. Douglas Baily said at a news conference in Juneau that he was 
pleased with the verdict and had congratulated the prosecutors on the single 
conviction. 


He said the prosecution had proceeded against Hazelwood ""certainly not as a 
scapegoat, but as a result of his own involvement as we saw it. It was always 
my view that the captain of that vessel is ultimately responsible."" 


Former Valdez Mayor John Devins said Hazelwood was never the issue. 


""The real issue confronting the state of Alaska is whether industry is prepared 
to prevent another oil spill,"" said Devins, now a candidate for Congress. 


Hazelwood's legal battles began within a few days of the grounding. He was 
still in Valdez when the Coast Guard served a summons notifying the captain 
that his license would be reviewed. Exxon immediately fired the skipper. 


Relieved of command and a job, and with his personal security in some doubt, 
the grounded captain drove to Anchorage and flew home to Huntington, Long 
Island, apparently unaware that local law enforcement officials were preparing 
a criminal action against him. 


In the next few days, Hazelwood would become the object of a highly publicized 
manhunt launched by embarrassed Alaskan officials who didn't know he had left 
the state. 


A few days later, however, accompanied by his attorneys, Hazelwood surrendered 
to a court near his Long Island home. Amid a circus of reporters and TV 
cameras, a Suffolk County judge accused Hazelwood of complicity in an 
environmental disaster comparable to the atomic bombing of Hiroshima. 


Bail was set at $1 million. Hazelwood spent a night in the county jail before 
an appeals court reduced it to $25,000. 


Last May a grand jury in Alaska added the most serious charge -- a felony count 
of criminal mischief that carried a potential penalty of five years in prison 
-- setting the stage for the trial that began Feb. 5. 

",27,"[ 0.         0.         0.0094752 ...,  0.         0.         0.       ]"
269,"

Exxon salvage crews successfully refloated the stricken tanker Exxon Valdez on 
Wednesday as the former captain of the vessel surrendered to authorities in New 
York to face criminal charges in the massive oil spill. 


Joseph Hazelwood, 42, surrendered to police in a Long Island suburb of New York 
City and hours later Judge Kenneth Rohl set bail at $500,000 -- 10 times what 
Alaskan authorities had sought. 


Hazelwood's lawyer said he had not decided whether to waive extradition 
proceedings and return to Alaska to face the charges; Hazelwood was not 
required to enter a plea Wednesday. 




Fired by Exxon 


After the Exxon Valdez ran aground on March 24, Hazelwood was found to be 
legally drunk and was fired by Exxon. Hazelwood left Alaska before local 
authorities could interview him, and had been pursued since Saturday on a 
fugitive warrant on three misdemeanor charges: operating a watercraft while 
intoxicated, reckless endangerment and negligent discharge of oil at sea. 


Together, those three charges have a maximum penalty of 27 months in prison and 
a $10,000 fine. 


""These misdemeanors are of such a magnitude that has never been equaled, at 
least in this country,"" Rohl said. ""We have a man-made destruction that has not 
been equaled, probably, since Hiroshima."" 


FBI officials in Washington say they also are investigating whether Hazelwood 
could be charged with felony violations of the Clean Water Act, which prohibits 
negligent discharge of pollutants into navigable waters. 


No people have been killed or even seriously injured by the spill, but oil has 
seriously disrupted the rich Prince William Sound fishing industry. Also, 
animal-rescue teams estimate the spill has killed several thousand birds and 
hundreds of sea otters. 


Estimates of wildlife deaths are not easy to make because oiled birds are hard 
to spot from the air, and many beaches are difficult to reach for in person 
inspections. 


In the wildlife-rich sound, cleanup crews continued to skim emulsified oil as 
thick as pudding. As of Wednesday, 12 days after the Exxon Valdez ran aground, 
the 240,000-barrel slick was estimated to affect an area the size of Delaware, 
and Exxon's fleet of oil-skimming boats had picked up only about 5% of the 
spilled oil. 


The state of Alaska condemned Exxon's cleanup on Wednesday and asked the Coast 
Guard to take over the effort. Rep. George Miller (D-Martinez), a senior member 
of the House Interior and Insular Affairs Committee added during a tour of 
Prince William Sound that fraud ""is not too strong a word to describe Exxon's 
cleanup claims."" 


""What they are really doing is managing the failure,"" Miller said after meeting 
with Aleut Indian residents in the tiny fishing village of Chenega Bay. 


Alaska Gov. Steve Cowper said the Coast Guard should be better able to handle 
coordination and management of the cleanup than Exxon, which he said was too 
bureaucratic. 


""Maybe that's been the problem all along. You need a military system to get 
things done,"" the governor said. 


Although Cowper said he did not want to be ""extremely critical"" of Exxon, a 
letter sent to the Coast Guard by a state environmental official said Exxon had 
been unresponsive. 


""Exxon has failed to provide . . . the information necessary to make sound 
planning recommendations regarding the cleanup of oil and the protection of 
resources,"" wrote Lynn Kent, chief of the state Oil and Hazardous Substance 
Spill Response Section. 


President Bush earlier had sent a team of high-level officials to Valdez and 
determined that federal management of the cleanup was not necessary. Rear Adm. 
Edward Nelson Jr., commander of the Coast Guard's 17th District in Juneau had 
no immediate reply to Cowper's request. 


Exxon spokesman Henry Beathard said the company disagreed with charges it was 
not handling the cleanup properly and thought Exxon was the best organization 
to manage the effort. 


""We gathered all the resources and organized the cleanup. We think the most 
effective and efficient way to carry out this project is (for Exxon) to 
continue,"" Beathard said. 


The tanker refloat went unexpectedly well. The 987-foot ship lifted off the 
reef three hours earlier than the Exxon salvage crew predicted, proceeding 
without problem under close watch of a flotilla of six tugs and other support 
craft, including the Coast Guard Cutter Rush, to a cove on uninhabited Naked 
Island 25 miles to the southwest, where repairs will be made. 


Even though a relatively well-known salvage technique was used to float the 
Valdez -- using compressed air to force water out of the ruptured hold and thus 
assist high tide in lifting the vessel off the rocks -- ""we couldn't predict 
this by the exact hour or minute,"" said salvage coordinator Gary Gorski, who 
supervised from the ferry Glacier Queen II. 


Almost 1 million barrels of oil were pumped from the Exxon Valdez to three 
smaller tankers over the last 11 days, and the salvage process began as soon as 
the last of the tankers left for Southern California refineries on Tuesday. The 
ship was made airtight above the water line, and then, on Wednesday, compressed 
air was forced inside. 


The air forced out some of the 998,000 barrels of sea water that had been 
pumped into the stricken tanker as oil was removed. 


Naval architect Richard Smith, hired by Exxon, estimated before the refloat 
that the pressure would force enough water out of the hull to lift the ship at 
least three feet. He added that this technique also would produce a pressurized 
buffer of clean sea water between the oil left in the tanker -- about 15,000 to 
20,000 barrels -- and the once-pristine waters off Valdez. 


Even so, Exxon officials warned in advance that refloating the ship could 
uncover additional oil that had been pinned in pockets between the ship's hull 
and rocky Bligh Reef. 


The Port of Valdez was closed at 10 a.m. to clear the iceberg-dotted waters of 
other vessels as the refloating was attempted and Coast Guard spokesman Bruce 
Pimental said that the vital oil terminal would remain closed until the 
stricken tanker was safely anchored. 


However, flow through the Alaskan pipeline returned to its normal daily flow of 
2.1 million barrels Wednesday, the Alyeska Pipeline Service Co. said. Oil flow 
from the North Slope had been cut by 60% because the spill restricted tanker 
traffic in Valdez harbor, but traffic has increased. 


Gorski said that the ease with which the refloat was accomplished may indicate 
that the damage, while severe, may not be as bad as earlier feared. 


Exxon officials were reluctant to estimate how long temporary repairs would 
take or discuss where the tanker would be taken to permanently patch its hull 
and rebuild its internal pumping system, which also was compromised in the 
accident. 


Portland, Ore., was the company's first choice, but it backed away from that 
option after Oregon Gov. Neil E. Goldschmidt and managers of the Port of 
Portland expressed concern that the Exxon Valdez would still be leaking oil 
when it arrived there. 


Already under attack by Gov. Cowper for fouling Prince William Sound, Exxon 
said it would consider having the tanker repaired in the Far East -- Japan, 
Korea or Singapore. 


Even as it made that concession, the company denied its ship would endanger any 
port it visited for repair. 


Staff writer Larry B. Stammer in Valdez contributed to this report. 

",27,"[ 0.         0.         0.0112419 ...,  0.         0.         0.       ]"
270,"
   Arkansas Gov. Bill Clinton secured a
solid majority to win his sixth straight Democratic nomination. But,
like a boxing champion who slipped by on points, he is being asked
to explain the lack of a knockout punch.
   Clinton, 43, was the nation's youngest governor when first
elected in 1978 and he has had a stranglehold on the state's
Democratic Party ever since.
   But in last week's primary, he garnered just 55 percent of the
vote while Tom McRae, an unpolished campaigner who heads a public
policy think tank, earned 39 percent. Four also-rans divided the
rest.
   Clinton, who toyed with the idea of running for the presidency in
1988 and already is talking about 1996, said he saw no cause for
concern in the margin of his primary victory.
   ``I didn't see how I could get 60 percent, knowing the number of
people who were saying in the surveys that they thought I was a good
governor but were concerned about the tenure issue,'' Clinton said
recently.
   Tenure was summed up repeatedly by McRae as ``10 years is long
enough.''
   Arkansans grow bored with their politicians sooner than voters
elsewhere, Clinton said, in part because politics in the state is so
personal. Pumping hands at shopping malls and crawfish festivals is
considered as important as running the right television ad.
   ``I'm just trying to tell people that in business they wouldn't
fire a 43-year-old with 10 years of experience who's doing a good
job,'' Clinton said days before the primary.
   Sheffield Nelson, who upset Rep. Tommy Robinson for the
Republican gubernatorial nomination, already is jumping on the
theme, saying ``Arkansas is ready for a change.''
   Clinton, who has focused on improving the state's education
system, counters by calling himself the candidate of change.
   ``Frankly, if you look at what I proposed, compared with the
others, it represents more change,'' he said. ``Ten years is an
asset, not a liability.''
   Clinton lost his first re-election bid in 1980 to Republican
Frank White, but won again in 1982, 1984 and 1986, when the
gubernatorial term was changed to four years. He has all but
promised not to run for the White House in 1992 if re-elected this
year.
   His showing in this year's primary, largely in line with
pre-election polls, was the first time since his political comeback
in 1982 that Clinton got less than 60 percent of the primary vote.
   ``I'm sure the governor would like to have made a better showing,
but when you're in office 10 years you have a lot of friends and a
lot of enemies,'' said Bill Paschall, a Little Rock political
consultant. ``I don't think it's a death blow that he made 55
(percent), but it shows him he has to work harder.''
   While the biggest complaint against Clinton appears to be that he
has been in office too long, the governor also has been accused of
being more interested in his national ambitions than state concerns.
   Clinton's recent troubles with the legislature also have been a
sticking point. Twice in 1989 he failed to win legislative approval
for proposals to increase taxes.
   Nelson, who hopes to paint Clinton as a tax-and-spend Democrat,
said the primary election results show the governor is on the ropes.
   ``I'd say against an unknown who never held an office, I think
that was low. It probably did make some bells go off in his head,''
Nelson said.
   Clinton said he would have done better if a large number of
traditional Democrats hadn't crossed over to the GOP primary to vote
against Robinson.
   ``We did poorly in areas where I did not campaign; where my
supporters, in spite of my best interest, believed the polls and
didn't work; and where we did a poor job of telling the people what
I had done that affected their lives; and where people knew there
was an alternative but didn't know much about what the alternative
was,'' Clinton said.
   Betsey Wright, Clinton's former chief of staff, said the
governor's supporters were complacent.
   ``Bill Clinton is always perceived as being so strong that people
find it difficult to believe in calls for such cohesion and tight
energies,'' she said of the primary.
",28,"[ 0.41048118  0.01074837  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
271,"
Language: <F P=105> German </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Editorial by Kurt Kister: ""Clinton's Astonishing Comeback""] </F>
  [Text] On 20 January 1993, Bill Clinton swore his oath of 
office. One month afterwards, renowned commentators declared 
the administration to be a premature birth without any marked 
prospects for survival. Already, during the first week, the 
newly installed President had caused a storm with his 
ill-considered attempt to lift the ban against homosexuals in 
the U.S. Army. Then one blow followed after the other: 
Candidates for important offices were rejected; strong words on 
Haiti and Bosnia during the election campaign were not followed 
by the promised deeds; the new team in the White House was 
extremely clumsy. The man, whom almost two-thirds of all 
Americans trusted -- even though only 43 percent had voted for 
him -- seemed to flounder like a leaking ship. 
  How times change! Today Bill Clinton is a President who has 
managed to achieve the most important thing within 12 months: 
America feels better again. Hardly any other master in the 
White House after 1945 has caused as many things to move in as 
many fields as Clinton. In this he is similar to -- and this 
makes conservatives complain -- Ronald Reagan, the great 
changer. And even more: He is popular. After Clinton's 
popularity rates rose and fell like a roller-coaster, they have 
now almost reached the level of 20 January again. About 60 
percent attest that he is doing good work. One-fifth even 
declare Clinton to be the person they admire most -- far ahead 
of family members or other authorities. 
  What are the successes? First of all, there is the economy. 
For 1994, a growth rate like the one in 1988 is predicted, 
which is better than for a long time. Prices are stable, the 
people have confidence in their future and spend more money, on 
consumer goods and investments. At Christmas, business 
purchases with credit cards rose by 25 percent -- an unambiguous 
sign that the people incur debts, because they are confident 
that they will be able to pay them. Because confidence is 
higher and interest rates are still low, more Americans are 
buying houses and cars. This creates satisfaction and 
stimulates economic development. 
  Critics claim that all this is a success Clinton has been 
given for free; the economy would have recovered with or without 
Clinton. The opposite cannot be proved, but it is a fact that 
the economic climate has clearly improved since the narrow vote 
in favor of Clinton's budget and has not deteriorated as the 
Republicans predicted pessimistically. Another important sign 
is that the annual budget deficit will go down. While, in 1992, 
Bush's economists predicted a deficit of about $300 billion for 
1994, now it seems that the deficit will go down to about $200 
billion in 1994. This is due to the recovery of the economy, 
but also to Clinton's thrift measures. Bill Clinton does what 
Reagan and Bush only promised: The deficit really goes down. 
The debts and the economy were the most important topics of the 
election campaign. Clinton has not disappointed his voters. 
  This range of topics also includes the North American Free 
Trade Agreement, NAFTA, and the world trade agreement GATT. 
With great skill, Clinton brought together a coalition of 
Republicans and Democrats, who pushed the controversial NAFTA 
treaty through Congress. Even though the president had to 
primarily struggle against his own party, he turned out to be a 
politician with leadership power, who enforces principles, if 
necessary also against his friends. Regarding the GATT 
conclusion, the Americans under Clinton and chief negotiator 
Kantor also acted skillfully and, in the end, correctly. A 
pleasant side effect of the NAFTA affair was that the charlatan 
Ross Perot was deflated -- above all by Al Gore, the most 
influential vice president of the recent past. 
  There are still a number of other things, for instance a new 
weapons law, which Bush and Reagan always blocked; a security 
package, which will bring, among other things, 100,000 
additional policemen to the streets of the cities; a law that 
permits young people to work their university loans off through 
some kind of alternative national service. And the Clintons, 
with First Lady Hillary at the head, have started the struggle 
for a general health insurance. If this struggle were to show 
success in 1994, this could become a piece of reform that can be 
compared only with the introduction of compulsory social 
insurance more than 50 years ago. 
  And what about foreign policy? Everyone knows the traps in 
Somalia, Haiti, North Korea, Bosnia, and Russia. Clinton's men 
sometimes stumbled, also because they were so inexperienced in 
international matters. However, the team is consolidating 
itself. The change in the Pentagon is one sign of that; Strobe 
Talbott's appointment as Warren Christopher's deputy is another. 
Europe must get used to the fact that this administration no 
longer claims superiority in all issues, that it defines 
national interest more narrowly and is, therefore, more careful 
with interventions -- political and military ones. One must 
never forget: Bill Clinton has been elected because he is 
supposed to reestablish America's trust in itself. This is the 
yardstick by which the President and his voters measure success 
or failure. 

",28,"[ 0.05806414  0.05734071  0.01598366 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
272,"
GOVERNOR Bill Clinton of Arkansas was gambling yesterday that an
extraordinary prime-time television confession of 'wrongdoing' in his
marriage has salvaged his campaign for the Democratic presidential
nomination.
During a joint TV appearance with his wife, Hillary, Mr Clinton admitted his
marriage had been rocky, but he denied allegations of a 12-year-long affair
with a former Arkansas state employee and part-time cabaret singer.
Ms Gennifer Flowers, the employee, last night held a news conference in New
York in which she accused Mr Clinton of lying when he claimed they were just
friends. She said: 'I was Bill Clinton's lover for 12 years. . . he is
absolutely lying. I'm disappointed, but realistically I never thought he'd
come out and admit it.'
In response to one question, she said the local Republican party in Arkansas
had offered her money six months ago to reveal her affair with Mr Clinton,
but she had refused. She said she had lied to the press to protect him and
that later she sold her story to a supermarket tabloid because he had
angered her.
At the press conference Ms Flowers played 10 minutes of tape-recorded
telephone conversation she said was between her and Mr Clinton. Published
excerpts of these tapes have so far proved inconclusive and questions have
surfaced about her credibility.
Ms Flowers maintains she met Mr Clinton in 1979 and 1980 at the Excelsior
Hotel in Little Rock. But the hotel did not open until 1982. She also claims
to have reported on Mr Clinton while working with a local TV station, but
Little Rock's KARK-TV said it could find no tapes to support this.
Mr Clinton, the early front-runner for the Democratic nomination, was judged
yesterday to have taken a huge gamble by appearing on CBS's programme 'Sixty
Minutes', which generally attracts more than 30m viewers.
Although his campaign advisers said the sex scandal rumours were drowning
out the Arkansas governor's message to voters, the risk was his confessions
could draw further media scrutiny just three weeks before the critical New
Hampshire primary election.
Mr Clinton, 46, appeared calm and good-humoured throughout the interview. 'I
have acknowledged causing pain in my marriage,' he said. 'I have said things
to you tonight and to the American people from the beginning that no
American politician ever has.' But in response to a question on whether he
had ever committed adultery, Mr Clinton avoided a clear-cut response. 'I'm
not prepared to say tonight that any married couple should ever discuss that
with anyone but themselves.'
He appealed to the US public for fairness and urged the media to respect his
privacy, instead of turning the 1992 campaign into a 'game of gotcha'.
Mr Clinton saw his popularity fall sharply last week among likely Democratic
voters in New Hampshire, Reuter reports from Boston.
In a poll by the American Research Group, which has conducted daily surveys
in advance of the February 18 primary, support for Mr Clinton fell 14
percentage points in five days last week.
The latest polling data put Mr Clinton in second place, with 25 per cent, to
Mr Paul Tsongas, a former Massachusetts senator, who has 27 per cent of
voters' support.
",28,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
273,"
In the closing stages of the election campaign President George Bush is
trying to win votes by convincing the public that Mr Bill Clinton has made a
hash of governing Arkansas. The state ranks at or near bottom on almost
every social and economic criteria, says Mr Bush. 'He would do for the
United States what he's done to Arkansas. We do not want to be the lowest of
the low.'
Arkansas is still one of the poorest states in the US. It ranks 47th in
terms of income, ahead of only Mississippi, Utah and West Virginia. Per
capita incomes are three-quarters of the national average, roughly the same
ratio as in 1979 when Mr Clinton was first elected governor. But while the
scale of Mr Clinton's achievement in Arkansas is disputed, the implication
that he has done nothing right in 12 years is unwarranted.
Mr Clinton's first gubernatorial term was a failure. The youthful governor,
then in his early 30s, charged in 'like a knight on a white horse to set the
world straight' recalls Ms Diane Blair, a campaign official and old friend.
'He tried to do too much, too soon and stepped on just about every economic
toe in Arkansas.'
Defeat in 1980 by a Republican was a seminal event in Mr Clinton's life. He
returned to the governor's mansion in 1983 a wiser politician, committed to
consensus, rather than controversy, and convinced that he could make
progress only on one or two fronts at a time.
The priorities he chose were economic development and educational reform.
The statistics point to significant achievements in both fields. Mr Clinton
has also been innovative in welfare reform, pioneering forms of 'work-fare'
that make benefits conditional on acceptance of jobs or skill training. But
his record since 1983 can be criticised in many other respects. For example,
he has relied too heavily on an unfair tax system, paid too little attention
to the environment, failed to pass civil rights legislation, and done less
than some other states to reform a poorly functioning health-care system.
In promoting industrial development Mr Clinton has struck a balance between
free enterprise and government intervention. 'I know Bill well enough to
know he's fully committed to the free market,' says Mr Warren Stephens,
president of Stephens Inc, a financial services group based in Little Rock.
Mr Stephens is backing Mr Clinton in the presidential race, having always
previously favoured Republicans.
But while welcoming competition, Mr Clinton believes government must create
an environment conducive to growth. His 'hands on' approach was tested in
1985 when International Paper threatened to close down its plants in Pine
Bluff and Camden, mill towns in southern Arkansas. 'Clinton went nuts,' says
Mr John Brummett, political editor of the Arkansas Times. After hectic
negotiations, he persuaded the company to expand its operations in Arkansas,
but only after creating an unusually generous investment tax credit worth
seven cents on the dollar.
Mr Dave Harrington, the head of Arkansas's Industrial Development
Commission, says the state's goal is to forge a partnership between the
private and public sectors. 'We're in trouble in this country because many
people believe government and business should be separated. Elsewhere there
is a unity of purpose, a complementarity. Mr Clinton has brought a lot of
that to Arkansas.'
The commission has targetted high-tech sectors, such as aerospace, in its
bid to strengthen Arkansas's manufacturing base. Along with development
agencies in other states it also energetically promotes inward investment,
offering both tax incentives and special support services. 'We guarantee to
a company that we will tailor-train its workforce,' says Mr Harrington. 'We
do whatever it takes, including, for example, sending workers to Germany for
training.'
The Arkansas economy has revived during the Clinton years, creating jobs
faster than the nation, especially in the past three years. Manufacturing
employment has grown about 12 per cent since 1980 compared with a 9 per cent
contraction nationally, and accounts for about 20 per cent of employment
against 15 per cent nationally. Some 109 foreign companies, including big
names such as British Aerospace and Dassault, the French aerospace group,
have sizeable investments in the state, three times as many as in 1979.
How much of this progress reflects active industrial policies is uncertain.
Companies have also been attracted by Arkansas's low wages, weak unions and
central location. During the Bush years, the state may have looked
artificially strong because other regions experienced a hangover after the
speculative excesses of the 1980s.
In the longer-term, Arkansas hopes that educational reforms will pay
economic dividends. In the late 1970s Arkansas schools were widely regarded
as among the nation's worst. On some measures they still lag badly: Arkansas
ranks 25th out of 28 states using the American College Test, a popular
college admission exam. This is a few places worse than in 1979.
Mr Burton Elliott, Arkansas's director of education, says the lack of
improvement reflects a rise from 38 per cent to 51 per cent in the
proportion of students attending college; many of the weaker pupils tested
today would have been drop-outs a decade ago. But he readily concedes the
benefits of many reforms are yet to be realised. 'School improvement is a
process, not an event; it takes time.'
Mr Clinton's main schools legislation was passed in 1983, following a year
of state-wide consultations led by his wife, Hillary. The measures included
an increase in teachers' salaries, then the lowest in the US; tougher course
requirements (many schools in rural areas had not previously offered
advanced courses in maths, science or languages); a reduction in average
class sizes; and regular testing of pupils to check progress.
In the past two years, Mr Clinton has built on this foundation with a
'second wave' of reforms. He has encouraged more competition within the
public sector by allowing students a free choice of schools and by making
school districts publish 'report cards' measuring their relative
performance. Teachers' salaries have again been increased, rising by 14 per
cent in the past year. .
Mr Mahlon Martin, head of the Winthrop Rockefeller Foundation in Little
Rock, says Mr Clinton's real achievement has been to change attitudes. A
state that previously paid little attention to schooling has been persuaded
that 'the long-term solution to economic problems lies in a commitment to
education'. In a poor region, money speaks louder than words. Mr Clinton has
repeatedly persuaded a sceptical legislature to finance educational reforms
by big increases in sales taxes.
He has done so partly by taking on the teachers' unions. The 1 cent sales
tax to finance the 1983 reforms was agreed only after Mr Clinton insisted on
competence tests for teachers. Some 1,400 teachers lost their jobs, causing
a rupture in relations between union leaders and Mr Clinton.
While grudgingly acknowledging some achievements, Mr Clinton's critics in
Arkansas find plenty to complain about. 'He has been a tax-and-spend
governor who believes in intervention,' says Mr Charles Venus, a Little Rock
economic consultant with a free market bent.
'Within six months or a year' of entering the White House, a President
Clinton would be pressing for a national value-added tax to pay for social
reforms, he warns. The figures, however, hardly suggest that Mr Clinton has
created a Leviathan in Arkansas: the ratio of state and local taxes to
personal incomes is still the fifth-lowest in the nation.
Ms Meredith Oakley, a political columnist for the conservative Arkansas
Democrat-Gazette, is even more scathing. 'I'd rate him only average as a
chief executive. It's not his vision that I have problems with, it's his
ability to translate it into something worthwhile. Millions of Americans are
going to be disappointed.'
Mr Brummett of the Arkansas Times, while better disposed towards Mr Clinton,
echoes her theme. 'The bottom line is that he could have got a lot more done
if he had pushed harder. He has a tendency to compromise quickly. He is
obsessed with trying to please people.'
Critics cite two instances where Mr Clinton has fallen short. The governor
has repeatedly relied on increases in sales taxes which are 'regressive' -
in the sense that they inevitably absorb a larger proportion of the incomes
of the poor than the rich. The excuse was that this was unavoidable because
a three-quarters majority of the legislature is needed to pass an increase
in income taxes. Mr Brummett and others, however, say Mr Clinton had the
authority to insist on a fairer solution; he could at least have won
exemptions for commodities such as food.
The environment is a second example. 'He went for jobs, jobs, jobs when he
could have been truer to his instincts,' says one critic. Mr Clinton has
been widely attacked for standing back while big companies, such as poultry
producers, badly polluted Arkansas's rivers.
No governor who has served as long as Mr Clinton can avoid mistakes or
expect to be free of controversy. But what general conclusions for a Clinton
presidency can be drawn from his Arkansas record?
His belief in education as a vehicle for economic and social advance is hard
to question. If elected, he would be certain to use the power of the
presidency to promote this cause. Perhaps more surprising, he has just as
solid a record in promoting business; he differs with many conservatives
only in instinctively rejecting a laissez-faire approach. Rightly or
wrongly, he is likely to regard his Arkansas record as evidence that active
industrial policies can indeed 'grow manufacturing jobs'.
The biggest doubt lies over his toughness: will he have the determination to
overcome the formidable interest group pressure blocking reform in
Washington? One reason for optimism is Mr Clinton's remarkable ability to
bridge social and economic gaps: it is striking, for example, that he wins
90 per cent of the vote in the poorest regions of Arkansas while also
attracting enthusiastic support from the state's elite business leaders. If
Mr Clinton wins this election, the White House will be occupied by a
pragmatic moderate with a talent for building diverse coalitions. After the
ideological infighting of the past decade this could prove a recipe for
constructive change.
",28,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
274,"
While President Bill Clinton has been quaffing Pilsner with Czech President
Vaclav Havel in Europe, controversy over his investments in Arkansas in the
1980s has continued to ferment, threatening to damage his credit with the US
public.
The controversy is over whether a bankrupt Arkansas savings and loan
organisation used its funds to prop up Mr and Mrs Clinton's investments in
an Ozark mountain property venture known as Whitewater or to pay Mr
Clinton's campaign debts from his 1984 race for the state governorship.
Mr and Mrs Clinton made the Dollars 68,900 investment in 1978, in
partnership with Mr James McDougal, owner of Madison Guaranty, an Arkansas
savings and loan entity. The Clintons say they lost all their money.
Republican critics want an investigation of whether Mr Clinton as governor
intervened to delay the shutdown of Madison, which failed in 1989 at a cost
to taxpayers of around Dollars 50m. They also want to examine suggestions
that Madison money was improperly channelled to Whitewater and to Mr
Clinton's 1984 campaign fund.
Mr McDougal denies that the Clintons benefited in any way from his handling
of Madison, and notes that he was acquitted in 1990 of fraud charges brought
by a Republican-appointed prosecutor.
Adding to interest in the case, the Clintons' Whitewater files were handled
by Mr Vincent Foster, the deputy White House counsel who committed suicide
last year.
Despite the intense Republican pressure, neither the Whitewater controversy
nor allegations last month by two Arkansas state troopers about Mr Clinton's
sex life as governor appear to have damaged his popularity.
A Washington Post-ABC poll published yesterday showed that 59 per cent of
those questioned approved of the job Mr Clinton is doing as president, with
36 per cent disapproving - a rather better rating than the same survey's
finding in December, before both sets of allegations boiled over.
Another poll published by USA Today and CNN showed Mr Clinton's approval
rating holding steady at 54 per cent, and 72 per cent said Whitewater had
had no effect on their opinion.
Nevertheless, White House advisers fear a steady erosion of Mr Clinton's
credibility, with both polls showing a decline in the number of people
believing in his honesty and integrity.
The White House strategy for dealing with the Whitewater charges, which were
also raised during the 1992 presidential election campaign, had been to
stonewall. As Mr Clinton put it: 'I didn't do anything wrong. I made an
investment and lost money. I then spent more money to document that we'd
lost money. All the federal investigators in the world that have looked into
this, not a single soul has alleged that I've done anything wrong.'
The White House and attorney-general Janet Reno had tried to deflect calls
for the appointment of a special counsel to investigate the matter, arguing
that anyone she named would be viewed as no more independent from her than
the career justice department official now in charge of the investigation.
But the move became inevitable after nine Democratic senators joined a
chorus of Republicans in urging the president to ask for a special counsel.
Mr Clinton said in a television interview in Prague that he had given all
the information he had to the Justice Department, but 'then people said
'Well, that's not enough' . . . So I think we have to evaluate that and see
where we are.'
Besides reccommending that he ask Ms Reno to appoint an independent counsel
some White House officials are understood to be urging Mr Clinton to make
public all the documents he has handed over to the justice department.
Because they were the object of a subpoena, the documents are currently
secret.
Ms Reno would have to name the counsel herself, since the law passed in the
wake of the Watergate scandal 20 years ago providing for a special counsel
to be named by a judicial panel lapsed last year.
Whatever Mr Clinton does, he can scarcely win. Keeping the Whitewater
documents sealed fuels his political enemies and feeds speculation that he
might have something to hide. Publishing them will just create a flurry of
further news reports.
But with senior members of his own party, such as Senators Pat Moynihan and
Bill Bradley, urging him to ask for a special counsel, Mr Clinton can no
longer complain that the furore is just partisan politics - an argument that
has carried less weight all along because the Republican attack has been led
by the eminently moderate Congressman Jim Leach of Iowa, rather than the
party's more rabid tub-thumpers.
",28,"[ 0.  0.  0. ...,  0.  0.  0.]"
275,"
   Ambition is a little engine that gives Gov. Bill Clinton no rest. 

   Ambition has propelled this bright, engaging Rhodes Scholar into the dogfights of 15 primary and general-election campaigns (successful and not) in only 12 years. 
Ambition and its consequences, 6 1/2 turbulent years as governor, have made him ""the oldest 40-year-old man in America,"" he says. 
He jokes that Arkansans have treated him the way an Ozarks mountaineer treated a three-legged hog -- a hog too good, the mountaineer explained, ""to eat him all at once."" 

   Now ambition has goaded this Democrat to the brink of a presidential bid, and a fundamental choice. 
Does he want to protect his legacy as governor, including sweeping education reform, or go for national glory? 
Under the creaky Arkansas constitution of 1874, it will be very hard to do both. 

   That constitution transforms an Arkansas governor into a pumpkin the instant he crosses the state line. 
His power passes to the lieutenant governor or, in his absence, the Senate president pro tem. 
The consequences can be startling. 

   A few weeks ago Gov. Clinton took a trip to Washington. 
By the time he got back, Senate President Pro Tem Nick Wilson, a Democratic adversary with scores to settle, had made 20 appointments to state boards and, for good measure, demoted Mr. Clinton's chief of staff, Betsy Wright. 
Mr. Clinton rescued Ms. Wright, but most other Wilson decisions will stick. 

   Sen. Wilson says the governor can easily avoid future embarrassments. 
Just stay home. 

   Gov. Clinton grouses that the senator behaved like his seven-year-old daughter, Chelsea Clinton, on a bad day. 
But the incident vividly illustrated the risks here at home of a presidential campaign. 

   ""It's very hard for a governor to run for president,"" he says. 
""Carter and Reagan did it, but they weren't sitting governors any more."" 

   That reality could yet dissuade Mr. Clinton from running. 
But sitting in his sun-washed office -- an Arkansas-made fiddle on the mantlepiece, portraits of Lincoln and Churchill looking down upon his desk -- he leaves little doubt that his heart is already on the campaign trail. 

   Such a race would be a long shot at best. 
But there's a potential opening for a progressive southerner in the long nomination contest. 
And with better-known Southern Democrats like Arkansas Sen. Dale Bumpers and Georgia Sen. Sam Nunn apparently uninterested in running, men like Gov. Clinton and Tennessee Sen. Albert Gore Jr. are moving to the forefront. 

   Mr. Clinton undoubtedly would run as a pragmatist who made government work, a man who prepared citizens for today's era of international competition by investing heavily in education. 
Arkansas now is among the nation's top 10 states in the ratio of computers to students. 
Three-fourths of its high school students now graduate, the best ratio in the South and better than the national average of 71%. 

   A mature politician, Mr. Clinton says, is one who can ""harness ambition"" and learn from his mistakes. 
And has he succeeded? 

   ""I hope so,"" he replies after a pause. 
""I've certainly tried."" 
Arkansas voters have seen to that, tempering and ultimately humbling the brash young man they elevated to governor from attorney general in 1978. 

   Bill Clinton was riding high, at age 32 the nation's youngest governor, his unsuccessful congressional bid of 1974 only a memory. 
But in 1980 Arkansans bounced him out of office. 
Jimmy Carter helped drag him down, first dumping hordes of Cuban refugees on Fort Chaffee, then precipitating the Republican landslide of 1980. 
But the ultimate factor was Mr. Clinton himself. 

   ""People got the impression he was a hot shot,"" says Archie Schaffer, a former administrative assistant to Sen. Bumpers. 
Arkansans have always had ""a parenting attitude"" toward their precocious governor, ventures chief of staff Betsy Wright; in 1980 they took him to the woodshed. 

   The defeat, accepted by a tearful Mr. Clinton, taught him something. 
Having sailed into office chockablock with ideas gathered at Georgetown, Yale and Oxford, ""he thought he had listened enough,"" recalls his wife, Hillary Rodham Clinton. 
""He learned that the listening process never ends."" (An attorney and power in her own right, Mrs. Clinton was named by her husband in 1983 to head the Arkansas Education Standards Committee, which oversaw the state reform effort.) 

   Voters forgave him in 1982. 
Bill Clinton regained the governorship after shortening his hair and promising not to ""lead without listening."" (His wife did her part by campaigning as Hillary Clinton instead of Hillary Rodham.) 
He won smashing reelection victories in 1984 and 1986, when the state went to a four-year term. 
Now he heads the National Governors' Association. 

   Some veteran lawmakers here say the 1980 thrashing left Mr. Clinton a different, more cautious man. 
One is state Sen. Wilson, the man who upset the apple cart as acting governor recently. 
Sen. Wilson, a progressive, says his feud with Gov. Clinton stems from a broken commitment, not philosophical differences. 
But he does see a gap between the governor's rhetoric and his actions. 

   ""When you hear him speak out of state, you just want to stand up and cheer,"" says the senator. 
""You think he's ready to charge hell with a bucket of water. 
Then he gets back home and that woman (chief of staff Wright) gets out her polls, and he's a different person."" 

   Still, the Clinton record does contain both risk-taking and solid accomplishment. 
Ms. Wright, who directed the 1986 Clinton campaign, argues that the governor's popularity with Arkansans would be ""the least of his gambles"" if he runs for the White House. 
""How to protect his programs -- that's what he's wrestling with."" 

   The heart of that record is education reform. 
Mr. Clinton is probably best known as the first governor to force teachers to take competency tests, which embittered the National Education Association. 
But he also pushed a grass-roots campaign that persuaded the Legislature to raise the sales tax for the first time in two decades, channeling all proceeds into education; helped raise standards for school districts and pushed for special programs for gifted pupils. 

   The governor also champions welfare revision. 
Arkansas now requires recipients to sign a ""contract"" committing them to upgrade their job skills. 
At the same time, the state has increased its budget for job training. 

   But Clinton-era programs could be stunted without further tax increases -- hard to get in a state that ranks 47th in per-capita income. 
Gov. Clinton asked the just-completed legislative session for $163 million in new revenue; it gave him only $66 million. 
Some say a preoccupation with presidential politics contributed to the setback. 
""He really never got deeply involved until the last weeks,"" says House Speaker Ernest Cunningham, a frequent Clinton ally. 

   A special session seems likely. 
But handling it, a delicate business at best, would be even touchier if the governor continues to eye the White House. 
The ""hot shot"" image of 1980 hasn't disappeared. 
It's just latent, and periodically Mr. Clinton comes close to reactivating it. 

   Mr. Clinton knows he's walking a tightrope between national and state constituencies. 
The day after his 1986 election, he gave a televised interview to NBC's nationally distributed ""Today"" show -- then tried to limit the Arkansas press to a wordless ""photo opportunity."" 
Amid cries of outrage, one Arkansas newspaper editorialized that the ""real"" Bill Clinton had resurfaced with ""the same old egotism and arrogance."" 

",28,"[ 0.26944792  0.00620879  0.25960389 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
276,"
   HOT SPRINGS, Ark. -- He moved into the governor's mansion
at 32, heir to a tradition of progressive Southern governors
and ready to light up Arkansas. It was January 1979 and there
was so much to do: Education needed to be overhauled, the
business climate needed to be improved, the state needed to
be dragged out of its slumberous, defeatist past. Bill
Clinton, the youngest governor in the nation since Harold
Stassen, had such big plans.
   But two years later Mr. Clinton -- educated at Georgetown,
Oxford and Yale, stylish, glib -- was out of office.
Arkansans chafed at his arrogance. They recoiled at his grand
bargain, a small rise in automobile license plate fees in
exchange for road improvements. They didn't like the idea
that his wife, a lawyer, hadn't taken his name. They flinched
at being regarded as a backwater reclamation project.
   The morning after the 1980 election his wife calmly sat in
the governor's mansion and called a real-estate agent. Mr.
Clinton quietly tended to paperwork. But the loss hurt him
deeply, marked him, changed him. His friends told him to move
to a state where he would be appreciated, but Mr. Clinton
decided to stay and fight and recover. He's now in his fifth
term as governor, about to become the longest-reigning chief
executive in Arkansas history.
   Cerebral -- he once read nearly 300 books in a single year
-- and informal -- he delights in wearing a rubber witch's
mask at Halloween while Little Rock's grandees stroll through
the governor's mansion -- the mature Bill Clinton was shaped
by two events, one he witnessed and one he didn't. The one he
lived through was his own re-election defeat, the shattering
of a dream and, it seemed, of a career. The one he never saw,
some three months before he was born, was the death of his
father, thrown from his car on a wet, isolated stretch of
highway in southeastern Missouri.
   And so if he sometimes seemed a young man in a hurry,
there was a reason. ""By the time I was governor at 32 I had
already lived three years longer than my father,"" says Mr.
Clinton, now 45 years old. ""To me, I wasn't a young man.""
   His earliest recollection, seared into his memory, was of
his mother at a New Orleans station platform, on her knees,
sobbing as he pulled away in a train. She was in nursing
school, and young Bill was there on a visit with his
grandparents, who were raising him in Hope, Ark. All along he
missed having a father. ""It's a sad place inside me,"" he
says.
   And though his grandmother tacked playing cards on the
window in front of his high chair to teach him to count and
had him reading by the time he was three, it was his mother
-- a woman of strength and sadness who has buried three
husbands -- who taught him to think.
   From the start, William Jefferson Blythe IV -- he sneaked
off to a chancery judge at 15 to take the name Clinton, his
stepfather's -- was an introspective young man; his best
friend once said he didn't want to go over to the Clintons'
house and watch Bill read. The neighborhood kids leaned
against the kitchen cabinets in the house on Scully Street as
his mother presided at discussions that sometimes spilled
over to debates at Cook's ice-cream parlor and, later, the
old Aloha Lounge.
   They talked about basketball and dating. But this was the
South, in the years just after troops were called out to
integrate the Little Rock schools. Larger issues were part of
their everyday lives: racial problems, the nature of justice.
""So early the wheels were turning about what was wrong in the
world,"" says David Leopoulos, who grew up with him here, and
he carried a concern about racial justice into adulthood.
   Mr. Clinton remembers that his grandparents, who owned a
grocery store in the black section of Hope, were
""instinctively opposed to segregation."" The Hot Springs
schools were segregated -- he graduated from high school in
1964 -- but he was part of a small group of white students
who regarded the system as unjust. ""Bill was quite explicit
about it: He thought this was totally unfair, wrong,"" says
Glenda Johnson Cooper, one of his classmates who recalled
that not all his schoolmates agreed. He prided himself for
knowing Martin Luther King's ""I Have A Dream"" speech by
heart.
   Once a year a photographer came to Hot Springs from
Dallas, and the portraits, slightly yellow now, show a
big-cheeked youngster, somewhat on the pudgy side, with
unruly hair. But there was ferment inside.
   As a young man, he overachieved at overachieving. Though
he was reared in a community that not only tolerated but
promoted illegal gambling -- craps and blackjack games
flourished in Hot Springs in those years, and slot machines
were as common as cigarette machines -- Billy Clinton was a
model citizen. He was the band major, won the Elks Youth
Leadership Award, took calculus and honors English, helped a
friend survive physics and went to Boys State and Boys
Nation. When he invited friends over, he would ask them to
bring their newspaper so he could do the crossword puzzle. He
rushes through the puzzles today in ink, not pencil.
   The competitive streak that his schoolmates noted in the
boy remained with him as a man and, if anything, has been
amplified by being on the ballot 17 times in the past 17
years.
   Years ago he would delight in announcing to his mother
that he had beaten Jim McDougal in a math test. Last year
when a group of friends impulsively set out for a midday
round of miniature golf, the men came straight from the
office in their business suits. Mr. Clinton changed into a
golf shirt; he didn't want his Putt-Putt score to be affected
by the 100-degree heat. Even his security guard says the
governor plays cards with relentless intensity.
   For a man so extroverted, Mr. Clinton is remarkably
inner-directed, sometimes examining his own life with a zoom
lens, sometimes with a microscope. His conclusions can be
jarring, even discomfiting.
   ""I had been living with the idea of my father's death, and
therefore my own mortality, since I was a kid,"" he says, ""and
that's maybe why I competed so hard and wanted so much.""
Indeed, on his honeymoon he read Ernest Becker's meditations
on death, chock full of critiques on Freud and Kierkegaard.
   Throughout his life Mr. Clinton has been surrounded by
strong women, first his mother, who at 68 still works as an
office nurse and who follows the horses from her home amid
the wisteria here in Hot Springs, and later his wife, who
finally came to call herself Hillary Clinton and with whom
Mr. Clinton has shared an intellectually rich if sometimes
tempestuous relationship.
   ""We were in wars -- campaigns, everything else -- from the
beginning,"" he says, ""and if it wasn't easy, it was always
good.""
   Today Mr. Clinton refuses to answer ""have-you-ever?""
questions about his marriage and personal life. Those who
know the couple say that the Clintons have had rocky times --
problems that led political foes and even some admirers to
describe Mr. Clinton as a womanizer. Mr. Clinton acknowledges
that his marriage hasn't been free of difficulties; he
parries and, he hopes, dismisses the charges with a simple
assertion: ""Anybody who knows us knows we love each other and
are committed to our child.""
   Even so, the early days of his presidential campaign have
been so shadowed by talk about marital infidelities that he
has been forced to address the question, even taking the
unusual step of having his wife accompany him to a breakfast
with political reporters in Washington last month. His
advisers are plainly, even openly, worried that this question
will be a distraction to the campaign, perhaps even an open
political wound.
   Those who know Mr. Clinton well insist the couple have
worked through the difficulties in their relationship.
   The Clintons met at Yale Law School, where Mr. Clinton was
known for his boasts that his first hometown, Hope, grew the
largest watermelons in the world, and where Hillary Rodham
was known as a brilliant student. His first impression was
that she looked like ""an interesting woman,"" attractive but a
bit forbidding, and he remembers staring at her for weeks.
Finally, she broke the ice.
   Guido Calabresi, now the dean of the Yale Law School,
remembers Hillary as a scholar, adding that Bill -- ""highly
idealistic, mildly conservative, with passionate cares"" --
was marked for Cabinet meetings, not partners' meetings. ""A
lot of kids at Yale wanted to go into politics,"" says Lovida
Coleman Jr., a Washington lawyer who knew Mr. Clinton in law
school, ""but Bill was the only one who didn't posture about
it, the only one to whom it came naturally.""
   As law school ended, John Doar, counsel for the Nixon
impeachment committee, asked Mr. Clinton to join his staff.
It was one of the biggest plums on the tree, but Mr. Clinton,
fatefully, decided not to reach for it. He wanted to return
home and run for office.
   Hillary took the job instead, and after President Nixon
resigned and Bill had moved south she faced the decision she
had put off for so long. ""I was going to have to make this
choice,"" remembers Mrs. Clinton, who had never even known
anyone from Arkansas. ""It was never in the game plan to grow
up and fall in love with someone from Arkansas.""
   She decided to ""take the chance,"" and moved to
Fayetteville, where Mr. Clinton was teaching at the
University of Arkansas Law School and preparing a valiant but
unsuccessful challenge to GOP Rep. John Paul Hammerschmidt.
They became one of the hottest couples in Fayetteville, two
intellectual powerhouses in a town so small that Hillary once
dialed directory assistance only to be told by the operator
that the person she wanted was away for the weekend.
   Mr. Clinton, who had seen some of the world during an
internship with Senate Foreign Relations Chairman J. William
Fulbright of Arkansas and during a Rhodes Scholarship, had
big ideas. ""He came back to Arkansas full of idealism and
ambition,"" says James Blair, the general counsel of Tysons
Foods, who used to talk late into the night with Mr. Clinton
at a local pizza parlor. ""He thought Arkansas could be
improved, and that he could do a lot of good.""
   Mr. Clinton was elected attorney general, battled
corporations and the 25-cent telephone call, and was
catapulted to the governor's office. His Little Rock idyll
was ruined both by what he has come to call ""a young man's
mistakes"" and the rioting of Cuban refugees at Fort Chaffee,
which occurred during his tenure. ""He was young and he was
convinced of what was right and he wanted to get it done
immediately,"" says Webster Hubbell, a former Arkansas Supreme
Court chief justice who is one of Mr. Clinton's closest
friends.
   Once back in office two years later, Mr. Clinton developed
the style he would take to the White House if elected:
accommodating, adept at forming consensus, conciliatory --
but chary of confrontation. He's personally approachable, yet
his office can be inaccessible; lobbyists say his personal
bureaucracy is so impenetrable they sometimes resort to
leaving things off at the governor's mansion.
   Mr. Clinton's biggest impact has been in raising education
spending and standards. He put his wife at the head of the
effort and the two of them stumped the state. He fought
entrenched interests, including the Arkansas Education
Association, threatening to veto a sales-tax increase that
provided teacher raises. He staked his career on it; as a
young man he had come back from Georgetown wondering why
people in Arkansas didn't have the same educational
opportunities that his college classmates did. ""I saw the
light bulb go off at age 19 to want to fix that,"" remembers
Carolyn Yeldell Staley, who grew up with him in Hot Springs.
   In the early 1980s came another milestone, the birth of
his daughter, Chelsea. ""I got a great gift my father never
had,"" he says now. ""I got to see my child.""
   He takes his parental responsibilities seriously, telling
Burt Reynolds he wouldn't join him at Evening Shade High
School because Chelsea had a dance recital that night. He
says he didn't run for president in 1988 because his daughter
wasn't old enough to handle the separation. She's 11 now, and
Mr. Clinton says she's ready.
   Mr. Clinton is older, too. He's had some sobering
experiences; his half-brother served a prison term for
selling cocaine. He's more prone to compromise and more
willing to delegate. Critics say he's been too eager to make
peace with the state's leading economic powers and is more
effective at national conferences on child care and welfare
reform than he has been at home, where making major strides
in a poor, tradition-bound state is difficult. But he is also
more relaxed, more patient, than he was when he was younger.
   ""I spent most of my life being a boy wonder,"" says Bill
Clinton, ""and it was much overrated.""
",28,"[ 0.27749956  0.0047017   0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
277,"
   In fact, he never joined the program, or even attended the
law school. But it exempted him from the draft during
September and October of 1969, the critical two months when
he expected to be called into service.
   By October, he had a change of heart and subjected himself
to possible induction. But by then the draft lottery was
about to take effect and he drew a lottery number high enough
that he never was called.
   Many young men with Mr. Clinton's educational background
found ways to avoid military service during the Vietnam War.
But the issues raised by his conduct remain relevant for
several reasons. The question of whether Vice President Dan
Quayle used influence to get into the Indiana National Guard
in 1969 -- and thus avoid Vietnam -- stirred a debate in the
last campaign, and Republicans no doubt will demand that Mr.
Clinton's record receive equal scrutiny. Moreover, people
directly involved with Mr. Clinton's draft status contradict
his version of what happened.
   Even back in 1969, Bill Clinton wasn't just any young man.
Though he had been classified 1-A -- available for military
service -- when he graduated from Georgetown University in
the spring of 1968, as a Rhodes scholar he was the pride of
his community. So instead of calling him right away, the
local draft board gave him a reprieve to allow him to
continue his studies at Oxford.
   ""As old as he was, he would have been at the top of the
list"" to be drafted, says 84-year-old Opal Ellis, the draft
board's executive secretary. But, she explains, ""we were
proud to have a Hot Springs boy with a Rhodes scholarship,""
and so ""the board was very lenient with him. . . . We gave
him more than he was entitled to.""
   Mr. Clinton's own memory is even more precise. He says the
board told him that he wouldn't be drafted until the fall of
1969, a year and a half after being designated 1-A. ""The
board said, `You'll probably be called in the fall, September
or October {of 1969},'"" he says in an interview.
   So when Mr. Clinton returned home after his first year at
Oxford, he knew the draft was imminent. Mrs. Ellis, a
Republican who held her civil-service position for 20 years,
alleges that he ""went in and told me he was too well educated
to go."" She says he told her that ""he was going to fix my
wagon {and} pull every string he could think of."" But Mr.
Clinton says he doesn't recall having any confrontation with
Mrs. Ellis, and he strongly denies using strongarm tactics to
avoid the draft; anyone who says he did, he says, ""has, at
best, a faulty memory."" In any case, Mr. Clinton says he
decided to, in his words, ""look around"" for another option.
He opposed the war, but if he had to serve he preferred to be
an officer rather than a draftee, so he sought an officer's
training program to join. He took the Air Force officer's
exam, he says, but failed because of a vision defect. He also
took the naval officer's test, but failed because of a
hearing problem. (He had already taken his draft physical,
and neither problem prevented him from passing.)
   Then, as his expected draft deadline loomed, Mr. Clinton
met Col. Eugene Holmes, an Army ROTC recruiter at the
University of Arkansas at Fayetteville. Both men say Mr.
Clinton agreed orally to join the Army officer's program at
the law school there.
   And based on that consent, the Hot Springs draft board, on
Aug. 7, 1969, reclassified Mr. Clinton from 1-A to 1-D -- a
draft deferment that a spokesman for the Selective Service
System says was only for people who had joined a reserve
unit, or who were students taking military training, such as
the ROTC.
   But Mr. Clinton never joined the training program -- and
for that matter, never even enrolled at the university. He
had one more year to go at Oxford, and intended to complete
that work. And when he finally returned to the U.S. in 1970,
he enrolled not at Arkansas, but at Yale Law School.
   Mr. Clinton says he indeed planned to attend Arkansas,
after he completed his studies in England. He says the
university informally accepted him based on his academic
record, though he never formally applied there. A Clinton
aide says the governor believes that he applied to Yale
during his second year at Oxford.
   But even Virginia Kelley, Mr. Clinton's mother, says she
doesn't remember him planning to attend Arkansas. ""That's
very strange,"" she says. ""I was under the impression when he
came home from Oxford that he was going to go to Yale.""
   Mr. Holmes, who counts himself as a political independent,
says Mr. Clinton's true plans weren't ever made plain to him;
he thought Mr. Clinton's arrival was imminent. ""I thought he
was going to finish a month or two in England and then come
back to the University of Arkansas,"" he says, adding of the
1-D deferment: ""I couldn't have done it for a year. That
wouldn't have been ethical."" He charges that ""Bill Clinton
was able to manipulate things so that he didn't have to go
in.""
   Mr. Clinton disputes Mr. Holmes's version of what
happened. He says Mr. Holmes offered him the ROTC deferment
immediately and also encouraged him to return for his final
year at Oxford. ""I remember talking to Holmes one day, and he
said: `You know, you can't go to summer camp until next
summer anyway. Why don't you just go back and do your second
year in England?'"" Mr. Clinton recalls.
   In any event, Mr. Clinton had his deferment in time to
cover the very period -- September and October of 1969 --
that the draft board had earlier told him was when he would
probably be conscripted.
   Asked whether the deferment was proper, Mr. Clinton says:
""I didn't know what the rules were. All I can tell you is
what they told me."" But he says he soon had doubts about the
morality of it. ""I had already had one year, I had high
school classmates who were already dead,"" he says. ""I decided
it was an inappropriate thing to do.""
   So Mr. Clinton informed Col. Holmes that he wouldn't be
joining the ROTC after all. Mr. Clinton recalls that he
notified Col. Holmes that he wouldn't participate in ROTC in
""September or early October."" Col. Holmes has trouble
remembering, though he thinks it might have been ""a month or
two months"" from the time of their August conversation.
   But Mr. Holmes says he was angered to learn of the change
of plans, and moved to revoke Mr. Clinton's draft deferment.
On Oct. 30, 1969, Mr. Clinton was reclassified 1-A.
""Ethically I think he should have stayed in ROTC,"" Mr. Holmes
says. ""He'd given his word and was backing out.""
   Having averted the fall draft, Mr. Clinton says he was
fully prepared to be conscripted. But he was never called. A
new draft lottery system, based on dates of birth, was
enacted into law on Nov. 26. And on Dec. 1, 1969, Mr. Clinton
got number 311. No one with a number higher than 195 was
called, according to the Selective Service System.
",28,"[ 0.21718486  0.00658488  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
278,"
   It is now clear that the 23-year-old Mr. Clinton, like
many of his peers at that time, worked to obtain a draft
deferment during the summer of that year, when he felt
certain he was about to be called up for military service.
   Gov. Clinton has said he later dropped that deferment
because he felt it was morally wrong to keep it while his
friends died in combat. But in a letter he wrote at the time,
he said he dropped the deferment to maintain his ""political
viability."" And it appears that he didn't actually subject
himself to the draft until it became clear that he had a
reasonable chance of escaping induction altogether.
   Here's a closer look at the questions that are raised by
his statements:
                                                                                                       

   Did Gov. Clinton ever intend to enroll in the Reserve
Officer Training Corps program at the University of Arkansas,
as he agreed to do at the time he received his deferment?
   Mr. Clinton never enrolled in either the ROTC or the
University of Arkansas, making dubious the circumstances
under which he received the deferment at such a critical
time. What's more, in a letter to his ROTC recruiter, Mr.
Clinton admitted, ""I had no interest in the ROTC program
itself"" and concedes that he may have ""deceived"" the
recruiter about his attitude.
   Mr. Clinton has said on several occasions recently that
for a brief period in the summer of 1969, he did intend to
join the ROTC and the University of Arkansas, but only after
finishing the second year of his Rhodes scholarship at Oxford
University in England. Col. Eugene Holmes, director of the
ROTC program at the University of Arkansas, says it would
have been improper for him to grant a deferment for Mr.
Clinton if he had no intention of joining the ROTC program
until a year later.
                                                                                                       

   When Mr. Clinton backed out of his agreement to join the
ROTC, was his intention to subject himself to the draft?
   That's what he has said in his statements and in his
letter. But Mr. Clinton didn't back out of the agreement
until after a statement on Sept. 19, 1969, by President Nixon
that made it clear that few new conscripts would be called
until December, when a draft lottery system was to begin. Mr.
Clinton has said he was unaware of any plans for a lottery
system at the time he backed out of his ROTC agreement, but
the president's comments were widely publicized.
   On the surface, Mr. Clinton's ROTC deferment, which lasted
2 1/2 months, enabled him to escape almost certain induction
and instead put him into a lottery system where his chances
of being called were smaller.
                                                                                                       

   Why did Mr. Clinton wait until Dec. 3, 1969, to write to
Col. Holmes about his harsh views of the draft, the war and
the ROTC?
   The letter provides no answer to that question. But it was
written two days after the lottery numbers were announced.
Mr. Clinton drew an extremely high number, 311, making it
clear that his chances of ever being called into service were
very small. After that, he may have felt freer to confess his
feelings.
",28,"[ 0.96165049  0.00337789  0.01694849 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
279,"
   In Georgia, where the draft issue and allegations of
womanizing threatened to derail the candidacy, it was Gov.
Zell Miller and Sen. Sam Nunn, two friends of Mr. Clinton
from the centrist Democratic Leadership Council, who came to
the rescue. Sen. Nunn, the chairman of the Armed Services
Committee, lent his credibility on defense matters, while Mr.
Miller launched stinging rhetorical attacks on Mr. Clinton's
rivals for the nomination.
   Nobody collects friends like Bill Clinton -- and nobody
puts them to better use. Inside the Clinton campaign, they
are known as the FOBs -- Friends of Bill's -- and they make
up a remarkable network. Its members include a virtual who's
who of the 40-something Democratic establishment, with large
contingents from Georgetown and Oxford universities, Yale Law
School, the 1972 McGovern campaign, the Democratic Leadership
Council and an elite policy organization known as the
Renaissance Group.
   His extraordinary network of loyalists left Mr. Clinton in
position to mount his sweeping victory in this week's Super
Tuesday primaries. Now, the FOBs are focusing on next week's
critical tests in Illinois, where Mr. Clinton's law school
moot court opponent is helping organize the state, and
Michigan, where a former roommate is doing likewise.
   Mr. Clinton portrays himself as a Washington outsider. ""I
am not the favorite candidate of the Beltway,"" he said after
his loss in this month's Maryland primary to Paul Tsongas,
whom he criticizes for his work as a Washington lobbyist. Yet
a host of Washington lobbyists have been Mr. Clinton's
""benefactors"" -- individuals committed to raising at least
$10,000 for the campaign.
   ""The notion that he'll be an outsider unschooled in the
ways of Washington is really a misperception,"" says Stuart
Eizenstat, a Washington lawyer, former Carter administration
official and friend and adviser to Mr. Clinton. ""This is a
guy who is very much plugged in.""
   Unlike Mr. Eizenstat's former boss, Jimmy Carter, Mr.
Clinton would arrive in the White House with longstanding
ties to official Washington and with an array of friends from
the Democratic Party's policy elite, the business world and
the legal community. He would be the most
Establishment-rooted Democratic president since John F.
Kennedy, a surprising feat for the governor of a small,
relatively poor state.
   Mr. Clinton's friends say they are drawn to him by his
intelligence and charm. In addition, after more than a decade
of graying GOP leadership, many evidently are lusting for a
return to power, and see him as their best hope.
   But another reason Mr. Clinton has been able to attract
and keep so many friends is simply that he works at it. Mr.
Clinton is calculating and ambitious, having set his sights
on the presidency during his teen-age years. Throughout his
life, he has stayed in touch with people through letters and
notes. He has also sought to involve his friends at decisive
moments in his career. In 1987, for instance, he summoned a
number of them from his Oxford and McGovern days (he ran the
1972 nominee's Texas campaign) to help him decide whether to
mount a presidential campaign in 1988.
   ""The idea that he would one day be running for president
occurred to all of us,"" says William Coleman III, a Detroit
lawyer who was Mr. Clinton's roommate at Yale Law School. Mr.
Coleman, son of former Transportation Secretary William
Coleman, is helping organize blacks for Mr. Clinton in next
week's Michigan primary.
   Because he had cultivated so many friends who went on to
high places, Mr. Clinton began his presidential effort with a
built-in issues-and-money machine. Friends inside Arkansas,
such as Thomas (Mack) McLarty, chairman of Arkla Inc., the
gas utility, raised millions early in the campaign season.
Mr. McLarty attended Miss Mary's kindergarten with Mr.
Clinton in Hope, Ark.
   After a supermarket tabloid reported allegations that Mr.
Clinton had a long extramarital affair, Harry Thomason,
another Arkansas native who now lives in Hollywood and
produces the hit CBS television program ""Designing Women,""
flew to his old friend's side in New Hampshire. Mr. Thomason
helped Mr. Clinton's media advisers put together two live TV
programs to answer the charges.
   In Baton Rouge, attorney Alston Johnson has been shaking
the money trees in Louisiana for his old friend. He
nostalgically recalls the summer of 1963, when he and Mr.
Clinton met at an American Legion Boys Nation conference in
Washington and got to shake President Kennedy's hand. Mr.
Clinton uses a photograph of that occasion in his campaigns.
   All four of Mr. Clinton's roommates from Georgetown
campaigned for him in New Hampshire. On Wall Street, another
friend from Georgetown days, Roger Altman, an investment
banker with the Blackstone Group, has personally raised
$75,000 for the candidate. Mr. Altman says Mr. Clinton's
political skills were already so well honed at Georgetown
that his successful campaign to become leader of the student
government ""was like watching a hot knife go through butter.""
   At Oxford, other future contacts were cemented. Besides
fielding draft queries for his friend, Mr. Reich is at the
center of the Clinton campaign brain-trust, pumping out
issues papers and speeches from his office at Harvard
University's Kennedy School of Government. ""Bill and I have
been talking about these issues for 25 years,"" Mr. Reich
says. ""The poor man has been encumbered with all my books and
articles, and there is even evidence that he has read them.""
   Mr. Talbott of Time magazine says it ""required some
reflection"" before he spoke out in the press about how many
Rhodes scholars, including Mr. Clinton, felt about the war in
Vietnam. ""In general, people in our line of work don't become
part of the story,"" he says. But he says he felt compelled to
step forward when he saw his friend being attacked as a
draft-dodger. ""I saw that as an inaccuracy,"" he says. ""Since
I was part of that cohort and knew the frame of mind, I felt
that I should speak out."" Mr. Talbott, who appears regularly
on the public-affairs television program ""Inside Washington,""
discloses his friendship with Mr. Clinton when he discusses
politics.
   Douglas Eakeley, another former Rhodes scholar and friend
from Oxford days, says he put together a successful
fund-raiser for the campaign in New Jersey last December
simply by calling on a list of Mr. Clinton's old pals from
Georgetown, Yale Law and Oxford. ""To have someone from
Arkansas running for president and trying to raise money in
New Jersey should have been unheard of,"" Mr. Eakeley says.
""But we raised $100,000 largely because of this extraordinary
network.""
   At Yale Law School, Mr. Clinton met his wife, Hillary, who
has her own formidable network of friends. Mrs. Clinton has
brought an array of high-powered attorneys into the campaign.
They include New York lawyer Susan Thomases, a politically
adept former aide to New Jersey Sen. Bill Bradley, who has
traveled with Mrs. Clinton and helped deflect questions
raised about the couple's investments with a former
savings-and-loan operator.
   It was also Mrs. Clinton who brought Los Angeles lawyer
Mickey Kantor into her husband's inner circle of advisers;
Mr. Kantor had served with her on the board of the Legal
Services Corp.
   From their days organizing Texas for the McGovern
campaign, Bill and Hillary Clinton have a small army of
followers. Mr. Clinton won Texas so decisively partly because
Garry Mauro, the popular state land commissioner, had spent
months organizing the state. Mr. Mauro met the Clintons in
the McGovern campaign, as did Carl Wagner, a prominent
Democratic Party operative whose political counsel Mr.
Clinton has sought over the years. Harold Ickes, the New York
lawyer who helped manage Jesse Jackson's 1988 campaign and is
working the state for Mr. Clinton this year, met him in
Project Pursestrings, an anti-Vietnam War effort launched
after the 1972 election.
   In 1978, when Mr. Clinton became his state's youngest
governor at the age of 32, he invited many of his old friends
to his inauguration and even appointed some of them to state
jobs. During the Carter administration, Mr. Clinton made sure
he was known inside the White House, dropping in on Mr.
Eizenstat and others. Later, during the Reagan years, he used
the National Governors Association as a vehicle to forge
alliances with other elected Democrats. An array of former
governors, including James Blanchard of Michigan and Richard
Riley of South Carolina, have put their old organizations to
work for Mr. Clinton.
   Mr. Clinton's chairmanship of the Democratic Leadership
Council gave him access to a host of conservative and
moderate Democratic bigwigs, from Sen. Nunn, whose early
endorsement helped give his candidacy credibility, to Buddy
MacKay, who is now Florida's lieutenant governor. The DLC
connection also gave Mr. Clinton an issues factory: Its
affiliated think-tank, the Progressive Policy Institute,
helped churn out most of the candidate's major speeches last
fall.
   The least-known of the Clintons' networks may be the one
that runs through the Renaissance Group. Founded by a South
Carolina businessman and unsuccessful gubernatorial candidate
in the early 1980s, it is a nonpartisan, policy-oriented
group that spends New Year's Eve weekend attending issues
seminars and playing golf in Hilton Head, S.C.
   Originally, it included mostly Sunbelt politicians who
shared an aversion to going out on New Year's Eve. ""The
original idea was to spend the time to think about the year
just passed and the year ahead,"" says David Ifshin, a
well-known pro-Israel Democrat who serves as Mr. Clinton's
general counsel.
   The group grew rapidly and includes such disparate members
as Supreme Court Justice Harry Blackmun, liberal New York
attorney and Kennedy insider Theodore Sorensen and David
Gergen, another journalist with whom Mr. Clinton is on
friendly terms. At least a half-dozen high-powered lawyers
working for Mr. Clinton in Washington, D.C., including Mr.
Ifshin, met him through Renaissance. ""Bill and Hillary have
been at the center of it,"" says Mr. Ifshin.
   Mr. Sorensen draws parallels between President Kennedy and
Mr. Clinton. ""Kennedy blazed the trail for Clinton,"" he says.
""They both used their youth to fit in with a message of
change. They both included a diversified group of friends in
their campaigns."" The Kennedy campaign included Choate School
roommates, old Navy buddies and Harvard brain-trusters. But
Mr. Kennedy was born into privilege, while Mr. Clinton, born
of modest means, has built his network from scratch.
   Lately, there has been some tension between the various
concentric circles of FOBs. Some of Mr. Clinton's advisers
from the McGovern and early days have tried to push the
campaign in a more traditionally progressive direction, while
his advisers within the Democratic Leadership Council would
like him to sharpen his attack on liberal orthodoxy. Will
Marshall, president of the DLC-affiliated Progressive Policy
Institute, worries that with so many campaign cooks and so
many competing agendas, Mr. Clinton's message has lost some
of its ""resolution"" of late. But if anyone can keep the
disparate network together, he says, it is the man at the
center of it.
   ""Clinton is good at getting the best from a wide spectrum
of people,"" Mr. Marshall says.
",28,"[ 0.23696984  0.00505593  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
280,"
   If this had been another issue, liberal Sen.
Howard Metzenbaum and conservative Sen. James McClure might have
quietly hammered out differences between their rival bills to make
certain that plastic pistols can't get through airport metal
detectors.
   But history has taught that a gun control engagement is never
fought with silencers, even in rare instances like this one, when
rival sponsors have identical goals: stopping terrorists,
especially at airports.
   So once again, bitter enemies of past gun control struggles are
following the usual rules of engagement _ high-powered lobbying,
full-page advertisements, fund-raising appeals and doomsday
rhetoric.
   Sparking the latest debate is a weapon not even on the market.
Red Eye Arms of Winter Park, Fla. says it has a patent for plastic
weapons, but won't start making handguns for at least two years _
and then only for military and police use.
   ``We would never allow anyone to build an undetectable civilian
handgun,'' said company vice president Dwight Brunoehler.
   Metzenbaum, D-Ohio, and McClure, R-Idaho, have vastly different
approaches to require that the guns be made detectable. Both would
ban manufacture or importation of any guns that did not meet their
standards.
   Metzenbaum's bill would require a minimum weight of metal to
ensure that an alarm would be triggered at today's magnetometer
settings. Its target is not only future plastic guns, but pint-size
metal pistols that are not detected today.
   The federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms estimates
there are three small metal guns that could get through most
magnetometers now used. The gun owners' lobby estimates there are
countless other models.
   McClure's legislation targets plastic guns only, and has no
minimum metallic requirement. However, it would require that guns
be detectable, by either including some metal, a serial number
engraved or stamped on metal, or a substance detectable by X-ray
machines used for luggage.
   Using today's technology, McClure's bill would require more
sensitive magnetometer settings, more alarms, and therefore more
airport passenger inconvenience _ some say gridlock.
   Brunoehler, of Red Eye Arms, says his firm has developed a
computer chip for plastic guns that would make the lower settings
unnecessary. The chip would emit a signal that would make it appear
that an enormous amount of metal was passing through the machine,
he said.
   Federal Aviation Administration spokesman Fred Farrar said the
FAA is aware of the chip, but believes it could be disabled by
drilling a hole in it or even placing the weapon in a microwave
oven.
   While these are the technical points for debate, a congressional
gun fight often ranges far beyond the issues at hand and this one
is no exception.
   The principal gun owner's lobby, the National Rifle Association,
told its 2.8 million members in a fund-raising letter last year
that Metzenbaum's real goal is ``the first federal gun ban bill in
America.''
   ``If Sen. Metzenbaum's bill passes, the next thing will be some
government official knocking at your door to weigh your guns for
inspection,'' said the NRA, which backs the McClure bill.
   To Handgun Control Inc., the most visible lobby for pistol
regulation, the issue is what the group calls the NRA's extremism.
``Cop-killer bullets, mail-order handguns, machine guns...has the
NRA gone off the deep end?'' says HCI ads, which have different
police chiefs using those same words.
   Handgun Control supports Metzenbaum. So do a dozen law
enforcement organizations.
   ``Both sides are simply waving flags so believers will send
money to Handgun Control Inc. and to the National Rifle
Association,'' says John Aquilino, a former NRA official who now
publishes his own gun owners' newsletter. ``They're making
advertising agencies very wealthy. It's flag-waving and
fund-raising.''
   The latest battle reflects new political realities that surfaced
in 1986. Then, the major law enforcement organizations joined
forces with handgun control advocates to fight NRA-backed
legislation to ease many restrictions of the 1968 Gun Control Act.
   The presence of uniformed policemen lobbying their local
lawmakers began to neutralize some of the NRA's seemingly
invincible clout.
   Nonetheless, the gun lobby attained many of its goals two years
ago with passage of the McClure-Volkmer Act, which changed a number
of provisions of the 1968 law. But the invigorated gun
control-police alliance was able to retain, as part of that fight,
a ban on interstate sales of handguns.
   Now, the same coalition of police and gun control advocates is
back on the detectability question. But Jerald R. Vaughn, executive
director of the International Association of Chiefs of Police, says
of his fellow police lobbyists, ``We're still babes in the woods
when it comes to the political process.''
   Yet, the NRA has taken an unusual turn by backing McClure's
bill. The group normally opposes any legislation that could bring
more restrictions on firearms.
   Only last May, NRA Governmental Affairs Director James Jay Baker
told a House panel, ``The NRA believes that the only workable
approach'' to the detection problem is better security at airports.
   He said ``attempts to dictate metallic content of firearms or
chemical composition of non-metallic components of firearms'' were
unnecessary.
   ``Their position from day one has been, there shall never be any
law on guns,'' said N.T. ``Pete'' Shields, chairman of Handgun
Control Inc.
   ``All of a sudden this issue of plastic handguns has made them
compromise this whole concept. I think they have come a long way,
but I think they're trying to address it with smoke. McClure's bill
is impractical. You would bottle up the airport.''
   Baker said in an interview, ``The NRA has moved a long way on
this issue. We decided to take the bull by the horns and deal with
the terms as framed by the other side. If they're interested in
detectability, it can be done with no interference with existing
firearms.''
   Metzenbaum's most prominent Senate ally is Strom Thurmond, a
conservative South Carolina Republican and ranking Republican on
the Judiciary Committee. Metzenbaum and Thurmond tried to win
passage of their legislation last December, but it was tabled by a
47-42 vote.
   Metzenbaum, in an interview, called McClure's bill ``purely
cosmetic.''
   McClure, also in an interview, said he rejects any arbitrary
metallic standard, and called any potential inconvenience ``part of
the price you pay for having secure airports.''
",29,"[ 0.42006771  0.00780602  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
281,"
   Michael Dukakis' long-time support for tighter
government controls on handguns provided ample ammunition for George
Bush and the National Rifle Asociation.
   Dukakis, who supports a federal seven-day waiting period on
handgun purchases and a ban on ``Saturday Night Specials,'' accused
his opponent of distorting his stance on gun control.
   ``I've always supported the right of hunters and sportsmen to own
weapons and (for) people to protect themselves in their own homes,''
the Democrat said.
   Dukakis backed the so-called Brady amendment to impose a uniform,
mandatory seven-day waiting period on handgun purchases in all
states. Bush opposed the Brady amendment, which went down to a
228-182 defeat Sept. 13 after intense lobbying by the NRA.
   Bush, a lifetime member of the NRA, elicited cheers from crowds
across the South and West whenever he declared his opposition to new
federal gun controls.
   ``I'm a sportsman, I'm a hunter, (I) like to do it, and I don't
believe we need the federal government going forward with gun
control legislation,'' Bush told a rally in Billings, Mont.
   In opposing a federal waiting period, Bush found himself on the
opposite side of several national police organizations, worried
about the vagaries of state laws. Only 22 states now bar instant gun
purchases.
   Dukakis vehemently denied ever telling a gun owners' lobbyist,
``I don't believe in people owning guns, only the police and
military. And I am going to do everything I can to disarm this
state.''
   In 1976, Dukakis supported a Massachusetts referendum to ban
private ownership of handguns. The referendum failed.
   Dukakis currently favors the ban on Saturday Night Specials, as
well as ``additional efforts to keep guns out of the hands of the
criminally or mentally dangerous, including background checks.''
   Dukakis boasts that as governor he supported a law setting a
mandatory one-year prison sentence for those illegally carrying a
gun, and stiffened penalties for felonies commited with a firearm.
He says 22,000 Americans are killed each year with handguns.
   At one point the Dukakis campaign threatened a lawsuit against
the NRA over ads berating the Democrat's record on guns and crime.
   Sen. Lloyd Bentsen, D-Texas, long a favorite of the NRA, came to
the defense of his running mate, saying, ``I saw those ads about
Mike Dukakis going to take the guns away from you. I sure wouldn't
be running with any fellow if I thought he was going to take my
shotgun away from me.''
   Bush said he supports ``mandatory sentences for those caught
using a gun during a crime.'' But in a letter to the NRA, the
Republican attacked what he called the ``gun control myths.''
   ``Those who invent these myths threaten more than the rights of
our 70 million gun owners and 25 million hunters,'' Bush said.
``Federal licensing, gun registration, background checks, or a ban
on firearms to name a few, would only restrict the rights of the
law-abiding, leaving criminals free to commit crimes with illegal
weapons.''
   Dukakis told a crowd in Pueblo, Colo., that the charges he is
against gun ownership are ``a lot of baloney.''
   ``What I'm concerned about is teen-agers in major cities of this
country running around with Uzis and AK-47s (automatic military
weapons) and killing people'' in street gangs and drug deals,
Dukakis said. ``That's the kind of thing that's got to be
controlled, not innocent sportsmen who have a perfect right to
hunt.''
   Bush, as a congressman from Houston, voted for the original
federal Gun Control Act of 1968. That law, enacted after the
assassination of the Rev. Martin Luther King Jr., barred convicted
felons from buying or owning guns and banned interstate and
mail-order sale of handguns.
   But Bush says he also supported the 1986 McClure-Volkmer Act that
allowed the interstate sale of rifles and shotguns.
   Bush, in his campaign literature, says, ``I have always opposed
federal gun registration or licensing of gun owners.'' But he added,
``We must balance the legitimate interests of gun owners with the
rights of society. ... We must do all we can to keep guns out of the
hands of convicted criminals.''
   In a debate with other Republican candidates before the Gun
Owners of New Hampshire last Feb. 2, Bush said, ``I'm not only a
hunter but I'm a lifetime member of the NRA. I do have a deep
appreciation for the Second Amendment rights'' to keep and bear arms.
",29,"[ 0.34021163  0.00933258  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
282,"
   Anti-gun control groups and some U.S. law
enforcement officials are questioning the validity of a study that
says the Canadian city of Vancouver is safer than Seattle because of
gun control laws.
   A study to be published Thursday in the New England Journal of
Medicine concludes that the number of handgun deaths in Vancouver,
British Columbia, 120 miles to the north, between 1980 and 1986 was
nearly one-fifth that of Seattle.
   Dr. John Henry Sloan, chief investigator for the study, said 388
homicides occurred in Seattle during the study period, while 204
occurred in Vancouver. The number of gun-related deaths in Seattle
was 139, compared with 25 for Vancouver, he said.
   Sloan, 34, a researcher at the Injury Prevention Research Center
at Seattle's Harborview Medical Center, stopped short Tuesday of
saying his findings prove Seattle's laxer handgun control laws cause
more deaths, but said ``it virtually explains it.''
   Gun control activists were quick to seize the opportunity.
   ``I think that the study clearly puts to rest the notion strong
handgun control laws don't have an effect on levels of crime,'' said
Susan Whitmore, spokeswoman for Washington, D.C.,-based Handgun
Control Inc.
   John Hosford, executive director of the Seattle-based Citizen's
Committee for the Right to Keep and Bear Arms, dismissed the study
as a political ploy to help a gun control initiative on Maryland's
ballot.
   ``It's not new research,'' Hosford said. ``I don't think the
study is valid, since it doesn't take into account the cause and
effect of many issues.''
   And Dr. Paul Blackman, spokesman for the National Rifle
Association in Washington, D.C., criticized the study for not
looking at the period before Vancouver's new gun control laws went
into effect in 1978.
   Sloan said Vancouver's laws were made stricter in 1978, but
didn't change significantly.
   In Seattle, handguns may legally be purchased for self defense.
After a 30-day waiting period, a permit can be obtained to carry a
handgun as a concealed weapon. Recreational uses are minimally
restricted.
   In Vancouver, self-defense is not considered a legal reason to
purchase a handgun. Concealed weapons are not permitted and
recreational use of handguns such as target shooting and collecting
are regulated by the province. The weapons may only be fired at a
licensed shooting club.
   In addition, criminal offenses carry stricter penalties than in
the United States, said Vancouver police Sgt. Robert Law.
   Hosford said that what Seattle needs is not more gun control
laws, but stricter penalties for people convicted of crimes
involving guns.
   Jim Deschane, commander of the Seattle police West Precinct, said
he believes the process of allowing people to carry handguns in the
city is ``far too lax'' because police can't check applicants'
medical records.
   Dr. Stanley Abrams, a forensic psychologist who has been involved
in investigations of serial murders in Portland, Ore., said easy
availablity of guns can cause more deaths, because it is
psychologically more difficult for someone to use a knife to kill
than to just shoot a gun.
   ``People who use knives have to be more destructive _ it's
definitely more difficult to kill with a knife,'' Abrams said.
   And since only 5 percent of murders are planned, a person
carrying a gun makes it that much more likely a murder will occur,
Abrams said.
",29,"[ 0.36514066  0.01168583  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
283,"
   For the past half-year, as the District of
Columbia's murder rate grew ever higher, actor Charlton Heston has
noted ironically in a National Rifle Association television ad:
``They banned guns in this city a decade ago.''
   ``And the criminals just laugh at their laws,'' he intones,
sirens wailing in the background. ``That tells me guns aren't the
problem. Criminals are.''
   The District of Columbia has one of the nation's toughest gun
laws, yet armed violence persists. Of the record 438 murders in the
nation's capital in 1989, about 78 percent were committed with
firearms, says Metropolitan Police Officer Quintin Peterson.
   In addition, he said, more than 1,300 people were shot and
wounded. Police estimate that about 60 percent of the killings were
drug-related.
   The District of Columbia's Firearms Control Act of 1975,
implemented in February 1977, banned the sale of handguns with a
few exceptions for law enforcement and security personnel and
required registration of all firearms previously purchased. Those
seeking to register the weapons also had to submit to a thorough
background check.
   So where are these guns coming from?
   The federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms, which
compiles an annual report on guns retrieved in crimes in
Washington, found 52 percent of those collected in 1989 came from
Virginia, a slight increase over 1988, and 18 percent came from
Maryland, up from 15 percent from the previous year, said Dick
Pedersen of the ATF office covering Washington, Maryland and
Virginia.
   ``If you put them together, you have 70 percent'' of the guns,
he said. ``You can basically disregard the rest of the country.
We're looking at ones and twos from rest of the union, people
moving in and losing their gun, having it stolen.''
   The study is based on traces of several hundred guns each year
which are randomly selected, he said. A total of 2,333 firearms
were picked up in Washington last year, he said.
   While some of the weapons are rifles, ``This is really a handgun
city and a handgun area,'' Pedersen said. ``We're finding more than
half the guns picked up in crime now are semiautomatic handguns,
and that appears to be growing, based on the last couple of years.''
   In many cases, these are not the now-infamous Saturday Night
Specials, cheap handguns bought on the spur of the moment.
   ``We find a lot of high-quality firearms, a direct result of the
drug trade,'' Pedersen said. ``They can afford high quality, and
they buy them.''
   Some are the same weapons used by police forces around the
country, 9mm semiautomatic handguns that cost $500 to $700 apiece,
he said. At the same time, many of the guns are small and
concealable .25-caliber semiautomatic pistols that cost about $200,
he said.
   The NRA contends that Washington's murder rate _ the highest in
the nation _ demonstrates that gun control doesn't work.
   Gun control laws vary widely in the major cities with some of
the highest murder rates in 1988. The top 12 among the 35 U.S.
cities with 400,000 or more people included four cities with no gun
control measures, including Detroit, which has the second highest
murder rate.
   Seven more of the 12 had relatively strong gun control laws,
while one, Miami, had a three-day cooling off period for a gun
purchase, but no background check on the buyer.
   At the same time, Honolulu, covered by a strong state gun
control measure, showed the lowest murder rate among the 35 largest
cities.
   Law enforcement officials and gun control advocates say there's
more to the issue than whether an individual city has strong
controls.
   They say Washington's location _ carved out of Maryland and
Virginia with virtually no natural boundaries other than the easily
crossed Potomac River _ makes its handgun ban virtually
unenforceable.
   ``In Washington, you can drive across the river and purchase
handguns,'' said Susan Whitmore of Handgun Control Inc. ``Until
this last year, Virginia had one of the weakest gun laws in the
country.''
   New York City has the same problem, she said.
   ``More than 90 percent (of the guns used in New York crimes)
come from other states with very weak laws,'' Whitmore said.
``That's why we believe we need a national law.''
   A new law in Virginia that took effect Nov. 1, 1989, requires an
immediate background check prior to the purchase of assault-style
weapons and most handguns. A person wishing to buy a gun must
complete an application and the gun dealer must call the Virginia
State Police to get approval for the sale.
   As of Dec. 31, 1989, Virginia officials had approved 9,834 sales
_ each of which could involve numerous guns _ and rejected 109
applications, said state police Lt. R. Lewis Vass, who runs the
program.
   The program has produced an unexpected dividend: the capture of
three fugitives, one from Florida and two from New Jersey. By state
law, police have until the close of business the day after a
gun-purchase application has been rejected to tell the gun dealer
the rejection is confirmed or a search of records found the sale
could be made. As a result, some people rejected initially have
returned to gun stores the next day to get the final decision. In
three cases, police were waiting when the fugitives returned, Vass
said.
   Officials also are hoping prosecution of certain gun dealers
will curb illicit sales. Donald P. Percival, a former U.S. Park
Police officer who owned gun stores in Virginia, and James S.
Chapman, a former D.C. police officer and retired Secret Service
uniformed agent, were convicted in November of illegally selling
semiautomatic handguns to an 18-year-old drug dealer who resold or
traded the weapons for drugs in Washington.
   While Whitmore said she was encouraged by Virginia's new law,
Pedersen said it's still too early to tell what impact it will have
on gunfire in Washington, saying the problem occurs when legitimate
purchasers in Virginia provide weapons to people who would be
ineligible to purchase them legally.
   Gun control groups want national laws, but one law enforcement
official says regional controls might be sufficient.
   ``If you were in a town that had mountains or deserts around it
and people had to travel four hours and take two interstates to get
to the area, I can see how you might control a problem like this,''
the officer said. But in Washington, ``It's like walking across the
street to get a hamburger. We're one large urban area here. It's
hard to keep guns out of D.C. when there are no natural borders.''
",29,"[ 0.37020915  0.00735396  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
284,"
The smoke has cleared a little. After seven long years, the US Congress this
week passed its first significant gun control law since the assassinations
of Mr Robert Kennedy and Rev Martin Luther King Jr in 1968.
The legislation - known as the Brady bill after Mr James Brady, the former
White House press secretary severely wounded in an assassination attempt on
President Ronald Reagan - would impose a five-day waiting period on
purchases of handguns. It would give law enforcement authorities time to
check the buyer's background.
Advocates of tougher controls on guns were jubilant about their victory over
stubborn resistance by Republican senators from western states such as Idaho
and Alaska, who have long opposed any restriction on gun ownership in the
US.
The Brady bill's opponents in Congress say it will inconvenience only
law-abiding citizens, not criminals who buy or steal their weapons away from
the government's prying eyes.
They point to glaring failings in the federal government's policing of the
276,000 licensed gun dealers in the US as evidence of the Brady bill's
likely ineffectiveness. For instance, one newspaper reporter successfully
obtained a dealer's licence for his dog by submitting a made-up social
security number.
Studies of state laws requiring some form of background check suggest,
however, that at least some sales to convicted felons have been stopped, and
some suspected criminals have been caught when they tried to buy a gun.
But even the most ardent supporters of the Brady bill acknowledge that it
will make no more than a dent in the estimated 7.5m legal sales each year of
new or used firearms, let alone the approximately 200m guns in circulation;
and will barely affect the more than 14,000 murders and 1,400 accidental
deaths involving guns each year.
'The longest journey begins with a single step,' Mr Brady said after the
bill's final passage in the Senate on Wednesday.
Despite its uncertain effect, passage of the Brady bill is read by some as a
sign that the tide has turned decisively in favour of gun control. Other
initiatives in Congress and in state legislatures are under way: the Senate
last week agreed in a separate bill to ban assault weapons, a measure
already in force in California, New Jersey and Connecticut. Virginia has
passed a law restricting people to one gun purchase a month.
With the federal government considering the imposition of punitive taxes on
some particularly devastating types of ammunition, the Winchester company
recently decided to withdraw its Black Talon bullet. This is prized by some
game hunters for its killing power but detested by emergency room doctors
for the damage it inflicts on humans as it mushrooms on impact.
The strength of public feeling about rampant gun use has clearly grown in
the face of an apparently unstoppable wave of urban violence that has
brought the rate of death by shooting among young black men to more than 150
per 100,000, and led to the installation of metal detectors in city schools.
The fear of violent crimes such as carjackings and drive-by shootings has
spread even beyond the inner city and into the suburbs and the countryside,
provoking a widespread feeling that something - anything - must be done.
The message from an outraged public is not, however, unequivocally in favour
of gun control.
Paradoxically, while thousands of people have been telephoning their
Republican senators to demand that they stop blocking the Brady bill,
thousands have also been flocking to join the National Rifle Association,
the leading organisation among the pro-gun lobbies. In the past year and a
half, it has gained 1,000 members a day to bring its total, which had
declined to about 2.6m in 1991, to a record of about 3.3m. Many new members
and gun owners are women.
Recent election results have shown, too, that simply being tough on guns is
not enough to woo the voters. Although Democratic Governor Jim Florio of New
Jersey came close to victory in the gubernatorial race this month by
striking a tougher stance on both guns and crime in general than his
Republican challenger, Mrs Christine Todd Whitman, this was not enough.
Voters were swayed by economic considerations and particularly by his
first-term tax increase.
In Virginia, meanwhile, Ms Mary Sue Terry, the Democratic candidate for
governor, relied in her campaign on gun control and was thrashed by Mr
George Allen, her Republican opponent, who did not favour tighter curbs but
promised to be tough on criminals by abolishing parole.
While such results do not indicate that the NRA has been routed, they have
put the association on the defensive. Most members now favour some form of
gun control, but the core membership opposes all restraints on the sale of
firearms. Their beliefs are rooted in an almost theological  - some would
say fanatical - interpretation of the second amendment to the US
constitution, which states that: 'A well-regulated militia, being necessary
to the security of a free state, the right of the people to keep and bear
arms, shall not be infringed.'
'The second amendment is not about duck-hunting. In the 1990s, it is about
self-defence,' says Mr James Jay Baker, the NRA's chief Washington lobbyist.
To many members, the right to self-defence is not just against muggers or
burglars, but against a tyrannical government. Mr Neal Knox, sacked from a
lobbying position with the NRA in the 1980s but now one of its elected
directors, argues that the second amendment is the citizen's 'freedom
insurance plan' against tyranny.
Mr Knox says the Holocaust would not have happened if Europe's Jews had
owned rifles, and if the Nazis had not been able to confiscate guns, thanks
to gun registration laws passed in the 1930s. He also contends that the
solution to Somalia's problems is to arm Somali mothers with AK-47s.
Such beliefs have led the NRA to campaign against restrictions on machine
guns, assault weapons and armour-piercing bullets. In the process they have
lost touch with many of their members, who back gun control in general and
specifically the Brady bill.
Two trends over the past few years have weakened the advocates of gun
rights. First, left-wing Democrats have begun to champion gun control as a
supplement to tough anti-crime measures, rather than an alternative; they
have recaptured much of the 'tough on crime' high ground by backing boot
camps for young delinquents, harsher sentences and stiffer restrictions on
parole or habeas corpus appeals.
The NRA is trying to fight back with a campaign called CrimeStrike, calling
for harsher measures against criminals.
Second, the NRA's insistence on combating any gun control, even that viewed
as reasonable by a majority not just of the US population but of gun-owners,
has driven away some former political and police supporters.
Senator Denis DeConcini of Arizona, once voted the NRA's 'legislator of the
month', is backing a ban on assault weapons. Delegate Clinton Miller of the
Virginia state assembly, once rated 'A+' by the NRA, now calls the
organisation's top members 'hateful, spiteful, arrogant'.
This alienation is apparent among gun-owners at large. According to a Gallup
poll earlier this year, 57 per cent of people who said they had a gun in
their house also favoured stricter laws on the sale of firearms.
These converts to gun control, however, are a long way from believing that
the answer to violent crime lies in more radical action, such as the
proposal of Senator John Chafee, a Rhode Island Republican, for a complete
ban on handguns.
Some Americans may move in this direction, but many more may put their faith
in self-defence and buy their own weapons.
",29,"[ 0.00640939  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
285,"

A statewide coalition of law enforcement officials, formed last fall to respond 
to what they see as the proliferation of military-type semiautomatic firearms 
among street gangs and drug dealers, has nearly completed the task of drafting 
legislation to outlaw the manufacture and sale of such guns. 


As they prepare for a showdown in the Legislature with the powerful gun lobby, 
the coalition -- whose leaders include Atty. Gen. John K. Van de Kamp, Los 
Angeles County Sheriff Sherman Block and Alameda County Dist. Atty. John J. 
Meehan -- has made passage of the bill its top priority of the year. 


""If law enforcement doesn't attempt to do something about it now, we are just 
going to have a whole higher level of arms race in California, and it is going 
to be extremely dangerous for innocent people,"" said Richard Inglehart, an 
Alameda County prosecutor and member of the task force drafting the 
legislation. 


The legislation is aimed at semiautomatic rifles like the Uzi, AK-47 and AR-15, 
available over the counter to anyone 18 or older who provides identification 
and fills out a form declaring that he is not a drug addict, a fugitive or a 
mentally unstable person. By contrast, purchasers of handguns must wait 15 days 
for a state background investigation before taking possession of their 
firearms. 


A bruising fight with the politically powerful National Rifle Assn. and the Gun 
Owners of California seems assured. Traditionally, the Legislature has been 
reluctant to enact anything that smacks of controls on guns or firearm 
ownership. Former Gov. Edmund G. Brown Jr. once observed that in California, 
""you don't mess with a man's guns or cars."" 


""It will be one of the donnybrooks of the legislative session,"" predicted Gary 
Mullen, executive director of the California District Attorneys Assn., of the 
campaign that will pit the NRA against the police. 


Lobbyist David Marshall of the NRA, a veteran of previous unsuccessful attempts 
to outlaw military-type semiautomatics, maintains that a prohibition against 
such firearms will not deter criminals intent on getting them but will work to 
the disadvantage of law-abiding Californians. 


""Leave the law-abiding citizen alone,"" he said. ""Go after the criminals and 
nail them to the wall and stop treating them with kid gloves. Get them off the 
streets. Give them mandatory jail time. No plea-bargaining. No probation. No 
parole."" 




Popular Military Type 


Increasingly, the weapon of choice for drug dealers and street gangs is the 
military-style semiautomatic gun that often is easily concealed and can be 
converted to a full automatic. At semiautomatic, the rifle fires one bullet at 
a time as fast as the trigger is pulled. On automatic, one squeeze sends out a 
stream of fire like a machine gun's. 


Under a law sponsored by the NRA, it is illegal in California to convert a 
semiautomatic to a full automatic. Likewise, it is illegal to possess a machine 
gun without a permit from the attorney general. 


The drafters of the proposed law enforcement gun bill say they are close to 
agreement on language in the bill that would outlaw the manufacture and sale of 
certain ""bad guns"" but exempt ""good guns"" -- those used by hunters, competitive 
target shooters and collectors. 


The difficulty is in distinguishing between semiautomatic military weapons and 
the semiautomatic rifles and shotguns used by sportsmen, because all operate on 
basically the same principle. 




Broad Definition 


The bill would establish a broad generic definition that would fit military 
assault-type semiautomatics and be based on such things as the length of barrel 
and size of the bullet magazine. Some existing weapons would actually be banned 
by name. However, certain sporting guns that may resemble the prohibited 
firearms would be exempted by name. 


The legislation would allow manufacturers of the military-style weapons to 
obtain a permit to sell the guns that is similar to what is required for 
machine guns. In general, however, they would not be allowed to sell to 
civilian outlets in California. 


A commission would be created to approve or reject new guns that come on the 
market in the future. The commission, as yet of unspecified membership, could 
add prohibited guns to the list, which sponsors said would be short, at least 
initially. 


The bill, which has undergone at least 10 drafts, is expected to be introduced 
next month. No legislator has yet been asked to carry the measure, proponents 
said, although Senate President Pro Tem David A. Roberti (D-Los Angeles) has 
promised to author such a bill. 


Strategists for the task force conceded that assuring hunters, collectors and 
sportsmen that their guns are ""safe"" and would not be affected by the bill is a 
key element in winning its approval by a Legislature highly sensitive to 
gun-owning constituents. 


""We want to make sure the bill doesn't affect hunters and sportsmen, even 
though the NRA will take it on and be opposed to it,"" said prosecutor 
Inglehart. ""But there are some guns that are not designed or meant to be used 
for hunting."" 


Sheriff Block, an outspoken opponent of semiautomatic assault weapons, said he 
believes there is a need to ""selectively regulate and, if necessary, prohibit 
certain kinds of weaponry in the interests of public safety. These weapons are 
legally available. People have exercised what is a right under the law (to 
purchase them) and I think the law has to be changed."" 




Retired Senator Active 


Joining in the fight against the legislation will be the Gun Owners of 
California, a political action committee headed by retired Sen. H. L. 
Richardson. The Glendora Republican now is in the business of producing 
conservative political videos. 


Richardson said he intends to blanket the state with thousands of videos 
opposing the legislation, just as he did when he campaigned for the defeat of 
former state Supreme Court Chief Justice Rose Elizabeth Bird. 


Gun control advocates, who were active in earlier attempts to outlaw 
military-type semiautomatic rifles, have made the tactical decision to remain 
on the sidelines in this struggle. For many gun owners and legislators, gun 
control is a code phrase for confiscating firearms. 


""We are taking our cue from law enforcement and looking to them for leadership 
on this issue,"" said Louis Tolley, state director of Handgun Control Inc. ""We 
are very anxious to support them. They have the expertise in defining these 
assault weapons and how best to restrict them. We don't have that expertise."" 

",29,"[ 0.          0.          0.01310139 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
286,"

IN BLOOD-RED letters, the sign on the front window of the Dealers Outlet gun 
store in suburban Phoenix declared: ""Urgent! Act Now! Stop the Gun Ban!"" 
Inside, customers took time out from browsing through AK-47 assault rifles and 
a flock of other firearms to sign a petition -- and to vent their wrath at a 
local ""turncoat,"" U.S. Sen. Dennis DeConcini (D-Ariz.). 


""We are petitioning to protest the semiautomatic gun-control bills before 
Congress,"" read the text above a fast-growing list of names. ""If we allow the 
government to become involved in any type of gun control, we are violating a 
basic constitutional right, the right to keep and bear arms."" 


The petitioners' target that sunny day last spring was DeConcini, a longtime 
opponent of gun-control measures who had suddenly switched sides, sponsoring 
one of the nine bills currently in Congress to ban the sale of assault weapons. 
""I'm a one-issue voter, and I'm going to do everything in my power to take 
DeConcini out,"" George Hiers, a burly man on crutches, vowed as he bought a 
semiautomatic shotgun for his wife to defend herself with while he's away on 
hunting trips. 


The attack on DeConcini was stirred up by the National Rifle Assn. in a display 
of fury that represented far more than retaliation against a former supporter. 
Long described as ""the powerful gun lobby,"" the NRA is now scrambling to 
recover from stunning setbacks in the past three years. Over the NRA's 
opposition, Congress and state legislatures have enacted legislation banning 
""cop-killer bullets"" that penetrate protective vests, plastic guns that can be 
slipped past metal detectors and ""Saturday night specials"" that are used in 
many crimes. And most recently, the group found itself caught in the furor over 
assault weapons that was ignited by the massacre of five children in a Stockton 
schoolyard last January. Those killings, combined with the increasing use of 
the weapons by drug dealers and youth gangs, have exacerbated the contentious 
relations between the NRA and its former allies. 


Law-enforcement leaders, concerned about rising violence and terrorism, have 
ended their friendliness toward the gun lobby and become well-organized in 
opposition. Politicians once fearful of the NRA have been much more willing to 
stand up to it; President Bush, an NRA ""Life Member,"" on July 7 imposed a 
permanent ban on imports of assault rifles and has proposed limiting the 
semiautomatics' ammunition clips. The ban so infuriated some NRA members that 
they have launched petition drives in two dozen states to oust Bush from the 
organization. Meanwhile, California, whose voters only seven years ago defeated 
an initiative that would have frozen the number of handguns in the state, last 
May became the first state to ban assault weapons. At the same time, 
gun-control organizations are beginning to match the NRA's mass mailings, ads 
and lobbying; many schools are showing ""Guns and the Constitution,"" an anti-gun 
video produced by Handgun Control Inc., whose chairwoman is Sarah Brady, wife 
of former White House Press Secretary James Brady, who was disabled by gunfire 
in the 1981 assassination attempt on then-President Reagan. 


And the NRA even is feeling pressure from more-militant gun groups that 
threaten to drain away members and funds. Although enjoying a membership surge, 
the NRA ran up a record $5.9-million deficit last year after spending more than 
$83 million. 


Thus, in fending off the assaults on assault weapons, the 118-year-old NRA is 
facing what its leaders call its most daunting challenge. 


""We're at a crossroads,"" James Jay Baker, the NRA's top congressional lobbyist, 
acknowledged as DeConcini's assault-weapons bill cleared its first Senate 
hurdle in April. ""We're going to go down the road of either prohibitive 
firearms regulations or tough criminal justice provisions"" -- that is, more 
prosecutors, penalties and prisons, the course sought by the NRA. ""Once you get 
into a (gun-control) rut, it's tough to get out of that rut."" 


Aside from the nation's capital, two of the hottest battlegrounds in the 
assault-weapons fight are Arizona and Florida. That would seem ironic, since 
guns permeate the cultures of those generally conservative states. But with 
opinion polls in both states showing that large majorities of residents support 
bans -- and with police complaining about being outgunned by criminals -- 
legislators have moved into action, spurring angry counterattacks from the NRA. 




Call Now! Write Today! 


AS PAT JONAS signed the petition in the gun store near Phoenix, one could 
witness the NRA's true political power: mobilizing citizens at the grass roots. 
""I don't want to see guns outlawed,"" Jonas said, ""because I like to collect 
guns."" Probably no other organization in the world floods government officials 
with as many phone calls, letters, telegrams and visits from its members as the 
NRA. Charles J. Orasin, president of 15-year-old Handgun Control -- the NRA's 
chief nemesis -- estimates that as many as 500,000 members of the NRA and other 
gun groups regularly lobby elected officials and bureaucrats. 


The outpouring is prompted by red-alert mailings churned out by NRA leaders, 
all sounding essentially the same alarm: They're out to get your guns. These 
letters go not only to the NRA's 2.9 million members, whose $25 annual 
membership fee brings such benefits as a magazine, gun-theft insurance and 
safety instruction, but also to 10,000 affiliated hunting organizations and 
shooting-competition groups. 


Time and again, the NRA has proved that citizen action generated by such 
mailings can have far more effect on legislation than opinion polls, especially 
when a majority for gun control is relatively silent. ""If a lawmaker is looking 
for an excuse to vote with the NRA, all he has to say is, 'I got a hundred 
calls from the NRA, but none from the other side,' "" said a congressional aide. 
And in a close election, a well-organized, single-interest group such as the 
NRA can wield decisive power by turning out highly motivated voters. 


It was one of these red-alert warnings, written by NRA lobbyist Baker, that had 
been delivered to 100,000 gun owners in Arizona and riled up the customers at 
the Dealers Outlet outside Phoenix. Baker's letter assailed DeConcini's bill, a 
scaled-down version of the one enacted by California in May. DeConcini's bill 
calls for a nationwide ban on sales of AK-47s and eight other semiautomatic 
rifles -- guns enjoying wide popularity because they have the menacing look and 
much of the firepower of fully automatic assault weapons used by the military 
and police. (Automatic guns fire 20 bullets or so per trigger pull; 
semiautomatics fire one bullet per trigger squeeze, but a fast index finger can 
get off as many as 20 shots in five seconds as ammunition is automatically 
reloaded from a clip. And many semiautomatics can easily be converted to 
automatic weapons.) 


In his letter, Baker called DeConcini's proposal a ""tragic mistake,"" charging 
that it could even block sales of traditional hunting rifles and lead to 
criminal charges against 30 million sportsmen who own semiautomatic guns. ""Does 
anyone seriously believe (Senate Bill) 747 will stop drug smugglers . . . who 
bring cocaine by the planeload . . . from bringing in any guns they want and 
selling them on the profitable black market Senator DeConcini's bill will 
create?"" Baker's letter asked. It concluded with a call to arms, warning that 
DeConcini ""needs to know we will not allow our constitutional freedoms to be 
strangled by restrictions that have absolutely no effect on the criminals who 
are supposed to be the real target! . . . CALL NOW! WRITE TODAY!"" 




""Lies and Exaggerations"" 


GUN OWNERS' rage spread quickly after the NRA letter hit Arizona the last week 
of April. In three weeks, DeConcini's office received 6,395 calls and letters 
against his bill and 68 for it, despite a poll indicating that more than 
two-thirds of the people in metropolitan Phoenix favor some kind of ban on 
assault weapons. 


""I've been to the four corners of Arizona, and people are shocked and dismayed"" 
by DeConcini's bill, said Landis Aden, a motorcycle-riding computer technician 
who lobbies part time for the Arizona NRA. Aden believes that semiautomatic 
guns would come in handy if a Mexican revolution spilled over the border and 
Arizonans got caught in the cross fire. ""You could defend your farm or your 
ranch fairly well,"" he said. 


Martin Mandall, a brash Scottsdale gun dealer who insisted that a reporter feel 
the thrill of firing Uzi and AK-47 machine guns at a range in his store 
basement, vowed during a conversation there to ""work with the utmost severity 
to get DeConcini out of office."" He said he had sold three years' stock of 
assault rifles in the two weeks after Bush issued a temporary import ban in 
March. 


""People are talking recall here,"" said Lee Echols, range master for the Phoenix 
Rod and Gun Club. ""We stood behind DeConcini at the last election, and we feel 
he has completely betrayed us."" Another member of the club, Bill Houston, 
telephoned DeConcini aide Matthew McCoy in his Washington office to protest. 
McCoy's end of the conversation went this way: 


""You're misinterpreting the legislation. . . . Recall election? I think that 
will hurt everybody and not help anybody. . . . You think that by attempting to 
burn your friends you can . . . If the alternative were something more strict 
than DeConcini's legislation, how would you feel then? Metzenbaum is going to 
come from somewhere out of left field."" Sen. Howard M. Metzenbaum (D-Ohio) is 
pushing a ban that is much broader than DeConcini's. 


Interviewed in his Phoenix office as the firestorm was building, a serene 
DeConcini accused the NRA of ""lies and exaggerations"" about his bill; he 
strongly disputed the NRA's claim that a provision banning any gun ""nearly 
identical"" to the nine listed in the measure could be interpreted to cover 
virtually all semiautomatics. The recently re-elected senator said he was 
trying to head off more-drastic legislation from Metzenbaum and others, 
including California Democratic Reps. Howard L. Berman of Panorama City and 
Fortney H. (Pete) Stark of Oakland. 


But DeConcini was also careful to take political cover behind two Republicans 
who are NRA ""Life Members."" He noted Bush's import ban and cited a salty 
declaration by Barry M. Goldwater, Arizona's venerable former senator, that 
semiautomatic guns ""have no place in anybody's arsenal. If any S.O.B. can't hit 
a deer with one shot, then he ought to quit shooting."" (Goldwater made the 
remark shortly after appearing in a full-page, ""I'm the NRA"" ad in Time 
magazine.) 


DeConcini, an NRA ""Person of the Month"" last year, said that NRA officials 
""flat told me, 'We can't negotiate' "" on his bill because ""they were burned so 
badly last year when they negotiated with (then-Atty. Gen. Edwin) Meese on 
banning plastic guns. They said their membership and revenues fell off. . . . 
Now they need to get members and money, and that's why they're doing this to 
me. . . . If I weren't a mature person, I'd say, 'Up yours. Now I'm going to be 
a gun-control advocate, and you're going to lose me.' "" 


Later, he said at a Senate hearing on his bill: ""By using these tactics, the 
NRA is succeeding only in alienating its friend closest to the fight."" 




Foxes in the Henhouse 


AS THE NRA waged its war in the West, Marion P. Hammer, a 50-year-old 
grandmother with brown bangs, strode to the front of another heated 
battleground in Tallahassee, Fla., a packed meeting room in the state's House 
of Representatives. 


A subcommittee was getting ready to vote on a bill that would ban a list of 
semiautomatic assault weapons, and Hammer had asked to speak against it. Only 4 
feet, 11 inches tall, she could barely be seen as she took the podium. Her gray 
slacks, blue ruffled blouse and blue suede jacket complemented her steel-blue 
eyes but belied her credentials: prize-winning marksman and hardball lobbyist 
for the Florida NRA. 


To her supporters, Hammer represents all that is strong about the NRA; to her 
detractors, much that is weak. 


Attacking the crux of the bill, Hammer told the subcommittee: ""You cannot 
differentiate between semiautomatic firearms that look menacing and your 
routine sporting firearms because, functionally, they are the same."" 


Next, she dealt acidly with one of the NRA's prickliest political problems: 
""There are some law-enforcement officers who are NRA members who are against 
us. I would suggest to you that it would not be the first time that the fox has 
been in the henhouse."" 


Finally, as NRA Washington lobbyist Baker had done in his letter to Arizona gun 
owners, Hammer charged that a loosely worded definition in the Florida bill 
would inadvertently ban all semiautomatic rifles and shotguns. That is, the ban 
would cover not just the targeted guns -- the ones with folding stocks that 
make them easy to conceal, pistol grips, huge ammunition clips and flash 
suppressors that, according to police, make it easy to spray bullets from the 
hip. But doomed as well, she claimed, would be firearms of traditional design 
long used by hunters and target shooters in one of the nation's gun-owningest 
states. 


""Taking away firearms from law-abiding citizens who have lawfully owned them 
for decades is not the solution"" to violent crime, she declared. 


One might have expected the House subcommittee to reject the bill handily on 
that April day. After all, two years earlier, Hammer had led a phenomenal 
victory for the NRA in Florida, winning passage of measures that threw out all 
locally imposed gun restrictions. The action was so sweeping that many Sunshine 
Staters thought that they had been freed to carry guns openly, Wild West-style. 
The Legislature later closed that seeming loophole in the wake of widespread 
hoots about the ""Gunshine State."" But it left intact all other provisions, 
including one making it much easier in many areas to obtain a concealed-weapon 
permit. 


Hammer has skillfully built support for the changes in the gun laws over many 
years. Rising at 4 a.m. after less than four hours' sleep, chain-smoking 
filter-tip cigarettes, sipping diet sodas -- and aided only by one part-time 
staffer and a $125,000 yearly budget -- she tirelessly works Capitol corridors 
and grinds out newsletters aimed at firing up the NRA's 130,000 Florida members 
to contact their representatives. Once, she threw a party at a firing range for 
legislators, aides, spouses and children; hundreds feasted on shrimp and 
oysters, and many took shooting lessons from expert instructors. 


Testimonials to Hammer's lobbying efforts -- not to mention her marksmanship 
with muzzle-loading rifles -- cover the walls of her office. Among the plaques 
and pictures is a Winchester .30-30 carbine from the National Antique Arms 
Assn., recognizing her as the first woman to receive its ""Roy Rogers Man of the 
Year Award."" 


Despite her past successes, however, the House panel voted 5-1 to pass the 
assault-weapons bill along to the full Criminal Justice Committee. Hammer still 
would have several opportunities to halt the bill's progress. But the 
surprising setback symbolized the NRA's shifting fortunes, not only in Florida, 
but across the nation. 


""The NRA has been unreasonable with their positions for so long, it's catching 
up with them now,"" asserted Rep. Ronald A. Silver, a Miami Beach Democrat who 
chairs the criminal justice panel. One of the NRA's major problems, he said, is 
that a number of legislative allies have been angered by its strong-arm tactics 
when the group decided they went astray. 


Dramatic evidence of this cropped up the day before the House action, when Sen. 
John A. Grant Jr., a conservative Tampa Republican who heads a companion Senate 
committee, was being interviewed about prospects for an assault-weapons ban. As 
Hammer sat casually on a table nearby, waiting to request that an NRA videotape 
be shown to the panel, Grant remarked that ""the gun lobby is very 
well-organized, and I give them credit for being able to rally the troops on 
very short notice."" But asked if the NRA provides accurate information, he 
responded, with a backward glance at Hammer: ""Well, sometimes they get a little 
bit overzealous. When they said I was part of the Gestapo last year, that was a 
little out of order."" 


Hammer explained later that Grant was referring to a newsletter in which she 
had said that a bill in his committee ""sets up a modern-day Gestapo movement"" 
because it threatened to invalidate many concealed-weapon permits. ""I wasn't 
calling members of that committee Gestapo,"" she maintained. Nevertheless, Grant 
was so enraged that he had an aide call NRA officials in Washington to demand 
her removal. 


State Sen. George G. Kirkpatrick Jr. (D-Gainesville) protested in an interview 
that he had been savagely attacked by Hammer's group in his latest campaign 
despite a ""strong pro-gun"" voting record. ""They wrote the most vicious 
letters,"" he said. ""They called me Judas"" because he had backed a Senate 
leadership team viewed by the NRA as sympathetic to controls on handguns and 
assault weapons. Kirkpatrick, who easily won re-election, predicted that such 
tactics will backfire. ""Because of the NRA's unwillingness to sit down and work 
out a reasonable solution to problems perceived by the public, it makes it much 
more difficult to get their mission accomplished,"" he said. 


Said Hammer: ""He's very bitter, but I have a job to do. We have a right to 
vigorously oppose anyone whose actions are detrimental to our best interests."" 


Hammer faces another growing problem: competition from lobbyists on the other 
side. For instance, the day of the House subcommittee vote on assault weapons, 
she was outmaneuvered by Bernard Horn, the state legislative director for 
Handgun Control, who had flown in from Washington. Horn gave legislators a 
booklet picturing both the 27 guns proposed for banning and other semiautomatic 
rifles that were not on the list but that are popular with hunters. The move 
was aimed at shattering the NRA's claim that only cosmetic differences exist 
between assault weapons and sporting guns. 


The effect on subcommittee member Carol Hanson (R-Boca Raton) was decisive. 
Because of the booklet, she said, she was no longer willing to support merely a 
limit on the capacity of ammunition clips -- a fallback position to which 
Hammer had reluctantly acceded. Now, Hanson said, she favored banning the guns 
themselves. 


Eventually, Hammer was able to minimize her losses. Instead of banning assault 
weapons, the Legislature in June created a commission to study them. And, 
instead of enacting a seven-day waiting period for gun buyers, as sought by 
Handgun Control, it required dealers to make a less-comprehensive background 
check by telephoning a police computer. Voters will decide next year whether to 
accept a three-day waiting period. 


Although a Handgun Control news release declared, ""Florida Deals NRA Fourth 
Loss of Year,"" Hammer was able to say with some justification, ""I think we did 
pretty good."" The tide turned her way, she claimed, after legislators saw how 
student demonstrators in China were overwhelmed by troops ""because they were 
unarmed."" 


Shortly after adjourning, the Legislature was called back into special session 
to reconsider a bill that would make it illegal for gun owners to carelessly 
leave weapons around children. The NRA had helped kill the measure weeks 
earlier. But after a spate of gun accidents killed three children and wounded 
three others in early June, Hammer gave conditional support to the bill, and it 
passed overwhelmingly. 




Rambo Sells 


ON A BREEZY DAY last spring, a riot of orange- and gold-striped tulips swayed 
outside the gunmetal gray NRA headquarters in Washington. 


Inside the eight-story building, many of the 365 employees worked on gun-safety 
courses, shooting competitions, police firearms training and other services 
that predominated at the NRA until heavy lobbying against gun control began in 
the 1970s. The shift came after the murders of two Kennedys and a King inspired 
passage of major federal gun regulations in 1968. 


In his seventh-floor office, Jim Baker -- one of five in-house lobbyists 
supplemented by four high-powered outsiders -- had put the finishing touches on 
his letter to Arizona gun owners, slamming DeConcini's bill. ""I want this 
carefully fly-specked"" for mistakes, he told a secretary as he left for lunch. 


Over a roast beef sandwich and beer at a plush hotel restaurant, the handsome, 
35-year-old former prosecutor was asked whether Barry Goldwater's assertion 
that hunters don't need assault weapons had undermined the NRA's effort to 
prevent the ban. 


""You don't need any particular gun. You don't need to hunt. But I don't think 
you should have to justify anything in terms of need. That's a socialist 
concept. You ought to be able to own within reasonable limits what you want. 
The question is whether these proposals will fight crime effectively, and we 
think highly restrictive gun controls are a bankrupt concept."" 


Baker argued that claims of assault-weapon violence are grossly exaggerated and 
that the Stockton massacre could have been carried out with almost any gun, not 
just the semiautomatic AK-47 wielded by Patrick Purdy. 


A bit more candidly, J. Warren Cassidy, the NRA's executive vice president, 
later acknowledged that the Goldwater comment had hurt badly. Cassidy said a 
number of concerned NRA members wrote him, asking, ""What are you going to do 
about this?"" He wrote back, asking, ""What do you want me to do? I can't recall 
him, he's out of office -- he's an American legend."" But Cassidy noted in the 
interview: ""When a guy like Barry or Dennis DeConcini does these things, it's a 
belt to the solar plexus, because you've counted on these fellows."" 


Tom Korologos, one of the NRA's well-connected outside lobbyists, recalled 
another example of the difficulty of fighting off assault-weapon bans. He said 
that while touring exhibition booths at the NRA's recent national convention, 
he came across ""a basic .22 rifle that had a big banana clip and a big round 
thing to hold it with. It looked for all the world like Rambo's personal gun."" 
Korologos asked the exhibitor, ""Why are you ruining this perfectly legitimate 
rifle?"" 


""Ah,"" came the response, ""but they sell."" 


Korologos commented: ""Never mind it doesn't do us any good on Capitol Hill to 
have those damn things loose."" 


An NRA operative conceded that, despite a tough ""no-compromise"" resolution 
unanimously adopted at the national convention, the NRA might have to back a 
compromise bill when Congress takes final action on assault weapons. ""We may be 
branded as traitors, but that's the nature of the game in this town, to forge 
agreements and compromises,"" said the source, who requested anonymity. 


Actually, in the face of increasingly well-organized support for gun control, 
the NRA grudgingly compromised on cop-killer bullets in 1986 and plastic guns 
in 1988. 


To fight assault-weapon bills, Baker said, the NRA hopes to spend $5 million, 
most of it derived from direct-mail appeals. The organization's revenues last 
year included $45.4 million from membership dues and $9.4 million from 
contributions. About one-fourth of the $83.6 million in expenditures was spent 
on lobbying. 


In addition, the NRA is continuing to contribute heavily to political 
campaigns, despite the disappointments it suffered in last year's elections. In 
1988, five incumbents and all 15 challengers supported by the NRA were 
defeated; although 182 incumbents won, the NRA netted no gain with the $770,000 
it poured into campaigns. 


For the assault-weapons fight, the NRA has sent dozens of police officers to 
Washington to offset pro-ban lobbying by police chiefs, launched a national 
newspaper and TV ad campaign and continued to make available to gun owners a 
900 toll phone number that has already produced thousands of NRA form letters 
to President Bush and members of Congress. 


Baker denied that NRA officials had anything to do with the petition drive to 
purge Bush from membership, saying that it originated with rank-and-filers 
""obviously disappointed with the President's first six months in office."" But 
he added that the NRA board of directors would be forced to consider the matter 
at its September meeting. 


For a while, the NRA harshly retaliated against police chiefs who spoke out for 
gun control, seeking to get chiefs fired in Nashville, Tenn., and Baltimore 
County, Md. But Dover, N.H., Chief Charles Reynolds, president of the 
International Assn. of Chiefs of Police, said that he and NRA President Joe 
Foss recently agreed to ""keep the debate issue-oriented, without personal 
attacks."" 


The most frequent charge against the NRA is the one leveled by DeConcini -- 
that it lies and exaggerates. Denying this, Baker said ""a survey of Congress"" 
by the American Library Assn. had found that the library group and the NRA 
""supplied the most accurate information"" of all lobbying organizations. In 
truth, the compliment appeared in a Library Journal gossip column, citing only 
the opinion of ""a highly placed library source in Washington, D.C."" GraceAnne 
DeCandido, who wrote the item, said it was based on ""dinner-table conversation"" 
with a government bureaucrat. ""To have the NRA use that in support of their 
policies is beyond ludicrous,"" she said. 




A Prayer for Arms 


AT THE NRA's national convention in April, more than 16,000 people roamed 
across 160,000 square feet of exhibits at St. Louis' convention center. They 
shouldered pea-green SIG assault rifles. They clicked the triggers of 
super-light Glock 17 pistols. They marveled at new laser targeting devices that 
can project a red beam hundreds of feet, from gun to bull's-eye. 


And then, during a break, 1,000 NRA activists filed into a cavernous hall where 
Merrill L. (Pete) Petoskey, a wildlife biologist from Lewiston, Mich., 
delivered the opening prayer at the NRA's 118th annual meeting. 


 ""Dear God, Creator of all ... 


 ""Please give us the direction to make (gun-control advocates) understand that 
the actions of criminals, who should be confined, should not be dramatized into 
legislation that will impose on the rights of millions of law-abiding citizens 
to own and bear arms for lawful pursuits of recreation and self-defense. 


 ""Please help and guide the leaders of the National Rifle Association and of 
this nation to preserve and strengthen this freedom and this right. 


 ""Amen."" 


 Addressing the meeting, NRA President Foss acknowledged that the beleaguered 
group could, indeed, use more help. He called on the nation's 70 million gun 
owners ""to get off their duffs if they want to keep their guns."" The news 
media, the grizzled hero of two wars said, ""have a million reasons for us not 
to have guns. But look at what happened in Germany when ol' Hitler did a good 
job in disarming the nation. If people are armed, it keeps the bad actors off 
the scene."" 


""With your help,"" chimed in Wayne R. LaPierre Jr., head of the NRA's lobbying, 
""we will protect your basic God-given right to defend yourself and to own 
firearms in this country."" 


At the NRA's annual banquet that night, actor Charlton Heston evoked his famous 
movie image of Moses on the mountaintop as he provided the group with an 
inspirational boost. 


As the main speaker, Heston noted that he keeps beside his bed a .45-caliber 
service revolver that he brought back from World War II. ""That's a 
semiautomatic weapon, and I do not plan to surrender it,"" he proclaimed, 
banging the lectern. Then, accepting an ornate flintlock rifle from the NRA for 
his years of support, Heston hoisted it above his head as if it were a stone 
tablet. Intoning the punch line of a defiant pro-gun slogan, he suggested that 
nobody was going to take this weapon from him unless it was pried ""from my 
cold, dead hands!"" 


The 1,200 diners leaped up, roaring. For an army of crusaders besieged, it was 
just the rousing send-off needed for the tough battles ahead. 

",29,"[ 0.         0.         0.0039654 ...,  0.         0.         0.       ]"
287,"     But out West, politicians are still expected to support NRA leadership. The
conventional wisdom still is: If you cross the gun lobby, they'll have a
silver bullet waiting for you at the next election.;    I'm betting that those
days are over. I will vote for the Brady Bill -- the seven-day waiting period
for persons wanting to buy handguns -- and for restrictions on the sale and
domestic manufacture of assault weapons.;    Don't misunderstand: The NRA has
a strong presence throughout my state. Oregon probably has a lot more pickups
with gun racks than Volvos with ski racks. A landmark I'll never forget in
Newberg, Ore., was a gun store named ""Toys for Big Boys."" The NRA in Oregon is
62,000 members strong, and there are about 150 gun clubs in the state.;     I
USED to tell myself that gun control isn't crime control and -- comforted by
that thought -- I let my 100 percent NRA rating keep arguments about guns from
consuming the time I felt I needed for the issues I came to Congress to
advance: jobs, education, family security and social justice.;    What has
been happening in our streets has changed my mind dramatically. Handguns alone
have killed about 50,000 people in the United States since the Brady Bill was
last considered by Congress. Oregonians in ""safe"" neighborhoods face gun
violence unthinkable when I was first elected to Congress in 1974.;    Youth
gangs with bulging arsenals cruise up and down Interstate 5 on the West Coast
to ply their drug trade in our cities. Just a few weeks ago, a gang knocked
over a gun shop in rural Hood River to steal sophisticated firearms, including
assault weapons, apparently intended for sale on the black market. One youth
was shot to death during the crime.;    The '80s shattered Oregonians' dearly
held image of their state as an island in a sea of national crime and
violence. When a gunman with a long criminal history blew away five children
in a Stockton, Calif., schoolyard two years ago, Oregonians were appalled to
discover he'd bought his assault rifle in Sandy, Ore. Even Oregon gun
lobbyists privately conceded our state's problems with criminal and negligent
use of firearms.;     AS CRIME got worse, I discovered what an ideological
straitjacket that NRA seal of approval can be. If New Jersey's mandatory
background check for handgun purchases has caught 10,000 convicted felons
trying to buy handguns, how could I honestly tell myself that gun control
isn't crime control?;    If, as the nation just learned last week, more
teen-age boys now die from gunshot wounds than from all natural causes
combined, how could I continue to separate neatly the increasing carnage in
communities from ""my issues"" of jobs, education, social justice and family
security? I couldn't.;    A couple of years ago, after listening to my own
anti-gun-control spiel one time too many, I realized how threadbare it
sounded. I started paying closer attention to the arguments on both sides of
the Brady Bill and assault weapon curbs.;    I lent an ear to some unexpected
gun control advocates: a janitor who accosted me angrily after a teachers'
meeting in Beaverton; Newberg's police chief, who is also an NRA member; and
my own wife, who grew up -- as I did -- in rural Redmond, where some are fond
of saying you learn to shoot before you learn to read.;    I used to think I
listened; now I've heard. What I've heard convinces me that the conventional
wisdom about the NRA's clout is hopelessly out of touch -- and that the
leaders of the NRA are out of touch too. Most of the people I represent are
now more concerned about gun violence than they are about whatever
inconvenience may be caused by a seven-day waiting period, which can prevent
felons, drug addicts and the mentally disturbed from buying handguns.;    The
Brady bill and assault weapon curbs aren't panaceas for crime, but evidence at
the state level shows they will help.;     MY CONSTITUENTS want policies that
reduce violent crime, regardless of whether they are labeled ""gun control.""
The gun lobby guarantees its political irrelevance by denying that. By
opposing moderate measures like the Brady Bill -- which public opinion
research shows 87 percent of gun owners favor -- the leadership of the NRA has
made its congressional supporters patsies in a game of lethal consequences.;  
 This time, the gun lobby has overplayed its hand. Frankly, I'm sick of it,
and I'm sick of gun violence.;    After too long at the table, I'm ready to do
what I can to bust up the game.  ",29,"[ 0.41133514  0.00894174  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
288,"
   Cow kicked Nellie in the barn
   Didn't do her any good, didn't do her any harm.
                                                                                                       

   Gun-control laws can never substitute for the hard work of
apprehending and convicting criminals. Still, the Brady bill
is a small price to pay if Congress also agrees to the
administration's crime bill.
   No one believes that this gun bill would have a measurable
effect on violent crime, or even that it would have stopped
John Hinkley from buying the gun he used five months later to
shoot Mr. Reagan and James Brady. There would be a seven-day
waiting period before any gun dealer sells a handgun to a
customer. During that week, state law-enforcement officials
can (but wouldn't have to) investigate whether the purchaser
is a felon or has spent time in a mental institution. The gun
could be sold at the end of the week unless the police find
the evidence to stop the sale.
   The first problem is that there is no way of knowing who
is a felon, much less a mental patient. There is no computer
list of the criminal records from the states. Nine states do
not even require that courts report the final disposition of
felony cases. At the federal level, the FBI doesn't have
records showing the final results in half of its arrests. The
Brady bill would not create any national record of people who
cannot buy handguns. With no list for gun dealers to consult,
the bill's effectiveness dims.
   There is also something breathtaking in the claim that
crime can be stopped by regulating gun dealers. Attorney
General Dick Thornburgh calls this the ""17% solution."" Fewer
than one-in-five handguns acquired by felons are bought from
gun dealers. There is an active gun market, including
rent-a-gun operations in some public-housing projects. Making
it harder to buy from legitimate dealers will boost street
sales.
   Gun control has become the $600 toilet seat of the crime
debate. Yes, it would be good to keep firearms out of the
hands of felons and the mentally incompetent. But all the
talk about gun control has prevented the serious discussion
on crime this country desperately needs to have.
   For example, why don't we have records of felons? Part of
the answer is to imagine how long it would take an ACLU
affiliate somewhere to file a lawsuit alleging that the
rights of felons or certifiably dangerous mental patients
would be violated by a national registry.
   As with the drug problem, the only solution to crimes with
guns is on the demand side. Americans own perhaps 150 million
firearms; that is more guns than cars. Even if we somehow
banned sales of all weapons from butter knives to imported
semi-automatics, the current supply is more than adequate for
street crimes.
   This is why a Brady bill, which won't work but which also
won't cause much harm, would be a reasonable trade-off for
the Bush crime bill. Under the administration's bill,
criminals, especially ones who use firearms, would face more
certain punishment. The bill would finally limit the endless
appeals from death-penalty convictions and create new death
penalties for drug-related killings.
   Our favorite provision would offer more effective gun
control than the Brady bill. This is Mr. Thornburgh's
""inclusionary rule"" to replace the exclusionary rule's absurd
result that a criminal goes free because a constable
blundered. The jury would still get to see the evidence of
the gun and convict the criminal even where evidence of a
firearm is obtained under a faulty search warrant or some
other technical problem. Instead of keeping the truth from
jurors, the evidence would be allowed. But to encourage
lawful searches, the Justice Department would also set up a
system to pay compensation to people who are wrongly searched
and to discipline erring officers directly.
   Over the past 30 years, everything from ""Miranda""
censoring of confessions to activist judges declaring that
jails are ""too crowded"" has created a reign of lawlessness.
The chances of a crime leading to an arrest, conviction and
serious prison term are well under one-in-100 in many parts
of the country. We may have more people in jail than ever
before, but it is still true that a rational criminal can
calculate the odds that crime does pay.
   Gun-control proposals only hide the deeper problem that
the country still lacks the will to punish criminals. Our
idea of real gun and crime control starts with freeing the
law-enforcement system from the many procedural hurdles that
deter it from providing law, order and justice.
",29,"[ 0.76357692  0.00687297  0.01149501 ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
289,"     The homemade videotape, shot early Sunday morning in the Los Angeles
community of Lake View Terrace, appears to depict at least a dozen police
officers surrounding a man after he left his car, kicking him and inflicting
more than 30 blows with nightsticks as he lay on the pavement. The tape, shot
from a nearby balcony, recorded no sound.;    It was first shown Monday night
by a Los Angeles television station and broadcast throughout the day Tuesday
by Cable News Network. The violent images produced an immediate public
outcry.;    At a Los Angeles Police Commission meeting Tuesday afternoon,
Chief Daryl Gates called the tape shocking but said he would withhold judgment
until the incident had been investigated.;    Bradley was unequivocal in his
response: ""This is something we cannot and will not tolerate,"" the Los Angeles
mayor said. ""It's now a matter of our identifying and finding witnesses. . . .
I assure you that, once that's done, appropriate action will be taken by the
department and the police commission."";    Police officials identified the man
as Rodney Glenn King, an ex-convict who lives in Altadena.;    California
Highway Patrol officials said King's 1988 white Hyundai was clocked on the
freeway at up to 115 mph early Sunday morning. Los Angeles police officers
joined the pursuit when King exited to surface streets, running several red
lights, a Highway Patrol spokesman, Sgt. Mike Brey, said.;    Los Angeles
Traffic Detective Richard Talkington told the Los Angeles Times that written
police reports from officers involved said King ignored several requests to
leave the car after he was stopped.;    King finally lay down on the ground,
prone, at the officers' orders, he said. One officer approached King to
handcuff him, and when King attempted to stand up, Officer Laurence Powell put
his knee on his back to keep him down, Talkington said.;    Talkington said
King continued to rise, causing Powell to fall, ""and that's when the fight
started."" But the videotape contains no indication that King attempted to hit
the officers.;    Three witnesses who live near the site of the incident said
Tuesday that King did not fight officers.  ",30,"[ 0.44476714  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
290,"     ""You talk to people in the black community here, and they say, 'This is not
news,' "" said Joe Hicks, an American Civil Liberties Union spokesman who grew
up in the community. ""They say, 'Why are all the white people so surprised? A
guy got his butt beat by the cops. It happens all the time.' "";    Behind the
shrug, though, emotions run deep. ""There's nothing you can imagine the guy had
done that would justify that kind of response,"" Hicks said.;    Rodney Glen
King, the victim of the beating, on Wednesday was released from Los Angeles
County Jail after prosecutors said police had failed to prove their charges
that he resisted arrest after a high-speed chase. The 10 officers involved in
the beating have been taken off patrol.;    King told reporters that there had
been no chase, that he had done nothing to provoke the attack and that he was
""scared for my life"" during the beating.;    ""I'm lucky they didn't kill me,""
King said from a wheelchair, displaying a broken ankle, damaged eye and
bruises.;    He said that police ""continued to pound on me and beat on me all
over my body . . . all over my body. My ankles. They beat where it hurt. They
beat my whole body where it hurt."";    Los Angeles Police Chief Daryl Gates,
long controversial for racial statements he has made, called the brutality
depicted on the tape ""an aberration."";    The department issued no statements
Wednesday. Agencies including the FBI, the LAPD, Los Angeles District
Attorney's Office and the California Highway Patrol are investigating the
beating.;    Police wanted prosecutors to charge King with battery on an
officer and resisting arrest, said King's lawyer, Robert Rentzer. But the
district attorney's office refused.;    ""We have sent the case back to police
for further investigation,"" said Deputy District Attorney Don Eastman. ""There
are a lot of things we want to look at and a lot of witnesses who were not
interviewed."";    The district attorney's office said officers failed to
interview available witnesses, including two of King's passengers.;    The
pursuit of King's white 1988 Hyundai was initiated by CHP officers, who
estimated that King's car was hitting speeds as high as 115 mph on a freeway.
The CHP officers said that they called for assistance and had pulled King over
in the Terrace San Fernando Valley area of Los Angeles when several Los
Angeles police officers ""jumped into the mess,"" said a law enforcement source
familiar with the report CHP officers filed with their supervisors. When the
sedan finally stopped off the freeway, King was ordered out of the car.;   
The source said that a police sergeant told the CHP that his officers would
handle things. Witnesses said that King was already lying on the ground when a
police officer shot him with a stun gun, delivering an electrical shock.
Officers then clubbed him wildly. There was a brief lull and King lay silent
until one officer stomped on his head.;    One of the CHP officers at the
scene exhorted the police officers to stop the beating, but was told, in
effect, to ""stay out of it,"" according to the source.;    King, lifting his
hospital garb to show other marks, a large bruise on his chest, said police
""shocked me . . . they paused for a minute and then they struck me across the
face real hard with a billy club."";    The stunning videotape was recorded by
George Holliday, a plumber who was awakened about 12:30 a.m. Sunday by the
sound of police helicopters overhead. Holliday went to the terrace of his
second-story apartment and, seeing police in the street below, decided to get
some practice with his new videotape recorder.;    Witnesses said three or
four officers beat King in the two-minute tape, while as many as seven others
stood by to watch.;    ""Please stop! Please stop!"" King pleaded as he was
struck at least 40 times with police batons, said witness Dorothy Gibson.;   
King is black. The races of the police officers involved have not been
revealed. King said he didn't hear any racial comments from the officers.;   
""They beat me so bad I didn't pay attention to what they were saying,"" said
King, who had been released from jail in December after serving 2 1/2 years on
a second-degree robbery conviction.;    ""When I saw it on TV, I thought, 'Is
this something happening in South Africa or Kuwait?' "" said Keith Huling, 35,
who lives in the same apartment complex as Holliday. ""Then I looked a little
closer, and said, 'Hey, that's the park across the street.' "";    Police have
said King resisted arrest. Witnesses have said he did not.;    Huling said he
knows of other police beatings that he believes are racially motivated. A
prevailing sense in his neighborhood this week, he said, is that ""if I come
home from work and make a turn on a red light, I'm going to get my butt
kicked."";    The perception that non-Anglos are the targets of police
brutality has been chronic here.;    ""Whether that's a perception or a reality
is almost beside the point, because the perception is the reality,"" said Zev
Yaroslavsky, a councilman who has requested public hearings on brutality
throughout the city. ""I am troubled by the fact that when I learned the person
beaten was black, I wasn't surprised. . . . It is rare that there's an Anglo
that gets the crap beat out of him with a billy club."";    Yaroslavsky pointed
to recent incidents of harassment of black people. Just last December,
businessman and former Laker Jamaal Wilkes was handcuffed during a routine
traffic stop. The police department's subsequent apology to him came on the
heels of a federal jury award of $540,000 to former major league baseball
player Joe Morgan, who said Los Angeles police in 1988 had grabbed him by the
neck, thrown him to the ground and cuffed him at Los Angeles International
Airport when they thought he was a drug courier.  ",30,"[ 0.5093796  0.         0.        ...,  0.         0.         0.       ]"
291,"     Police wanted prosecutors to charge King with battery on an officer and
resisting arrest, said King's lawyer, Robert Rentzer. But the district
attorney's office refused.;    ""We have sent the case back to police for
further investigation,"" said Deputy District Attorney Don Eastman. ""There are
a lot of things we want to look at and a lot of witnesses who were not
interviewed."";    The district attorney's office said officers failed to
interview available witnesses, including two of King's passengers. The 10
officers involved in the beating have been taken off patrol.;    King told
reporters that there had been no high-speed car chase as they insisted, that
he had done nothing to provoke the attack and that he was ""scared for my life""
during the beating.;    ""I'm lucky they didn't kill me,"" he said.;   
Witnesses back King's version of what happened early Sunday morning in a Los
Angeles suburb, and a CHP officer at the scene said he exhorted the police
officers to stop the beating, but was told, in effect, to ""stay out of it,""
according to a source.;    The pursuit of King's white 1988 Hyundai was begun
by CHP officers, who estimated that King's car was hitting speeds as high as
115 mph on a freeway. The CHP officers said that they called for assistance
and had pulled King over in the Terrace San Fernando Valley area of Los
Angeles.;    At that point, several Los Angeles police officers ""jumped into
the mess,"" said a law enforcement source familiar with the report CHP officers
filed with their supervisors. When the car finally stopped off the freeway,
King was ordered out of the car.;    The source said that a police sergeant
told the CHP that his officers would handle things. Witnesses said that King
was already lying on the ground when a police officer shot him with a stun
gun, delivering an electrical shock. Officers then clubbed him wildly. There
was a brief lull and King lay silent until one officer stomped on his head.;  
 King said that police ""continued to pound on me and beat on me all over my
body . . . all over my body. My ankles. They beat where it hurt. They beat my
whole body where it hurt."";    King, lifting his hospital garb to show a large
bruise on his chest, said police ""shocked me . . . they paused for a minute
and then they struck me across the face real hard with a billy club."";   
Witnesses said three or four officers beat King in the two-minute tape, while
as many as seven others stood by to watch.;    ""Please stop! Please stop!""
King pleaded as he was struck at least 40 times with police batons, said
witness Dorothy Gibson.;    King is black. The races of the police officers
involved have not been revealed. King said he didn't hear any racial comments
from the officers.;    ""They beat me so bad I didn't pay attention to what
they were saying,"" said King, who had been released from jail in December
after serving 2 1/2 years on a second-degree robbery conviction.;    ""When I
saw it on TV, I thought, 'Is this something happening in South Africa or
Kuwait?' "" said Keith Huling, 35, who lives in the same apartment complex as
Holliday. ""Then I looked a little closer, and said, 'Hey, that's the park
across the street.' "";    Witnesses said King did not resist arrest.;    The
stunning videotape was recorded by George Holliday, a plumber who was awakened
about 12:30 a.m. Sunday by the sound of police helicopters overhead. Holliday
went to the terrace of his second-story apartment and, seeing police in the
street below, decided to get some practice with his new videotape recorder.;  
 The world reacted with sickened shock and outrage to the brutal, but some
some in the black community here reacted with more of a shrug.;    ""You talk
to people in the black community here, and they say, 'This is not news,' ""
said Joe Hicks, an American Civil Liberties Union spokesman who grew up in the
community. ""They say, 'Why are all the white people so surprised? A guy got
his butt beat by the cops. It happens all the time.' "";    Behind the shrug,
though, emotions run deep. ""There's nothing you can imagine the guy had done
that would justify that kind of response,"" Hicks said.;    Los Angeles Police
Chief Daryl Gates, long controversial for racial statements he has made,
called the brutality depicted on the tape ""an aberration."";    The department
issued no statements Wednesday. Agencies including the FBI, the LAPD, Los
Angeles District Attorney's Office and the California Highway Patrol are
investigating the beating.;    Huling said he knows of other police beatings
that he believes are racially motivated. A prevailing sense in his
neighborhood this week, he said, is that ""if I come home from work and make a
turn on a red light, I'm going to get my butt kicked."";    The perception that
non-Anglos are the targets of police brutality has been chronic here.;   
""Whether that's a perception or a reality is almost beside the point, because
the perception is the reality,"" said Zev Yaroslavsky, a councilman who has
requested public hearings on brutality throughout the city. ""I am troubled by
the fact that when I learned the person beaten was black, I wasn't surprised.
. . . It is rare that there's an Anglo that gets the crap beat out of him with
a billy club."";    Yaroslavsky pointed to recent incidents of harassment of
black people. Just last December, businessman and former Laker Jamaal Wilkes
was handcuffed during a routine traffic stop. The police department's
subsequent apology to him came on the heels of a federal jury award of
$540,000 to former major league baseball player Joe Morgan, who said Los
Angeles police in 1988 had grabbed him by the neck, thrown him to the ground
and cuffed him at Los Angeles International Airport when they thought he was a
drug courier.;    Last year, 55 residents of one of the city's streets
accepted a $3 million settlement for damages from a 1988 police drug raid in
which officers allegedly wrecked apartments and beat several people.;    ""I
don't think the body politic in Los Angeles has been willing to address it,""
Yaroslavsky said. ""But what the public has seen in black and white, no pun
intended, leaves nothing to the imagination, leaves nothing to interpretation,
(and) probably is the one event that may sensitize"" the politicians.  ",30,"[ 0.50870806  0.01395472  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
292,"     ""You talk to people in the black community here, and they say, 'This is not
news,' "" said Joe Hicks, an American Civil Liberties Union spokesman who grew
up in the community. ""They say, 'Why are all the white people so surprised? A
guy got his butt beat by the cops. It happens all the time.' "";    Behind the
shrug, though, emotions run deep. ""There's nothing you can imagine the guy had
done that would justify that kind of response,"" Hicks said.;    Rodney Glen
King, the victim of the beating, on Wednesday was released from Los Angeles
County Jail after prosecutors said police had failed to prove their charges
that he resisted arrest after a high-speed chase. The officers involved in the
beating have been taken off patrol.;    King told reporters that there had
been no chase, that he had done nothing to provoke the attack and that he was
""scared for my life"" during the beating.;    ""They continued to pound on me
and beat on me,"" King said from a wheelchair, ""all over my body . . . all over
my body. My ankles. They beat where it hurt. They beat my whole body where it
hurt."";    Los Angeles Police Chief Daryl Gates, long controversial for racial
statements he has made, called the brutality depicted on the tape ""an
aberration."";    ""Anyone who viewed this tape would hasten to make a quick
judgment,"" Gates said Tuesday. ""I would hope the public on this one case not
make a judgment on the Los Angeles Police Department."";    The department
issued no statements Wednesday. Agencies including the FBI, the LAPD, Los
Angeles District Attorney's Office and the California Highway Patrol are
investigating the beating. A city councilman also has asked for a council
committee review of the larger issue of police brutality throughout the city.;
   The stunning videotape was recorded by George Holliday, a plumber who was
awakened about 12:30 a.m. Sunday in his suburban Los Angeles home by the sound
of police helicopters overhead. Holliday went to the terrace of his
second-story apartment and, seeing police in the street below, decided to get
some practice with his new videotape recorder.;    Holliday took the tape to a
local television station, which aired it Monday night and passed it along to
the Cable News Network. By Tuesday night, the horrifying images had been piped
into more than 30 million homes: There, the 25-year-old King was lying on the
ground, struggling to his hands and knees, then writhing on the ground under a
hail of police night sticks and kicks. Witnesses said police also used a stun
gun on King. Three or four officers had at King in the two-minute tape, while
as many as seven others stood by to watch.;    King is black. The races of the
police officers involved have not been revealed. King said he didn't hear any
racial comments from the officers.;    ""They beat me so bad I didn't pay
attention to what they were saying,"" he said, adding that police in Los
Angeles ""consider themselves different"" than the general public.;    King, who
had been released from jail in December after serving 2 1/2 years on a
second-degree robbery conviction, had been pursued to the spot outside
Holliday's apartment by CHP and Los Angeles officers in a chase police said
reached speeds over 110 mph. Before his release Wednesday, the father of two
reportedly lay in the county jail's hospital ward with a broken jaw, broken
leg, disfigured face and badly bruised body.;    ""When I saw it on TV, I
thought, 'Is this something happening in South Africa or Kuwait?' "" said Keith
Huling, 35, who lives in the same apartment complex as Holliday. ""Then I
looked a little closer, and said, 'Hey, that's the park across the street.' "";
   Police have said King resisted arrest. Witnesses have said he did not.;   
Huling said he knows of other police beatings that he believes are racially
motivated. A prevailing sense in his neighborhood this week, he said, is that
""if I come home from work and make a turn on a red light, I'm going to get my
butt kicked."";    The perception that non-Anglos are the targets of police
brutality has been chronic here.;    ""Whether that's a perception or a reality
is almost beside the point, because the perception is the reality,"" said Zev
Yaroslavsky, the councilman who has requested public hearings on brutality
throughout the city. ""I am troubled by the fact that when I learned the person
beaten was black, I wasn't surprised. . . . It is rare that there's an Anglo
that gets the crap beat out of him with a billy club."";    Yaroslavsky pointed
to recent incidents of harassment of black people. Just last December,
businessman and former Laker Jamaal Wilkes was handcuffed during a routine
traffic stop. The police department's subsequent apology to him came on the
heels of a federal jury award of $540,000 to former major league baseball
player Joe Morgan, who said Los Angeles police in 1988 had grabbed him by the
neck, thrown him to the ground and cuffed him at Los Angeles International
Airport when they thought he was a drug courier.;    Last year, 55 residents
of one of the city's streets accepted a $3 million settlement for damages from
a 1988 police drug raid in which officers allegedly wrecked apartments and
beat several people.;    ""I don't think the body politic in Los Angeles has
been willing to address it,"" Yaroslavsky said. ""But what the public has seen
in black and white, no pun intended, leaves nothing to the imagination, leaves
nothing to interpretation, (and) probably is the one event that may sensitize""
the politicians.;    The Police Misconduct Lawyer Referral Service so far this
year has received 531 complaints of police misconduct, including 127 involving
officers in the LAPD, according to Karol Heppe, the non-profit organization's
executive director. The total number of complaints is 75 percent higher than
it was at this time last year, Heppe said.;    The complaints range from
illegal search and seizure to verbal abuse to death, Heppe said. Most do not
lead to prosecution.;    ""The only difference between those and this one is
that this one was caught on videotape,"" she said.;    Heppe lamented that the
Los Angeles police chief's attitude does not enhance the department's
reputation. Among the racial controversies he has stirred was the suggestion
that blacks die in choke holds because they have abnormal necks.;    The
ACLU's Hicks said the organization plans today to ask for Gates' resignation.  ",30,"[ 0.49492135  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
293,"     ""You talk to people in the black community here, and they say, 'This is not
news,' "" said Joe Hicks, an American Civil Liberties Union spokesman who grew
up in the community. ""They say, 'Why are all the white people so surprised? A
guy got his butt beat by the cops. It happens all the time.' "";    Behind the
shrug, though, emotions run deep. ""There's nothing you can imagine the guy had
done that would justify that kind of response,"" Hicks said.;    Rodney Glen
King, the victim of the beating, on Wednesday was released from Los Angeles
County Jail after prosecutors said police had failed to prove their charges
that he resisted arrest after a high-speed chase. The officers involved in the
beating have been taken off patrol.;    Los Angeles Police Chief Daryl Gates,
long controversial for racial statements he has made, called the brutality
depicted on the tape ""an aberration."";    ""Anyone who viewed this tape would
hasten to make a quick judgment,"" Gates said Tuesday. ""I would hope the public
on this one case not make a judgment on the Los Angeles Police Department."";  
 The department issued no statements Wednesday. Agencies including the FBI,
the LAPD, Los Angeles District Attorney's Office and the California Highway
Patrol are investigating the beating. A city councilman also has asked for a
council committee review of the larger issue of police brutality throughout
the city.;    The stunning videotape was recorded by George Holliday, a
plumber who was awakened about 12:30 a.m. Sunday in his suburban Los Angeles
home by the sound of police helicopters overhead. Holliday went to the terrace
of his second-story apartment and, seeing police in the street below, decided
to get some practice with his new videotape recorder.;    Holliday took the
tape to a local television station, which aired it Monday night and passed it
along to the Cable News Network. By Tuesday night, the horrifying images had
been piped into more than 30 million homes: There, the 25-year-old King was
lying on the ground, struggling to his hands and knees, then writhing on the
ground under a hail of police night sticks and kicks. Witnesses said police
also used a stun gun on King. Three or four officers had at King in the
two-minute tape, while as many as seven others stood by to watch. King is
black. The races and identities of the police officers involved have not been
revealed.;    King, who had been released from jail in December after serving
2 1/2 years on a second-degree robbery conviction, had been pursued to the
spot outside Holliday's apartment by CHP and Los Angeles officers in a chase
police said reached speeds over 110 mph. Before his release Wednesday, the
father of two reportedly lay in the county jail's hospital ward with a broken
jaw, broken leg, disfigured face and badly bruised body.;    ""When I saw it on
TV, I thought, 'Is this something happening in South Africa or Kuwait?' "" said
Keith Huling, 35, who lives in the same apartment complex as Holliday. ""Then I
looked a little closer, and said, 'Hey, that's the park across the street.' "";
   Police have said King resisted arrest. Witnesses have said he did not.;   
Huling said he knows of other police beatings that he believes are racially
motivated. A prevailing sense in his neighborhood this week, he said, is that
""if I come home from work and make a turn on a red light, I'm going to get my
butt kicked."";    The perception that non-Anglos are the targets of police
brutality has been chronic here.;    ""Whether that's a perception or a reality
is almost beside the point, because the perception is the reality,"" said Zev
Yaroslavsky, the councilman who has requested public hearings on brutality
throughout the city. ""I am troubled by the fact that when I learned the person
beaten was black, I wasn't surprised. . . . It is rare that there's an Anglo
that gets the crap beat out of him with a billy club."";    Yaroslavsky pointed
to recent incidents of harassment of black people. Just last December,
businessman and former Laker Jamaal Wilkes was handcuffed during a routine
traffic stop. The police department's subsequent apology to him came on the
heels of a federal jury award of $540,000 to former major league baseball
player Joe Morgan, who said Los Angeles police in 1988 had grabbed him by the
neck, thrown him to the ground and cuffed him at Los Angeles International
Airport when they thought he was a drug courier.;    Last year, 55 residents
of one of the city's streets accepted a $3 million settlement for damages from
a 1988 police drug raid in which officers allegedly wrecked apartments and
beat several people.;    ""I don't think the body politic in Los Angeles has
been willing to address it,"" Yaroslavsky said. ""But what the public has seen
in black and white, no pun intended, leaves nothing to the imagination, leaves
nothing to interpretation, (and) probably is the one event that may sensitize""
the politicians.;    The Police Misconduct Lawyer Referral Service so far this
year has received 531 complaints of police misconduct, including 127 involving
officers in the LAPD, according to Karol Heppe, the non-profit organization's
executive director. The total number of complaints is 75 percent higher than
it was at this time last year, Heppe said.;    The complaints range from
illegal search and seizure to verbal abuse to death, Heppe said. Most do not
lead to prosecution.;    ""The only difference between those and this one is
that this one was caught on videotape,"" she said.;    Heppe lamented that the
Los Angeles police chief's attitude does not enhance the department's
reputation. Among the racial controversies he has stirred was the suggestion
that blacks die in choke holds because they have abnormal necks.;    The
ACLU's Hicks said the organization plans today to ask for Gates' resignation.  ",30,"[ 0.46298256  0.00808207  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
294,"     ""He was screaming, 'Stop!' "" said Allen, who said he heard but did not see
his friend being beaten. ""Then he kind of quit, and all you could hear was
like bones being broken, a crunching, like a whip sound."";    In the first
complete account of the incident from one who was there, Allen, 25, said he
believed the beating of King and the blows directed at him and a second
passenger, Freddie Helms, were racially motivated.;    All three men in the
car were black. The police officers were white. As many as 21 Los Angeles
police officers were present; a sergeant and three officers have been indicted
on assault charges.;    Allen's lawyer, John C. Burton, said he would file a
federal civil rights suit. King's lawyer said Tuesday he also would file a
suit. None of the three men in the car has been charged.;    Allen tapped his
foot slowly as he sat with his lawyer Tuesday night, watching for the first
time the full seven-minute videotape, which includes the two-minute beating
that has been shown repeatedly on national television.;    The videotape has
led to calls for the resignation of Chief Daryl F. Gates and prompted
inquiries into the extent of police brutality nationwide.;    Speaking
quietly, Allen described King's erratic behavior behind the wheel on a night
when the three men had been drinking beer and said tension was heightened when
King had trouble with his seat belt as he was complying with police orders to
leave his car.;    He said that at one point a female officer intervened when
he himself was threatened with violence. ""She's the one who had her hand out
saying I didn't do anything wrong,"" Allen recalled. She was saying, 'He's the
one that had his hands up.' "";    Nevertheless, he said, he was kicked and
manhandled, and Allen said he was threatened by officers who said: ""You want
to be like your home boy? You want to be like your home boy?"";    When the
beating was over, the police officers left him and Helms standing by the side
of the road, he said. ""They said, 'Guess what?' I said, 'What?' They said,
'You're in a Crips neighborhood.' They laughed and took off."";    Allen said
he and his friends, all unemployed, came from a neighborhood claimed by the
Bloods, a rival to the Crips gang.;    Since the incident, he said, he had
spoken twice with King, 25, who suffered multiple fractures and what his
lawyer said may be permanent brain damage. King initially declined to
characterize the incident as racial.;    On his recent visits, he said, King
was having difficulty remembering the night of the beating in a coherent way.
""It sounded like he was talking in riddles, all mixed up,"" Allen said.;    As
Allen recalls it, the late-night incident began with the three men speeding
down the Foothill Freeway in northern Los Angeles at what might have been as
fast as 80 miles an hour. Burton said the men had each drunk a 40-ounce bottle
of Old English 800 malt liquor.;    Burton said, ""Drugs had absolutely nothing
to do with this incident."" Medical tests also showed that King was free of
drugs.;    After visiting at Allen's house, King told his friends he was
taking them to a park where he had gone in the past with his father.;    When
he saw the flashing lights of a California Highway Patrol car behind them,
Allen said: ""I told him, 'Rodney, pull over, stop.' He just kept on going,
kept on driving.;    ""I thought he was pulling over, but he was going down the
off-ramp. We stopped at the stop sign, and then we were driving again. I said,
'Rodney, pull over.' We were still driving, and the lights were flashing. I
could hear a lot of cars."" Their small white Hyundai was surrounded by police
cars and illuminated by the glare of headlights. It was at this point, he
said, that the other passenger, Helms, who had been asleep in the front seat,
woke up.;    ""The police ordered us, 'Driver, put your hands out the window,""'
Allen continued. ""They said, 'Take your left hand outside the door and step
out.' Rodney had the seat belt, and it kind of yanked him back. The police
were getting nervous too. They told him to lie flat down, and he lay flat
down."";    Allen said he and Helms left the car on the opposite side, beside a
large, dark park, and also lay down.;    ""The police put the handcuffs on me,
and that's when I heard Rodney screaming,"" Allen went on. ""He was screaming
like he was getting a whupping."";    After the screaming stopped, he said, he
continued to hear the whipping sound of the nightsticks through the clatter of
a hovering helicopter.  ",30,"[ 0.51896563  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
295,"     Hundreds of confidential documents obtained by the Los Angeles Times
indicate that officers who stopped the Altadena motorist played down his
injuries in their official reports.;    But Highway Patrol officers at the
scene told investigators that they were shocked by the ferocity of the
beating.;    Police have now determined that 21 Los Angeles police officers
were at the scene, instead of 15 as initially reported. There were also three
Highway Patrol officers and two school police officers.;    Police officers,
unaware that they had been videotaped by an amateur video buff, said in their
reports that King suffered cuts and bruises ""of a minor nature."";    In
contrast, the Highway Patrol officers were so taken aback that they jotted
down Los Angeles officers' names.;    ""I didn't see any need to hit him with a
baton,"" Officer Melanie Singer of the Highway Patrol later told
investigators.;    The conflicting accounts are contained in hundreds of pages
of confidential police reports, witness interviews and other official law
enforcement materials collected by investigators and studied by the county
grand jury, which indicted a sergeant and three officers last week.;    In
""use of force"" reports submitted by Sgt. Stacey Koon and officers Laurence M.
Powell and Timothy Wind, King's injuries were listed as ""contusions and
abrasions."";    They also marked boxes on the use of force reports saying King
""attacked officers,"" ""continued some resistance"" and ""increased his
resistance."" The videotape shows that King was often in a defenseless
position.;    The grand jury indicted Koon, Powell, Wind and Officer Ted
Briseno on charges of assault with a deadly weapon and beating a suspect under
color of authority. Koon and Powell were also charged with filing a false
police report.;    After the arrest, Koon wrote in his daily report that
reinforcements are needed to ensure a suspect's submission because sometimes
batons and electric stun guns don't work the way they are supposed to.;   
Highway Patrol Officers Tim and Melanie Singer said they saw the first
half-dozen blows inflicted on King. Another Highway Patrol officer, Gabriel
Aid, said he arrived after King was hogtied. Aid said one Los Angeles police
officer asked him, ""Did you get any blood on your hands?"";    The Singers, a
husband-and-wife team, saw King when he and two passengers were driving on
Interstate 210 at what Melanie Singer estimated were speeds of up to 100 mph.;
   She said King refused to stop, even after her husband advised him over
their car bullhorn: ""Pull over to the right. We won't hurt you."";    Los
Angeles police joined the pursuit. Melanie Singer said that, when King got out
of the car, he appeared jovial, dancing and ""heavily intoxicated."" One
passenger in King's car said they had been drinking malt liquor.;    As
Melanie Singer approached King, she said Koon told her, ""No, no. Get back.
We'll handle."" She said Koon shot King twice with a Taser stun gun, and King
stumbled to the ground.;    ""Officer Powell ran up and struck the suspect on
the right side of his head with his baton,"" she told investigators. ""The
suspect clasped his hands to his face and screamed with pain. He was bleeding.
Powell then struck him five to six more times in rapid succession in the head
and neck area."";    She described the blows as ""causing his face to split."";  
 At that point, she said, another Los Angeles police officer grabbed Powell's
arm to stop him, and Koon yelled at Powell, ""Stop! Stop! That's enough!"";   
""Mr. King appeared to be less resistive,"" she recalled. ""I considered him
disabled."";    None of the Los Angeles officers gave King instructions, she
said.  ",30,"[ 0.50522791  0.00938853  0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
296,"     ""He was screaming, 'Stop!' "" said Allen, who said he heard but did not see
his friend being beaten. ""Then he kind of quit, and all you could hear was
like bones being broken, a crunching, like a whip sound."";    In the first
complete account of the incident from one who was there, Allen, 25, said he
believed the beating of King and the blows directed at him and a second
passenger, Freddie Helms, were racially motivated.;    All three men in the
car were black. The police officers were white. As many as 21 Los Angeles
police officers were present; a sergeant and three officers have been indicted
on assault charges.;    Allen's lawyer, John C. Burton, said he would file a
federal civil rights suit. King's lawyer said Tuesday he also would file a
suit. None of the three men in the car has been charged.;    Allen tapped his
foot slowly as he sat with his lawyer Tuesday night, watching for the first
time the full seven-minute videotape, which includes the two-minute beating
that has been shown repeatedly on national television.;    The videotape has
led to calls for the resignation of Police Chief Daryl F. Gates and prompted
inquiries into the extent of police brutality nationwide.;    Speaking
quietly, Allen described King's erratic behavior behind the wheel on a night
when the three men had been drinking beer and said tension was heightened when
King had trouble with his seat belt as he was complying with police orders to
leave his car.;    Female officer intervened;  He said that at one point a
female officer intervened when he himself was threatened with violence. ""She's
the one who had her hand out saying I didn't do anything wrong,"" Allen
recalled. She was saying, 'He's the one that had his hands up.' "";   
Nevertheless, he said, he was kicked and manhandled and threatened by officers
who said: ""You want to be like your home boy? You want to be like your home
boy?"";    Allen said he believed that remarks like ""home boy,"" along with his
physical treatment, were part of an attempt to provoke him.;    Asked why else
he thought the incident was racial, he added, ""Three blacks in a car, all
white policemen, the way they look at us."";    Since the incident, he said, he
had spoken twice with King, who suffered multiple fractures and what his
lawyer said may be permanent brain damage. King initially declined to
characterize the incident as racial.;    King can't seem to remember;  He and
King, who is also 25, have known each other at least since they were 13, Allen
said.;    On his recent visits, he said, King was having difficulty
remembering the night of the beating in a coherent way. ""It sounded like he
was talking in riddles, all mixed up,"" Allen said.;    As Allen recalls it,
the late-night incident began with the three men speeding down the Foothill
Freeway in northern Los Angeles at what might have been as fast as 80 mph.
Burton said the men had each drunk a 40-ounce bottle of Olde English 800 malt
liquor.;    Burton said, ""Drugs had absolutely nothing to do with this
incident."" Medical tests also showed that King was free of drugs.;    After
visiting at Allen's house, the young man said, King told his friends he was
taking them to a park where he had gone in the past with his father.;    When
he saw the flashing lights of a California Highway Patrol car behind them,
Allen said: ""I told him, 'Rodney, pull over, stop.' He just kept on going,
kept on driving."";    He said King continued driving on the freeway for about
five minutes, with the patrol car behind them, during which time he continued
to urge him to pull over.;    'Rodney, stop';  ""We stopped at a red light and
took off again. We came to another red light. I told him, 'Rodney, stop,' and
he finally went to pull over and he stopped."";    Their small white Hyundai
was surrounded by police cars and illuminated by the glare of headlights.;   
""The police ordered us, 'Driver, put your hands out the window,' "" Allen
continued. ""Rodney had the seat belt, and it kind of yanked him back. The
police were getting nervous, too. They told him to lie flat down, and he lay
flat down."";    Allen said he and Helms left the car on the opposite side,
beside a large, dark park, and also lay down.;    ""The police put the
handcuffs on me, and that's when I heard Rodney screaming,"" Allen went on.;   
After the screaming stopped, he said, he continued to hear the whipping sound
of the nightsticks through the clatter of a hovering helicopter. Police
officers in Los Angeles use standard-issue PR-24 aluminum nightsticks that are
24 inches long and weigh 27 ounces.;    ""They made me crawl a certain way, to
scoot. I was flat down. I was definitely frightened. I thought I was going to
get shot or something."";    By that time, he said, King had stopped screaming.
""I just closed my eyes,"" Allen said. ""Whatever was happening to him, I didn't
want to see.""  ",30,"[ 0.58384893  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
297,"     King, who never enjoyed sitting at home, now leads a sedentary, largely
secluded life, venturing out with a wheelchair and cane mainly for medical
treatment. Never much of a bookworm, the 25-year-old laborer and high school
dropout does not even enjoy television these days because ""every time he turns
on the TV, he sees something on it"" about the beating, ex-wife Dennetta King
said.;    ""He's depressed, he's scared,"" she said, adding that she speaks with
King about twice a week, mainly about their daughters. ""That's about all he
talks about."";    ""He's depressed because they beat him like that and he feels
that his manhood has been taken, and he's scared because he doesn't know if
they're going to try to beat him up again or kill him or what,"" she said.;   
Dennetta King said her ex-husband has been staying at a series of undisclosed,
private homes with family members because of threats.;    King's attorney,
Steven Lerman of Beverly Hills, said he has hired security guards to ""watch
(out) for him."";    Lerman has filed an $83 million claim against the city on
King's behalf. Three Los Angeles police officers and a sergeant have been
indicted on charges of excessive force in the case, while investigations
continue into the culpability of 17 other officers present.;    Although the
March 3 videotaped beating has been replayed across the country and overseas,
igniting an unprecedented political war within city government and a series of
investigations, King himself has avoided publicity.;    Lerman said he has
declined all requests for interviews with King from reporters because ""I don't
feel he's in any kind of shape to be seen."";    King's neat, blue home in
Altadena has the curtains drawn, its phone number and those of other family
members long changed. Neighbors say they do not hear from King directly, and
only occasionally catch word that ""he's doing OK"" or ""getting by."";    King
suffers from painful headaches, and numbness on the right side of his face
where the bones of his cheek and eye were fractured ""like an eggshell,"" said
his plastic surgeon, Dr. Alvin Reiter.;    King's bones appear to be healing
well after five hours of reconstructive surgery March 14, Reiter said. The
natural tightening of the skin during the healing process has created
""significant bumps and depressions"" on King's face that probably will require
more surgery.;    ""He's very concerned about what he's going to look like,""
Reiter said.;    Dennetta King said Rodney was always proud of his good looks
and used to take longer than her to wash and dress. ""He loves his teeth and
face,"" she said. ""He brushed quite a bit, and used to get on the girls all the
time about brushing their teeth. He believed in pretty teeth."";    King
remains under investigation in the Feb. 21 armed robbery of a Los Angeles
video store. Los Angeles police have acknowledged he became a suspect in the
case, in which a store clerk was shot in the shoulder, only after the March 3
beating when his photograph was widely broadcast on television. He is on
parole for a 1989 robbery of a Monterey Park grocer.  ",30,"[ 0.47933122  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
298,"     Near the end of his prepared statement, the district attorney said that
""while many of the bystander officers were deeply disturbed by what occurred,
. . . to this day, some of the officers present do not acknowledge that the
incident should have been handled any differently than it was."";    Because
the beating still is under investigation, he declined to elaborate or answer
reporters' questions. But he said he would forward the ""disturbing interviews""
to the local independent commission investigating the police department. The
commission has no disciplinary power.;    ""I couldn't be more disappointed,""
said Mark Ridley-Thomas, a city council candidate and executive director of
this area's chapter of the Southern Christian Leadership Conference. ""We had
expectations that these lawbreakers -- and passive though they may have been,
they were lawbreakers -- would be dealt with accordingly. . . . We have not
given up on this."";    The American Civil Liberties Union plans to see whether
it can take any legal action on the grand jury's decision.;    ""Some of these
officers have strongly defended the activities surrounding Rodney King . . .
which is an incredible thing to say under investigation,"" ACLU spokesman Joe
Hicks said. ""We do not have a lot of confidence in the justice department and
(its) past record of investigation and prosecution of police abuse around the
country."";    The Los Angeles Times reported that the grand jury heard from
seven officers, including five rookies who witnessed King's arrest. The
rookies said the scene that night was chaotic and noisy, that King appeared
dangerous and possibly high on PCP, and that the sergeant there seemed to be
in charge. Officers reportedly weren't asked why they did not try to stop the
beating.;    In his statement, Reiner said that ""however morally wrong their
failure to intercede, in California law, there is no criminal statute under
which these officers can be indicted. . . . Because the behavior of the
bystander officers was both irresponsible and offensive, and in light of the
unprecedented public furor over this case, the grand jury is to be commended
for remaining true to their duty."";    King's March 3 beating, captured on
videotape, spawned outrage throughout the world and led to criminal charges by
the grand jury against four Los Angeles Police Department officers.;    Police
Chief Daryl Gates earlier this week fired one of the officers, a rookie still
on probation, and suspended the other three without pay pending hearings that
could lead to their dismissal.;    Besides those four, at least 17 other LAPD
officers were present at the scene of the beating. There also were two from
the California Highway Patrol and two from the Los Angeles Unified School
District.;    The police department's internal investigation of its bystanders
is continuing, Cmdr. Rick Dinse said. While he would not discuss the
investigation or its results, Dinse said that behavior ""doesn't have to be
criminal for us to take action."";    Only the police chief has the power,
after extensive review, to discipline officers. Whether Chief Gates will be
the one to rule on these officers remains a question. A Superior Court judge
is reviewing whether the city's police commission had the right to put Gates
on leave last month, and whether the city council has the right to reinstate
him.  ",30,"[ 0.42366371  0.          0.         ...,  0.          0.          0.        ]"
